ab LIBRARY OF THE FUTURE (R) First Edition Ver. 4.02 
 Gulliver's Travels                                               Swift Jonathan        

                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                      1726                                  
                                                                            
                                                                            
                               GULLIVER'S TRAVELS                           
                                                                            
                               by Jonathan Swift                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                  watermonger
waterphone
waterpot
waterproof
waterproofer
waterproofing
waterproofness
waterquake
waterscape
watershed
watershoot
waterside
watersider
waterskin
watersmeet
waterspout
waterstead
watertight
watertightal
watertightness
waterward
waterwards
waterway
waterweed
waterwise
waterwoman
waterwood
waterwork
waterworker
waterworm
waterworn
waterwort
watery
wath
wathstead
Watsonia
watt
wattage
wattape
wattle
wattlebird
wattled
wattless
wattlework
wattling
wattman
wattmeter
Watusi
wauble
wauch
wauchle
waucht
wauf
waugh
waughy
wauken
waukit
waukrife
waul
waumle
wauner
wauns
waup
waur
Waura
wauregan
wauve
wavable
wavably
Wave
wave
waved
waveless
wavelessly
wavelessness
wavelet
wavelike
wavellite
wavemark
wavement
wavemeter
waveproof
waver
waverable
waverer
wavering
waveringly
waveringness
waverous
wavery
waveson
waveward
wavewise
wavey
wavicle
wavily
waviness
waving
wavingly
Wavira
wavy
waw
wawa
wawah
wawaskeesh
wax
waxberry
waxbill
waxbird
waxbush
waxchandler
waxchandlery
waxen
waxer
waxflower
Waxhaw
waxhearted
waxily
waxiness
waxing
waxingly
waxlike
waxmaker
waxmaking
waxman
waxweed
waxwing
waxwork
waxworker
waxworking
waxy
way
wayaka
wayang
Wayao
wayback
wayberry
waybill
waybird
waybook
waybread
waybung
wayfare
wayfarer
wayfaring
wayfaringly
wayfellow
waygang
waygate
waygoing
waygone
waygoose
wayhouse
waying
waylaid
waylaidlessness
waylay
waylayer
wayleave
wayless
waymaker
wayman
waymark
waymate
Wayne
waypost
ways
wayside
waysider
waysliding
waythorn
wayward
waywarden
waywardly
waywardness
waywiser
waywode
waywodeship
wayworn
waywort
wayzgoose
Wazir
we
Wea
weak
weakbrained
weaken
weakener
weakening
weakfish
weakhanded
weakhearted
weakheartedly
weakheartedness
weakish
weakishly
weakishness
weakliness
weakling
weakly
weakmouthed
weakness
weaky
weal
weald
Wealden
wealdsman
wealth
wealthily
wealthiness
wealthless
wealthmaker
wealthmaking
wealthmonger
Wealthy
wealthy
weam
wean
weanable
weanedness
weanel
weaner
weanling
Weanoc
weanyer
Weapemeoc
weapon
weaponed
weaponeer
weaponless
weaponmaker
weaponmaking
weaponproof
weaponry
weaponshaw
weaponshow
weaponshowing
weaponsmith
weaponsmithy
wear
wearability
wearable
wearer
weariable
weariableness
wearied
weariedly
weariedness
wearier
weariful
wearifully
wearifulness
weariless
wearilessly
wearily
weariness
wearing
wearingly
wearish
wearishly
wearishness
wearisome
wearisomely
wearisomenessermaker
weathermaking
weatherman
weathermost
weatherology
weatherproof
weatherproofed
weatherproofing
weatherproofness
weatherward
weatherworn
weathery
weavable

wearishly
wearishness
wearisome
wearisomely
wearisomenessermaker
weathermaking
weatherman
weathermost
weatherology
weatherproof
weatherproofed
weatherproofing
weatherproofness
weatherward
weatherworn
weathery
weavable                                                          
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
 Electronically Enhanced Text (c) Copyright 1991, World Library, Inc.       
                                                                            
LETTER_TO_SYMPSON                                                           
  A LETTER FROM CAPTAIN GULLIVER TO HIS COUSIN SYMPSON                      
-                                                                           
  I hope you will be ready to own publicly, whenever you shall be           
called to it, that by your great and frequent urgency you prevailed on      
me to publish a very loose and uncorrect account of my travels; with        
direction to hire some young gentlemen of either university to put          
them in order, and correct the style, as my cousin Dampier did by my        
advice, in his book called A Voyage round the World. But I do not           
remember I gave you power to consent that any thing should be omitted,      
and much less that any thing should be inserted: therefore, as to           
the latter, I do here renounce every thing of that kind;                    
particularly a paragraph about her Majesty the late Queen Anne, of          
most pious and glorious memory; although I did reverence and esteem         
her more than any of human species. But you, or your interpolator,          
ought to have considered, that as it was not my inclination, so was it      
not decent to praise any animal of our composition before my master         
Houyhnhnm: and besides the fact was altogether false; for to my             
knowledge, being in England during some part of her Majesty's reign,        
she did govern by a chief minister; nay, even by two successively; the      
first whereof was the Lord of Godolphin, and the second the Lord of         
Oxford; so that you have made me say the thing that was not. Likewise,      
in the account of the Academy of Projectors, and several passages of        
my discourse to my master Houyhnhnm, you have either omitted some           
material circumstances, or minced or changed them in such a manner,         
that I do hardly know my own work. When I formerly hinted to you            
something of this in a letter, you were pleased to answer that you          
were afraid of giving offense; that people in power were very watchful      
over the press, and apt not only to interpret, but to punish every          
thing which looked like an innuendo (as I think you called it). But         
pray, how could that which I spoke so many years ago, and at about          
five thousand leagues distance, in another reign, be applied to any of      
the Yahoos who now are said to govern the herd; especially at a time        
when I little thought on or feared the unhappiness of living under          
them? Have not I the most reason to complain, when I see these very         
Yahoos carried by Houyhnhnms in a vehicle, as if these were brutes,         
and those the rational creatures? And indeed, to avoid so monstrous         
and detestable a sight was one principal motive of my retirement            
hither.                                                                     
  Thus much I thought proper to tell you in relation to yourself,           
and to the trust I reposed in you.                                          
  I do in the next place complain of my own great want of judgement,        
in being prevailed upon by the entreaties and false reasonings of           
you and some others, very much against my own opinion, to suffer my         
travels to be published. Pray bring to your mind how often I desired        
you to consider, when you insisted on the motive of public good;            
that the Yahoos were a species of animals utterly incapable of              
amendment by precepts or examples: and so it hath proved; for               
instead of seeing a full stop put to all abuses and corruptions, at         
least in this little island, as I had reason to expect: behold,             
after above six months warning, I cannot learn that my book hath            
produced one single effect according to my intentions: I desired you        
would let me know by a letter, when party and faction were                  
extinguished; judges learned and upright; pleaders honest and               
modest, with some tincture of common sense; and Smithfield blazing          
with pyramids of lawbooks; the young nobility's education entirely          
changed; the physicians banished; the female Yahoos abounding in            
virtue, honour, truth and good sense; courts and levees of great            
ministers thoroughly weeded and swept; wit, merit and learning              
rewarded; all disgracers of the press in prose and verse condemned          
to eat nothing but their own cotton, and quench their thirst with           
their own ink. These and a thousand other reformations, I firmly            
counted upon by your encouragement; as indeed they were plainly             
deducible from the precepts delivered in my book. And it must be owned      
that seven months were a sufficient time to correct every vice and          
folly to which Yahoos are subject, if their natures had been capable        
of the least disposition to virtue or wisdom: yet so far have you been      
from answering my expectation in any of your letters, that on the           
contrary you are loading our carrier every week with libels, and keys,      
and reflections, and memoirs, and second parts; wherein I see myself        
accused of reflecting upon great states-folk, of degrading human            
nature (for so they have still the confidence to style it), and of          
abusing the female sex. I find likewise that the writers of those           
bundles are not agreed among themselves; for some of them will not          
allow me to be author of my own travels; and others make me author          
of books to which I am wholly a stranger.                                   
  I find likewise that your printer hath been so careless as to             
confound the times, and mistake the dates of my several voyages and         
returns; neither assigning the true year, or the true month, or day of      
the month: and I hear the original manuscript is all destroyed since        
the publication of my book. Neither have I any copy left: however I         
have sent you some corrections, which you may insert, if ever there         
should be a second edition: and yet I cannot stand to them, but             
shall leave that matter to my judicious and candid readers, to              
adjust it as they please.                                                   
  I hear some of our sea-Yahoos find fault with my sea-language, as         
not proper in many parts, nor now in use. I cannot help it. In my           
first voyages, while I was young, I was instructed by the oldest            
mariners, and learned to speak as they did. But I have since found          
that the sea-Yahoos are apt, like the land ones, to become new-fangled      
in their words, which the latter change every year, insomuch as I           
remember upon each return to my own country their old dialect was so        
altered that I could hardly understand the new. And I observe, when         
any Yahoo comes from London out of curiosity visit me at my own house,      
we neither of us are able to deliver our conceptions in a manner            
intelligible to the other.                                                  
                                            {LETTER_TO_SYMPSON ^paragraph 5}
  If the censure of Yahoos could any way affect me, I should have           
great reason to complain that some of them are so bold as to think          
my book of travels a mere fiction out of my own brain, and have gone        
so far as to drop hints that the Houyhnhnms and Yahoos have no more         
existence than the inhabitants of Utopia.                                   
  Indeed I must confess, that as to the people of Lilliput,                 
Brobdingrag (for so the word should have been spelt, and not                
erroneously Brobdingnag), and Laputa, I have never yet heard of any         
Yahoo so presumptuous as to dispute their being, or the facts I have        
related concerning them; because the truth immediately strikes every        
reader with conviction. And is there less probability in my account of      
the Houyhnhnms or Yahoos, when it is manifest as to the latter,             
there are so many thousands even in this city, who only differ from         
their brother brutes in Houyhnhnm-land, because they use a sort of a        
jabber, and do not go naked? I wrote for their amendment, and not           
their approbation. The united praise of the whole race would be of          
less consequence to me than the neighing of those two degenerate            
Houyhnhnms I keep in my stable; because from these, degenerate as they      
are, I still improve in some virtues, without any mixture of vice.          
  Do these miserable animals presume to think that I am so far              
degenerated as to defend my veracity? Yahoo as I am, it is well             
known through all Houyhnhnm-land, that by the instructions and example      
of my illustrious master I was able in the compass of two years             
(although I confess with the utmost difficulty) to remove that              
infernal habit of lying, shuffling, deceiving, and equivocating, so         
deeply rooted in the very souls of all my species, especially the           
Europeans.                                                                  
  I have other complaints to make upon this vexatious occasion; but         
I forbear troubling myself or you any further. I must freely                
confess, that since my last return some corruptions of my Yahoo nature      
have revived in me by conversing with a few of your species, and            
particularly those of my own family, by an unavoidable necessity; else      
I should never have attempted so absurd a project as that of reforming      
the Yahoo race in this kingdom; but I have now done with all visionary      
schemes for ever.                                                           
-                                                                           
-                                                                           
April 2, 1727.                                                              
                                                                            
PUBLISHERS_LETTER                                                           
  THE PUBLISHER TO THE READER                                               
-                                                                           
  The author of these Travels, Mr. Lemuel Gulliver, is my ancient           
and intimate friend; there is likewise some relation between us by the      
mother's side. About three years ago Mr. Gulliver, growing weary of         
the concourse of curious people coming to him at his house in Redriff,      
made a small purchase of land, with a convenient house, near Newark in      
Nottinghamshire, his native country; where he now lives retired, yet        
in good esteem among his neighbors.                                         
  Although Mr. Gulliver was born in Nottinghamshire, where his              
father dwelt, yet I have heard him say his family came from                 
Oxfordshire; to confirm which, I have observed in the churchyard at         
Banbury, in that county, several tombs and monuments of the Gullivers.      
  Before he quitted Redriff, he left the custody of the following           
papers in my hands, with the liberty to dispose of them as I should         
think fit. I have carefully perused them three times: the style is          
very plain and simple; and the only fault I find is, that the               
author, after the manner of travelers, is a little too circumstantial.      
There is an air of truth apparent through the whole; and indeed the         
author was so distinguished for his veracity, that it became a sort of      
proverb among his neighbors at Redriff, when any one affirmed a thing,      
to say it was as true as if Mr. Gulliver had spoke it.                      
  By the advice of several worthy persons, to whom, with the                
author's permission, I communicated these papers, I now venture to          
send them into the world, hoping they may be at least, for some             
time, a better entertainment to our young noblemen than the common          
scribbles of politics and party.                                            
  This volume would have been at least twice as large, if I had not         
made bold to strike out innumerable passages relating to the winds and      
tides, as well as to the variations and bearings in the several             
voyages; together with the minute descriptions of the management of         
the ship in storms, in the style of sailors: likewise the account of        
the longitudes and latitudes; wherein I have reason to apprehend            
that Mr. Gulliver may be a little dissatisfied: but I was resolved          
to fit the work as much as possible to the general capacity of              
readers. However, if my own ignorance in sea-affairs shall have led me      
to commit some mistakes, I alone am answerable for them: and if any         
traveler hath a curiosity to see the whole work at large, as it came        
from the hand of the author, I shall be ready to gratify him.               
                                            {PUBLISHERS_LETTER ^paragraph 5}
  As for any further particulars relating to the author, the reader         
will receive satisfaction from the first pages of the book.                 
-                                                                           
                                          Richard Sympson.                  
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                     PART I                                 
                                                                            
                              A VOYAGE TO LILLIPUT                          
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                  (SEE PLATE 1)                             
                                                                            
P_1|CH_1                                                                    
  CHAPTER I                                                                 
-                                                                           
  My father had a small estate in Nottinghamshire; I was the third          
of five sons. He sent me to Emanuel College in Cambridge at fourteen        
years old, where I resided three years, and applied myself close to my      
studies: but the charge of maintaining me (although I had a very            
scanty allowance) being too great for a narrow fortune, I was bound         
apprentice to Mr. James Bates, an eminent surgeon in London, with whom      
I continued four years; and my father now and then sending me small         
sums of money, I laid them out in learning navigation, and other parts      
of the mathematics, useful to those who intend to travel, as I              
always believed it would be some time or other my fortune to do.            
When I left Mr. Bates, I went down to my father; where, by the              
assistance of him and my uncle John, and some other relations, I got        
forty pounds, and a promise of thirty pounds a year to maintain me          
at Leyden: there I studied physic two years and seven months,               
knowing it would be useful in long voyages.                                 
  Soon after my return from Leyden, I was recommended, by my good           
master Mr. Bates, to be surgeon to the Swallow, Captain Abraham             
Pannell commander; with whom I continued three years and a half,            
making a voyage or two into the Levant, and some other parts. When I        
came back, I resolved to settle in London, to which Mr. Bates, my           
master, encouraged me, and by him I was recommended to several              
patients. I took part of a small house in the Old Jury; and being           
advised to alter my condition, I married Mrs. Mary Burton, second           
daughter to Mr. Edmund Burton, hosier, in Newgate-street, with whom         
I received four hundred pounds for a portion.                               
  But, my good master Bates dying in two years after, and I having few      
friends, my business began to fail; for my conscience would not suffer      
me to imitate the bad practice of too many among my brethren. Having        
therefore consulted with my wife, and some of my acquaintance, I            
determined to go again to sea. I was surgeon successively in two            
ships, and made several voyages, for six years, to the East and West        
Indies, by which I got some addition to my fortune. My hours of             
leisure I spent in reading the best authors, ancient and modern, being      
always provided with a good number of books; and when I was ashore, in      
observing the manners and dispositions of the people, well as learning      
their language, wherein I had a great facility by the strength of my        
memory.                                                                     
  The last of these voyages not proving very fortunate, I grew weary        
of the sea, and intended to stay at home with my wife and family. I         
removed from the Old jury to Fetter-Lane, and from thence to Wapping        
hoping to get business among the sailors; but it would not turn to          
account. After three years expectation that things would mend, I            
accepted an advantageous offer from Captain William Prichard, master        
of the Antelope, who was making a voyage to the South-Sea. We set sail      
from Bristol May 4, 1699, and our voyage at first was very prosperous.      
  It would not be proper, for some reasons, to trouble the reader with      
the particulars of our adventures in those seas: let it suffice to          
inform him, that in our passage from thence to the East Indies, we          
were driven by a violent storm to the northwest of Van Diemen's             
Land. By an observation, we found ourselves in the latitude of 30           
degrees 2 minutes south. Twelve of our crew were dead by immoderate         
labor and ill food, the rest were in a very weak condition. On the          
fifth of November, which was the beginning of summer in those parts,        
the weather being very hazy, the seamen spied a rock, within half a         
cable's length of the ship; but the wind was so strong, that we were        
driven directly upon it, and immediately split. Six of the crew, of         
whom I was one, having let down the boat into the sea, made a shift to      
get clear of the ship, and the rock. We rowed by my computation             
about three leagues, till we were able to work no longer, being             
already spent with labor while we were in the ship. We therefore            
trusted ourselves to the mercy of the waves, and in about half an hour      
the boat was overset by a sudden flurry from the north. What became of      
my companions in the boat, as well as of those who escaped on the           
rock, or were left in the vessel, I cannot tell; but conclude they          
were all lost. For my own part, I swam as fortune directed me, and was      
pushed forward by wind and tide. I often let my legs drop, and could        
feel no bottom: but when I was almost gone, and able to struggle no         
longer, I found myself within my depth; and by this time the storm was      
much abated. The declivity was so small, that I walked near a mile          
before I got to the shore, which I conjectured was about eight o'clock      
in the evening. I then advanced forward near half a mile, but could         
not discover any sign of houses or inhabitants; at least I was in so        
weak a condition, that I did not observe them. I was extremely              
tired, and with that, and the heat of the weather, and about half a         
pint of brandy that I drank as I left the ship, I found myself much         
inclined to sleep. I lay down on the grass, which was very short and        
soft, where I slept sounder than ever I remember to have done in my         
life, and, as I reckoned, above nine hours; for when I awakened, it         
was just daylight. I attempted to rise, but was not able to stir            
for, as I happened to he on my back, I found my arms and legs were          
strongly fastened on each side to the ground; and my hair, which was        
long and thick, tied down in the same manner. I likewise felt               
several slender ligatures across my body, from my armpits to my             
thighs. I could only look upwards; the sun began to grow hot, and           
the light offended my eyes. I heard a confused noise about me, but          
in the posture I lay, could see nothing except the sky. In a little         
time I felt something alive moving on my left leg, which advancing          
gently forward over my breast, came almost up to my chin; when bending      
my eyes downwards as much as I could, I perceived it to be a human          
creature not six inches high, with a bow and arrow in his hands, and a      
quiver at his back. In the meantime, I felt at least forty more of the      
same kind (as I conjectured) following the first. I was in the              
utmost astonishment, and roared so loud, that they all ran back in a        
fright; and some of them, as I was afterwards told, were hurt with the      
falls they got by leaping from my sides upon the ground. However, they      
soon returned, and one of them, who ventured so far as to get a full        
sight of my face, lifting up his hands and eyes by way of                   
admiration, cried out in a shrill but distinct voice, Hekinah degul:        
the others repeated the same words several times, but I then knew           
not what they meant. I lay all this while, as the reader may                
believe, in great uneasiness: at length, struggling to get loose, I         
had the fortune to break the strings, and wrench out the pegs that          
fastened my left arm to the ground; for, by lifting it up to my             
face, I discovered the methods they had taken to bind me, and at the        
same time, with a violent pull, which gave me excessive pain, I a           
little loosened the strings that tied down my hair on the left side,        
so that I was just able to turn my head about two inches. But the           
creatures ran off a second time, before I could seize them;                 
whereupon there was a great shout in a very shrill accent, and after        
it ceased, I heard one of them cry aloud, Tolgo phonac; when in an          
instant I felt above a hundred arrows discharged on my left hand,           
which pricked me like so many needles; and besides they shot another        
flight into the air, as we do bombs in Europe, whereof many, I              
suppose, fell on my body (though I felt them not) and some on my face,      
which I immediately covered with my left hand. When this shower of          
arrows was over, I fell a groaning with grief and pain, and then            
striving again to get loose, they discharged another volley larger          
than the first, and some of them attempted with spears to stick me          
in the sides; but, by good luck, I had on me a buff jerkin, which they      
could not pierce. I thought it the most prudent method to lie still,        
and my design was to continue so till night, when, my left hand             
being already loose, I could easily free myself: and as for the             
inhabitants, I had reason to believe I might be a match for the             
greatest armies they could bring against me, if they were all of the        
same size with him that I saw. But fortune disposed otherwise of me.        
When the people observed I was quiet, they discharged no more               
arrows; but, by the noise I heard, I knew their numbers increased; and      
about four yards from me, over against my right ear, I heard a              
knocking for above an hour, like that of people at work; when               
turning my head that way, as well as the pegs and strings would permit      
me, I saw a stage erected, about a foot and a half from the ground,         
capable of holding four of the inhabitants, with two or three               
ladders to mount it: from whence one of them, who seemed to be a            
person of quality, made me a long speech, whereof I understood not one      
syllable. But I should have mentioned, that before the principal            
person began his oration, he cried out three times, Langro dehul san        
(these words and the former were afterwards repeated and explained          
to me). Whereupon immediately about fifty of the inhabitants came, and      
cut the strings that fastened the left side of my head, which gave          
me the liberty of turning it to the right, and of observing the person      
and gesture of him that was to speak. He appeared to be of a middle         
age, and taller than any of the other three who attended him,               
whereof one was a page that held up his train, and seemed to be             
somewhat longer than my middle finger; the other two stood one on each      
side to support him. He acted every part of an orator, and I could          
observe many periods of threatenings, and others of promises, pity,         
and kindness. I answered in a few words, but in the most submissive         
manner, lifting up my left hand and both my eyes to the sun, as             
calling him for a witness; and being almost famished with hunger,           
having not eaten a morsel for some hours before I left the ship, I          
found the demands of nature so strong upon me, that I could not             
forbear showing my impatience (perhaps against the strict rules of          
decency) by putting my finger frequently on my mouth, to signify            
that I wanted food. The Hurgo (for so they call a great lord, as I          
afterwards learned) understood me very well. He descended from the          
stage, and commanded that several ladders should be applied to my           
sides, on which above a hundred of the inhabitants mounted, and walked      
towards my mouth, laden with baskets full of meat, which had been           
provided, and sent thither by the King's orders, upon the first             
intelligence he received of me. I observed there was the flesh of           
several animals, but could not distinguish them by the taste. There         
were shoulders, legs, and loins, shaped like those of mutton, and very      
well dressed, but smaller than the wings of a lark. I ate them by           
two or three at a mouthful, and took three loaves at a time, about the      
bigness of musket bullets. They supplied me as they could, showing a        
thousand marks of wonder and astonishment at my bulk and appetite. I        
then made another sign that I wanted drink. They found by my eating         
that a small quantity would not suffice me, and being a most ingenious      
people, they slung up with great dexterity one of their largest             
hogsheads, then rolled it toward my hand, and beat out the top; I           
drank it off at a draught, which I might well do, for it did not            
hold half a pint, and tasted like a small wine of Burgundy, but much        
more delicious. They brought me a second hogshead, which I drank in         
the same manner, and made signs for more, but they had none to give         
me. When I had performed these wonders, they shouted for joy, and           
danced upon my breast, repeating several times as they did at first,        
Hekinah degul. They made me a sign that I should throw down the two         
hogsheads, but first warning the people below to stand out of the way,      
crying aloud, Borach mivola, and when they saw the vessels in the air,      
there was a universal shout of Hekinah degul. I confess I was often         
tempted, while they were passing backwards and forwards on my body, to      
seize forty or fifty of the first that came in my reach, and dash them      
against the ground. But the remembrance of what I had felt, which           
probably might not be the worst they could do, and the promise of           
honor I made them, for so I interpreted my submissive behavior, soon        
drove out these imaginations. Besides, I now considered myself as           
bound by the laws of hospitality to a people who had treated me with        
so much expense and magnificence. However, in my thoughts I could           
not sufficiently wonder at the intrepidity of these diminutive              
mortals, who dare venture to mount and walk upon my body, while one of      
my hands was at liberty, without trembling at the very sight of so          
prodigious a creature as I must appear to them. After some time,            
when they observed that I made no more demands for meat, there              
appeared before me a person of high rank from his Imperial Majesty.         
His Excellency, having mounted on the small of my right leg,                
advanced forwards up to my face, with about a dozen of his retinue.         
And producing his credentials under the Signet Royal, which he applied      
close to my eyes, spoke about ten minutes, without any signs of anger,      
but with a kind of determinate resolution; often pointing forwards,         
which, as I afterwards found, was towards the capital city, about half      
a mile distant, whither it was agreed by his Majesty in council that I      
must be conveyed. I answered in few words, but to no purpose, and made      
a sign with my hand that was loose, putting it to the other (but            
over his Excellency's head, for fear of hurting him or his train)           
and then to my own head and body, to signify that I desired my              
liberty. It appeared that he understood me well enough, for he shook        
his head by way of disapprobation, and held his hand in a posture to        
show that I must be carried as a prisoner. However, he made other           
signs to let me understand that I should have meat and drink enough,        
and very good treatment. Whereupon I once more thought of attempting        
to break my bonds, but again, when I felt the smart of their arrows         
upon my face and hands, which were all in blisters, and many of the         
darts still sticking in them, and observing likewise that the number        
of my enemies increased, I gave tokens to let them know that they           
might do with me what they pleased. Upon this the Hurgo and his             
train withdrew with much civility and cheerful countenances. Soon           
after I heard a general shout, with frequent repetitions of the words,      
Peplom selan, and I felt great numbers of the people on my left side        
relaxing the cords to such a degree, that I was able to turn upon my        
right, and to ease myself with making water; which I very                   
plentifully did, to the great astonishment of the who conjecturing          
by my motions what I was going to do, immediately opened to the             
right and left on that side, to avoid the torrent which fell with such      
noise and violence from me. But before this, they had daubed my face        
and both my hands with a sort of ointment very pleasant to the              
smell, which in a few minutes removed all the smart of their arrows.        
These circumstances, added to the refreshment I had received by             
their victuals and drink, which were very nourishing, disposed me to        
sleep. I slept about eight hours, as I was afterwards assured; and          
it was no wonder, for the physicians, by the Emperor's order, had           
mingled a sleepy potion in the hogsheads of wine.                           
                                                     {P_1|CH_1 ^paragraph 5}
  It seems that upon the first moment I was discovered sleeping on the      
ground after my landing, the Emperor had early notice of it by an           
express; and determined in council that I should be tied in the manner      
I have related (which was done in the night while I slept), that            
plenty of meat and drink should be sent me, and a machine prepared          
to carry me to the capital city.                                            
  This resolution perhaps may appear very bold and dangerous, and I am      
confident would not be imitated by any prince in Europe on the like         
occasion; however, in my opinion, it was extremely prudent, as well as      
generous. For supposing these people had endeavored to kill me with         
their spears and arrows while I was asleep, I should certainly have         
awakened with the first sense of smart, which might so far have roused      
my rage and strength, as to have enabled me to break the strings            
wherewith I was tied; after which, as they were not able to make            
resistance, so they could expect no mercy.                                  
  These people are most excellent mathematicians, and arrived to great      
perfection in mechanics by the countenance and encouragement of the         
Emperor, who is a renowned patron of learning. This prince has several      
machines fixed on wheels for the carriage of trees and other great          
weights. He often builds his largest men of war, whereof some are nine      
feet long, in the woods where the timber grows, and has them carried        
on these engines three or four hundred yards to the sea. Five               
hundred carpenters and engineers were immediately set at work to            
prepare the greatest engine they had. It was a frame of wood raised         
three inches from the ground, about seven feet long and four wide,          
moving upon twenty-two wheels. The shout I heard was upon the               
arrival of this engine, which it seems set out in four hours after          
my landing. It was brought parallel to me as I lay. But the                 
principal difficulty was to raise and place me in this vehicle. Eighty      
poles, each of one foot high, were erected for this purpose, and            
very strong cords of the bigness of packthread were fastened by             
hooks to many bandages, which the workmen had girt round my neck, my        
hands, my body, and my legs. Nine hundred of the strongest men were         
employed to draw up these cords by many pulleys fastened on the poles,      
and thus, in less than three hours, I was raised and slung into the         
engine, and there tied fast. All this I was told, for while the             
whole operation was performing, I lay in a profound sleep, by the           
force of that soporiferous medicine infused into my liquor. Fifteen         
hundred of the Emperor's largest horses, each about four inches and         
a half high, were employed to draw me towards the metropolis, which,        
as I said, was half a mile distant.                                         
  About four hours after we began our journey, I awaked by a very           
ridiculous accident; for the carriage being stopped a while to              
adjust something that was out of order, two or three of the young           
natives had the curiosity to see how I looked when I was asleep;            
they climbed up into the engine, and advancing very softly to my face,      
one of them, an officer in the Guards, put the sharp end of his             
half-pike a good way up into my left nostril, which tickled my nose         
like a straw, and made me sneeze violently: whereupon they stole off        
unperceived, and it was three weeks before I knew the cause of my           
awaking so suddenly. We made a long march the remaining part of that        
day, and rested at night with five hundred guards on each side of           
me, half with torches, and half with bows and arrows, ready to shoot        
me if I should offer to stir. The next morning at sunrise we continued      
our march, and arrived within two hundred yards of the city gates           
about noon. The Emperor, and all his court, came out to meet us; but        
his great officers would by no means suffer his Majesty to endanger         
his person by mounting on my body.                                          
  At the place where the carriage stopped, there stood an ancient           
temple, esteemed to be the largest in the whole kingdom, which              
having been polluted some years before by an unnatural murder, was,         
according to the zeal of those people, looked on as profane, and            
therefore had been applied to common uses, and all the ornaments and        
furniture carried away. In this edifice it was determined I should          
lodge. The great gate fronting to the north was about four feet             
high, and almost two feet wide, through which I could easily creep. On      
each side of the gate was a small window not above six inches from the      
ground: into that on the left side, the King's smiths conveyed              
fourscore and eleven chains, like those that hang to a lady's watch in      
Europe, and almost as large, which were locked to my left leg with six      
and thirty padlocks. Over against this temple, on the other side of         
the great highway, at twenty feet distance, there was a turret at           
least five feet high. Here the Emperor ascended with many principal         
lords of his court, to have an opportunity of viewing me, as I was          
told, for I could not see them. It was reckoned that above a hundred        
thousand inhabitants came out of the town upon the same errand; and in      
spite of my guards, I believe there could not be fewer than ten             
thousand, at several times, who mounted upon my body by the help of         
ladders. But a proclamation was soon issued to forbid it upon pain          
of death. When the workmen found it was impossible for me to break          
loose, they cut all the strings that bound me; whereupon I rose up          
with as melancholy a disposition as ever I had in my life. But the          
noise and astonishment of the people at seeing me rise and walk, are        
not to be expressed. The chains that held my left leg were about two        
yards long, and gave me not only the liberty of walking backwards           
and forwards in a semi-circle; but, being fixed within four inches          
of the gate, allowed me to creep in, and lie at my full length in           
the temple.                                                                 
                                                                            
P_1|CH_2                                                                    
  CHAPTER II                                                                
-                                                                           
  When I found myself on my feet, I looked about me, and must               
confess I never beheld a more entertaining prospect. The country round      
appeared like a continued garden, and the inclosed fields, which            
were generally forty feet square, resembled so many beds of flowers.        
These fields were intermingled with woods of half a sting, and the          
tallest trees, as I could judge, appeared to be seven feet high. I          
viewed the town on my left hand, which looked like the painted scene        
of a city in a theatre.                                                     
  I had been for some hours extremely pressed by the necessities of         
nature; which was no wonder, it being almost two days since I had last      
unburdened myself. I was under great difficulties between urgency           
and shame. The best expedient I could think of, was to creep into my        
house, which I accordingly did; and shutting the gate after me, I went      
as far as the length of my chain would suffer, and discharged my            
body of that uneasy load. But this was the only time I was ever guilty      
of so uncleanly an action; for which I cannot but hope the candid           
reader will give some allowance, after he has maturely and impartially      
considered my case, and the distress I was in. From this time my            
constant practice was, as soon as I rose, to perform that business          
in open air, at the full extent of my chain, and due care was taken         
every morning before company came, that the offensive matter should be      
carried off in wheelbarrows, by two servants appointed for that             
purpose. I would not have dwelt so long upon a circumstance, that           
perhaps at first sight may appear not very momentous, if I had not          
thought it necessary to justify my character in point of cleanliness        
to the world; which I am told some of my maligners have been                
pleased, upon this and other occasions, to call in question.                
  When this adventure was at an end, I came back out of my house,           
having occasion for fresh air. The Emperor was already descended            
from the tower, and advancing on horseback towards me, which had            
like to have cost him dear; for the beast, though very well trained,        
yet wholly unused to such a sight, which appeared as if a mountain          
moved before him, he reared up on his hinder feet: but that prince,         
who is an excellent horseman, kept his seat, till his attendants ran        
in, and held the bridle, while his Majesty had time to dismount.            
When he alighted, he surveyed me round with great admiration, but kept      
without the length of my chain. He ordered his cooks and butlers,           
who were already prepared, to give me victuals and drink, which they        
pushed forward in a sort of vehicle upon wheels till I could reach          
them. I took these vehicles, and soon emptied them all; twenty of them      
were filled with meat, and ten with liquor; each of the former              
afforded me two or three good mouthfuls, and I emptied the liquor of        
ten vessels, which was contained in earthen vials, into one vehicle,        
drinking it off at a draught; and so I did with the rest. The Empress,      
and young Princes of the blood, of both sexes, attended by many             
ladies, sat at some distance in their chairs; but upon the accident         
that happened to the Emperor's horse, they alighted, and came near his      
person, which I am now going to describe. He is taller by almost the        
breadth of my nail than any of his court, which alone is enough to          
strike an awe into the beholders. His features are strong and               
masculine, with an Austrian lip and arched nose, his complexion olive,      
his countenance erect, his body and limbs well proportioned, all his        
motions graceful, and his deportment majestic. He was then past his         
prime, being twenty-eight years and three quarters old, of which he         
had reigned about seven, in great felicity, and generally                   
victorious. For the better convenience of beholding him, I lay on my        
side, so that my face was parallel to his, and he stood but three           
yards off: however, I have had him since many times in my hand, and         
therefore cannot be deceived in the description. His dress was very         
plain and simple, and the fashion of it between the Asiatic and the         
European; but he had on his head a light helmet of gold, adorned            
with jewels, and a plume on the crest. He held his sword drawn in           
his hand, to defend himself, if I should happen to break loose; it was      
almost three inches long, the hilt and scabbard were gold enriched          
with diamonds. His voice was shrill, but very clear and articulate,         
and I could distinctly hear it when I stood up. The ladies and              
courtiers were all most magnificently clad, so that the spot they           
stood upon seemed to resemble a petticoat spread on the ground,             
embroidered with figures of gold and silver. His Imperial Majesty           
spoke often to me, and I returned answers, but neither of us could          
understand a syllable. There were several of his priests and lawyers        
present (as I conjectured by their habits) who were commanded to            
address themselves to me, and I spoke to them in as many languages          
as I had the least smattering of, which were High and Low Dutch,            
Latin, French, Spanish, Italian, and Lingua Franca; but all to no           
purpose. After about two hours the court retired, and I was left            
with a strong guard, to prevent the impertinence, and probably the          
malice of the rabble, who were very impatient to crowd about me as          
near as they dare, and some of them had the impudence to shoot their        
arrows at me as I sat on the ground by the door of my house, whereof        
one very narrowly missed my left eye. But the colonel ordered six of        
the ringleaders to be seized, and thought no punishment so proper as        
to deliver them bound into my hands, which some of his soldiers             
accordingly did, pushing them forwards with the butt-ends of their          
pikes into my reach; I took them all in my right hand, put five of          
them into my coat pocket, and as to the sixth, I made a countenance as      
if I would eat him alive. The poor man squalled terribly, and the           
colonel and his officers were in much pain, especially when they saw        
me take out my penknife: but I soon put them out of fear; for, looking      
mildly, and immediately cutting the strings he was bound with, I set        
him gently on the ground, and away he ran. I treated the rest in the        
same manner, taking them one by one out of my pocket, and I observed        
both the soldiers and people were highly obliged at this mark of my         
clemency, which was represented very much to my advantage at court.         
  Towards night I with some difficulty got into my house, where I           
lay on the ground, and continued to do so about a fortnight; during         
which time the Emperor gave orders to have a bed prepared for me.           
Six hundred beds of the common measure were brought in carriages,           
and worked up in my house; a hundred and fifty of their beds sewn           
together made up the breadth and length, and these were four double,        
which however kept me but very indifferently from the hardness of           
the floor, that was of smooth stone. By the same computation they           
provided me with sheets, blankets, and coverlets, tolerable enough for      
one who had been so long inured to hardships as I.                          
  As the news of my arrival spread through the kingdom, it brought          
prodigious numbers of rich, idle, and curious people to see me; so          
that the villages were almost emptied, and great neglect of tillage         
and household affairs must have ensued, if his Imperial Majesty had         
not provided, by several proclamations and orders of state, against         
this inconveniency. He directed that those who had already beheld me        
should return home, and not presume to come within fifty yards of my        
house without license from court; whereby the secretaries of state got      
considerable fees.                                                          
                                                     {P_1|CH_2 ^paragraph 5}
  In the meantime, the Emperor held frequent councils to debate what        
course should be taken with me; and I was afterwards assured by a           
particular friend, a person of great quality, who was looked upon to        
be as much in the secret as any, that the court was under many              
difficulties concerning me. They apprehended my breaking loose, that        
my diet would be very expensive, and might cause a famine. Sometimes        
they determined to starve me, or at least to shoot me in the face           
and hands with poisoned arrows, which would soon dispatch me: but           
again they considered, that the stench of so large a carcass might          
produce a plague in the metropolis, and probably spread through the         
whole kingdom. In the midst of these consultations, several officers        
of the army went to the door of the great council chamber; and two          
of them being admitted, gave an account of my behavior to the six           
criminals above mentioned, which made so favorable an impression in         
the breast of his Majesty and the whole board in my behalf, that an         
Imperial Commission was issued out, obliging all the villages nine          
hundred yards round the city, to deliver in every morning six               
beeves, forty sheep, and other victuals for my sustenance; together         
with a proportionable quantity of bread, and wine, and other liquors        
for the due payment of which his Majesty gave assignments upon his          
treasury. For this prince lives chiefly upon his own demesnes, seldom,      
except upon great occasions, raising any subsidies upon his                 
subjects, who are bound to attend him in his wars at their own              
expense. An establishment was-also made of six hundred persons to be        
my domestics, who had board-wages allowed for their maintenance, and        
tents built for them very conveniently on each side of my door. It was      
likewise ordered, that three hundred tailors should make me a suit          
of clothes after the fashion of the country: that six of his Majesty's      
greatest scholars should be employed to instruct me in their language:      
and, lastly, that the Emperor's horses, and those of the nobility, and      
troops of guards, should be frequently exercised in my sight, to            
accustom themselves to me. All these orders were duly put in                
execution, and in about three weeks I made a great progress in              
learning their language; during which time the Emperor frequently           
honored me with his visits, and was pleased to assist my masters in         
teaching me. We began already to converse together in some sort; and        
the first words I learned were to express my desire that he would           
please give me my liberty, which I every day repeated on my knees. His      
answer, as I could apprehend it, was, that this must be a work of           
time, not to be thought on without the advice of his council, and that      
first I must Lumos kelmin pesso desmar lon Emposo; that is, swear a         
peace with him and his kingdom. However, that I should be used with         
all kindness; and he advised me to acquire, by my patience and              
discreet behavior, the good opinion of himself and his subjects. He         
desired I would not take it ill, if he gave orders to certain proper        
officers to search me; for probably I might carry about me several          
weapons, which must needs be dangerous things, if they answered the         
bulk of so prodigious a person. I said, his Majesty should be               
satisfied, for I was ready to strip myself, and turn out my pockets         
before him. This I delivered part in words, and part in signs. He           
replied, that by the laws of the kingdom I must be searched by two          
of his officers; that he knew this could not be done without my             
consent and assistance; that he had so good an opinion of my                
generosity and justice, as to trust their persons in my hands: that         
whatever they took from me should be returned when I left the country,      
or paid for at the rate which I would set upon them. I took up the two      
officers in my hands, put them first into my coat-pockets, and then         
into every other pocket about me, except my two fobs, and another           
secret pocket I had no mind should be searched, wherein I had some          
little necessaries that were of no consequence to any but myself. In        
one of my fobs there was a silver watch, and in the other a small           
quantity of gold in a purse. These gentlemen, having pen, ink, and          
paper about them, made an exact inventory of everything they saw;           
and when they were through, desired I would set them down, that they        
might deliver it to the Emperor. This inventory I afterwards                
translated that into English, and is word for word as follows.              
-                                                                           
  Imprimis, In the right coat pocket of the Great Man Mountain (for so      
I interpret the words Quinbus Flestrin) after the strictest search, we      
found only one great piece of coarse cloth, large enough to be a            
foot cloth for your Majesty's chief room of state. In the left              
pocket we saw a huge silver chest, with a cover of the same metal,          
which we the searchers were not able to lift. We desired it should          
be opened, and one of us stepping into it, found himself up to the mid      
leg in a sort of dust, some part whereof flying up to our faces, set        
us both sneezing for several times together. In his right waistcoat         
pocket we found a prodigious bundle of white thin substances, folded        
one over another, about the bigness of three men, tied with a strong        
cable, and marked with black figures; which we humbly conceive to be        
writings, every letter almost half as large as the palm of our              
hands. In the left there was a sort of engine, from the back of             
which were extended twenty long poles, resembling the palisades before      
your Majesty's court; wherewith we conjecture the Man-Mountain combs        
his head, for we did not always trouble him with questions, because we      
found it a great difficulty to make him understand us. In the large         
pocket on the right side of his middle cover (so I translate the            
word ranfu-lo, by which they meant my breeches) we saw a hollow pillar      
of iron, about the length of a man, fastened to a strong piece of           
timber, larger than the pillar; and upon one side of the pillar were        
huge pieces of iron sticking out, cut into strange figures, which we        
know not what to make of. In the left pocket, another engine of the         
same kind. In the smaller pocket on the right side, were several round      
flat pieces of white and red metal, of different bulk; some of the          
white, which seemed to be silver, were so large and heavy, that my          
comrade and I could hardly lift them. In the left pocket were two           
black pillars irregularly shaped: we could not, without difficulty,         
reach the top of them as we stood at the bottom of his pocket. One          
of them was covered, and seemed all of a piece: but at the upper end        
of the other, there appeared a white round substance, about twice           
the bigness of our heads. Within each of these was enclosed a               
prodigious plate of steel; which, by our orders, we obliged him to          
show us, because we apprehended they might be dangerous engines. He         
took them out of their cases, and told us, that in his own country his      
practice was to shave his beard with one of these, and to cut his meat      
with the other. There were two pockets which we could not enter: these      
he called his fobs; they were two large slits cut into the top of           
his middle cover, but squeezed close by the pressure of his belly. Out      
of the right fob hung a great silver chain, with a wonderful kind of        
engine at the bottom. We directed him to draw out whatever was              
fastened to that chain; which appeared to be a globe, half silver, and      
half of some transparent metal: for on the transparent side we saw          
certain strange figures circularly drawn, and thought we could touch        
them, till we found our fingers stopped by that lucid substance. He         
put this engine to our ears, which made an incessant noise like that        
of a watermill: and we conjecture it is either some unknown animal, or      
the god that he worships; but we are more inclined to the latter            
opinion, because he assured us (if we understood him right, for he          
expressed himself very imperfectly) that he seldom did anything             
without consulting it: he called it his oracle, and said it pointed         
out the time for every action of his life. From the left fob he took        
out a net almost large enough for a fisherman, but contrived to open        
and shut like a purse, and serve him for the same use: we found             
therein several massy pieces of yellow metal, which, if they be real        
gold, must be of immense value.                                             
  Having thus, in obedience to your Majesty's commands, diligently          
searched all his pockets, we observed a girdle about his waist made of      
the hide of some prodigious animal; from which, on the left side, hung      
a sword of the length of five men; and on the right, a bag or pouch         
divided into two cells, each cell capable of holding three of your          
Majesty's subjects. In one of these cells were several globes or balls      
of a most ponderous metal, about the bigness of our heads, and              
requiring a strong hand to lift them: the other cell contained a            
heap of certain black grains, but of no great bulk or weight, for we        
could hold above fifty of them in the palms of our hands.                   
  This is an exact inventory of what we found about the body of the         
Man-Mountain, who used us with great civility, and due respect to your      
Majesty's commission. Signed and sealed on the fourth day of the            
eighty-ninth moon of your Majesty's auspicious reign.                       
                                                    {P_1|CH_2 ^paragraph 10}
                                   Clefren Frelock, Marsi Frelock.          
-                                                                           
-                                                                           
  When this inventory was read over to the Emperor, he directed me,         
although in very gentle terms, to deliver up the several                    
particulars. He first called for my scimitar, which I took out,             
scabbard and all. In the meantime he ordered three thousand of his          
choicest troops (who then attended him) to surround me at a                 
distance, with their bows and arrows just ready to discharge: but I         
did not observe it, for my eyes were wholly fixed upon his Majesty. He      
then desired me to draw my scimitar, which, although it had got some        
rust by the sea water, was in most parts exceeding bright. I did so,        
and immediately all the troops gave a shout between terror and              
surprise; for the sun shone clear, and the reflection dazzled their         
eyes as I waved the scimitar to and fro in my hand. His Majesty, who        
is a most magnanimous prince, was less daunted than I could expect; he      
ordered me to return it into the scabbard, and cast it on the ground        
as gently as I could, about six foot from the end of my chain. The          
next thing he demanded was one of the hollow iron pillars, by which he      
meant my pocket-pistols. I drew it out, and at his desire, as well          
as I could, expressed to him the use of it; and charging it only            
with powder, which by the closeness of my pouch happened to escape          
wetting in the sea (an inconvenience against which all prudent              
mariners take special care to provide) I first cautioned the Emperor        
not to be afraid, and then I let it off in the air. The astonishment        
here was much greater than at the sight of my scimitar. Hundreds            
fell down as if they had been struck dead; and even the Emperor,            
although he stood his ground, could not recover himself in some             
time. I delivered up both my pistols in the same manner as I had            
done my scimitar, and then my pouch of powder and bullets; begging him      
that the former might be kept from the fire, for it would kindle            
with the smallest spark, and blow up his imperial palace into the air.      
I likewise delivered up my watch, which the Emperor was very curious        
to see, and commanded two of his tallest yeomen of the guards to            
bear it on a pole upon their shoulders, as draymen in England do a          
barrel of ale. He was amazed at the continual noise it made, and the        
motion of the minute-hand, which he could easily discern; for their         
sight is much more acute than ours; and asked the opinions of his           
learned men about him, which were various and remote, as the reader         
may well imagine without my repeating; although indeed I could not          
very perfectly understand them. I then gave up my silver and copper         
money, my purse with nine large pieces of gold, and some smaller ones;      
my knife and razor, my comb and silver snuff-box, my handkerchief and       
journal-book. My scimitar, pistols, and pouch, were conveyed in             
carriages to his Majesty's stores; but the rest of my goods were            
returned me.                                                                
  I had, as I before observed, one private pocket which escaped             
their search, wherein there was a pair of spectacles (which I               
sometimes use for the weakness of my eyes), a pocket perspective,           
and several other little conveniences; which, being of no                   
consequence to the Emperor, I did not think myself bound in honor to        
discover, and I apprehended they might be lost or spoiled if I              
ventured them out of my possession.                                         
                                                                            
P_1|CH_3                                                                    
  CHAPTER III                                                               
-                                                                           
  My gentleness and good behavior had gained so far on the Emperor and      
his court, and indeed upon the army and people in general, that I           
began to conceive hopes of getting my liberty in a short time. I            
took all possible methods to cultivate this favorable disposition. The      
natives came by degrees to be less apprehensive of any danger from me.      
I would sometimes lie down, and let five or six of them dance on my         
hand. And last the boys and girls would venture to come and play at         
hide and seek in my hair. I had now made good progress in                   
understanding and speaking their language. The Emperor had a mind           
one day to entertain me with several of the country shows, wherein          
they exceeded all nations I have known, both for dexterity and              
magnificence. I was diverted with none so much as that of the               
rope-dancers, performed upon a slender white thread, extended about         
two feet, and twelve inches from the ground. Upon which I shall desire      
liberty, with the reader's patience, to enlarge a little.                   
  This diversion is only practiced by those persons who are candidates      
for great employments and high favors at court. They are trained in         
this art from their youth, and are not always of noble birth, or            
liberal education. When a great office is vacant either by death or         
disgrace (which often happens) five or six of those candidates              
petition the Emperor to entertain his Majesty and the court with a          
dance on the rope, and whoever jumps the highest without falling,           
succeeds in the office. Very often the chief ministers themselves           
are commanded to show their skill, and to convince the Emperor that         
they have not lost their faculty. Flimnap, the Treasurer, is allowed        
to cut a caper on the straight rope, at least an inch higher than           
any other lord in the whole empire. I have seen him do the summerset        
several times together upon a trencher fixed on the rope, which is          
no thicker than a common packthread in England. My friend Reldresal,        
principal Secretary for Private Affairs, is, in my opinion, if I am         
not partial, the second after the Treasurer; the rest of the great          
officers are much upon a par.                                               
  These diversions are often attended with fatal accidents, whereof         
great numbers are on record. I myself have seen two or three                
candidates break a limb. But the danger is much greater when the            
ministers themselves are commanded to show their dexterity; for by          
contending to excell themselves and their fellows, they strain so far,      
that there is hardly one of them who has not received a fall, and some      
of them two or three. I was assured that a year or two before my            
arrival, Flimnap would have infallibly broken his neck, if one of           
the King's cushions, that accidentally lay on the ground, had not           
weakened the force of his fall.                                             
  There is likewise another diversion, which is only shown before           
the Emperor and Empress, and first minister, upon particular                
occasions. The Emperor lays on the table three fine silken threads          
of six inches long. One is blue, the other red, and the third green.        
These threads are proposed as prizes for those persons whom the             
Emperor has a mind to distinguish by a peculiar mark of his favor. The      
ceremony is performed in his Majesty's great chamber of state, where        
the candidates are to undergo a trial of dexterity very different from      
the former, and such as I have not observed the least resemblance of        
in any other country of the old or the new world. The Emperor holds         
a stick in his hands, both ends parallel to the horizon, while the          
candidates, advancing one by one, sometimes leap over the stick,            
sometimes creep under it backwards and forwards several times,              
according as the stick is advanced or depressed. Sometimes the Emperor      
holds one end of the stick, and his first minister the other;               
sometimes the minister has it entirely to himself. Whoever performs         
his part with most agility, and holds out the longest in leaping and        
creeping, is rewarded with the blue-colored silk; the red is given          
to the next, and the green to the third, which they all wear girt           
twice round about the middle; and you see few great persons about this      
court who are not adorned with one of these girdles.                        
  The horses of the army, and those of the royal stables, having            
been daily led before me, were no longer shy, but would come up to          
my very feet without starting. The riders would leap them over my hand      
as I held it on the ground, and one of the Emperor's huntsmen, upon         
a large courser, took my foot, shoe and all; which was indeed a             
prodigious leap. I had the good fortune to divert the Emperor one           
day after a very extraordinary manner. I desired he would order             
several sticks two feet high, and the thickness of an ordinary cane,        
to be brought me; whereupon his Majesty commanded the master of his         
woods to give directions accordingly; and the next morning six woodmen      
arrived with as many carriages, drawn by eight horses to each. I            
took nine of these sticks, and fixing them firmly in the ground in a        
quadrangular figure, two feet and a half square, I took four other          
sticks, and tied them parallel at each corner, about two feet from the      
ground; then I fastened my handkerchief to the nine sticks that             
stood erect, and extended it on all sides till it was as tight as           
the top of a drum; and the four parallel sticks rising about five           
inches higher than the handkerchief served as ledges on each side.          
When I had finished my work, I desired the Emperor to let a troop of        
his best horse, twentyfour in number, come and exercise upon this           
plain. His Majesty approved of the proposal, and I took them up one by      
one in my hands, ready mounted and armed, with the proper officers          
to exercise them. As soon as they got into order, they divided into         
two parties, performed mock skirmishes, discharged blunt arrows,            
drew their swords, fled and pursued, attacked and retired, and in           
short discovered the best military discipline I ever beheld. The            
parallel sticks secured them and their horses from falling over the         
stage; and the Emperor was so much delighted, that he ordered this          
entertainment to be repeated several days, and once was pleased to          
be lifted up and give the word of command; and, with great difficulty,      
persuaded even the Empress herself to let me hold her in her close          
chair within two yards of the stage, from whence she was able to            
take a full view of the whole performance. It was my good fortune that      
no ill accident happened in these entertainments, only once a fiery         
horse that belonged to one of the captains pawing with his hoof struck      
a hole in my handkerchief, and his foot slipping, he overthrew his          
rider and himself; but I immediately relieved them both, and                
covering the hole with one hand, I set down the troop with the              
other, in the same manner as I took them up. The horse that fell was        
strained in the left shoulder, but the rider got no hurt, and I             
repaired my handkerchief as well as I could: however I would not trust      
to the strength of it any more in such dangerous enterprises.               
                                                     {P_1|CH_3 ^paragraph 5}
  About two or three days before I was set at liberty, as I was             
entertaining the court with these kind of feats, there arrived an           
express to inform his Majesty that some of his subjects riding near         
the place where I was first taken up, had seen a great black substance      
lying on the ground, very oddly shaped, extending its edges round as        
wide as his Majesty's bedchamber, and rising up in the middle as            
high as a man; that it was no living creature, as they at first             
apprehended, for it lay on the grass without motion, and some of            
them had walked round it several tunes: that by mounting upon each          
other's shoulders, they had got to the top, which was flat and even,        
and stamping upon it they found it was hollow within; that they humbly      
conceived it might be something belonging to the Man-Mountain, and          
if his Majesty pleased, they would undertake to bring it with only          
five horses. I presently knew what they meant, and was glad at heart        
to receive this intelligence. It seems upon my first reaching the           
shore after our shipwreck, I was in such confusion, that before I came      
to the place where I went to sleep, my hat, which I had fastened            
with a string to my head while I was rowing, and had stuck on all           
the time I was swimming, fell off after I came to land; the string, as      
I conjecture, breaking by some accident which I never observed, but         
thought my hat had been lost at sea. I entreated his Imperial               
Majesty to give orders it might be brought to me as soon as                 
possible, describing to him the use and the nature of it: and the next      
day the wagoners arrived with it, but not in a very good condition;         
they had bored two holes in the brim, within an inch and a half of the      
edge, and fastened two hooks in the holes; these hooks were tied by         
a long cord to the harness, and thus my hat was dragged along for           
above half an English mile: but the ground in that country being            
extremely smooth and level, it received less damage than I expected.        
  Two days after this adventure, the Emperor having ordered that            
part of his army which quarters in and about his metropolis to be in a      
readiness, took a fancy of diverting himself in a very singular             
manner. He desired I would stand like a Colossus, with my legs as           
far asunder as I conveniently could. He then commanded his General          
(who was an old experienced leader, and a great patron of mine) to          
draw up the troops in close order, and march them under me, the foot        
by twentyfour in a breast, and the horse by sixteen, with drums             
beating, colors flying, and pikes advanced. This body consisted of          
three thousand foot, and a thousand horse. His Majesty gave orders,         
upon pain of death, that every soldier in his march should observe the      
strictest decency with regard to my person; which, however, could           
not prevent some of the younger officers from turning up their eyes as      
they passed under me. And, to confess the truth, my breeches were at        
that time in so ill a condition, that they afforded some opportunities      
for laughter and admiration.                                                
  I had sent so many memorials and petitions for my liberty, that           
his Majesty at length mentioned the matter, first in the cabinet,           
and then in a full council; where it was opposed by none, except            
Skyresh Bolgolam, who was pleased, without any provocation, to be my        
mortal enemy. But it was carried against him by the whole board, and        
confirmed by the Emperor. That minister was Galbet, or Admiral of           
the Realm, very much in his master's confidence, and a person well          
versed in affairs, but of a morose and sour complexion. However, he         
was at length persuaded to comply; but prevailed that the articles and      
conditions upon which I should be set free, and to which I must swear,      
should be drawn up by himself. These articles were brought to me by         
Skyresh Bolgolam in person, attended by two under-secretaries, and          
several persons of distinction. After they were read, I was demanded        
to swear to the performance of them; first in the manner of my own          
country, and afterwards in the method prescribed by their laws;             
which was to hold my right foot in my left hand, to place the middle        
finger of my right hand on the crown of my head, and my thumb on the        
tip of my right ear. But because the reader may perhaps be curious          
to have some idea of the style and manner of expression peculiar to         
that people, as well as to know the articles upon which I recovered my      
liberty, I have made a translation of the whole instrument word for         
word, as near as I was able, which I here offer to the public.              
-                                                                           
  GOLBASTO MOMAREN EVLAME GURDILO SHEFIN MULLY ULLY GUE, most mighty        
Emperor of Lilliput, delight and terror of the universe, whose              
dominions extend five thousand blustrugs (about twelve miles in             
circumference) to the extremities of the globe; monarch of all              
monarchs, taller than the sons of men; whose feet press down to the         
center, and whose head strikes against the sun; at whose nod the            
princes of the earth shake their knees; pleasant as the spring,             
comfortable as the summer, fruitful as autumn, dreadful as winter. His      
most sublime Majesty proposes to the Man-Mountain, lately arrived to        
our celestial dominions, the following articles, which by a solemn          
oath he shall be obliged to perform.                                        
                                                    {P_1|CH_3 ^paragraph 10}
  First, The Man-Mountain shall not depart from our dominions, without      
our license under our great seal.                                           
  2nd, He shall not presume to come into our metropolis, without our        
express order; at which time the inhabitants shall have two hours           
warning to keep within their doors.                                         
  3rd, The said Man-Mountain shall confine his walks to our                 
principal high roads, and not offer to walk or lie down in a meadow or      
field of corn.                                                              
  4th, As he walks the said roads, he shall take the utmost care not        
to trample upon the bodies of any of our loving subjects, their             
horses, or carriages, nor take any of our said subjects into his            
hands, without their own consent.                                           
  5th, If an express requires extraordinary dispatch, the Man-Mountain      
shall be obliged to carry in his pocket the messenger and horse a           
six days journey once in every moon, and return the said messenger          
back (if so required) safe to our Imperial Presence.                        
                                                    {P_1|CH_3 ^paragraph 15}
  6th, He shall be our ally against our enemies in the Island of            
Blefuscu, and do his utmost to destroy their fleet, which is now            
preparing to invade us.                                                     
  7th, That the said Man-Mountain shall, at his times of leisure, be        
aiding and assisting to our workmen, in helping to raise certain great      
stones, towards covering the wall of the principal park, and other          
of our royal buildings.                                                     
  8th, That the said Man-Mountain shall, in two moons' time, deliver        
in an exact survey of the circumference of our dominions by a               
computation of his own paces round the coast.                               
   Lastly, That upon his solemn oath to observe all the above               
articles, the said Man-Mountain shall have a daily allowance of meat        
and drink sufficient for the support of 1,728 of our subjects, with         
free access to our Royal Person, and other marks of our favor. Given        
at our Palace at Belfaborac the twelfth day of the ninety-first moon        
of our reign.                                                               
-                                                                           
                                                    {P_1|CH_3 ^paragraph 20}
  I swore and subscribed to these articles with great cheerfulness and      
content, although some of them were not so honorable as I could have        
wished; which proceeded wholly from the malice of Skyresh Bolgolam the      
High Admiral: whereupon my chains were immediately unlocked, and I was      
at full liberty; the Emperor himself in person did me the honor to          
be by at the whole ceremony. I made my acknowledgments by                   
prostrating myself at his Majesty's feet: but he commanded me to rise;      
and after many gracious expressions, which, to avoid the censure of         
vanity, I shall not repeat, he added, that he hoped I should prove a        
useful servant, and well deserve all the favors he had already              
conferred upon me, or might do for the future.                              
  The reader may please to observe, that in the last article for the        
recovery of my liberty the Emperor stipulates to allow me a quantity        
of meat and drink sufficient for the support of 1,728 Lilliputians.         
Some time after, asking a friend at court how they came to fix on that      
determinate number, he told me that his Majesty's mathematicians,           
having taken the height of my body by the help of a quadrant, and           
finding it to exceed theirs in the proportion of twelve to one, they        
concluded from the similarity of their bodies, that mine must               
contain at least 1,728 of theirs, and consequently would require as         
much food as was necessary to support that number of Lilliputians.          
By which the reader may conceive an idea of the ingenuity of that           
people, as well as the prudent and exact economy of so great a prince.      
                                                                            
P_1|CH_4                                                                    
  CHAPTER IV                                                                
-                                                                           
  The first request I made after I had obtained my liberty, was,            
that I might have license to see Mildendo, the metropolis, which the        
Emperor easily granted me, but with a special charge to do no hurt          
either to the inhabitants or their houses. The people had notice by         
proclamation of my design to visit the town. The wall which                 
encompassed it is two feet and a half high, and at least eleven inches      
broad, so that a coach and horses may be driven very safely round           
it; and it is flanked with strong towers at ten feet distance. I            
stepped over the great Gate, and passed very gently, and sidering           
through the two principal streets, only in my short waistcoat, for          
fear of damaging the roofs and eaves of the houses with the skirts          
of my coat. I walked with the utmost circumspection, to avoid treading      
on any stragglers, that might remain in the streets, although the           
orders were very strict, that all people should keep in their houses        
at their own peril. The garret windows and tops of houses were so           
crowded with spectators, that I thought in all my travels I had not         
seen a more populous place. The city is an exact square, each side          
of the wall being five hundred feet long. The two great streets, which      
run cross and divide it into four quarters, are five feet wide. The         
lanes and alleys, which I could not enter, but only viewed them as I        
passed, are from twelve to eighteen inches. The town is capable of          
holding five hundred thousand souls. The houses are from three to five      
stories. The shops and markets well provided.                               
  The Emperor's palace is in the centre of the city, where the two          
great streets meet. It is enclosed by a wall of two feet high, and          
twenty feet distant from the buildings. I had his Majesty's permission      
to step over this wall; and the space being so wide between that and        
the palace, I could easily view it on every side. The outward court is      
a square of forty feet, and includes two other courts: in the inmost        
are the royal apartments, which I was very desirous to see, but             
found it extremely difficult; for the great gates, from one square          
into another, were but eighteen inches high and seven inches wide. Now      
the buildings of the outer court were at least five feet high, and          
it was impossible for me to stride over them without infinite damage        
to the pile, though the walls were strongly built of hewn stone, and        
four inches thick. At the same time the Emperor had a great desire          
that I should see the magnificence of his palace; but this I was not        
able to do till three days after, which I spent in cutting down with        
my knife some of the largest trees in the royal park, about a               
hundred yards distant from the city. Of these trees I made two stools,      
each about three feet high, and strong enough to bear my weight. The        
people having received notice a second time, I went again through           
the city to the palace, with my two stools in my hands. When I came to      
the side of the outer court, I stood upon one stool, and took the           
other in my hand: this I lifted over the roof, and gently set it            
down on the space between the first and second court, which was             
eight feet wide. I then stepped over the buildings very conveniently        
from one stool to the other, and drew up the first after me with a          
hooked stick. By this contrivance I got into the inmost court; and          
lying down upon my side, I applied my face to the windows of the            
middle stories, which were left open on purpose, and discovered the         
most splendid apartments that can be imagined. There I saw the Empress      
and the young Princes, in their several lodgings, with their chief          
attendants about them. Her Imperial Majesty was pleased to smile            
very graciously upon me, and gave me out of the window her hand to          
kiss.                                                                       
  But I shall not anticipate the reader with farther descriptions of        
this kind, because I reserve them for a greater work, which is now          
almost ready for the press, containing a general description of this        
empire, from its first erection, through a long series of princes,          
with a particular account of their wars and politics, laws,                 
learning, and religion: their plants and animals, their peculiar            
manners and customs, with other matters very curious and useful; my         
chief design at present being only to relate such events and                
transactions as happened to the public, or to myself, during a              
residence of about nine months in that empire.                              
  One morning, about a fortnight after I had obtained my liberty,           
Reldresal, principal Secretary (as they style him) of Private Affairs,      
came to my house attended only by one servant. He ordered his coach to      
wait at a distance, and desired I would give him an hour's audience;        
which I readily consented to, on account of his quality and personal        
merits, as well as the many good offices he had done me during my           
solicitations at court. I offered to lie down, that he might the            
more conveniently reach my ear; but he chose rather to let me hold him      
in my hand during our conversation. He began with compliments on my         
liberty; said he might pretend to some merit in it: but, however,           
added, that if it had not been for the present situation of things          
at court, perhaps I might not have obtained it so soon. For, said           
he, as flourishing a condition as we may appear to be in to                 
foreigners, we labor under two mighty evils; a violent faction at           
home, and the danger of an invasion by a most potent enemy from             
abroad. As to the first, you are to understand, that for above seventy      
moons past there have been two struggling parties in this empire,           
under the names of Tramecksan and Slamecksan, from the high and low         
heels on their shoes, by which they distinguish themselves. It is           
alleged indeed, that the high heels are most agreeable to our               
ancient constitution: but however this be, his Majesty has                  
determined to make use of only low heels in the administration of           
the government, and all offices in the gift of the Crown, as you            
cannot but observe; and particularly, that his Majesty's Imperial           
heels are lower at least by a drurr than any of his court; (drurr is a      
measure about the fourteenth part of an inch). The animosities between      
these two parties run so high, that they will neither eat nor drink,        
nor talk with each other. We compute the Tramecksan, or High-Heels, to      
exceed us in number; but the power is wholly on our side. We apprehend      
his Imperial Highness, the Heir to the Crown, to have some tendency         
towards the High-Heels; at least we can plainly discover one of his         
heels higher than the other, which gives him a hobble in his gait.          
Now, in the midst of these intestine disquiets, we are threatened with      
an invasion from the Island of Blefuscu, which is the other great           
empire of the universe, almost as large and powerful as this of his         
Majesty. For as to what we have heard you affirm, that there are other      
kingdoms and states in the world inhabited by human creatures as large      
as yourself, our philosophers are in much doubt, and would rather           
conjecture that you dropped from the moon, or one of the stars;             
because it is certain, that a hundred mortals of your bulk would, in a      
short time, destroy all the fruits and cattle of his Majesty's              
dominions. Besides, our histories of six thousand moons make no             
mention of any other regions, than the two great empires of Lilliput        
and Blefuscu. Which two mighty powers have, as I was going to tell          
you, been engaged in a most obstinate war for six and thirty moons          
past. It began upon the following occasion. It is allowed on all            
hands, that the primitive way of breaking eggs, before we eat them,         
was upon the larger end: but his present Majesty's grandfather,             
while he was a boy, going to eat an egg, and breaking it according          
to the ancient practice, happened to cut one of his fingers. Whereupon      
the Emperor his father published an edict, commanding all his               
subjects, upon great penalties, to break the smaller end of their           
eggs. The people so highly resented this law, that our histories            
tell us there have been six rebellions raised on that account; wherein      
one Emperor lost his life, and another his crown. These civil               
commotions were constantly fomented by the monarchs of Blefuscu; and        
when they were quelled, the exiles always fled for refuge to that           
empire. It is computed, that eleven thousand persons have, at               
several times, suffered death, rather than submit to break their            
eggs at the smaller end. Many hundred large volumes have been               
published upon this controversy: but the books of the Big-Endians have      
been long forbidden, and the whole party rendered incapable by law          
of holding employments. During the course of these troubles, the            
Emperors of Blefuscu did frequently expostulate by their                    
ambassadors, accusing us of making a schism in religion, by                 
offending against a fundamental doctrine of our great prophet Lustrog,      
in the fifty-fourth chapter of the Blundecral (which is their however,      
is thought to be a mere strain upon the text: for the words are these;      
That all true believers shall break their eggs at the convenient            
end: and which is the convenient end, seems, in my humble opinion,          
to be left to every man's conscience, or at least in the power of           
the chief magistrate to determine. Now the Big-Endian exiles have           
found so much credit in the Emperor of Blefuscu's court, and so much        
private assistance and encouragement from their party here at home,         
that a bloody war has been carried on between the two empires for           
six and thirty moons with various success; during which time we have        
lost forty capital ships, and a much greater number of smaller              
vessels, together with thirty thousand of our best seamen and               
soldiers; and the damage received by the enemy is reckoned to be            
somewhat greater than ours. However, they have now equipped a numerous      
fleet, and are just preparing to make a descent upon us; and his            
Imperial Majesty, placing great confidence in your valor and strength,      
has commanded me to lay this account of his affairs before you.             
  I desired the Secretary to present my humble duty to the Emperor,         
and to let him know, that I thought it would not become me, who was         
a foreigner, to interfere with parties; but I was ready, with the           
hazard of my life, to defend his person and state against all               
invaders.                                                                   
                                                                            
P_1|CH_5                                                                    
  CHAPTER V                                                                 
-                                                                           
  The Empire of Blefuscu is an island situated to the                       
north-northeast side of Lilliput, from whence it is parted only by a        
channel of eight hundred yards wide. I had not yet seen it, and upon        
this notice of an intended invasion, I avoided appearing on that            
side of the coast, for fear of being discovered by some of the enemy's      
ships, who had received no intelligence of me, all intercourse between      
the two empires having been strictly forbidden during the war, upon         
pain of death, and an embargo laid by our Emperor upon all vessels          
whatsoever. I communicated to his Majesty a project I had formed of         
seizing the enemy's whole fleet: which, as our scouts assured us,           
lay at anchor in the harbor ready to sail with the first fair wind.         
I consulted the most experienced seamen, upon the depth of the              
channel, which they had often plumbed, who told me, that in the middle      
at high-water it was seventy glumgluffs deep, which is about six            
feet of European measure; and the rest of it fifty glumgluffs at most.      
I walked towards the northeast coast over against Blefuscu; and             
lying down behind a hillock, took out my small pocket perspective           
glass, and viewed the enemy's fleet at anchor, consisting of about          
fifty men of war, and a great number of transports; I then came back        
to my house, and gave order (for which I had a warrant) for a great         
quantity of the strongest cable and bars of iron. The cable was             
about as thick as packthread, and the bars of the length and size of a      
knitting needle. I trebled the cable to make it stronger, and for           
the same reason I twisted three of the iron bars together, binding the      
extremities into a hook. Having thus fixed fifty hooks to as many           
cables, I went back to the northeast coast, and putting off my coat,        
shoes, and stockings, walked into the sea in my leather jerkin,             
about half an hour before high water. I waded with what haste I could,      
and swam in the middle about thirty yards till I felt ground; I             
arrived at the fleet in less than half an hour. The enemy was so            
frighted when they saw me, that they leaped out of their ships, and         
swam to shore, where there could not be fewer than thirty thousand          
souls. I then took my tackling, and fastening a hook to a hole at           
the prow of each, I tied all the cords together at the end. While I         
was thus employed, the enemy discharged several thousand arrows,            
many of which stuck in my hands and face; and besides the excessive         
smart, gave me much disturbance in my work. My greatest apprehension        
was for my eyes, which I should have infallibly lost, if I had not          
suddenly thought of an expedient. I kept among other little                 
necessaries a pair of spectacles in a private pocket, which, as I           
observed before, had escaped the Emperor's searchers. These I took out      
and fastened as strongly as I could upon my nose, and thus armed            
went on boldly with my work in spite of the enemy's arrows, many of         
which struck against the glasses of my spectacles, but without any          
other effect, further than a little to discompose them. I now fastened      
all the hooks, and taking the knot in my hand, began to pull; but           
not a ship would stir, for they were all too fast held by their             
anchors, so that the boldest part of my enterprise remained. I              
therefore let go the cord, and leaving the hooks fixed to the ships, I      
resolutely cut with my knife the cables that fastened the anchors,          
receiving above two hundred shots in my face and hands; then I took up      
the knotted end of the cables to which my hooks were tied, and with         
great ease drew fifty of the enemy's men-of-war after me.                   
  The Blefuscudians, who had not the least imagination of what I            
intended, were at first confounded with astonishment. They had seen me      
cut the cables, and thought my design was only to let the ships run         
adrift or fall foul on each other: but when they perceived the whole        
fleet moving in order, and saw me pulling at the end, they set up such      
a scream of grief and despair, that it is almost impossible to              
describe or conceive. When I had got out of danger, I stopped awhile        
to pick out the arrows that stuck in my hands and face, and rubbed          
on some of the same ointment that was given me at my first arrival, as      
I have formerly mentioned. I then took off my spectacles, and               
waiting about an hour, till the tide was a little fallen, I waded           
through the middle with my cargo, and arrived safe at the royal port        
of Lilliput                                                                 
  The Emperor and his whole court stood on the shore expecting the          
issue of this great adventure. They saw the ships move forward in a         
large half-moon, but could not discern me, who was up to my breast          
in water. When I advanced to the middle of the channel, they were           
yet in more pain, because I was under water to my neck. The Emperor         
concluded me to be drowned, and that the enemy's fleet was approaching      
in a hostile manner: but he was soon eased of his fears, for the            
channel growing shallower every step I made, I came in a short time         
within hearing, and holding up the end of the cable by which the fleet      
was fastened, I cried in a loud voice, Long live the most puissant          
Emperor of Lilliput! This great prince received me at my landing            
with all possible encomiums, and created me a Nardac upon the spot,         
which is the highest title of honor among them.                             
  His Majesty desired I would take some other opportunity of                
bringing all the rest of his enemy's ships into his ports. And so           
unmeasurable is the ambition of princes, that he seemed to think of         
nothing less than reducing the whole empire of Blefuscu into a              
province, and governing it by a Viceroy; of destroying the                  
Big-Endian exiles, and compelling that people to break the smaller end      
of their eggs, by which he would remain the sole monarch of the             
whole world. But I endeavored to divert him from this design, by            
many arguments drawn from the topics of policy as well as justice; and      
I plainly protested, that I would never be an instrument of bringing a      
free and brave people into slavery. And when the matter was debated in      
council, the wisest part of the ministry were of my opinion.                
  This open bold declaration of mine was so opposite to the schemes         
and politics of his Imperial Majesty, that he could never forgive           
it; he mentioned it in a very artful manner at council, where I was         
told that some of the wisest appeared, at least by their silence, to        
be of my opinion; but others, who were my secret enemies, could not         
forbear some expressions, which by a side-wind reflected on me. And         
from this time began an intrigue between his Majesty and a junto of         
ministers maliciously bent against me, which broke out in less than         
two months, and had like to have ended in my utter destruction. Of          
so little weight are the greatest services to princes, when put into        
the balance with a refusal to gratify their passions.                       
                                                     {P_1|CH_5 ^paragraph 5}
  About three weeks after this exploit, there arrived a solemn embassy      
from Blefuscu, with humble offers of a peace; which was soon concluded      
upon conditions very advantageous to our Emperor, wherewith I shall         
not trouble the reader. There were six ambassadors, with a train of         
about five hundred persons, and their entry was very magnificent,           
suitable to the grandeur of their master, and the importance of             
their business. When their treaty was finished, wherein I did them          
several good offices by the credit I now had, or at least appeared          
to have at court, their Excellencies, who were privately told how much      
I had been their friend, made me a visit in form. They began with many      
compliments upon my valor and generosity, invited me to that kingdom        
in the Emperor their master's name, and desired me to show them some        
proofs of my prodigious strength, of which they had heard so many           
wonders; wherein I readily obliged them, but shall not trouble the          
reader with the particulars.                                                
  When I had for some time entertained their Excellencies, to their         
infinite satisfaction and surprise, I desired they would do me the          
honor to present my most humble respects to the Emperor their               
master, the renown of whose had so justly filled the whole world            
with admiration, and whose royal person I resolved to attend before         
I returned to my own country: accordingly, the next time I had the          
honor to see our Emperor, I desired his general license to wait on the      
Blefuscudian monarch, which he was pleased to grant me, as I could          
plainly perceive, in a very cold manner; but could not guess the            
reason, till I had a whisper from a certain person, that Flimnap and        
Bolgolam had represented my intercourse with those ambassadors as a         
mark of disaffection, from which I am sure my heart was wholly free.        
And this was the first time I began to conceive some imperfect idea of      
courts and ministers.                                                       
  It is to be observed, that these ambassadors spoke to me by an            
interpreter, the languages of both empires differing as much from each      
other as any two in Europe, and each nation priding itself upon the         
antiquity, beauty, and energy of their own tongues, with an avowed          
contempt for that of their neighbor; yet our Emperor, standing upon         
the advantage he had got by the seizure of their fleet, obliged them        
to deliver their credentials, and make their speech in the Lilliputian      
tongue. And it must be confessed, that from the great intercourse of        
trade and commerce between both realms, from the continual reception        
of exiles, which is mutual among them, and from the custom in each          
empire to send their young nobility and richer gentry to the other, in      
order to polish themselves by seeing the world and understanding men        
and manners; there are few persons of distinction, or merchants, or         
seamen, who dwell in the maritime parts, but what can hold                  
conversation both tongues; as I found some weeks after, when I went to      
pay my respects to the Emperor of Blefuscu, which in the midst of           
great misfortunes, through the malice of my enemies, proved a very          
happy adventure to me, as I shall relate in its proper place.               
  The reader may remember, that when I signed those articles upon           
which I recovered my liberty, there were some which I disliked upon         
account of their being too servile, neither could anything but an           
extreme necessity have forced me to submit. But being now a Nardac, of      
the highest rank in that empire, such offices were looked upon as           
below my dignity, and the Emperor (to do him justice) never once            
mentioned them to me. However, it was not long before I had an              
opportunity of doing his Majesty, at least, as I then thought, a            
most signal service. I was alarmed at midnight with the cries of            
many hundred people at my door; by which being suddenly awaked, I           
was in some kind of terror. I heard the word burglum repeated               
incessantly: several of the Emperor's court, making their way               
through the crowd, entreated me to come immediately to the Palace,          
where her Imperial Majesty's apartment was on fire, by the                  
carelessness of a maid of honor, who fell asleep while she was reading      
a romance. I got up in an instant; and orders being given to clear the      
way before me, and it being likewise a moonshine night, I made a shift      
to get to the Palace without trampling on any of the people. I found        
they had already applied ladders to the walls of the apartment, and         
were well provided with buckets, but the water was at some distance.        
These buckets were about the size of a large thimble, and the poor          
people supplied me with them as fast as they could; but the flame           
was so violent that they did little good. I might easily have               
stifled it with my coat, which I unfortunately left behind me for           
haste, and came away only in my leathern jerkin. The case seemed            
wholly desperate and deplorable; and this magnificent palace would          
have infallibly been burned down to the ground, if, by a presence of        
mind, unusual to me, I had not suddenly thought of an expedient. I had      
the evening before drunk plentifully of a most delicious wine,              
called glimigrim (the Blefuscudians call it flunec, but ours is             
esteemed the better sort), which is very diuretic. By the luckiest          
chance in the world, I had not discharged myself of any part of it.         
The heat I had contracted by coming very near the flames, and by            
laboring to quench them, made the wine begin to operate my urine;           
which I voided in such a quantity, and applied so well to the proper        
places, that in three minutes the fire was wholly extinguished, and         
the rest of that noble pile, which had cost so many ages in                 
erecting, preserved from destruction.                                       
  It was now daylight, and I returned to my house without waiting to        
congratulate with the Emperor: because, although I had done a very          
eminent piece of service, yet I could not tell how his Majesty might        
resent the manner by which I had performed it: for, by the fundamental      
laws of the realm, it is capital in any person, of what quality             
soever, to make water within the precincts of the palace. But I was         
a little comforted by a message from his Majesty, that he would give        
orders to the Grand Justiciary for passing my pardon in form; which,        
however, I could not obtain. And I was privately assured, that the          
Empress, conceiving the greatest abhorrence of what I had done,             
removed to the most distant side of the court, firmly resolved that         
those buildings should never be repaired for her use: and, in the           
presence of her chief confidants could not forbear vowing revenge.          
                                                                            
P_1|CH_6                                                                    
  CHAPTER VI                                                                
-                                                                           
  Although I intend to leave the description of this empire to a            
particular treatise, yet in the meantime I am content to gratify the        
curious reader with some general ideas. As the common size of the           
natives is somewhat under six inches high, so there is an exact             
proportion in all other animals, as well as plants and trees: for           
instance, the tallest horses and oxen are between four and five inches      
in height, the sheep an inch and a half, more or less: their geese          
about the bigness of a sparrow, and so the several gradations               
downwards till you come to the smallest, which, to my sight, were           
almost invisible; but nature had adapted the eyes of the                    
Lilliputians to all objects proper for their view: they see with great      
exactness, but at no great distance. And to show the sharpness of           
their sight towards objects that are near, I have been much pleased         
with observing a cook pulling a lark, which was not so large as a           
common fly; and a young girl threading an invisible needle with             
invisible silk. Their tallest trees are about seven feet high; I            
mean some of those in the great royal park, the tops whereof I could        
but just reach with my fist clenched. The other vegetables are in           
the same proportion; but this I leave to the reader's imagination.          
  I shall say but little at present of their learning, which for            
many ages had flourished in all its branches among them; but their          
manner of writing is very peculiar, being neither from the left to the      
right, like the Europeans; nor from the right to the left, like the         
Arabians; nor from up to down, like the Chinese; nor from down to           
up, like the Cascagians; but aslant from one corner of the paper to         
the other, like ladies in England.                                          
  They bury their dead with their heads directly downwards, because         
they hold an opinion, that in eleven thousand moons they are all to         
rise again, in which period the earth (which they conceive to be flat)      
will turn upside down, and by this means they shall, at their               
resurrection, be found ready standing on their feet. The learned among      
them confess the absurdity of this doctrine, but the practice still         
continues, in compliance to the vulgar.                                     
  There are some laws and customs in this empire very peculiar; and if      
they were not so directly contrary to those of my own dear country,         
I should be tempted to say a little in their justification. It is only      
to be wished that they were as well executed. The first I shall             
mention relates to informers. All crimes against the state are              
punished here with the utmost severity; but if the person accused           
makes his innocence plainly to appear upon his trial, the accuser is        
immediately put to an ignominious death; and out of his goods or            
lands, the innocent person is quadruply recompensed for the loss of         
his time, for the danger he underwent, for the hardship of his              
imprisonment, and for all the charges he had been at in making his          
defense. Or, if that fund be deficient, it is largely supplied by           
the Crown. The Emperor does also confer on him some public mark of his      
favor, and proclamation is made of his innocence through the whole          
city.                                                                       
  They look upon fraud as a greater crime than theft, and therefore         
seldom fail to punish it with death; for they allege, that care and         
vigilance, with a very common understanding, may preserve a man's           
goods from thieves, but honesty has no fence against superior cunning;      
and since it is necessary that there should be a perpetual intercourse      
of buying and selling, and dealing upon credit, where fraud is              
permitted and connived at, or has no law to punish it, the honest           
dealer is always undone, and the knave gets the advantage. remember         
when I was once interceding with the King for a criminal who had            
wronged his master of a great sum of money, which he had received by        
order, and ran away with; and happening to tell his Majesty, by way of      
extenuation, that it was only a breach of trust; the Emperor thought        
it monstrous in me to offer, as a defense, the greatest aggravation of      
the crime: and truly I had little to say in return, farther than the        
common answer, that different nations had different customs; for, I         
confess, I was heartily ashamed.                                            
                                                     {P_1|CH_6 ^paragraph 5}
  Although we usually call reward and punishment the two hinges upon        
which all government turns, yet I could never observe this maxim to be      
put in practice by any nation except that of Lilliput. Whoever can          
there bring sufficient proof that he has strictly observed the laws of      
his country for seventy-three moons, has a claim to certain                 
privileges, according to his quality and condition of life, with a          
proportionable sum of money out of a fund appropriated for that use:        
he likewise acquires the title of Snilpall, or Legal, which is added        
to his name, but does not descend to his posterity. And these people        
thought it a prodigious defect of policy among us, when I told them         
that our laws were enforced only by penalties without any mention of        
reward. It is upon this account that the image of justice, in their         
courts of judicature, is formed with six eyes, two before, as many          
behind, and on each side one, to signify circumspection; with a bag of      
gold open in her right hand, and a sword sheathed in her left, to show      
she is more disposed to reward than to punish.                              
  In choosing persons for all employments, they have more regard to         
good morals than to great abilities; for, since government is               
necessary to mankind, they believe-that the common size of human            
understandings is fitted to some station or other, and that Providence      
never intended to make the management of public affairs a mystery,          
to be comprehended only by a few persons of sublime genius, of which        
there seldom are three born in an age: but they suppose truth,              
justice, temperance, and the like, to be in every man's power; the          
practice of which virtues, assisted by experience and a good                
intention, would qualify any man for the service of his country,            
except where a course of study is required. But they thought the            
want of moral virtues was so far from being supplied by superior            
endowments of the mind, that employments could never be put into            
such dangerous hands as those of persons so qualified; and at least,        
that the mistakes committed by ignorance in a virtuous disposition,         
would never be of such fatal consequence to the public weal, as the         
practices of a man whose inclinations led him to be corrupt, and had        
great abilities to manage, and multiply, and defend his corruptions.        
  In like manner, the disbelief of a Divine Providence renders a man        
incapable of holding any public station; for, since kings avow              
themselves to be the deputies of Providence, the Lilliputians think         
nothing can be more absurd than for a prince to employ such men as          
disown the authority under which he acts.                                   
  In relating these and the following laws, I would only be understood      
to mean the original institutions, and not the most scandalous              
corruptions into which these people are fallen by the degenerate            
nature of man. For as to that infamous practice of acquiring great          
employments by dancing on the ropes, or badges of favor and                 
distinction by leaping over sticks and creeping under them, the reader      
is to observe, that they were first introduced by the grandfather of        
the Emperor now reigning, and grew to the present height by the             
gradual increase of party and faction.                                      
   Ingratitude is among them a capital crime, as we read it to have         
been in some other countries; for they reason thus, that whoever makes      
ill returns to his benefactor, must needs be a common enemy to the          
rest of mankind, from whom he has received no obligation, and               
therefore such a man is not fit to live.                                    
                                                    {P_1|CH_6 ^paragraph 10}
  Their notions relating to the duties of parents and children              
differ extremely from ours. For since the conjunction of male and           
female is founded upon the great law of nature, in order to                 
propagate and continue the species, the Lilliputians will needs have        
it, that men and women are joined together like other animals, by           
the motives of concupiscence; and that their tenderness towards             
their young proceeds from the like natural principle: for which reason      
they will never allow, that a child is under any obligation to his          
father for begetting him, or his mother for bringing him into the           
world; which, considering the miseries of human life, was neither a         
benefit itself, nor intended so by his parents, whose thoughts in           
their love-encounters were otherwise employed. Upon these, and the          
like reasonings, their opinion is, that parents are the last of all         
others to be trusted with the education of their own children: and          
therefore they have in every town public nurseries, where all parents,      
except cottagers and laborers, are obliged to send their infants of         
both sexes to be reared and educated when they come to the age of           
twenty moons, at which time they are supposed to have some rudiments        
of docility. These schools are of several kinds, suited to different        
qualities, and to both sexes. They have certain professors well             
skilled in preparing children for such a condition of life as befits        
the rank of their parents, and their own capacities as well as              
inclinations. I shall say something of the male nurseries, and then of      
the female.                                                                 
  The nurseries for males of noble or eminent birth are provided            
with grave and learned professors, and their several deputies. The          
clothes and food of the children are plain and simple. They are bred        
up in the principles of honor, justice, courage, modesty, clemency,         
religion, and love of their country; they are always employed in            
some business, except in the times of eating and sleeping, which are        
very short, and two hours for diversions, consisting of bodily              
exercises. They are dressed by men till four years of age, and then         
are obliged to dress themselves, although their quality be ever so          
great; and the women attendants, who are aged proportionably to ours        
at fifty, perform only the most menial offices. They are never              
suffered to converse with servants, but go together in small or             
greater numbers to take their diversions, and always in the presence        
of a professor, or one of his deputies; whereby they avoid those early      
bad impressions of folly and vice to which our children are subject.        
Their parents are suffered to see them only twice a year; the visit is      
to last but an hour. They are allowed to kiss the child at meeting and      
parting; but a professor, who always stands by on those occasions,          
will not suffer them to whisper, or use any fondling expressions, or        
bring any presents of toys, sweetmeats, and the like.                       
  The pension from each family for the education and entertainment          
of a child, upon failure of due payment, is levied by the Emperor's         
officers.                                                                   
  The nurseries for children of ordinary gentlemen, merchants,              
traders, and handicrafts, are managed proportionably after the same         
manner; only those designed for trades are put out apprentices at           
eleven years old, whereas those of persons of quality continue in           
their exercises till fifteen, which answers to one and twenty with us:      
but the confinement is gradually lessened for the last three years.         
  In the female nurseries, the young girls of quality are educated          
much like the males, only they are dressed by orderly servants of           
their own sex; but always in the presence of a professor or deputy,         
till they come to dress themselves, which is at five years old. And if      
it be found that these nurses ever presume to entertain the girls with      
frightful or foolish stories, or the common follies practiced by            
chambermaids among us, they are publicly whipped thrice about the           
city, imprisoned for a year and banished for life to the most desolate      
part of the country. Thus the young ladies there are as much ashamed        
of being cowards and fools as the men, and despise all personal             
ornaments beyond decency and cleanliness: neither did I perceive any        
difference in their education, made by their difference of sex, only        
that the exercises of the females were not altogether so robust; and        
that some rules were given them relating to domestic life, and a            
smaller compass of learning was enjoined them: for their maxim is,          
that among people of quality a wife should be always a reasonable           
and agreeable companion, because she cannot always be young. When           
the girls are twelve years old, which among them is the marriageable        
age, their parents or guardians take them home, with great expressions      
of gratitude to the professors, and seldom without tears of the             
young lady and her companions.                                              
                                                    {P_1|CH_6 ^paragraph 15}
  In the nurseries of females of the meaner sort, the children are          
instructed in all kinds of works proper for their sex, and their            
several degrees: those intended for apprentices are dismissed at            
nine years old, the rest are to thirteen.                                   
  The meaner families who have children at these nurseries, are             
obliged, besides their annual pension, which is as low as possible, to      
return to the steward of the nursery a small monthly share of their         
gettings, to be a portion for the child; and therefore all parents are      
limited in their expenses by the law. For the Lilliputians think            
nothing can be more unjust, than for people, in subservience to             
their own appetites, to bring children into the world and leave the         
burden of supporting them on the public. As to persons of quality,          
they give security to appropriate a certain sum for each child,             
suitable to their condition; and these funds are always managed with        
good husbandry, and the most exact justice.                                 
  The cottagers and laborers keep their children at home, their             
business being only to till and cultivate the earth, and therefore          
their education is of little consequence to the public; but the old         
and discased among them are supported by hospitals: for begging is a        
trade unknown in this kingdom.                                              
  And here it may perhaps divert the curious reader to give some            
account of my domestics, and my manner of living in this country,           
during a residence of nine months and thirteen days. Having a head          
mechanically turned, and being likewise forced by necessity, I had          
made for myself a table and chair convenient enough, out of the             
largest trees in the royal park. Two hundred seamstresses were              
employed to make me shirts, and linen for my bed and table, all of the      
strongest and coarsest kind they could get; which, however, they            
were forced to quilt together in several folds, for the thickest was        
some degrees finer than lawn. Their linen is usually three inches           
wide, and three feet make a piece. The seamstresses took my measure as      
I lay on the ground, one standing at my neck, and another at my             
mid-leg, with a strong cord extended, that each held by the end, while      
the third measured the length of the cord with a rule an inch long.         
Then they measured my right thumb, and desired no more; for by a            
mathematical computation, that twice round the thumb is once round the      
wrist, and so on to the neck and the waist, and by the help of my           
old shirt, which I displayed on the ground before them for a                
pattern, they fitted me exactly. Three hundred tailors were employed        
in the same manner to make me clothes; but they had another                 
contrivance for taking my measure. I kneeled down, and they raised a        
ladder from the ground to my neck; upon this ladder one of them             
mounted, and let fall a plumb-line from my collar to the floor,             
which just answered the length of my coat; but my waist and arms I          
measured myself. When my clothes finished, which was done in my             
house (for the largest of theirs would not have been able to hold           
them) they looked like the patch-work made by the ladies in England,        
only that mine were all of a color.                                         
  I had three hundred cooks to dress my victuals, in little convenient      
huts built about my house, where they and their families lived, and         
prepared me two dishes apiece. I took up twenty waiters in my hand,         
and placed them on the table; a hundred more attended below on the          
ground, some with dishes of meat, and some with barrels of wine, and        
other liquors, slung on their shoulders; all which the waiters above        
drew up as I wanted, in a very ingenious manner, by certain cords,          
as we draw the bucket up a well in Europe. A dish of their meat was         
a good mouthful, and a barrel of their liquor a reasonable draught.         
Their mutton yields to ours, but their beef is excellent. I have had a      
sirloin so large, that I have been forced to make three bits of it;         
but this is rare. My servants were astonished to see me eat it bones        
and all, as in our country we do the leg of a lark. Their geese and         
turkeys I usually ate at a mouthful, and I must confess they far            
exceed ours. Of their smaller fowl I could take up twenty or thirty at      
the end of my knife.                                                        
                                                    {P_1|CH_6 ^paragraph 20}
  One day his Imperial Majesty, being informed of my way of living,         
desired that himself and his Royal Consort, with the young Princes          
of the blood of both sexes, might have the happiness (as he was             
pleased to call it) of dining with me. They came accordingly, and I         
placed them upon chairs of state on my table, just over against me,         
with their guards about them. Flimnap, the Lord High Treasurer,             
attended there likewise with his white staff; and I observed he             
often looked on me with a sour countenance, which I would not seem          
to regard, but ate more than usual, in honor to my dear country, as         
well as to fill the court with admiration. I have some private reasons      
to believe, that this visit from his Majesty gave Flimnap an                
opportunity of doing me ill offices to his master. That minister had        
always been my secret enemy, though he outwardly caressed me more than      
was usual to the moroseness of his nature. He represented to the            
Emperor the low condition of his treasury; that he was forced to            
take up money at great discount; that exchequer bills would not             
circulate under nine per cent below par; that in short I had cost           
his Majesty above a million and a half of sprugs (their greatest            
gold coin, about the bigness of a spangle) and upon the whole, that it      
would be advisable in the Emperor to take the first fair occasion of        
dismissing me.                                                              
  I am here obliged to vindicate the reputation of an excellent             
lady, who was an innocent sufferer upon my account. The Treasurer took      
a fancy to be jealous of his wife, from the malice of some evil             
tongues, who informed him that her Grace had taken a violent affection      
for my person; and the court-scandal ran for some time, that she            
once came privately to my lodging. This I solemnly declare to be a          
most infamous falsehood, without any grounds, farther than that her         
Grace was pleased to treat me with all innocent marks of freedom and        
friendship. I own she came often to my house, but always publicly, nor      
ever without three more in the coach, who were usually her sister           
and young daughter, and some particular acquaintance; but this was          
common to many other ladies of the court. And I still appeal to my          
servants round, whether they at any time saw a coach at my door             
without knowing what persons were in it. On those occasions, when a         
servant had given me notice, my custom was to go immediately to the         
door; and, after paying my respects, to take up the coach and two           
horses very carefully in my hands (for if there were six horses, the        
postillion always unharnessed four) and place them on a table, where I      
had fixed a moveable rim quite round, of five inches high, to               
prevent accidents. And I have often had four coaches and horses at          
once on my table full of company, while I sat in my chair leaning my        
face towards them; and when I was engaged with one set, the coachmen        
would gently drive the others round my table. I have passed many an         
afternoon very agreeably in these conversations. But I defy the             
Treasurer, or his two informers (I will name them, and let them make        
their best of it) Clustril and Drunlo, to prove that any person ever        
came to me incognito, except the secretary Reldresal, who was sent          
by express command of his Imperial Majesty, as I have before                
related. I should not have dwelt so long upon this particular, it           
had not been a point wherein the reputation of a great lady is so           
nearly concerned, to say nothing of my own; though I then had the           
honor to be a Nardac, which the Treasurer himself is not; for all           
the world knows he is only a Glumglum, a title inferior by one degree,      
as that of a Marquis is to a Duke in England, although I allow he           
preceded me in right of his post. These false informations, which I         
afterwards came to the knowledge of, by an accident not proper to           
mention, made Flimnap the Treasurer show his lady for some time an ill      
countenance, and me a worse; and although he were at last undeceived        
and reconciled to her, yet I lost all credit with him, and found my         
interest decline very fast with the Emperor himself, who was indeed         
too much governed by that favorite.                                         
                                                                            
P_1|CH_7                                                                    
  CHAPTER VII                                                               
-                                                                           
  Before I proceed to give an account of my leaving this kingdom, it        
may be proper to inform the reader of a private intrigue which had          
been for two months forming against me.                                     
  I had been hitherto all my life a stranger to courts, for which I         
was unqualified by the meanness of my condition. I had indeed heard         
and read enough of the dispositions of great princes and ministers;         
but never expected to have found such terrible effects of them in so        
remote a country, governed, as I thought, by very different maxims          
from those in Europe.                                                       
  When I was just preparing to pay my attendance on the Emperor of          
Blefuscu, a considerable person at court (to whom I had been very           
serviceable at a time when he lay under the highest displeasure of his      
Imperial Majesty) came to my house very privately at night in a             
close chair, and without sending his name, desired admittance. The          
chairmen were dismissed; I put the chair, with his Lordship in it,          
into my coat-pocket: and giving orders to a trusty servant to say I         
was indisposed and gone to sleep, I fastened the door of my house,          
placed the chair on the table, according to my usual custom, and sat        
down by it. After the common salutations were over, observing his           
Lordship's countenance full of concern, and enquiring into the reason,      
he desired I would hear him with patience in a matter that highly           
concerned my honor and my life. His speech was to the following             
effect, for I took notes of it as soon as he left me.                       
  You are to know, said he, that several Committees of Council have         
been lately called in the most private manner on your account; and          
it is but two days since his Majesty came to a full resolution.             
  You are very sensible that Skyresh Bolgolam (Galbet, or High              
Admiral) has been your mortal enemy almost ever since your arrival.         
His original reasons I know not, but his hatred is much increased           
since your great success against Blefuscu, by which his glory as            
Admiral is obscured. This Lord, in conjunction with Flimnap the High        
Treasurer, whose enmity against you is notorious on account of his          
lady, Limtoc the General, Lalcon the Chamberlain, and Balmuff the           
Grand Justiciary, have prepared articles of impeachment against you,        
for treason, and other capital crimes.                                      
                                                     {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 5}
  This preface made me so impatient, being conscious of my own              
merits and innocence, that I was going to interrupt; when he entreated      
me to be silent, and thus proceeded.                                        
  Out of gratitude for the favors you have done me, I procured              
information of the whole proceedings, and a copy of the articles,           
wherein I venture my head for your service.                                 
-                                                                           
          Articles of Impeachment against Quinbus Flestrin                  
                        (the Man-Mountain)                                  
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 10}
-                                                                           
                            ARTICLE I                                       
  Whereas, by a statute made in the reign of his Imperial Majesty           
Calin Deffar Plune, it is enacted, that whoever shall make water            
within the precincts of the royal palace, should be liable to the           
pains and penalties of high treason; notwithstanding, the said Quinbus      
Flestrin, in open breach of the said law, under color of extinguishing      
the fire kindled in the apartment of his Majesty's most dear                
Imperial Consort, did maliciously, traitorously, and devilishly, by         
discharge of his urine, put out the said fire kindled in the said           
apartment, lying and being within the precincts of the said royal           
palace, against the statute in that case provided, etc., against the        
duty, etc.                                                                  
-                                                                           
                            ARTICLE II.                                     
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 15}
  That the said Quinbus Flestrin having brought the imperial fleet          
of Blefuscu into the royal port, and being afterwards commanded by his      
Imperial Majesty to seize all the other ships of the said empire of         
Blefuscu, and reduce that empire to a province, to be governed by a         
Viceroy from hence, and to destroy and put to death not only all the        
Big-Endian exiles, but likewise all the people of that empire, who          
would not immediately forsake the Big-Endian heresy: He, the said           
Flestrin, like a false traitor against his most Auspicious, Serene,         
Imperial Majesty, did petition to be excused from the said service          
upon pretense of unwillingness to force the consciences, or destroy         
the liberties and lives of an innocent people.                              
-                                                                           
                            ARTICLE III.                                    
  That, whereas certain ambassadors from the court of Blefuscu, to sue      
for peace in his Majesty's court: He, the said Flestrin, did, like a        
false traitor, aid, abet, comfort, and divert the said ambassadors,         
although he knew them to be servants to a Prince who was lately an          
open enemy to his Imperial Majesty, and in open war against his said        
Majesty.                                                                    
-                                                                           
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 20}
                            ARTICLE IV.                                     
  That the said Quinbus Flestrin, contrary to the duty of a faithful        
subject, is now preparing to make a voyage to the court and empire          
of Blefuscu, for which he had received only verbal license from his         
Imperial Majesty; and under color of the said license, doth falsely         
and traitorously intend to take the said voyage, and hereby to aid,         
comfort, and abet the Emperor of Blefuscu, so late an enemy, and in         
open war with his Imperial Majesty aforesaid.                               
-                                                                           
  There are some other articles, but these are the most important,          
of which I have read you an abstract.                                       
  In the several debates upon this impeachment, it must be confessed        
that his Majesty gave many marks of his great lenity, often urging the      
services you had done him, and endeavoring to extenuate your crimes.        
The Treasurer and Admiral insisted that you should be put to the            
most painful and ignominious death, by setting fire on your house at        
night, and the General was to attend with twenty thousand men armed         
with poisoned arrows to shoot you on the face and hands. Some of            
your servants were to have private orders to strew a poisonous juice        
on your shirts, which would soon make you tear your own flesh, and die      
in the utmost torture. The General came into the same opinion, so that      
for a long time there was a majority against you. But his Majesty           
resolving, if possible, to spare your life, at last brought off the         
Chamberlain.                                                                
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 25}
  Upon this incident, Reldresal, principal Secretary for Private            
Affairs, who always approved himself your true friend, was commanded        
by the Emperor to deliver his opinion, which he accordingly did; and        
therein justified the good thoughts you have of him. He allowed your        
crimes to be great, but that still there was room for mercy, the            
most commendable virtue in a prince, and for which his Majesty was          
so justly celebrated. He said, the friendship between you and him           
was so well known to the world, that perhaps the most honorable             
board might think him partial: however, in obedience to the command he      
had received, he would freely offer his sentiments. That if his             
Majesty, in consideration of your services, and pursuant to his own         
merciful disposition, would please to spare your life, and only give        
order to put out both your eyes, he humbly conceived that by this           
expedient justice might in some measure be satisfied, and all the           
world would applaud the lenity of the Emperor, as well as the fair and      
generous proceedings of those who have the honor to be his                  
counsellors. That the loss of your eyes would be no impediment to your      
bodily strength, by which you might still be useful to his Majesty.         
That blindness is an addition to courage, by concealing dangers from        
us; that the fear you had for your eyes was the greatest difficulty in      
bringing over the enemy's fleet, and it would be sufficient for you to      
see by the eyes of the ministers, since the greatest princes do no          
more.                                                                       
  This proposal was received with the utmost disapprobation by the          
whole board. Bolgolam, the Admiral, could not preserve his temper, but      
rising up in fury said he wondered how the Secretary dared presume          
to give his opinion for preserving the life of a traitor: that the          
services you had performed, were, by all true reasons of state, the         
great aggravation of your crimes; that you, who were able to                
extinguish the fire, by discharge of urine in her Majesty's                 
apartment (which he mentioned with horror), might at another time,          
raise an inundation by the same means, to drown the whole palace;           
and the same strength which enabled you to bring over the enemy's           
fleet, might serve, upon the first discontent, to carry it back:            
that he had good reasons to think you were a Big-Endian in your heart;      
and as treason begins in the heart, before it appears in overt acts,        
so he accused you as a traitor on that account, and therefore insisted      
you should be put to death.                                                 
  The Treasurer was of the same opinion; he showed to what straits his      
Majesty's revenue was reduced by the charge of maintaining you,             
which would soon grow insupportable: that the Secretary's expedient of      
putting out your eyes was so far from being a remedy against this           
evil, it would probably increase it, as it is manifest from the common      
practice of blinding some kind of fowl, after which they fed the            
faster, and grew sooner fat: that his sacred Majesty and the                
Council, who are your judges, were in their own consciences fully           
convinced of your guilt, which was a sufficient argument to condemn         
you to death, without the formal proofs required by the strict              
letter of the law.                                                          
  But his Imperial Majesty, fully determined against capital                
punishment, was graciously pleased to say, that since the Council           
thought the loss of your eyes too easy a censure, some other may be         
inflicted hereafter. And your friend the Secretary humbly desiring          
to be heard again, in answer to what the Treasurer had objected             
concerning the great charge his Majesty was at in maintaining you,          
said that his Excellency, who had the sole disposal of the Emperor's        
revenue, might easily provide against that evil, by gradually               
lessening your establishment; by which, for want of sufficient food,        
you would grow weak and faint, and lose your appetite, and                  
consequently decay and consume in a few months; neither would the           
stench of your carcass be then so dangerous, when it should become          
more than half diminished; and immediately upon your death, five or         
six thousand of his Majesty's subjects might, in two or three days,         
cut your flesh from your bones, take it away by cartloads, and bury it      
in distant parts to prevent infection, leaving the skeleton as a            
monument of admiration to posterity.                                        
  Thus by the great friendship of the Secretary, the whole affair           
was compromised. It was strictly enjoined, that the project of              
starving you by degrees should be kept a secret, but the sentence of        
putting out your eyes was entered on the books; none dissenting except      
Bolgolam the Admiral, who, being a creature of the Empress, was             
perpetually instigated by her Majesty to insist upon your death, she        
having borne perpetual malice against you, on account of that infamous      
and illegal method you took to extinguish the fire in her apartment.        
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 30}
  In three days your friend the Secretary will be directed to come          
to your house, and read before you the articles of impeachment; and         
then to signify the great lenity and favor of his Majesty and Council,      
whereby you are only condemned to the loss of your eyes, which his          
Majesty does not question you will gratefully and humbly submit to;         
and twenty of his Majesty's surgeons will attend, in order to see           
the operation well performed, by discharging very sharp-pointed arrows      
into the balls of your eyes, as you lie on the ground.                      
  I leave to your prudence what measures you will take; and to avoid        
suspicion, I must immediately return in as private a manner as I came.      
  His Lordship did so, and I remained alone, under many doubts and          
perplexities of mind.                                                       
  It was a custom introduced by this prince and his ministry (very          
different, as I have been assured, from the practices of former times)      
that after the court had decreed any cruel execution, either to             
gratify the monarch's resentment, or the malice of a favorite, the          
Emperor always made a speech to his whole Council, expressing his           
great lenity and tenderness, as qualities known and confessed by all        
the world. This speech was immediately published through the                
kingdom; nor did anything terrify the people so much as those               
encomiums on his Majesty's mercy; because it was observed, that the         
more these praises were enlarged and insisted on, the more inhuman was      
the punishment, and the sufferer more innocent. And as to myself, I         
must confess, having never been designed for a courtier either by my        
birth or education, I was so ill a judge of things, that I could not        
discover the lenity and favor of this sentence, but conceived it            
(perhaps erroneously) rather to be rigorous than gentle. I sometimes        
thought of standing my trial, for although I could not deny the             
facts alleged in the several articles, yet I hoped they would admit of      
some extenuations. But having in my life perused many state trials,         
which I ever observed to terminate as the judges thought fit to             
direct, I dared not rely on so dangerous a decision, in so critical         
a juncture, and against such powerful enemies. Once I was strongly          
bent upon resistance, for while I had liberty, the whole strength of        
that empire could hardly subdue me, and I might easily with stones          
pelt the metropolis to pieces; but I soon rejected that project with        
horror, by remembering the oath I had made to the Emperor, the              
favors I received from him, and the high title of Nardac he                 
conferred upon me. Neither had I so soon learned the gratitude of           
courtiers, to persuade myself that his Majesty's present severities         
quitted me of all past obligations.                                         
  At last I fixed upon a resolution, for which it is probable I may         
incur some censure, and not unjustly; for I confess I owe the               
preserving of my eyes, and consequently my liberty, to my own great         
rashness and want of experience: because if I had then known the            
nature of princes and ministers, which I have since observed in many        
other courts, and their methods of treating criminals less obnoxious        
than myself, I should with great alacrity and readiness have submitted      
to so easy a punishment. But hurried on by the precipitancy of              
youth, and having his Imperial Majesty's license to pay my                  
attendance upon the Emperor of Blefuscu, I took this opportunity,           
before the three days were elapsed, to send a letter to my friend           
the Secretary, signifying my resolution of setting out that morning         
Blefuscu pursuant to the leave I had got; and without waiting for an        
answer, I went to that side of the island where our fleet lay. I            
seized a large man of war, tied a cable to the prow, and, lifting up        
the anchors, I stripped myself, put my clothes (together with my            
coverlet, which I brought under my arm) into the vessel, and drawing        
it after me between wading and swimming, arrived at the royal port          
of Blefuscu, where the people had long expected me; they lent me two        
guides to direct me to the capital city, which is of the same name.         
I held them in my hands till I came within two hundred yards of the         
gate, and desired them to signify my arrival to one of the                  
secretaries, and let him know, I there waited his Majesty's                 
commands. I had an answer in about an hour, that his Majesty, attended      
by the Royal Family, and great officers of the court, was coming out        
to receive me. I advanced a hundred yards. The Emperor and his train        
alighted from their horses, the Empress and ladies from their coaches,      
and I did not perceive they were in any fright or concern. I lay on         
the ground to kiss his Majesty's and the Empress's hand. I told his         
Majesty that I had come according to my promise, and with the               
license of the Emperor, my master, to have the honor of seeing so           
mighty a monarch, and to offer him any service in my power, consistent      
with my duty to my own prince; not mentioning a word of my disgrace,        
because I had hitherto no regular information of it, and might suppose      
myself wholly ignorant of any such design; neither could I                  
reasonably conceive that the Emperor would discover the secret while I      
was out of his power: wherein, however, it soon appeared I was              
deceived.                                                                   
                                                    {P_1|CH_7 ^paragraph 35}
  I shall not trouble the reader with the particular account of my          
reception at this court, which was suitable to the generosity of so         
great a prince; nor of the difficulties I was in for want of a house        
and bed, being forced to lie on the ground, wrapped up in my coverlet.      
                                                                            
P_1|CH_8                                                                    
  CHAPTER VIII                                                              
-                                                                           
  Three days after my arrival, walking out of curiosity to the              
northeast coast of the island, I observed, about half a league off, in      
the sea, something that looked like a boat overturned. I pulled off my      
shoes and stockings, and wading two or three hundred yards, I found         
the object to approach nearer by force of the tide; and then plainly        
saw it to be a real boat, which I supposed might, by some tempest,          
have been driven from a ship; whereupon I returned immediately towards      
the city, and desired his Imperial Majesty to lend me twenty of the         
tallest vessels he had left after the loss of his fleet, and three          
thousand seamen under the command of his Vice-Admiral. This fleet           
sailed round, while I went back the shortest way to the coast where         
I first discovered the boat; I found the tide had driven it still           
nearer. The seamen were all provided with cordage, which I had              
beforehand twisted to a sufficient strength. When the ships came up, I      
stripped myself, and waded till I came within a hundred yards of the        
boat, after which I was forced to swim till I got up to it. The seamen      
threw me the end of the cord, which I fastened to a hole in the             
forepart of the boat, and the other end to a man of war; but I found        
all my labor to little purpose; for being out of my depth, I was not        
able to work. In this necessity, I was forced to swim behind, and push      
the boat forwards as often as I could, with one of my hands; and the        
tide favoring me, I advanced so far, that I could just hold up my chin      
and feel the ground. I rested two or three minutes, and then gave           
the boat another shove, and so on till the sea was no higher than my        
arm-pits; and now the most laborious part being over, I took out my         
other cables, which were stowed in one of the ships, and fastening          
them first to the boat, and then to nine of the vessels which attended      
me; the wind being favorable, the seamen towed, and I shoved till we        
arrived within forty yards of the shore; and waiting till the tide was      
out, I got dry to the boat, and by the assistance of two thousand men,      
with ropes and engines, I made a shift to turn it on its bottom, and        
found it was but little damaged.                                            
  I shall not trouble the reader with the difficulties I was under          
by the help of certain paddles, which cost me ten days making, to           
get my boat to the royal port of Blefuscu, where a mighty concourse of      
people appeared upon my arrival, full of wonder at the sight of so          
prodigious a vessel. I told the Emperor that my good fortune had            
thrown this boat in my way, to carry me to some place from whence I         
might return into my native country, and begged his Majesty's orders        
for getting materials to fit it up, together with his license to            
depart; which, after some kind expostulations, he was pleased to            
grant.                                                                      
  I did very much wonder, in all this time, not to have heard of any        
express relating to me from our Emperor to the court of Blefuscu.           
But I was afterwards given privately to understand, that his                
Imperial Majesty, never imagining I had the least notice of his             
designs, believed I was only gone to Blefuscu in performance of my          
promise, according to the license he had given me, which was well           
known at our court, and would return in a few days when that                
ceremony was ended. But he was at last in pain at my long absence; and      
after consulting with the Treasurer, and the rest of that cabal, a          
person of quality was dispatched with the copy of the articles against      
me. This envoy had instructions to represent to the monarch of              
Blefuscu the great lenity of his master, who was content to punish          
me no farther than with the loss of my eyes; that I had fled from           
justice, and if I did not return in two hours, I should be deprived of      
my title of Nardac, and declared a traitor. The envoy further added,        
that in order to maintain the peace and amity between both empires,         
his master expected, that his brother of Blefuscu would give orders to      
have me sent back to Lilliput, bound hand and foot, to be punished          
as a traitor.                                                               
  The Emperor of Blefuscu having taken three days to consult, returned      
an answer consisting of many civilities and excuses. He said, that          
as for sending me bound, his brother knew it was impossible; that           
although I had deprived him of his fleet, yet he owed great                 
obligations to me for many good offices I had done him in making the        
peace. That however both their Majesties would soon be made easy;           
for I had found a prodigious vessel on the shore, able to carry me          
on the sea, which he had given order to fit up with my own                  
assistance and direction; and he hoped in a few weeks both empires          
would be freed from so insupportable an incumbrance.                        
  With this answer the envoy returned to Lilliput, and the monarch          
of Blefuscu related to me all that had past, offering me at the same        
time (but under the strictest confidence) his gracious protection,          
if I would continue in his service; wherein although I believed him         
sincere, yet I resolved never more to put any confidence in princes or      
ministers, where I could possibly avoid it; and therefore, with all         
due acknowledgements for his favorable intentions, I humbly begged          
to be excused. I told him that since fortune, whether good or evil,         
had thrown a vessel in my way, I was resolved to venture myself in the      
ocean, rather than be an occasion of difference between two such            
mighty monarchs. Neither did I find the Emperor at all displeased; and      
I discovered by a certain accident, that he was very glad of my             
resolution, and so were most of his ministers.                              
                                                     {P_1|CH_8 ^paragraph 5}
  These considerations moved me to hasten my departure somewhat sooner      
than I intended; to which the court, impatient to have me gone, very        
readily contributed. Five hundred workmen were employed to make two         
sails to my boat, according to my directions, by quilting thirteen          
fold of their strongest linen together. I was at the pains of making        
ropes and cables, by twisting ten, twenty or thirty of the thickest         
and strongest of theirs. A great stone that I happened to find,             
after a long search, by the sea-shore, served me for an anchor. I           
had the tallow of three hundred cows for greasing my boat, and other        
uses. I was at incredible pains in cutting down some of the largest         
timber-trees for oars and masts, wherein I was, however, much assisted      
by his Majesty's ship carpenters, who helped me in smoothing them,          
after I had done the rough work.                                            
  In about a month, when all was prepared, I sent to receive his            
Majesty's commands, and to take my leave. The Emperor and Royal Family      
came out of the palace; I lay down on my face to kiss his hand,             
which he very graciously gave me: so did the Empress and young Princes      
of the blood. His Majesty presented me with fifty purses of two             
hundred sprugs apiece, together with his picture at full length, which      
I put immediately into one of my gloves, to keep it from being hurt.        
The ceremonies at my departure were too many to trouble the reader          
with at this time.                                                          
  I stored the boat with the carcases of a hundred oxen, and three          
hundred sheep, with bread and drink proportionable, and as much meat        
ready dressed as four hundred cooks could provide. I took with me           
six cows and two bulls alive, with as many ewes and rams, intending to      
carry them into my own country, and propagate the breed. And to feed        
them on board, I had a good bundle of hay, and a bag of corn. I             
would gladly have taken a dozen of the natives, but this was a thing        
the Emperor would by no means permit; and besides a diligent search         
into my pockets, his Majesty engaged my honor not to carry away any of      
his subjects, although with their own consent and desire.                   
  Having thus prepared all things as well as I was able, I set sail on      
the twenty-fourth day of September, 1701, at six in the morning; and        
when I had gone about four leagues to the northward, the wind being at      
southeast, at six in the evening I descried a small island about            
half a league to the northwest. I advanced forward, and cast anchor on      
the leeside of the island, which seemed to be uninhabited. I then took      
some refreshment, and went to my rest. I slept well, and I                  
conjecture at least six hours, for I found the day broke in two             
hours after I awaked. It was a clear night. I ate my breakfast              
before the sun was up; and heaving anchor, the wind being favorable, I      
steered the same course that I had done the day before, wherein I           
was directed by my pocket compass. My intention was to reach, if            
possible, one of those islands, which I had reason to believe lay to        
the northeast of Van Diemen's Land. I discovered nothing all that day;      
but upon the next, about three in the afternoon, when I had by my           
computation made twenty-four leagues from Blefuscu, I descried a            
sail steering to the southeast; my course was due east. I hailed            
her, but could get no answer; yet I found I gained upon her, for the        
wind slackened. I made all the sail I could, and in half an hour she        
spied me, then hung out her ancient, and discharged a gun. It is not        
easy to express the joy I was in upon the unexpected hope of once more      
seeing my beloved country, and the dear pledges I had left in it.           
The ship slackened her sails, and I came up with her between five           
and six in the evening, September 26; but my heart leaped within me to      
see her English colors. I put my cows and sheep into my coat                
pockets, and got on board with all my little cargo of provisions.           
The vessel was an English merchantman, returning from Japan by the          
North and South Seas; the Captain, Mr. John Biddle of Deptford, a very      
civil man, and an excellent sailor. We were now in the latitude of          
30 degrees south; there were about fifty men in the ship; and here I        
met an old comrade of mine, one Peter Williams, who gave me a good          
character to the Captain. This gentleman treated me with kindness, and      
desired I would let know what place I came from last, and whither I         
was bound; which I did in few words, but he thought I was raving,           
and that the dangers I underwent had disturbed my head; whereupon I         
took my black cattle and sheep out of my pocket, which, after great         
astonishment, clearly convinced him of my veracity. I then showed           
him the gold given me by the Emperor of Blefuscu, together with his         
Majesty's picture at full length, and some other rarities of that           
country. I gave him two purses of two hundred sprugs each, and              
promised, when we arrived in England, to make him a present of a cow        
and a sheep big with young.                                                 
  I shall not trouble the reader with a particular account of this          
voyage, which was very prosperous for the most part. We arrived in the      
Downs on the 13th of April, 1702. I had only one misfortune, that           
the rats on board carried away one of my sheep; I found her bones in a      
hole, picked clean from the flesh. The rest of my cattle I got safe on      
shore, and set them grazing in a bowling-green at Greenwich, where the      
fineness of the grass made them feed very heartily, though I had            
always feared the contrary: neither could I possibly have preserved         
them in so long a voyage, if the Captain had not allowed me some of         
his best biscuit, which, rubbed to powder, and mingled with water, was      
their constant food. The short time I continued in England, I made          
considerable profit by showing my cattle to many persons of quality,        
and others: and before I began my second voyage, I sold them for six        
hundred pounds. Since my last return, I find the breed is considerably      
increased, especially the sheep; which I hope will prove much to the        
advantage of the woollen manufacture, by the fineness of the fleeces.       
                                                    {P_1|CH_8 ^paragraph 10}
  I stayed but two months with my wife and family; for my insatiable        
desire of seeing foreign countries would suffer me to continue no           
longer. I left fifteen hundred pounds with my wife, and fixed her in a      
good house at Redriff. My remaining stock I carried with me, part in        
money, and part in goods, in hopes to improve my fortunes. My eldest        
uncle John had left me an estate in land, near Epping, of about thirty      
pounds a year; and I had a long lease of the Black Bull in Fetter           
Lane, which yielded me as much more; so that I was not in any danger        
of leaving my family upon the parish. My son Johnny, named so after         
his uncle, was at the Grammar School, and a towardly child. My              
daughter Betty (who is now well married, and has children) was then at      
her needlework. I took leave of my wife, and boy and girl, with             
tears on both sides, and went on board the Adventure, a merchantship        
of three hundred tons, bound for Surat, Captain John Nicholas of            
Liverpool, Commander. But my account of this voyage must be referred        
to the second part of my Travels.                                           
-                                                                           
                       THE END OF THE FIRST PART                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                    PART II                                 
                                                                            
                            A VOYAGE TO BROBDINGNAG                         
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                  (SEE PLATE 2)                             
                                                                            
P_2|CH_1                                                                    
  CHAPTER I                                                                 
-                                                                           
  Having been condemned by nature and fortune to an active and              
restless life, in two months after my return I again left my native         
country, and took shipping in the Downs on the 20th day of June, 1702,      
in the Adventure, Captain John Nicholas, a Cornishman, Commander,           
bound for Surat. We had a very prosperous gale till we arrived at           
the Cape of Good Hope, where we landed for fresh water, but                 
discovering a leak we unshipped our goods and wintered there; for           
the Captain falling sick of an ague, we could not leave the Cape            
till the end of March. We then set sail, and had a good voyage till we      
passed the Straits of Madagascar; but having got northward of that          
island, and to about five degrees south latitude, the winds, which          
in those seas are observed to blow a constant equal gale between the        
north and west from the beginning of December to the beginning of May,      
on the 19th of April began to blow with much greater violence, and          
more westerly than usual, continuing so for twenty days together,           
during which time we were driven a little to the east of the Molucca        
Islands, and about three degrees northward of the Line, as our Captain      
found by an observation he took the 2nd of May, at which time the wind      
ceased, and it was a perfect calm, whereat I was not a little               
rejoiced. But he, being a man well experienced in the navigation of         
those seas, bid us all prepare against a storm, which accordingly           
happened the day following: for a southern wind, called the southern        
monsoon, began to set in.                                                   
  Finding it was likely to overblow, we took in our spritsail, and          
stood by to hand the foresail; but making foul weather, we looked           
the guns were all fast, and handed the mizzen. The ship lay very broad      
off, so we thought it better spooning before the sea, than trying or        
hulling. We reefed the foresail and set him, we hauled aft the              
foresheet; the helm was hard aweather. The ship wore bravely. We            
belayed the fore-down-haul; but the sail was split, and we hauled down      
the yard, and got the sail into the ship, and unbound all the things        
clear of it. It was a very fierce storm; the sea broke strange and          
dangerous. We hauled off upon the lanyard of the whipstaff, and helped      
the man at helm. We would not get down our topmast, but let all stand,      
because she scudded before the sea very well, and we knew that the          
topmast being aloft, the ship was the wholesomer, and made better           
way through the sea, seeing we had sea room. When the storm was             
over, we set foresail and mainsail, and brought the ship to: then we        
set the mizzen, main-topsail, and the fore-topsail. Our course was          
east northeast, the wind was at southwest. We got the starboard             
tacks aboard; we cast off our weather-braces and lifts; we set in           
the leebraces, and hauled forward by the weatherbowlings, and hauled        
them tight, and belayed them, and hauled over the mizzen tack to            
windward, and kept her full and by as near as she would lie.                
  During this storm, which was followed by a strong wind west               
southwest, we were carried by my computation about five hundred             
leagues to the east, so that the oldest sailor on board could not tell      
in what part of the world we were. Our provisions held out well, our        
ship was staunch, and our crew all in good health; but we lay in the        
utmost distress for water. We thought it best to hold on the same           
course, rather than turn more northerly, which might have brought us        
to the northwest parts of Great Tartary, and into the frozen sea.           
  On the 16th day of June, 1703, a boy on the topmost discovered land.      
On the 17th we came in full view of a great island or continent (for        
we knew not which) on the south side whereof was a small neck of            
land jutting out into the sea, and a creek too shallow to hold a            
ship of above one hundred tons. We cast anchor within a league of this      
creek, and our Captain sent a dozen of his men well armed in the            
longboat, with vessels for water if any could be found. I desired           
his leave to go with them, that I might see the country, and make what      
discoveries I could. When we came to land we saw no river or spring,        
nor any sign of inhabitants. Our men therefore wandered on the shore        
to find out some fresh water near the sea, and I walked alone about         
a mile on the other side, where I observed the country all barren           
and rocky. I now began to be weary, and seeing nothing to entertain my      
curiosity, I returned gently down towards the creek; and the sea being      
full in my view, I saw our men already got into the boat, and rowing        
for life to the ship. I was going to halloo after them, although it         
had been to little purpose, when I observed a huge creature walking         
after them in the sea, as fast as he could: he waded not much deeper        
than his knees, and took prodigious strides: but our men had the start      
of him half a league, and the sea thereabouts being full of                 
sharp-pointed rocks, the monster was not able to overtake the boat.         
This I was afterwards told, for I dared not stay to see the issue of        
that adventure; but ran as fast as I could the way I first went, and        
then climbed up a steep hill, which gave me some prospect of the            
country. I found it fully cultivated; but that which first surprised        
me was the length of the grass, which in those grounds that seemed          
to be kept for hay, was about twenty feet high.                             
  I fell into a high road, for so I took it to be, though it served to      
the inhabitants only as a footpath through a field of barley. Here I        
walked on for some time, but could see little on either side, it being      
now near harvest, and the corn rising at least forty feet. I was an         
hour walking to the end of this field, which was fenced in with a           
hedge of at least one hundred and twenty feet high, and the trees so        
lofty that I could make no computation of their altitude. There was         
a stile to pass from this field into the next. It had four steps,           
and a stone to cross over when you came to the uppermost. It was            
impossible for me to climb this stile, because every step was six feet      
high, and the upper stone above twenty. I was endeavoring to find some      
gap in the hedge, when I discovered one of the inhabitants in the next      
field, advancing towards the stile, of the same size with him whom I        
saw in the sea pursuing our boat. He appeared as tall as an ordinary        
spire steeple, and took about ten yards at every stride, as near as         
I could guess. I was struck with the utmost fear and astonishment, and      
ran to hide myself in the corn, from whence I saw him at the top of         
the stile, looking back into the next field on the right hand, and          
heard him call in a voice many degrees louder than a speaking trumpet:      
but the noise was so high in the air, that at first I certainly             
thought it was thunder. Whereupon seven monsters like himself came          
towards him with reaping hooks in their hands, each hook about the          
size of six scythes. These people were not so well clad as the              
first, whose servants or laborers they seemed to be. For upon some          
words he spoke, they went to reap the corn in the field where I lay. I      
kept from them at as great a distance as I could, but was forced to         
move with extreme difficulty, for the stalks of the corn were               
sometimes not above a foot distant, so that I could hardly squeeze          
my body between them. However, I made a shift to go forward till I          
came to a part of the field where the corn had been laid by the rain        
and wind. Here it was impossible for me to advance a step; for the          
stalks were so interwoven that I could not creep through, and the           
beards of the fallen ears so strong and pointed that they pierced           
through my clothes into my flesh. At the same time I heard the reapers      
not above a hundred yards behind me. Being quite dispirited with toil,      
and wholly overcome by grief and despair, I lay down between two            
ridges, and heartily wished I might there end my days. I bemoaned my        
desolate widow, and fatherless children. I lamented my own folly and        
willfulness in attempting a second voyage against the advice of all my      
friends and relations. In this terrible agitation of mind I could           
not forbear thinking of Lilliput, whose inhabitants looked upon me          
as the greatest prodigy that ever appeared in the world; where I was        
able to draw an Imperial Fleet in my hand, and perform those other          
actions which will be recorded forever in the chronicles of that            
empire, while posterity shall hardly believe them, although attested        
by millions. I reflected what a mortification it must prove to me to        
appear as inconsiderable in this nation as one single Lilliputian           
would be among us. But this I conceived was to be the least of my           
misfortunes: for as human creatures are observed to be more savage and      
cruel in proportion to their bulk, what could I expect but to be a          
morsel in the mouth of the first among these enormous barbarians            
that should happen to seize me? Undoubtedly philosophers are in the         
right when they tell us, that nothing is great or little otherwise          
than by comparison. It might have pleased fortune to let the                
Lilliputians find some nation, where the people were as diminutive          
with respect to them, as they were to me. And who knows but that            
even this prodigious race of mortals might be equally overmatched in        
some distant part of the world, whereof we have yet no discovery?           
                                                     {P_2|CH_1 ^paragraph 5}
  Scared and confounded as I was, I could not forbear going on with         
these reflections, when one of the reapers approaching within ten           
yards of the ridge where I lay, made me apprehend that with the next        
step I should be squashed to death under his foot, or cut in two            
with his reaping hook. And therefore when he was again about to             
move, I screamed as loud as fear could make me. Whereupon the huge          
creature trod short, and looking round about under him for some             
time, at last espied me as I lay on the ground. He considered a             
while with the caution of one who endeavors to lay hold on a small          
dangerous animal in such a manner that it shall not be able either          
to scratch or to bite him, as I myself have sometimes done with a           
weasel in England. At length he ventured to take me up behind by the        
middle between his forefinger and thumb, and brought me within three        
yards of his eyes, that he might behold my shape more perfectly. I          
guessed his meaning, and my good fortune gave me so much presence of        
mind, that I resolved not to struggle in the least as he held me in         
the air about sixty feet from the ground, although he grievously            
pinched my sides, for fear I should slip through his fingers. All I         
ventured was to raise my eyes towards the sun, and place my hands           
together in a supplicating posture, and to speak some words in a            
humble melancholy tone, suitable to the condition I then was in. For I      
apprehended every moment that he would dash me against the ground,          
as we usually do any little hateful animal which we have a mind to          
destroy. But my good star would have it, that he appeared pleased with      
my voice and gestures, and began to look upon me as a curiosity,            
much wondering to hear me pronounce articulate words, although he           
could not understand them. In the meantime I was not able to forbear        
groaning and shedding tears, and turning my head towards my sides;          
letting him know, as well as I could, how cruelly I was hurt by the         
pressure of his thumb and finger. He seemed to apprehend my meaning;        
for, lifting up the lappet of his coat, he put me gently into it,           
and immediately ran along with me to his master, who was a substantial      
farmer, and the same person I had first seen in the field.                  
  The farmer having (as I supposed by their talk) received such an          
account of me as his servant could give him, took a piece of a small        
straw, about the size of a walking staff, and therewith lifted up           
the lappets of my coat; which it seems he thought to be some kind of        
covering that nature had given me. He blew my hair aside to take a          
better view of my face. He called his hinds about him, and asked            
them (as I afterwards learned) whether they had ever seen in the            
fields any little creature that resembled me. He then placed me softly      
on the ground upon all four, but I got immediately up, and walked           
slowly backwards and forwards, to let those people see I had no intent      
to run away. They all sat down in a circle about me, the better to          
observe my motions. I pulled off my hat, and made a low bow towards         
the farmer. I fell on my knees, and lifted up my hands and eyes, and        
spoke several words as loud as I could: I took a purse of gold out          
of my pocket, and humbly presented it to him. He received it on the         
palm of his hand, then applied it close to his eye, to see what it          
was, and afterwards turned it several times with the point of a pin         
(which he took out of his sleeve), but could make nothing of it.            
Whereupon I made a sign that he should place his hand on the ground. I      
took the purse, and opening it, poured all the gold into his palm.          
There were six Spanish pieces of four pistoles each, beside twenty          
or thirty smaller coins. I saw him wet the tip of his little finger         
upon his tongue, and take up one of my largest pieces, and then             
another, but he seemed to be wholly ignorant what they were. He made        
me a sign to put them again into my purse, and the purse again into my      
pocket, which after offering to him several times, I thought it best        
to do.                                                                      
  The farmer by this time was convinced I must be a rational creature.      
He spoke often to me, but the sound of his voice pierced my ears            
like that of a water mill, yet his words were articulate enough. I          
answered as loud as I could, in several languages, and he often laid        
his car within two yards of me, but all in vain, for we were wholly         
unintelligible to each other. He then sent his servants to their work,      
and taking his handkerchief out of his pocket, he doubled and spread        
it on his left hand, which he placed flat on the ground, with the palm      
upwards, making me a sign to step into it, as I could easily do, for        
it was not above a foot in thickness. I thought it my part to obey,         
and for fear of falling, laid myself at length upon the                     
handkerchief, with the remainder of which he lapped me up to the            
head for further security, and in this manner carried me home to his        
house. There he called his wife, and showed me to her; but she              
screamed and ran back, as women in England do at the sight of a toad        
or a spider. However, when she had a while seen my behavior, and how        
well I observed the signs her husband made, she was soon reconciled,        
and by degrees grew extremely tender of me.                                 
  It was about twelve at noon, and a servant brought in dinner. It was      
only one substantial dish of meat (fit for the plain condition of an        
husbandman) in a dish of about twenty-four feet in diameter. The            
company were the farmer and his wife, three children, and an old            
grandmother. When they sat down, the farmer placed me at some distance      
from him on the table, which was thirty feet high from the floor. I         
was in a terrible fright, and kept as far as I could from the edge for      
fear of falling. The wife minced a bit of meat, then crumbled some          
bread on a trencher, and placed it before me. I made her a low bow,         
took out my knife and fork, and fell to eating, which gave them             
exceeding delight. The mistress sent her maid for a small dram cup,         
which held about three gallons, and filled it with drink; I took up         
the vessel with much difficulty in both hands, and in a most                
respectful manner drank to her ladyship's health, expressing the words      
as loud as I could in English, which made the company laugh so              
heartily, that I was almost deafened with the noise. This liquor            
tasted like a small cider, and was not unpleasant. Then the master          
made me a sign to come to his trencher side; but as I walked on the         
table, being in great surprise all the time, as the indulgent reader        
will easily conceive and excuse, I happened to stumble against a            
crust, and fell flat on my face, but received no hurt. I got up             
immediately, and observing the good people to be in much concern, I         
took my hat (which I held under my arm out of good manners) and waving      
it over my head, made three huzzas, to show I had gotten no mischief        
by my fall. But advancing forwards toward my master (as I shall             
henceforth call him), his youngest son who sat next him, an arch boy        
of about ten years old, took me up by the legs, and held me so high in      
the air, that I trembled every limb; but his father snatched me from        
him, and at the same time gave him such a box on the left ear, as           
would have felled an European troop of horse to the earth, ordering         
him to be taken from the table. But being afraid the boy might owe          
me a spite, and well remembering how mischievous all children among us      
naturally are to sparrows, rabbits, young kittens, and puppy dogs, I        
fell on my knees, and pointing to the boy, made my master to                
understand, as well as I could, that I desired his son might be             
pardoned. The father complied, and the lad took his seat again;             
whereupon I went to him and kissed his hand, which my master took, and      
made him stroke me gently with it.                                          
  In the midst of dinner, my mistress' favorite cat leaped into her         
lap. I heard a noise behind me like that of a dozen stocking-weavers        
at work; and turning my head, I found it proceeded from the purring of      
this animal, who seemed to be three times larger than an ox, as I           
computed by the view of her head, and one of her paws, while her            
mistress was feeding and stroking her. The fierceness of this               
creature's countenance altogether discomposed me; though I stood at         
the farther end of the table, above fifty feet off and although my          
mistress held her fast for fear she might give a spring, and seize          
me in her talons. But it happened there was no danger; for the cat          
took not the least notice of me when my master placed me within             
three yards of her. And as I have been always told, and found true          
by experience in my travels, that flying, or discovering fear way to        
make it pursue or attack you, so I resolved in this dangerous juncture      
to show no manner of concern. I walked with intrepidity five or six         
times before the very head of the cat, and came within half a yard          
of her; whereupon she drew herself back, as if she were more afraid of      
me: I had less apprehension concerning the dogs, whereof three or four      
came into the room, as it is usual in farmers' houses; one of which         
was a mastiff, equal in bulk to four elephants, and a greyhound,            
somewhat taller than the mastiff, but not so large.                         
                                                    {P_2|CH_1 ^paragraph 10}
  When dinner was almost done, the nurse came in with a Child of a          
year old in her arms, who immediately spied me, and began a squall          
that you might have heard from London Bridge to Chelsea, after the          
usual oratory of infants, to get me for a plaything. The mother out of      
pure indulgence took me up, and put me towards the child, who               
presently seized me by the middle, and got my head in his mouth, where      
I roared so loud that the urchin was frightened, and let me drop;           
and I should infallibly have broken my neck if the mother had not held      
her apron under me. The nurse to quiet her babe made use of a               
rattle, which was a kind of hollow vessel filled with great stones,         
and fastened by a cable to the childs waist: but all in vain, so            
that she was forced to apply the last remedy by giving it suck. I must      
confess no object ever disgusted me so much as the sight of her             
monstrous breast, which I cannot tell what to compare with, so as to        
give the curious reader an idea of its bulk, shape and color. It stood      
prominent six feet, and could not be less than sixteen in                   
circumference. The nipple was about half the size of my head, and           
the hue both of that and the dug so varified with spots, pimples and        
freckles, that nothing could appear more nauseous: for I had a near         
sight of her, she sitting down the more conveniently to give suck, and      
I standing on the table. This made me reflect upon the fair skins of        
our English ladies, who appear so beautiful to us, only because they        
are of our own size, and their defects not to be seen but through a         
magnifying glass, where we find by experiment that the smoothest and        
whitest skins look rough and coarse, and ill colored.                       
  I remember when I was at Lilliput, the complexion of those                
diminutive people appeared to me the fairest in the world; and talking      
upon this subject with a person of learning there, who was an intimate      
friend of mine, he said that my face appeared much fairer and smoother      
when he looked on me from the ground, than it did upon a nearer view        
when I took him up in my hand and brought him close, which he               
confessed was at first a very shocking sight. He said he could              
discover great holes in my skin; that the stumps of my beard were           
ten times stronger than the bristles of a boar, and my complexion made      
up of several colors altogether disagreeable: although I must beg           
leave to say for myself, that I am as fair as most of my sex and            
country, and very little sunburned by all my travels. On the other          
side, discoursing of the ladies in that Emperor's court, he used to         
tell me, one had freckles, another too wide a mouth, a third too large      
a nose, nothing of which I was able to distinguish. I confess this          
reflection was obvious enough; which however I could not forbear, lest      
the reader might think those vast creatures were actually deformed:         
for I must do them justice to say they are a comely race of people;         
and particularly the features of my master's countenance, although          
he were but a farmer, when I beheld him from the height of sixty feet,      
appeared very well proportioned.                                            
  When dinner was done, my master went out to his laborers, and as I        
could discover by his voice and gesture, gave his wife a strict charge      
to take care of me. I was very much tired, and disposed to sleep,           
which my mistress perceiving, she put me on her own bed, and covered        
me with a clean white handkerchief, larger and coarser than the             
mainsail of a man of war.                                                   
  I slept about two hours, and dreamed I was at home with my wife           
and children, which aggravated my sorrows when I awakened and found         
myself alone in a vast room, between two and three hundred feet             
wide, and above two hundred high, lying in a bed twenty yards wide. My      
mistress was gone about her household affairs, and had locked me in.        
The bed was eight yards from the floor. Some natural necessities            
required me to get down; I dare not presume to call, and if I had,          
it would have been in vain, with such a voice as mine, at so great a        
distance from the room where I lay to the kitchen where the family          
kept. While I was under these circumstances, two rats crept up the          
curtains, and ran smelling backwards and forwards on the bed. One of        
them came up almost to my face, whereupon I rose in a fright, and drew      
out my hanger to defend myself. These horrible animals had the              
boldness to attack me on both sides, and one of them held his               
fore-feet at my collar; but I had the good fortune to rip up his belly      
before he could do me any mischief. He fell down at my feet, and the        
other, seeing the fate of his comrade, made his escape, but not             
without one good wound on the back, which I gave him as he fled, and        
made the blood run trickling from him. After this exploit, I walked         
gently to and fro on the bed, to recover my breath and loss of              
spirits. These creatures were of the size of a large mastiff, but           
infinitely more nimble and fierce, so that if I had taken off my            
belt before I went to sleep, I must have infallibly been torn to            
pieces and devoured. I measured the tail of the dead rat, and found it      
to be two yards long, wanting an inch; but it went against my               
stomach to drag the carcass off the bed, where it lay still                 
bleeding; I observed it had yet some life, but with a strong slash          
cross the neck, I thoroughly dispatched it.                                 
  Soon after my mistress came into the room, who seeing me all bloody,      
ran and took me up in her hand. I pointed to the dead rat, smiling and      
making other signs to show I was not hurt, whereat she was extremely        
rejoiced, calling the maid to take up the dead rat with a pair of           
tongs, and throw it out of the window. Then she set me on a table,          
where I showed her my hanger all bloody, and wiping it on the lappet        
of my coat, returned it to the scabbard. I was pressed to do more than      
one thing, which another could not do for me, and therefore endeavored      
to make my mistress understand that I desired to be set down on the         
floor; which after she had done, my bashfulness would not suffer me to      
express myself farther than by pointing to the door, and bowing             
several times. The good woman with much difficulty at last perceived        
what I would be at, and taking me up again in her hand, walked into         
the garden, where she set me down. I went on one side about two             
hundred yards, and beckoning to her not to look or to follow me, I hid      
myself between two leaves of sorrel and there discharged the                
necessities of nature.                                                      
                                                    {P_2|CH_1 ^paragraph 15}
  I hope the gentle reader will excuse me for dwelling on these and         
the like particulars, which however insignificant they may appear to        
grovelling vulgar minds, yet will certainly help a philosopher to           
enlarge his thoughts and imagination, and apply them to the benefit of      
public as well as private life, which was my sole design in presenting      
this and other accounts of my travels to the world; wherein I have          
been chiefly studious of truth, without affecting any ornaments of          
learning or of style. But the whole scene of this voyage made so            
strong an impression on my mind, and is so deeply fixed in my               
memory, that in committing it to paper I did not omit one material          
circumstance: however, upon a strict review, I blotted out several          
passages of less moment which were in my first copy, for fear of being      
censured as tedious and trifling, whereof travelers are often, perhaps      
not without justice, accused.                                               
                                                                            
P_2|CH_2                                                                    
  CHAPTER II                                                                
-                                                                           
  My mistress had a daughter of nine years old, a child of forward          
parts for her age, very dextrous at her needle, and skillful in             
dressing her baby. Her mother and she contrived to fit up the baby's        
cradle for me against night: the cradle was put into a small drawer of      
a cabinet, and the drawer placed upon a hanging shelf for fear of           
the rats. This was my bed all the time I stayed with those people,          
though made more convenient by degrees, as I began to learn their           
language, and make my wants known. This young girl was so handy,            
that after I had once or twice pulled off my clothes before her, she        
was able to dress and undress me, though I never gave her that trouble      
when she would let me do either myself. She made me seven shirts,           
and some other linen, of as fine cloth as could be got, which indeed        
was coarser than sackcloth; and these she constantly washed for me          
with her own hands. She was likewise my school mistress to teach me         
the language: when I pointed to anything, she told me the name of it        
in her own tongue, so that in a few days I was able to call for             
whatever I had a mind to. She was very good-natured, and not above          
forty feet high, being little for her age. She gave me the name of          
Grildrig, which the family took up, and afterwards the whole                
kingdom. The word imports what the Latins call nanunculus the Italians      
homunceletino, and the English mannikin. To her I chiefly owe my            
preservation in that country: we never parted while I was there; I          
called her my Glumdalclitch, or little nurse: and I should be guilty        
of great ingratitude if I omitted this honorable mention of her care        
and affection towards me, which I heartily wish it lay in my power          
to requite as she deserves, instead of being the innocent but               
unhappy instrument of her disgrace, as I have too much reason to fear.      
  It now began to be known and talked of in the neighborhood, that          
my master had found a strange animal in the field, about the bigness        
of a splacknuck, but exactly shaped in every part like a human              
creature; which it likewise imitated in all its actions; seemed to          
speak in a little language of its own, had already learned several          
words of theirs, went erect upon two legs, was tame and gentle,             
would come when it was called, do whatever it was bid, had the              
finest limbs in the world, and a complexion fairer than a nobleman's        
daughter of three years old. Another farmer who lived hard by, and was      
a particular friend of my master, came on a visit on purpose to             
inquire into the truth of this story. I was immediately produced,           
and placed upon a table, where I walked as I was commanded, drew my         
hanger, put it up again, made my reverence to my master's guest, asked      
him in his own language how he did, and told him he was welcome,            
just as my little nurse had instructed me. This man, who was old and        
dim-sighted, put on his spectacles to behold me better, at which I          
could not forbear laughing very heartily, for his eyes appeared like        
the full moon shining into a chamber at two windows. Our people, who        
discovered the cause of my mirth, bore me company in laughing, at           
which the old fellow was fool enough to be angry and out of                 
countenance. He had the character of a great miser, and to my               
misfortune he well deserved it, by the cursed advice he gave my master      
to show me as a sight upon a market day in the next town, which was         
half an hour's riding, about twenty-two miles from our house. I             
guessed there was some mischief contriving, when I observed my              
master and his friend whispering long together, sometimes pointing          
at me; and my fears made me fancy that I overheard and understood some      
of their words. But the next morning Glumdalclitch, my little nurse,        
told me the whole matter, which she had cunningly picked out from           
her mother. The poor girl laid me on her bosom, and fell weeping            
with shame and grief. She apprehended some mischief would happen to me      
from rude vulgar folks, who might squeeze me to death, or break one of      
my limbs by taking me in their hands. She had also observed how modest      
I was in my nature, how nicely I regarded my honor, and what an             
indignity I should conceive it to be exposed for money as a public          
spectacle to the meanest of the people. She said, her papa and mamma        
had promised that Grildrig should be hers, but now she found they           
meant to serve her as they did last year, when they pretended to            
give her a lamb, and yet, as soon as it was fat, sold it to a butcher.      
For my own part, I may truly affirm that I was less concerned than          
my nurse. I had a strong hope which never left me, that I should one        
day recover my liberty; and as to the ignominy of being carried             
about for a monster, I considered myself to be a perfect stranger in        
the country, and that such a misfortune could never be charged upon me      
as a reproach, if ever I should return to England; since the King of        
Great Britain himself, in my condition, must have undergone the same        
distress.                                                                   
  My master, pursuant to the advice of his friend, carried me in a box      
the next market day to the neighboring town, and took along with him        
his little daughter, my nurse, upon a pillion behind him. The box           
was close on every side, with a little door for me to go in and out,        
and a few gimlet holes to let in air. The girl had been so careful          
to put the quilt of her baby's bed into it, for me to lie down on.          
However, I was terribly shaken and discomposed in this journey, though      
it were but of half an hour. For the horse went about forty feet at         
every step, and trotted so high, that the agitation was equal to the        
rising and falling of a ship in a great storm, but much more frequent.      
Our journey was somewhat further than from London to St. Albans. My         
master alighted at an inn which he used to frequent; and after              
consulting a while with the inn-keeper, and making some necessary           
preparations, he hired the Grultrud, or crier, to give notice               
through the town of a strange creature to be seen at the Sign of the        
Green Eagle, not so big as a splacknuck (an animal in that country          
very finely shaped, about six foot long) and in every part of the body      
resembling a human creature, could speak several words, and perform         
a hundred diverting tricks.                                                 
  I was placed upon a table in the largest room of the inn, which           
might be near three hundred feet square. My little nurse stood on a         
low stool close to the table, to take care of me, and direct what I         
should do. My master, to avoid a crowd, would suffer only thirty            
people at a time to see me. I walked about on the table as the girl         
commanded: she asked me questions as far as she knew my                     
understanding of the language reached, and I answered them as loud          
as I could. I turned about several times to the company, paid my            
humble respects, said they were welcome, and used some other                
speeches I had been taught. I took up a thimble filled with liquor,         
which Glumdalclitch had given me for a cup, and drank their health.         
I drew out my hanger, and flourished it after the manner of fencers in      
England. My nurse gave me part of a straw, which I exercised as a           
pike, having learned the art in my youth. I was that day shown to           
twelve sets of company, and as often forced to go over again with           
the same fopperies, till I was half dead with weariness and                 
vexation. For those who had seen me made such wonderful reports,            
that the people were ready to break down the doors to come in. My           
master for his own interest would not suffer any one to touch me            
except my nurse; and, to prevent danger, benches were set around the        
table at such a distance as put me out of everybody's reach.                
However, an unlucky schoolboy aimed a hazel nut directly at my head,        
which very narrowly missed me; otherwise, it came with so much              
violence, that it would have infallibly knocked out my brains, for          
it was almost as large as a small pumpion: but I had the                    
satisfaction to see the young rogue well beaten, and turned out of the      
room.                                                                       
  My master gave public notice that he would show me again the next         
market day, and in the meantime he prepared a more convenient               
vehicle for me, which he had reason enough to do; for I was so tired        
with my first journey, and with entertaining company for eight hours        
together, that I could hardly stand upon my legs or speak a word. It        
was at least three days before I recovered my strength; and that I          
might have no rest at home, all the neighboring gentlemen from a            
hundred miles around, hearing of my fame, came to see me at my              
master's own house. There could not be fewer than thirty persons            
with their wives and children (for the country is very populous);           
and my master demanded the rate of a full room whenever he showed me        
at home, although it were only to a single family; so that for some         
time I had but little ease every day of the week (except Wednesday,         
which is their Sabbath) although I were not carried to the town.            
                                                     {P_2|CH_2 ^paragraph 5}
  My master, finding how profitable I was likely to be, resolved to         
carry me to the most considerable cities of the kingdom. Having             
therefore provided himself with all things necessary for a long             
journey, and settled his affairs at home, he took leave of his wife,        
and upon the 17th of August, 1703, about two months after my                
arrival, we set out for the metropolis, situated near the middle of         
that empire, and about three thousand miles distance from our house.        
My master made his daughter Glumdalclitch ride behind him. She carried      
me on her lap in a box tied about her waist. The girl had lined it          
on all sides with the softest cloth she could get, well quilted             
underneath, furnished it with her baby's bed, provided me with linen        
and other necessaries, and made everything as convenient as she could.      
We had no other company but a boy of the house, who rode after us with      
the luggage.                                                                
  My master's design was to show me in all the towns by the way, and        
to step out of the road for fifty or a hundred miles, to any village        
or person of quality's house where he might expect custom. We made          
easy journeys of not above seven or eight score miles a day: for            
Glumdalclitch, on purpose to spare me, complained she was tired with        
the trotting of the horse. She often took me out of my box at my own        
desire, to give me air and show me the country, but always held me          
fast by a leading string. We passed over five or six rivers many            
degrees broader and deeper than the Nile or the Ganges; and there           
was hardly a rivulet so small as the Thames at London Bridge. We            
were ten weeks in our journey, and I was shown in eighteen large towns      
besides many villages and private families.                                 
  On the 26th day of October, we arrived at the metropolis, called          
in their language Lorbrulgrud, or Pride of the Universe. My master          
took a lodging in the principal street of the city, not far from the        
royal palace, and put out bills in the usual form, containing an exact      
description of my person and parts. He hired a large room between           
three and four hundred feet wide. He provided a table sixty feet in         
diameter, upon which I was to act my part, and palisadoed it around         
three feet from the edge, and as many high, to prevent my falling           
over. I was shown ten times a day to the wonder and satisfaction of         
all people. I could now speak the language tolerably well, and              
perfectly understood every word that was spoken to me. Besides, I           
had learned their alphabet, and could make a shift to explain a             
sentence here and there; for Glumdalclitch had been my instructor           
while we were at home, and at leisure hours during our journey. She         
carried a little book in her pocket, not much larger than a Sanson's        
Atlas; it was a common treatise for the use of young girls, giving a        
short account of their religion: out of this she taught me my letters,      
and interpreted the words.                                                  
                                                                            
P_2|CH_3                                                                    
  CHAPTER III                                                               
-                                                                           
  The frequent labors I underwent every day made in a few weeks a very      
considerable change in my health: the more my master got by me, the         
more unsatiable he grew. I had quite lost my stomach, and was almost        
reduced to a skeleton. The farmer observed it, and concluding I soon        
must die, resolved to make as good a hand of me as he could. While          
he was thus reasoning and resolving with himself, a Slardral, or            
Gentleman Usher, came from court, commanding my master to carry me          
immediately thither for the diversion of the Queen and her ladies.          
Some of the latter had already been to see me, and reported strange         
things of my beauty, behavior, and good sense. Her Majesty and those        
who attended her were beyond measure delighted with my demeanor. I          
fell on my knees, and begged the honor of kissing her Imperial foot;        
but this gracious princess held out her little finger towards me            
(after I was set on a table) which I embraced in both my arms, and put      
the tip of it with the utmost respect to my lip. She made me some           
general questions about my country and my travels, which I answered as      
distinctly and in as few words as I could. She asked whether I would        
be content to live at court. I bowed down to the board of the table,        
and humbly answered, that I was my master's slave, but if I were at my      
own disposal, I should be proud to devote my life to her Majesty's          
service. She then asked my master whether he were willing to sell me        
at a good price. He, who apprehended I could not live a month, was          
ready enough to part with me, and demanded a thousand pieces of             
gold, which were ordered him on the spot, each piece being about the        
bigness of eight hundred moidores; but, allowing for the proportion of      
all things between that country and Europe, and the high price of gold      
among them, was hardly so great a sum as a thousand guineas would be        
in England. I then said to the Queen, since I was now her Majesty's         
most humble creature and vassal, I must beg the favor, that                 
Glumdalclitch, who had always tended me with so much care and               
kindness, and understood to do it so well, might be admitted into           
her service, and continue to be my nurse and instructor. Her Majesty        
agreed to my petition, and easily got the farmer's consent, who was         
glad enough to have his daughter preferred at court: and the poor girl      
herself was not able to hide her joy. My late master withdrew, bidding      
me farewell, and saying he had left me in a good service; to which I        
replied not a word, only making him a slight bow.                           
  The Queen observed my coldness, and when the farmer was gone out          
of the apartment, asked me the reason. I made bold to tell her Majesty      
that I owed no other obligation to my late master, than his not             
dashing out the brains of a poor harmless creature found by chance          
in his field; which obligation was amply recompensed by the gain he         
had made in showing me through half the kingdom, and the price he           
had now sold me for. That the life I had since led was laborious            
enough to kill an animal of ten times my strength. That my health           
was much impaired by the continual drudgery of entertaining the rabble      
every hour of the day, and that if my master had not thought my life        
in danger, her Majesty perhaps would not have got so cheap a                
bargain. But as I was out of all fear of being ill treated under the        
protection of so great and good an Empress, the Ornament of Nature,         
the Darling of the World, the Delight of her Subjects, the Phoenix          
of the Creation; so I hoped my late master's apprehensions would            
appear to be groundless, for I already found my spirits to revive by        
the influence of her most august presence.                                  
  This was the sum of my speech, delivered with great improprieties         
and hesitation; the latter part was altogether framed in the style          
peculiar to that people, whereof I learned some phrases from                
Glumdalclitch, while she was carrying me to court.                          
  The Queen giving great allowance for my defectiveness in speaking,        
was however surprised at so much wit and good sense in so diminutive        
an animal. She took me in her own hand, and carried me to the King,         
who was then retired to his cabinet. His Majesty, a prince of much          
gravity, and austere countenance, not well observing my shape at first      
view, asked the Queen after a cold manner, how long it was since she        
grew fond of a splacknuck; for such it seems he took me to be, as I         
lay upon my breast in her Majesty's right hand. But this princess, who      
has an infinite deal of wit and humor, set me gently on my feet upon        
the scrutore, and commanded me to give his Majesty an account of            
myself, which I did in a very few words; and Glumdalclitch, who             
attended at the cabinet door, and could not endure I should be out          
of her sight, being admitted, confirmed all that had passed from my         
arrival at her father's house.                                              
  The King, although he be as learned a person as any in his                
dominions, and had been educated in the study of philosophy, and            
particularly mathematics; yet when he observed my shape exactly, and        
saw me walk erect, before I began to speak, conceived I might be a          
piece of clockwork (which is in that country arrived to a very great        
perfection), contrived by some ingenious artist. But when he heard          
my voice, and found what I delivered to be regular and rational, he         
could not conceal his astonishment. He was by no means satisfied            
with the relation I gave him of the manner I came into his kingdom,         
but thought it a story concerted between Glumdalclitch and her father,      
who had taught me a set of words to make me sell at a higher price.         
Upon this imagination he put several other questions to me, and             
still received rational answers, no otherwise defective than by a           
foreign accent, and an imperfect knowledge in the language, with            
some rustic phrases which I had learned at the farmer's house, and did      
not suit the polite style of a court.                                       
                                                     {P_2|CH_3 ^paragraph 5}
  His Majesty sent for three great scholars who were then in their          
weekly waiting, according to the custom in that country. These              
gentlemen, after they had awhile examined my shape with much nicety,        
were of different opinions concerning me. They all agreed that I could      
not be produced according to the regular laws of nature, because I was      
not framed with a capacity of preserving my life, either by swiftness,      
or climbing of trees, or digging holes in the earth. They observed          
by my teeth, which they viewed with great exactness, that I was a           
carnivorous animal; yet most quadrupeds being an overmatch for me, and      
field mice, with some others, too nimble, they could not imagine how I      
should be able to support myself, unless I fed upon snails and other        
insects, which they offered, by many learned arguments, to evince that      
I could not possibly do. One of these virtuosi seemed to think that         
I might be an embryo, or abortive birth. But this opinion was rejected      
by the other two, who observed my limbs to be perfect and finished,         
and that I had lived several years, as it was manifested from my            
beard, the stumps whereof they plainly discovered through a magnifying      
glass. They would not allow me to be a dwarf, because my littleness         
was beyond all degrees of comparison; for the Queen's favorite              
dwarf, the smallest ever known in that kingdom, was nearly thirty feet      
high. After much debate, they concluded unanimously that I was only         
relplum scalcath, which is interpreted literally, lusus naturae; a          
determination exactly agreeable to the modern philosophy of Europe,         
whose professors, disdaining the old evasion of occult causes, whereby      
the followers of Artistotle endeavor in vain to disguise their              
ignorance, have invented this wonderful solution of all                     
difficulties, to the unspeakable advancement of human knowledge.            
  After this decisive conclusion, I entreated to be heard a word or         
two. I applied myself to the King, and assured his Majesty, that I          
came from a country which abounded with several millions of both            
sexes, and of my own stature; where the animals, trees, and houses          
were all in proportion, and where by consequence I might be as able to      
defend myself, and to find sustenance, as any of his Majesty's              
subjects could do here; which I took for a full answer to those             
gentlemen's arguments. To this they only replied with a smile of            
contempt, saying that the farmer had instructed me very well in my          
lesson. The King, who had a much better understanding, dismissing           
his learned men, sent for the farmer, who by good fortune was not           
yet gone out of town. Having therefore first examined him privately,        
and then confronted him with me and the young girl, his Majesty             
began to think that what we told him might possibly be true. He             
desired the Queen to order that a particular care should be taken of        
me, and was of opinion that Glumdalclitch should still continue in her      
office of tending me, because he observed we had a great affection for      
each other. A convenient apartment was provided for her at court;           
she had a sort of governess appointed to take care of her education, a      
maid to dress her, and two other servants for menial offices; but           
the care of me was wholly appropriated to herself. The Queen commanded      
her own cabinet maker to contrive a box that might serve me for a           
bedchamber, after the model that Glumdalclitch and I should agree           
upon. This man was a most ingenious artist, and according to my             
directions, in three weeks finished for me a wooden chamber of sixteen      
feet square, and twelve high, with sash windows, a door, and two            
closets, like a London bedchamber. The board that made the ceiling was      
to be lifted up and down by two hinges, to put in a bed ready               
furnished by her Majesty's upholsterer, which Glumdalclitch took out        
every day to air, made it with her own hands, and letting it down at        
night, locked up the roof over me. A nice workman, who was famous           
for little curiosities, undertook to make me two chairs, with backs         
and frames, of a substance not unlike ivory, and two tables, with a         
cabinet to put my things in. The room was quilted on all sides, as          
well as the floor and the ceiling, to prevent any accident from the         
carelessness of those who carried me, and to break the force of a jolt      
when I went in a coach. I desired a lock for my door, to prevent            
rats and mice from coming in: the smith, after several attempts,            
made the smallest that ever was seen among them, for I have known a         
larger at the gate of a gentleman's house in England. I made a shift        
to keep the key in a pocket of my own, fearing Glumdalclitch might          
lose it. The Queen likewise ordered the thinnest silks that could be        
gotten, to make me clothes, not much thicker than an English                
blanket, very cumbersome till I was accustomed to them. They were           
after the fashion of the kingdom, partly resembling the Persian, and        
partly the Chinese, and are a very grave and decent habit.                  
  The Queen became so fond of my company, that she could not dine           
without me. I had a table placed upon the same at which her Majesty         
ate, just at her left elbow, and a chair to sit on. Glumdalclitch           
stood upon a stool on the floor, near my table, to assist and take          
care of me. I had an entire set of silver dishes and plates, and other      
necessaries, which, in proportion to those of the Queen, were not much      
bigger than what I have seen of the same kind in a London toy shop,         
for the furniture of a babyhouse: these my little nurse kept in her         
pocket in a silver box, and gave me at meals as I wanted them,              
always cleaning them herself. No person dined with the Queen but the        
two Princesses Royal, the elder sixteen years old, and the younger          
at that time thirteen and a month. Her Majesty used to put a bit of         
meat upon one of my dishes, out of which I carved for myself, and           
her diversion was to see me eat in miniature. For the Queen (who had        
indeed but a weak stomach) took up at one mouthful as much as a             
dozen English farmers could eat at a meal, which to me was for some         
time a very nauseous sight. She would crunch the wing of a lark, bones      
and all, between her teeth, although it were nine times as large as         
that of a full grown turkey; and put a bit of bread into her mouth, as      
big as two twelve-penny loaves. She drank out of a golden cup, above a      
hogshead at a draught. Her knives were twice as long as a scythe set        
straight upon the handle. The spoons, forks, and other instruments          
were all in the same proportion. I remember when Glumdalclitch carried      
me out of curiosity to see some of the tables at court, where ten or a      
dozen of these enormous knives and forks were lifted up together, I         
thought I had never till then beheld so terrible a sight.                   
  It is the custom that every Wednesday (which, as I have before            
observed, was their Sabbath) the King and Queen, with the royal             
issue of both sexes, dine together in the apartment of his Majesty, to      
whom I was now become a great favorite; and at these times my little        
chair and table were placed at his left hand, before one of the salt        
cellars. This prince took a pleasure in conversing with me,                 
inquiring into the manners, religion, laws, government, and learning        
of Europe; wherein I gave him the best account I was able. His              
apprehension was so clear, and his judgment so exact, that he made          
very wise reflections and observations upon all I said. But, I              
confess, that after I had been a little too copious in talking of my        
own beloved country, of our trade, and wars by sea and land, of our         
schisms in religion, and parties in the state, the prejudices of his        
education prevailed so far, that he could not forbear taking me up          
in his right hand, and stroking me gently with the other, after an          
hearty fit of laughing, asked me whether I were a Whig or a Tory. Then      
turning to his first minister, who waited behind him with a white           
staff, near as tall as the mainmast of the Royal Sovereign, he              
observed how contemptible a thing was human grandeur, which could be        
mimicked by such diminutive insects as I: and yet, said he, I dare          
engage, these creatures have their titles and distinctions of honor,        
they contrive little nests and burrows, that they call houses and           
cities; they make a figure in dress and equipage; they love, they           
fight, they dispute, they cheat, they betray. And thus he continued         
on, while my color came and went several times with indignation to          
hear our noble country, the mistress of arts and arms, the scourge          
of France, the arbitress of Europe, the seat of virtue, piety, honor        
and truth, the pride and envy of the world, contemptuously treated.         
  But as I was not in a condition to resent injuries, so, upon              
mature thoughts, I began to doubt whether I were injured or not.            
For, after having been accustomed several months to the sight and           
converse of this people, and observed every object upon which I cast        
my eyes to be of proportionable magnitude, the horror I had first           
conceived from their bulk and aspect was so far worn off, that if I         
had then beheld a company of English lords and ladies in their              
finery and best day clothes, acting their several parts in the most         
courtly manner, of strutting, and bowing, and prating, to say the           
truth, I should have been strongly tempted to laugh as much at them as      
the King and his grandees did at me. Neither indeed could I forbear         
smiling at myself, when the Queen used to place me upon her hand            
towards a looking glass, by which both our persons appeared before          
me in full view together! and there could be nothing more ridiculous        
than the comparison; so that I really began to imagine myself dwindled      
many degrees below my usual size.                                           
                                                    {P_2|CH_3 ^paragraph 10}
  Nothing angered and mortified me so much as the Queen's dwarf, who        
being of the lowest stature that was ever that country (for I verily        
think he was not thirty feet high) became insolent at seeing a              
creature so much beneath him, that he would always affect to swagger        
and look big as he passed by me in the Queen's antechamber, while I         
was standing on some table talking with the lords or ladies of the          
court, and he seldom failed of a smart word or two upon my littleness;      
against which I could only revenge myself by calling him brother,           
challenging him to wrestle, and such repartees as are usual in the          
mouths of court pages. One day at dinner this malicious little cub was      
so nettled with something I had said to him, that raising himself upon      
the frame of her Majesty's chair, he took me up by the middle, as I         
was sitting down, not thinking any harm, and let me drop into a             
large silver bowl of cream, and then ran away as fast as he could. I        
fell over head and ears, and if I had not been a good swimmer, it           
might have gone very hard with me; for Glumdalclitch in that instant        
happened to be at the other end of the room, and the Queen was in such      
a fright that she wanted presence of mind to assist me. But my              
little nurse ran to my relief, and took me out, after I had                 
swallowed above a quart of cream. I was put to bed; however, I              
received no other damage than the loss of a suit of clothes, which was      
utterly spoiled. The dwarf was soundly whipped, and as a farther            
punishment, forced to drink up the bowl of cream, into which he had         
thrown me; neither was he ever restored to favor; for soon after the        
Queen bestowed him to a lady of high quality, so that I saw him no          
more, to my very great satisfaction; for I could not tell to what           
extremity such a malicious urchin might have carried his resentment.        
  He had before served me a scurvy trick, which set the Queen a             
laughing, although at the same time she was heartily vexed, and             
would have immediately cashiered him, if I had not been so generous as      
to intercede. Her Majesty had taken a marrow bone upon her plate,           
and after knocking out the marrow, placed the bone again in the dish        
erect as it stood before; the dwarf watching his opportunity, while         
Glumdalclitch was gone to the sideboard, mounted upon the stool she         
stood on to take care of me at meals, took me up in both hands, and         
squeezing my legs together, wedged them into the marrow bone above          
my waist, where I stuck for some time, and made a very ridiculous           
figure. I believe it was near a minute before any one knew what was         
become of me, for I thought it below me to cry out. But, as princes         
seldom get their meat hot, my legs were not scalded, only my stockings      
and breeches in a sad condition. The dwarf at my entreaty had no other      
punishment than a sound whipping.                                           
  I was frequently rallied by the Queen upon account of my                  
fearfulness, and she used to ask me whether the people of ray               
country were as great cowards as myself. The occasion was this. The         
kingdom is much pestered with flies in summer; and these odious             
insects, each of them as big as a Dunstable lark, hardly gave me any        
rest while I sat at dinner, with their continual humming and buzzing        
about my ears. They would sometimes alight upon my victuals; and leave      
their loathsome excrement or spawn behind, which to me was very             
visible, though not to the natives of that country, whose large optics      
were not so acute as mine in viewing smaller objects. Sometimes they        
would fix upon my nose or forehead, where they stung me to the              
quick, smelling very offensively, and I could easily trace that             
viscous matter, which our naturalists tell us enables those                 
creatures to walk with their feet upwards upon a ceiling. I had much        
ado to defend myself against these detestable animals, and could not        
forbear starting when they came on my face. It was the common practice      
of the dwarf to catch a number of these insects in his hand, as             
schoolboys do among us, and let them out suddenly under my nose, on         
purpose to frighten me, and divert the Queen. My remedy was to cut          
them in pieces with my knife as they flew in the air, wherein my            
dexterity was much admired.                                                 
  I remember one morning when Glumdalclitch had set me in my box            
upon a window, as she usually did in fair days to give me air (for I        
dared not venture to let the box be hung on a nail out of the               
window, as we do with cages in England) after I had lifted up one of        
my sashes, and sat down at my table to eat a piece of sweet cake for        
my breakfast, above twenty wasps, allured by the smell, came flying         
into the room, humming louder than the drones of as many bagpipes.          
Some of them seized my cake, and carried it piecemeal away, others          
flew about my head and face, confounding me with the noise, and             
putting me in the utmost terror of their stings. However I had the          
courage to rise and draw my hanger, and attack them in the air. I           
dispatched four of them, but the rest got away, and I presently shut        
my window. These insects were as large as partridges: I took out their      
stings, found them an inch and a half long, and as sharp as needles. I      
carefully preserved them all, and having since shown them with some         
other curiosities in several parts of Europe, upon my return to             
England I gave three of them to Gresham College, and kept the fourth        
for myself.                                                                 
                                                                            
P_2|CH_4                                                                    
  CHAPTER IV                                                                
-                                                                           
  I now intend to give the reader a short description of this country,      
as far as I traveled in it, which was not above two thousand miles          
round Lorbrulgrud, the metropolis. For the Queen, whom I always             
attended, never went further when she accompanied the King in his           
progresses, and there stayed until his Majesty returned from viewing        
his frontiers. The whole extent of this prince's dominions reaches          
about six thousand miles in length, and from three to five in breadth.      
From whence I cannot but conclude that our geographers of Europe are        
in a great error, by supposing nothing but sea between Japan and            
California; for it was ever my opinion, that there must be a balance        
of earth to counterpoise the great continent of Tartary; and therefore      
they ought to correct their maps and charts, by joining this vast           
tract of land to the northwest parts of America, wherein I shall be         
ready to lend them my assistance.                                           
  The kingdom is a peninsula, terminated to the northeast by a ridge        
of mountains thirty miles high, which are altogether impassable by          
reason of the volcanoes upon the tops. Neither do the most learned          
know what sort of mortals inhabit beyond those mountains, or whether        
they be inhabited at all. On the three other sides it is bounded by         
the ocean. There is not one seaport in the whole kingdom, and those         
parts of the coasts into which the rivers issue are so full of pointed      
rocks, and the sea generally so rough, that there is no venturing with      
the smallest of their boats, so that these people are wholly                
excluded from any commerce with the rest of the world. But the large        
rivers are full of vessels, and abound with excellent fish, for they        
seldom get any from the sea because the sea fish are of the same            
size with those in Europe, and consequently not worth catching;             
whereby it is manifest, that nature, in the production of plants and        
animals of so extraordinary a bulk, is wholly confined to this              
continent, of which I leave the reasons to be determined by                 
philosophers. However, now and then they take a whale that happens          
to be dashed against the rocks, which the common people feed on             
heartily. These whales I have known so large that a man could hardly        
carry one upon his shoulders; and sometimes for curiosity they are          
brought in hampers to Lorbrulgrud: I saw one of them in a dish at           
the King's table, which passed for a rarity, but I did not observe          
he was fond of it; for I think indeed the bigness disgusted him,            
although I have seen one somewhat larger in Greenland.                      
  The country is well inhabited, for it contains fifty-one cities,          
near a hundred walled towns, and a great number of villages. To             
satisfy my curious reader, it may be sufficient to describe                 
Lorbrulgrud. This city stands upon almost two equal parts on each side      
the river that passes through. It contains above eighty thousand            
houses, and about six hundred thousand inhabitants. It is in length         
three glonglungs (which make about fifty-four English miles) and two        
and a half in breadth, as I measured it myself in the royal map made        
by the King's order, which was laid on the ground on purpose for me,        
and extended a hundred feet; I paced the diameter and circumference         
several times barefoot, and computing by the scale, measured it pretty      
exactly.                                                                    
  The King's palace is no regular edifice, but a heap of building           
about seven miles around: the chief rooms are generally two hundred         
and forty feet high, and broad and long proportion. A coach was             
allowed to Glumdalclitch and me, wherein her governess frequently took      
her out to see the town, or go among the shops; and I was always of         
the party, carried in my box; although the girl at my own desire would      
often take me out, and hold me in her hand, that I might more               
conveniently view the houses and the people, as we passed along the         
streets. I reckoned our coach to be about a square of Westminster           
Hall, but not altogether so high; however, I cannot be very exact. One      
day the governess ordered our coachman to stop at several shops, where      
the beggars, watching their opportunity, crowded to the sides of the        
coach, and gave me the most horrible spectacles that ever an English        
eye beheld. There was a woman with a cancer in her breast, swelled          
to a monstrous size, full of holes, in two or three of which I could        
have easily crept, and covered my whole body. There was a fellow            
with a wen in his neck, larger than five wool-packs, and another            
with a couple of wooden legs, each about twenty feet high. But the          
most hateful sight of all was the lice crawling on their clothes. I         
could see distinctly the limbs of these vermin with my naked eye, much      
better than those of an European louse through a microscope, and their      
snouts with which they rooted like swine. They were the first I had         
ever beheld, and I should have been curious enough to dissect one of        
them, if I had proper instruments (which I unluckily left behind me in      
the shop) although indeed the sight was so nauseous, that it perfectly      
turned my stomach.                                                          
  Besides the large box in which I was usually carried, the Queen           
ordered a smaller one to be made for me, of about twelve feet               
square, and ten high, for the convenience of traveling, because the         
other was somewhat too large for Glumdalclitch's lap, and cumbersome        
in the coach; it was made by the same artist, whom I directed in the        
whole contrivance. This traveling closet was an exact square with a         
window in the middle of three of the squares, and each window was           
latticed with iron wire on the outside, to prevent accidents in long        
journeys. On the fourth side, which had no window, two strong               
staples were fixed, through which the person that carried me, when I        
had a mind to be on horseback, put in a leathern belt, and buckled          
it about his waist. This was always the office of some grave trusty         
servant in whom I could confide, whether I attended the King and Queen      
in their progresses, or were disposed to see the gardens, or pay a          
visit to some great lady or minister of state in the court, when            
Glumdalclitch happened to be out of order: for I soon began to be           
known and esteemed among the greatest officers, I suppose more upon         
account of their Majesties' favor, than any merit of my own. In             
journeys, when I was weary of the coach, a servant on horseback             
would buckle my box, and place it on a cushion before him; and there I      
had a full prospect of the country on three sides from my three             
windows. I had in this closet a field bed and a hung from the ceiling,      
two chairs and a table, neatly screwed to the floor, to prevent             
being tossed about by the agitation of the horse or the coach. And          
having been long used to sea voyages, those motions, although               
sometimes very violent, did not much discompose me.                         
                                                     {P_2|CH_4 ^paragraph 5}
  Whenever I had a mind to see the town, it was always in my traveling      
closet, which Glumdalclitch held in her lap in a kind of open sedan,        
after the fashion of the country, borne by four men, and attended by        
two others in the Queen's livery. The people who had often heard of         
me, were very curious to crowd about the sedan, and the girl was            
complaisant enough to make the bearers stop, and to take me in her          
hand that I might be more conveniently seen.                                
  I was very desirous to see the chief temple, and particularly the         
tower belonging to it, which is reckoned the highest in the kingdom.        
Accordingly, one day my nurse carried me thither, but I may truly           
say I came back disappointed; for height is not above three thousand        
feet, reckoning from the ground to the highest pinnacle top; which          
allowing for the difference between the size of those people and us in      
Europe, is no great matter for admiration, nor at all equal in              
proportion (if I rightly remember) to Salisbury steeple. But, not to        
detract from a nation to which during my life I shall acknowledge           
myself extremely obliged, it must be allowed that whatever this famous      
tower wants in height is amply made up in beauty and strength. For the      
walls are near a hundred feet thick, built of hewn stone, whereof each      
is about forty feet square, and adorned on all sides with statues of        
gods and emperors cut in marble larger than the life, placed in             
their several niches. I measured a little finger which had fallen down      
from one of these statues, and lay unperceived among some rubbish, and      
found it exactly four feet and an inch in length. Glumdalclitch             
wrapped it up in a handkerchief, and carried it home in her pocket          
to keep among other trinkets, of which the girl was very fond, as           
children at her age usually are.                                            
  The King's kitchen is indeed a noble building, vaulted at top, and        
about six hundred feet high. The great oven is not so wide by ten           
yards as the cupola at St. Paul's; for I measured the latter on             
purpose after my return. But if I should describe the kitchen grate,        
the prodigious pots and kettles, the joints of meat turning on the          
spits, with many other particulars, perhaps I should be hardly              
believed; at least a severe critic would be apt to think I enlarged         
a little, as travelers are often suspected to do. To avoid which            
censure, I fear I have run too much into the other extreme; and that        
if this treatise should happen to be translated into the language of        
Brobdingnag (which is the general name of that kingdom) and                 
transmitted thither, the King and his people would have reason to           
complain that I had done them an injury by a false and diminutive           
representation.                                                             
  His Majesty seldom keeps above six hundred horses in his stables:         
they are generally from fifty-four to sixty feet high. But when he          
goes abroad on solemn days, he is attended for state by a militia           
guard of five hundred horse, which indeed I thought was the most            
splendid sight that could be ever beheld, till I saw part of his            
army in battalia, whereof I shall find another occasion to speak.           
                                                                            
P_2|CH_5                                                                    
  CHAPTER V                                                                 
-                                                                           
  I should have lived happy enough in that country, if my littleness        
had not exposed me to several ridiculous and troublesome accidents,         
some of which I shall venture to relate. Glumdalclitch often carried        
me into the gardens of the court in my smaller box, and would               
sometimes take me out of it and hold me in her hand, or set me down to      
walk. I remember, before the dwarf left the Queen, he followed us           
one day into those gardens, and my nurse having set me down, he and         
I being close together, near some dwarf apple trees, I must needs show      
my wit by a silly allusion between him and the trees, which happens to      
hold in their language as it does in ours. Whereupon, the malicious         
rogue watching his opportunity, when I was walking under one of             
them, shook it directly over my head, by which a dozen apples, each of      
them near as large as a Bristol barrel, came tumbling about my ears;        
one of them hit me on the back as I chanced to stoop, and knocked me        
down flat on my face, but I received no other hurt, and the dwarf           
was pardoned at my desire, because I had given the provocation.             
  Another day Glumdalclitch left me on a smooth grass plot to divert        
myself while she walked at some distance with her governess. In the         
meantime there suddenly fell such a violent shower of hail, that I was      
immediately by the force of it struck to the ground: and when I was         
down, the hailstones gave me such cruel bangs all over the body, as if      
I had been pelted with tennis balls; however, I made a shift to             
creep on all fours, and shelter myself by lying flat on my face on the      
lee side of a border of lemon thyme, but so bruised from head to            
foot that I could not go abroad in ten days. Neither is this at all to      
be wondered at, because nature in that country observing the same           
proportion through all her operations, a hailstone is near eighteen         
hundred times as large as one in Europe, which I can assert upon            
experience, having been so curious to weigh and measure them.               
  But a more dangerous accident happened to me in the same garden,          
when my little nurse believing she had put me in a secure place, which      
I often entreated her to do, that might enjoy my own thoughts, and          
having left my box at home to avoid the trouble of carrying it, went        
to another part of the garden with her governess and some ladies of         
her acquaintance. While she was absent and out of hearing, a small          
white spaniel belonging to one of the chief gardeners, having got by        
accident into the garden, happened to range near the place where I          
lay. The dog following the scent, came directly up, and taking me in        
his mouth, ran straight to his master, wagging his tail, and set me         
gently on the ground. By good fortune he had been so well taught, that      
I was carried between his teeth without the least hurt, or even             
tearing my clothes. But the poor gardener, who knew me well, and had a      
great kindness for me, was in a terrible fright. He gently took me          
up in both his hands, and asked me how I did; but I was so amazed           
and out of breath, that I could not speak a word. In a few minutes I        
came to myself, and he carried me safe to my little nurse, who by this      
time had returned to the place where she left me, and was in cruel          
agonies when I did not appear, nor answer when she called: she              
severely reprimanded the gardener on account of his dog. But the thing      
was hushed up, and never known at court; for the girl was afraid of         
the Queen's anger, and truly as to myself, I thought it would not be        
for my reputation that such a story should go about.                        
  This accident absolutely determined Glumdalclitch never to trust          
me abroad for the future out of her sight. I had been long afraid of        
this resolution, and therefore concealed from her some little               
unlucky adventures that happened in those times when I was left by          
myself. Once a kite hovering over the garden made a swoop at me, and        
if I had not resolutely drawn my hanger, and run under a thick              
espalier, he would have certainly carried me away in his talons.            
Another time walking to the top of a fresh molehill, I fell to my neck      
in the hole through which that animal had cast up the earth, and            
coined some lie, not worth remembering, to excuse myself for                
spoiling my clothes. I likewise broke my right shin against the             
shell of a snail, which I happened to stumble over, as I was walking        
alone, and thinking on poor England.                                        
  I cannot tell whether I were more pleased or mortified, to observe        
in those solitary walks that the smaller birds did not appear to be at      
all afraid of me, but would hop about within a yard's distance,             
looking for worms and other food with as much indifference and              
security as if no creature at all were near them. I remember a              
thrush had the confidence to snatch out of my hand with his bill a          
piece of cake that Glumdalclitch had just given me for my breakfast.        
When I attempted to catch any of these birds, they would boldly turn        
against me, endeavoring to pick my fingers, which I dared not               
venture within their reach; and then they would hop back unconcerned        
to hunt for worms or snails, as they did before. But one day I took         
a thick cudgel, and threw it with all my strength so luckily at a           
linnet that I knocked him down, and seizing him by the neck with            
both my hands, ran with him in triumph to my nurse. However, the bird,      
who had only been stunned, recovering himself, gave me so many boxes        
with his wings on both sides of my head and body, though I held him at      
arm's length, and was out of the reach of his claws, that I was twenty      
times thinking to let him go. But I was soon relieved by one of our         
servants, who wrung off the bird's neck, and I had him next day for         
dinner, by the Queen's command. This as near as I can remember, to          
be somewhat larger than an English swan.                                    
                                                     {P_2|CH_5 ^paragraph 5}
  The Maids of Honor often invited Glumdalclitch to their                   
apartments, and desired she would bring me along with her, on               
purpose to have the pleasure of seeing and touching me. They would          
often strip me naked from top to toe, and lay me at full length in          
their bosoms; wherewith I was much disgusted; because, to say the           
truth, a very offensive smell came from their skins; which I do not         
mention or intend to the disadvantage of those excellent ladies, for        
whom I have all manner of respect; but I conceive that my sense was         
more acute in proportion to my littleness, and that those                   
illustrious persons were no more disagreeable to their lovers, or to        
each other, than people of the same quality are with us in England.         
And, after all, I found their natural smell was much more                   
supportable than when they used perfumes, under which I immediately         
swooned away. I cannot forget that an intimate friend of mine in            
Lilliput took the freedom in a warm day, when I had used a good deal        
of exercise, to complain of a strong smell about me, although I am          
as little faulty that way as most of my sex: but I suppose his faculty      
of smelling was as nice with regard to me, as mine was to that of this      
people. Upon this point, I cannot forbear doing justice to the Queen        
my mistress, and Glumdalclitch my nurse, whose persons were as sweet        
as those of any lady in England.                                            
  That which gave me most uneasiness among these Maids of Honor,            
when my nurse carried me to visit them, was to see them use me without      
any manner of ceremony, like a creature who had no sort of                  
consequence. For they would strip themselves to the skin, and put on        
their smocks in my presence, while I was placed on their toilet             
directly before their naked bodies, which, I am sure, to me was very        
far from being a tempting sight, or from giving me any other                
emotions than those of horror and disgust. Their skins appeared so          
coarse and uneven, so variously colored, when I saw them near, with         
a mole here and there as broad as a trencher, and hairs hanging from        
it thicker than packthreads, to say nothing further concerning the          
rest of their persons. Neither did they at all scruple, while I was         
by, to discharge what they had drunk, to the quantity of at least           
two hogsheads, in a vessel that held above three tons. The                  
handsomest among these Maids of Honor, a pleasant frolicsome girl of        
sixteen, would sometimes set me astride upon one of her nipples,            
with many other tricks, wherein the reader will excuse me for not           
being over particular. But I was so much displeased, that I                 
entreated Glumdalclitch to contrive some excuse for not seeing that         
young lady any more.                                                        
  One day a young gentleman, who was a nephew to my nurse's governess,      
came and pressed them both to see an execution. It was of a man who         
had murdered one of that gentleman's intimate acquaintance.                 
Glumdalclitch was prevailed on to be of the company, very much against      
her inclination, for she was naturally tender-hearted; and as for           
myself, although I abhorred such kind of spectacles, yet my                 
curiosity tempted me to see something that I thought must be                
extraordinary. The malefactor was fixed in a chair upon a scaffold          
erected for the purpose, and his head cut off at a blow with a sword        
of about forty foot long. The veins and arteries spouted up such a          
prodigious quantity of blood, and so high in the air, that the great        
jet d'eau at Versailles was not equal for the time it lasted; and           
the head, when it fell on the scaffold floor, gave such a bounce, as        
made me start, although I were at least half an English mile distant.       
  The Queen, who often used to hear me talk of my sea voyages, and          
took all occasions to divert me when I was melancholy, asked me             
whether I understood how to handle a sail or an oar, and whether a          
little exercise of rowing might not be convenient for my health. I          
answered that I understood both very well. For, although my proper          
employment had been to be surgeon or doctor to the ship, yet upon a         
pinch, I was forced to work like a common mariner. But I could not see      
how this could be done in their country, where the smallest wherry was      
equal to a first-rate man of war among us, and such a boat as I             
could manage would never live in any of their rivers. Her Majesty           
said, if I would contrive a boat, her own joiner should make it, and        
she would provide a place for me to sail in. The fellow was an              
ingenious workman, and by my instructions in ten days finished a            
pleasure boat with all its tackling, able conveniently to hold eight        
Europeans. When it was finished, the Queen was so delighted, that           
she ran with it in her lap to the King, who ordered it to be put in         
a cistern full of water, with me in it, by way of trial; where I could      
not manage my two sculls, or little oars, for want of room. But the         
Queen had before contrived another project. She ordered the joiner          
to make a wooden trough of three hundred feet long, fifty broad, and        
eight deep; which being well pitched to prevent leaking, was placed on      
the floor along the wall, in an outer room of the palace. It had a          
cock near the bottom to let out the water when it began to grow stale,      
and two servants could easily fill it in half an hour. Here I often         
used to row for my own diversion, as well as that of the Queen and her      
ladies, who thought themselves well entertained with my skill and           
agility. Sometimes I would put up my sail, and then my business was         
only to steer, while the ladies gave me a gale with their fans; and         
when they were weary, some of the pages would blow my sail forward          
with their breath, while I showed my art steering starboard or              
larboard as I pleased. When I had done, Glumdalclitch always carried        
my boat into her closet, and hung it on a nail to dry.                      
  In this exercise I once met an accident which had like to have            
cost me my life. For one of the pages having put my boat into the           
trough, the governess who attended Glumdalclitch very officiously           
lifted me up to place me in the boat, but I happened to slip through        
her fingers, and should have infallibly fallen down forty feet upon         
the floor, if by the luckiest chance in the world, I had not been           
stopped by a corking-pin that stuck in the good gentlewoman's               
stomacher; the head of the pin passed between my shirt and the              
waistband of my breeches, and thus I was held by the middle in the air      
till Glumdalclitch ran to my relief.                                        
                                                    {P_2|CH_5 ^paragraph 10}
  Another time, one of the servants, whose office it was to fill my         
trough every third day with fresh water, was so careless to let a huge      
frog (not perceiving it) slip out of his pail. The frog lay                 
concealed till I was put into my boat, but then seeking a resting           
place, climbed up, and made it lean so much on one side, that I was         
forced to balance it with all my weight on the other, to prevent            
overturning. When the frog got in, it hopped at once half the length        
of the boat, and then over my head, backwards and forwards, daubing my      
face and clothes with its odious slime. The largeness of its                
features made it appear the most deformed animal that can be                
conceived. However, I desired Glumdaclitch to let me deal with it           
alone. I banged it a good while with one of my sculls, and at last          
forced it to leap out of the boat.                                          
  But the greatest danger I ever underwent in that kingdom was from         
a monkey, who belonged to one of the clerks of the kitchen.                 
Glumdalclitch had locked me up in her closet, while she went somewhere      
upon business or a visit. The weather being very warm, the closet           
window was left open, as well as the windows and the door of my bigger      
box, in which I usually lived, because of its largeness and                 
conveniency. As I sat quietly meditating at my table, I heard               
something bounce in at the closet window, and skip about from one side      
to the other; whereat, although I was much alarmed, yet I ventured          
to look out, but stirred not from my seat; and then I saw this              
frolicsome animal, frisking and leaping up and down, till at last he        
came to my box, which he seemed to view with great pleasure and             
curiosity, peeping in at the door and every window. I retreated to the      
farther corner of my room, or box, but the monkey looking in at             
every side, put me into such a fright, that I wanted presence of            
mind to conceal myself under the bed, as I might easily have done.          
After some time spent in peeping, grinning, and chattering, he at last      
espied me, and reaching one of his paws in at the door, as a cat            
does when she plays with a mouse, although I often shifted place to         
avoid him, he at length seized the lappet of my coat (which being made      
of that country cloth, was very thick and strong) and dragged me            
out. He took me up in his right forefoot, and held me as a nurse            
does a child she is going to suckle, just as I have seen the same sort      
of creature do with a kitten in Europe: and when I offered to               
struggle, he squeezed me so hard, that I thought it more prudent to         
submit. I have good to believe that he took me for a young one of           
his own species, by his often stroking my face very gently with his         
other paw. In these diversions he was interrupted by a noise at the         
closet door, as if somebody were opening it; whereupon he suddenly          
leaped up to the window at which he had come in, and thence upon the        
leads and gutters, walking upon three legs, and holding me in the           
fourth, till he clambered up to a roof that was next to ours. I             
heard Glumdalclitch give a shriek at the moment he was carrying me          
out. The poor girl was almost distracted: that quarter of the palace        
was all in an uproar; the servants ran for ladders; the monkey was          
seen by hundreds in the court, sitting upon the ridge of a building,        
holding me like a baby in one of his fore-paws, and feeding me with         
the other, by cramming into my mouth some victuals he had squeezed out      
of the bag on one side of his chaps, and patting me when I would not        
eat; whereat many of the rabble below could not forbear laughing;           
neither do I think they justly ought to be blamed, for without              
question the sight was ridiculous enough to everybody but myself. Some      
of the people threw up stones, hoping to drive the monkey down; but         
this was strictly forbidden, or else very probably my brains had            
been dashed out.                                                            
  The ladders were now applied, and mounted by several men, which           
the monkey observing, and finding himself almost encompassed, not           
being able to make speed enough with his three legs, let me drop on         
a ridge tile, and made his escape. Here I sat for some time three           
hundred yards from the ground, expecting every moment to be blown down      
by the wind, or to fall by my own giddiness, and come tumbling over         
and over from the ridge to the eaves; but an honest lad, one of my          
nurse's footmen, climbed up, and putting me into his breeches               
pocket, brought me down safe.                                               
  I was almost choked with the filthy stuff the monkey had crammed          
down my throat: but my dear little nurse picked it out of my mouth          
with a small needle, and then I fell to vomiting, which gave me             
great relief. Yet I was so weak and bruised in the sides with the           
squeezes given me by this odious animal, that I was forced to keep          
my bed a fortnight. The King, Queen, and all the court, sent every day      
to inquire after my health, and her Majesty made me several visits          
during my sickness. The monkey was killed, and an order made that no        
such animal should be kept about the palace.                                
  When I attended the King after my recovery, to return him thanks for      
his favors, he was pleased to rally me a good deal upon this                
adventure. He asked me what my thoughts and speculations were while         
I lay in the monkey's paw, how I liked the victuals he gave me, his         
manner of feeding, and whether the fresh air on the roof had sharpened      
my stomach. He desired to know what I would have done upon such an          
occasion my own country. I told his Majesty that in Europe we had no        
monkeys, except such as were brought for curiosities from other             
places, and so small that I could deal with a dozen of them                 
together, if they presumed to attack me. And as for that monstrous          
animal with whom I was so lately engaged (it was indeed as large as an      
elephant), if my fears had suffered me to think so far as to make           
use of my hanger (looking fiercely and clapping my hand upon the            
hilt as I spoke) when he poked his paw into my chamber, perhaps I           
should have given him such a wound, as would have made him glad to          
withdraw it with more haste than he put it in. This I delivered in a        
firm tone, like a person who was jealous lest his courage should be         
called in question. However, my speech produced nothing else besides a      
loud laughter, which all the respect due to his Majesty from those          
about him could not make them contain. This made me reflect how vain        
an attempt it is for a man to endeavor doing himself honor among those      
who are out of all degree of equality or comparison with him. And           
yet I have seen the moral of my own behavior very frequent in               
England since my return, where a little contemptible varlet, without        
the least title to birth, person, wit, or common sense, shall               
presume to look with importance, and put himself upon a foot with           
the greatest persons of the kingdom.                                        
                                                    {P_2|CH_5 ^paragraph 15}
  I was every day furnishing the court with some ridiculous story; and      
Glumdalclitch, although she loved me to excess, yet was arch enough to      
inform the Queen, whenever I committed any folly that she thought           
would be diverting to her Majesty. The girl, who had been out of            
order, was carried by her governess to take the air about an hour's         
distance, or thirty miles from town. They alighted out of the coach         
near a small footpath in a field, and Glumdalclitch setting down my         
traveling box, I went out of it to walk. There was a cow dung in the        
path, and I must needs try my activity by attempting to leap over           
it. I took a run, but unfortunately jumped short, and found myself          
just in the middle up to my knees. I waded through with some                
difficulty, and one of the footmen wiped me as clean as he could            
with his handkerchief; for I was filthily bemired, and my nurse             
confined me to my box till we returned home; where the Queen was            
soon informed of what had passed, and the footmen spread it about           
the court, so that all the mirth, for some days, was at my expense.         
                                                                            
P_2|CH_6                                                                    
  CHAPTER VI                                                                
-                                                                           
  I used to attend the King's levee once or twice a week, and had           
often seen him under the barber's hand, which indeed was at first very      
terrible to behold; for the razor was almost twice as long as an            
ordinary scythe. His Majesty, according to the custom of the                
country, was only shaved twice a week. I once prevailed on the              
barber to give me some of the suds or lather, out of which I picked         
forty or fifty of the strongest stumps of hair. I then took a piece of      
fine wood, and cut it like the back of a comb, making several holes in      
it at equal distance with as small a needle as I could get from             
Glumdalclitch. I fixed in the stumps so artificially, scraping and          
sloping them with my knife toward the points, that I made a very            
tolerable comb; which was a seasonable supply, my own being so much         
broken in the teeth, that it was almost useless: neither did I know         
any artist in that country so nice and exact, as would undertake to         
make me another.                                                            
  And this puts me in mind of an amusement wherein I spent many of          
my leisure hours. I desired the Queen's woman to save for me the            
combings of her Majesty's hair, whereof in time I got a good quantity,      
and consulting with my friend the cabinet-maker, who had received           
general orders to do little jobs for me, I directed him to make two         
chair frames, no larger than those I had in my box, and then to bore        
little holes with a fine awl round those parts where I designed the         
backs and seats; through these holes I wove the strongest hairs I           
could pick out, just after the manner of cane chairs in England.            
When they were finished, I made a present of them to her Majesty,           
who kept them in her cabinet, and used to show them for curiosities,        
as indeed they were the wonder of every one that beheld them. The           
Queen would have had me sit upon one of these chairs, but I absolutely      
refused to obey her, protesting I would rather die a thousand deaths        
than place a dishonorable part of my body on those precious hairs that      
once adorned her Majesty's head. Of these hairs (as I had always a          
mechanical genius) I likewise made a neat little purse about five feet      
long, with her Majesty's name deciphered in gold letters, which I gave      
to Glumdalclitch, by the Queen's consent. To say the truth, it was          
more for show than use, being not of strength to bear the weight of         
the larger coins, and therefore she kept nothing in it but some little      
toys that girls are fond of.                                                
  The King, who delighted in music, had frequent concerts at court, to      
which I was sometimes carried, and set in my box on a table to hear         
them; but the noise was so great, that I could hardly distinguish           
the tunes. I am confident that all the drums and trumpets of a royal        
army, beating and sounding together just at your ears, could not equal      
it. My practice was to have my box removed from the places where the        
performers sat, as far as I could, then to shut the doors and               
windows of it, and draw the window curtains; after which I found their      
music not disagreeable.                                                     
  I had learned in my youth to play a little upon the spinet                
Glumdaclitch kept one in her chamber, and a master attended twice a         
week to teach her: I call it a spinet, because it somewhat resembled        
that instrument. and was played upon in the same manner. A fancy            
came into my head that I would entertain the King and Queen with an         
English tune upon this instrument. But this appeared extremely              
difficult; for the spinet was near sixty feet long, each key being          
almost a foot wide, so that, with my arms extended, I could not             
reach to above five keys, and to press them down required a good smart      
stroke with my fist, which would be too great a labor, and to no            
purpose. The method I contrived was this. I prepared two round              
sticks about the bigness of common cudgels; they were thicker at one        
end than the other, and I covered the thicker ends with a piece of a        
mouse's skin, that by rapping on them I might neither damage the            
tops of the keys, nor interrupt the sound. Before the spinet a bench        
was placed, about four feet below the keys, and I was put upon the          
bench. I ran sideling upon it that way and this, as fast as I could,        
banging the proper keys with my two sticks, and made a shift to play a      
jig, to the great satisfaction of both their Majesties: but it was the      
most violent exercise I ever underwent, and yet I could not strike          
above sixteen keys, nor, consequently, play the bass and treble             
together, as other artists do; which was a great disadvantage to my         
performance.                                                                
  The King, who, as I before observed, was a prince of excellent            
understanding, would frequently order that I should be brought in my        
box, and set upon the table in his closet. He would then command me to      
bring one of my chairs out of the box, and sit down within three yards      
distance upon the top of the cabinet, which brought me almost to a          
level with his face. In this manner I had several conversations with        
him. I one day took the freedom to tell his Majesty, that the contempt      
he discovered towards Europe, and the rest of the world, did not            
seem answerable to those excellent qualities of the mind he was master      
of. That reason did not extend itself with the bulk of the body: on         
the contrary, we observed in our country that the tallest persons were      
usually least provided with it. That among other animals, bees and          
ants had the reputation of more industry, art and sagacity, than            
many of the larger kinds. And that, as inconsiderable as he took me to      
be, I hoped I might live to do his Majesty some signal service. The         
King heard me with attention, and began to conceive a much better           
opinion of me than he had ever before. He desired I would give him          
as exact an account of the government of England as I possibly              
could; because, as fond as princes commonly are of their own customs        
(for so he conjectured of other monarchs, by my former discourses), he      
should be glad to hear of anything that might deserve imitation.            
                                                     {P_2|CH_6 ^paragraph 5}
  Imagine with thyself, courteous reader, how often I then wished           
for the tongue of Demosthenes or Cicero, that might have enabled me to      
celebrate the praise of my own dear native country in a style equal to      
its merits and felicity.                                                    
  I began my discourse by informing his Majesty that our dominions          
consisted of two islands, which composed three mighty kingdoms under        
one sovereign, beside our plantations in America. I dwelt long upon         
the fertility of our soil, and the temperature of our climate. I            
then spoke at large upon the constitution of an English Parliament,         
partly made up of an illustrious body called the House of Peers,            
persons of the noblest blood, and of the most ancient and ample             
patrimonies. I described that extraordinary care always taken of their      
education in arts and arms, to qualify them for being counselors            
born to the king and kingdom, to have a share in the legislature, to        
be members of the highest Court of Judicature, from whence there could      
be no appeal, and to be champions always ready for the defense of           
their prince and country, by their valor, conduct, and fidelity.            
That these were the ornament and bulwark of the kingdom, worthy             
followers of their most renowned ancestors, whose honor had been the        
reward of their virtue, from which their posterity were never once          
known to degenerate. To these we joined several holy persons, as            
part of that assembly, under the title of Bishops, whose peculiar           
business it is to take care of religion, and of those who instruct the      
people therein. These were searched and sought out through the whole        
nation, by the prince and his wisest counselors, among such of the          
priesthood as were most deservedly distinguished by the sanctity of         
their lives, and the depth of their erudition; who were indeed the          
spiritual fathers of the clergy and the people.                             
  That the other part of the Parliament consisted of an assembly            
called the House of Commons, who were all principal gentlemen,              
freely picked and culled out by the people themselves, for their great      
abilities and love of their country, to represent the wisdom of the         
whole nation. And these two bodies make up the most august assembly in      
Europe, to whom, in conjunction with the prince, the whole legislature      
is committed.                                                               
  I then descended to the Courts of justice, over which the judges,         
those venerable sages and interpreters of the law, presided, for            
determining the disputed rights and properties of men, as well as           
for the punishment of vice, and protection of innocence. I mentioned        
the prudent management of our treasury; the valor and achievements          
of our forces by sea and land. I computed the number of our people, by      
reckoning how many millions there might be of each religious sect,          
or political party among us. I did not omit even our sports and             
pastimes, or any other particular which I thought might redound to the      
honor of my country. And I finished all with a brief historical             
account of affairs and events in England for about a hundred years          
past.                                                                       
  This conversation was not ended under five audiences, each of             
several hours, and the King heard the whole with great attention,           
frequently taking notes of what I spoke, as well as memorandums of          
several questions he intended to ask me.                                    
                                                    {P_2|CH_6 ^paragraph 10}
  When I had put an end to these long discourses, his Majesty in a          
sixth audience, consulting his notes, proposed many doubts, queries,        
and objections, upon every article. He asked what methods were used to      
cultivate the minds and bodies of our young nobility, and in what kind      
of business they commonly spent the first and teachable part of             
their lives. What course was taken to supply that assembly when any         
noble family became extinct. What qualifications were in those who          
were to be created new lords. Whether the humor of the prince, a sum        
of money to a court lady, or a prime minister, or a design of               
strengthening a party opposite to the public interest, ever happened        
to be motives in those advancements. What share of knowledge these          
lords had in the laws of their country, and how they came by it, so as      
to enable them to decide the properties of their fellow-subjects in         
the last resort. Whether they were always so free from avarice,             
partialities, or want, that a bribe, or some other sinister view,           
could have no place among them. Whether those holy lords I spoke of         
were always promoted to that rank upon account of their knowledge in        
religious matters, and the sanctity of their lives, had never been          
compliers with the times while they were common priests, or slavish         
prostitute chaplains to some nobleman, whose opinions they continued        
servilely to follow after they were admitted into that assembly.            
  He then desired to know what arts were practiced in electing those        
whom I commoners: whether a stranger with a strong purse might not          
influence the vulgar voters to choose him before their own landlord,        
or the most considerable gentleman in the neighborhood. How it came to      
pass, that people were so violently bent upon getting into this             
assembly, which I allowed to be a great trouble and expense, often          
to the ruin of their families, without any salary or pension:               
because this appeared such an exalted strain of virtue and public           
spirit, that his Majesty seemed to doubt it might possibly not be           
always sincere: and he desired to know whether such zealous                 
gentlemen could have any views of refunding themselves for the charges      
and trouble they were at, by sacrificing the public good to the             
designs of a weak and vicious prince in conjunction with a corrupted        
ministry. He multiplied his questions and sifted me thoroughly upon         
every part of this head, proposing numberless inquiries and                 
objections, which I think it not prudent or convenient to repeat.           
  Upon what I said in relation to our Courts of Justice, his Majesty        
desired to be satisfied in several points: and this I was the better        
able to do, having been formerly almost ruined by a long suit in            
chancery, which was decreed for me with costs. He asked, what time was      
usually spent in determining between right and wrong, and what              
degree of expense. Whether advocates and orators had liberty to             
plead in causes manifestly known to be unjust, vexatious, or                
oppressive. Whether party in religion or politics were observed to          
be of any weight in the scale of justice. Whether those pleading            
orators were persons educated in the general knowledge of equity, or        
only in provincial, national, and other local customs. Whether they or      
their judges had any part in penning those laws which they assumed the      
liberty of interpreting and glossing upon at their pleasure. Whether        
they had ever at different times pleaded for and against the same           
cause, and cited precedents to prove contrary opinions. Whether they        
were a rich or a poor corporation. Whether they received any pecuniary      
reward for pleading or delivering their opinions. And particularly          
whether they were ever admitted as members in the lower senate.             
  He fell next upon the management of our treasury; and said he             
thought my memory had failed me, because I computed our taxes at about      
five or six millions a year, and when I came to mention the issues, he      
found they sometimes amounted to more than double; for the notes he         
had taken were very particular in this point, because he hoped, as          
he told me, that the knowledge of our conduct might be useful to            
him, and he could not be deceived in his calculations. But, if what         
I told him were true, he was still at a loss how a kingdom could run        
out of its estate like a private person. He asked me, who were our          
creditors; and where we should find money to pay them. He wondered          
to hear me talk of such chargeable and extensive wars; that                 
certainly we must be a quarrelsome people, or live among very bad           
neighbors, and that our generals must needs be richer than our              
kings. He asked what business we had out of our own islands, unless         
upon the score of trade or treaty, or to defend the coasts with our         
fleet. About all, he was amazed to hear me talk of a mercenary              
standing army in the midst of peace, and among a free people. He said,      
if we were governed by our own consent in the persons of our                
representatives, he could not imagine of whom we were afraid, or            
against whom we were to fight; and would hear my opinion, whether a         
private man's house might not better be defended by himself, his            
children, and family, than by half a dozen rascals picked up at a           
venture in the streets, for small wages, who might get a hundred times      
more by cutting their throats.                                              
  He laughed at my odd kind of arithmetic (as he was pleased to call        
it) in reckoning the numbers of our people by a computation drawn from      
the several sects among us in religion and politics. He said, he            
knew no reason, why those who entertain opinions prejudicial to the         
public, should be obliged to change, or should not be obliged to            
conceal them. And as it was tyranny in any government to require the        
first, so it was weakness not to enforce the second: for a man may          
be allowed to keep poisons in his closet, but not to vend them about        
for cordials.                                                               
                                                    {P_2|CH_6 ^paragraph 15}
  He observed that among the diversions of our nobility and gentry I        
had mentioned gaming. He desired to know at what age this                   
entertainment was usually taken up, and when it was laid down; how          
much of their time it employed; whether it ever went so high as to          
affect their fortunes; whether mean vicious people, by their dexterity      
in that art, might not arrive at great riches, and sometimes keep           
our very nobles in dependence, as well as habituate them to vile            
companions, wholly take them from the improvement of their minds,           
and force them, by the losses they have received, to learn and              
practice that infamous dexterity upon others.                               
  He was perfectly astonished with the historical account I gave him        
of our affairs during the last century, protesting it was only a            
heap of conspiracies, rebellions, murders, massacres, revolutions,          
banishments, the very worst effects that avarice, faction,                  
hypocrisy, perfidiousness, cruelty, rage, madness, hatred, envy, lust,      
malice, or ambition could produce.                                          
  His Majesty in another audience was at the pains to recapitulate the      
sum of all I had spoken, compared the questions he made with the            
answers I had given, then taking me into his hands, and stroking me         
gently, delivered himself in these words, which I shall never forget        
nor the manner he spoke them in: My little friend Grildrig, you have        
made a most admirable panegyric upon your country; you have clearly         
proved that ignorance, idleness, and vice, may be sometimes the only        
ingredients for qualifying a legislator; that laws are best explained,      
interpreted, and applied by those whose interest and abilities lie          
in perverting, confounding, and eluding them. I observe among you some      
lines of an institution, which in its original might have been              
tolerable, but these half erased, and the rest wholly blurred and           
blotted by corruptions. It does not appear from all you have said, how      
any one virtue is required towards the procurement of any one               
station among you; much less that men are ennobled on account of their      
virtue, that priests are advanced for their piety or learning,              
soldiers for their conduct or valor, judges for their integrity,            
senators for the love of their country, or counsellors for their            
wisdom. As for yourself (continued the King) who have spent the             
greatest part of your life in traveling, I am well disposed to hope         
you may hitherto have escaped many vices of your country. But by            
what I have gathered from your own relation, and the answers I have         
with much pains wringed and extorted from you, I cannot but conclude        
the bulk of your natives to be the most pernicious race of little           
odious vermin that nature ever suffered to crawl upon the surface of        
the earth.                                                                  
                                                                            
P_2|CH_7                                                                    
  CHAPTER VII                                                               
-                                                                           
  Nothing but an extreme love of truth could have hindered me from          
concealing this part of my story. It was in vain to discover my             
resentments, which were always turned into ridicule; and I was              
forced to rest with patience while my noble and most beloved country        
was so injuriously treated. I am heartily sorry as any of my readers        
can possibly be, that such an occasion was given: but this prince           
happened to be so curious and inquisitive upon every particular,            
that it could not consist either with gratitude or good manners to          
refuse giving him what satisfaction I was able. Yet thus much I may be      
allowed to say in my own vindication, that I artfully eluded many of        
his questions, and gave to every point a more favorable turn by many        
degrees than the strictness of truth would allow. For I have always         
borne that laudable partiality to my own country, which Dionysius           
Halicarnassensis with so much justice recommends to a historian. I          
would hide the frailties and deformities of my political mother, and        
place her virtues and beauties in the most advantageous light. This         
was my sincere endeavor in those many discourses I had with that            
mighty monarch, although it unfortunately failed of success.                
  But great allowances should be given to a King who lives wholly           
secluded from the rest of the world, and must therefore be                  
altogether unacquainted with the manners and customs that most prevail      
in other nations; the want of which knowledge will ever produce many        
prejudices, and a certain narrowness of thinking, from which we and         
the politer countries of Europe are wholly exempted. And it would be        
hard indeed, if so remote a prince's notions of virtue and vice were        
to be offered as a standard for all mankind.                                
  To confirm what I have now said, and further, to show the                 
miserable effects of a confined education, I shall here insert a            
passage which will hardly obtain belief. In hopes to ingratiate myself      
farther into his Majesty's favor, I told him of an invention                
discovered between three and four hundred years ago, to make a certain      
powder, into a heap of which the smallest spark of fire falling, would      
kindle the whole in a moment, although it were as big as a mountain,        
and make it all fly up in the air together, with a noise and agitation      
greater than thunder. That a proper quantity of this powder rammed          
into a hollow tube of brass or iron, according to its bigness, would        
drive a ball of iron or lead with such violence and speed, as               
nothing was able to sustain its force. the largest balls thus               
discharged, would not only destroy whole ranks of an army at once, but      
batter the strongest walls to the ground, sink down ships, with a           
thousand men in each, to the bottom of the sea; and, when linked            
together by a chain, would cut through masts and rigging, divide            
hundreds of bodies in the middle, and lay all waste before them.            
That we often put this powder into large hollow balls of iron, and          
discharged them by an engine into some city we were besieging, which        
would rip up the pavements, tear the houses to pieces, burst and throw      
splinters on every side, dashing out the brains of all who came             
near. That I knew the ingredients very well, which were cheap, and          
common; I understood the manner of compounding them, and could              
direct his workmen how to make those tubes of a size proportionable to      
all other things in his Majesty's kingdom, and the largest need not be      
above a hundred feet long; twenty or thirty of which tubes, charged         
with the proper quantity of powder and balls, would batter down the         
walls of the strongest town in his dominions in a few hours, or             
destroy the whole metropolis, if ever it should pretend to dispute his      
absolute commands. This I humbly offered to his Majesty, as a small         
tribute of acknowledgment in return of so many marks that I had             
received of his royal favor and protection.                                 
  The King was struck with horror at the description I had given of         
those terrible engines, and the proposal I had made. He was amazed how      
so impotent and grovelling an insect as I (these were his expressions)      
could entertain such inhuman ideas, and in so familiar a manner as          
to appear wholly unmoved at all the scenes of blood and desolation,         
which I had painted as the common effects of those destructive              
machines, whereof he said some evil genius, enemy to mankind, must          
have been the first contriver. As for himself, he protested that            
although few things delighted him so much as new discoveries in art or      
in nature, yet he would rather lose half his kingdom than be privy          
to such a secret, which he commanded me, as I valued my life, never to      
mention any more.                                                           
  A strange effect of narrow principles and short views that a              
prince possessed of every quality which procures veneration, love, and      
esteem; of strong parts, great wisdom, and profound learning, endued        
with admirable talents for government, and almost adored by his             
subjects, should from a nice unnecessary scruple, whereof in Europe we      
can have no conception, let slip an opportunity to put into his hands,      
that would have made him absolute master of the lives, the                  
liberties, and the fortunes of his people. Neither do I say this            
with the least intention to detract from the many virtues of that           
excellent King, whose character I am sensible will on this account          
be very much lessened in the opinion of an English reader: but I            
take this defect among them to have risen from their ignorance, they        
not having hitherto reduced politics into a science, as the more acute      
wits of Europe have done. For I remember very well, in a discourse one      
day with the King, when I happened to say there were several                
thousand books among us written upon the art of government, it gave         
him (directly contrary to my intention) a very mean opinion of our          
understandings. He professed both to abominate and despise all              
mystery, refinement, and intrigue, either in a prince or a minister.        
He could not tell what I meant secrets of state, where an enemy or          
some rival nation were not in the case. He confined the knowledge of        
governing within very narrow bounds; to common sense and reason, to         
justice and lenity, to the speedy determination of civil and                
criminal causes; with some other obvious topics, which are not worth        
considering. And he gave it for his opinion, that whoever could make        
two ears of corn or two blades of grass to grow upon a spot of              
ground where only one grew before, would deserve better of mankind,         
and do more essential service to his country than the whole race of         
politicians put together.                                                   
                                                     {P_2|CH_7 ^paragraph 5}
  The learning of this people is very defective, consisting only in         
morality, history, poetry, and mathematics, wherein they must be            
allowed to excel. But the last of these is wholly applied to what           
may be useful in life, to the improvement of agriculture, and all           
mechanical arts; so that among us it would be little esteemed. And          
as to ideas, entities, abstractions, and transcendentals, I could           
never drive the least conception into their heads.                          
  No law of that country must exceed in words the number of letters in      
their alphabet, which consists only of twenty-two. But indeed few of        
them extend even to that length. They are expressed in the most             
plain and simple terms, wherein those people are not mercurial              
enough to discover above one interpretation; and to write a comment         
upon any law is a capital crime. As to the decision of civil causes,        
or proceedings against criminals, their precedents are so few, that         
they have little reason to boast of any extraordinary skill in either.      
  They have had the art of printing, as well as the Chinese, time           
out of mind. But their libraries are not very large; for that of the        
King's which is reckoned the biggest, does not amount to above a            
thousand volumes, placed in a gallery twelve hundred feet long, from        
which I had liberty to borrow what books I pleased. The Queen's joiner      
had contrived in one of Glumdalclitch's rooms a kind of wooden machine      
twenty-five feet high, formed like a standing ladder; the steps were        
each fifty feet long. It was indeed a moveable pair of stairs, the          
lowest end placed at ten feet distance from the wall of the chamber.        
The book I had a mind to read was put up leaning against the wall. I        
first mounted to the upper step of the ladder, and turning my face          
towards the book, began at the top of the page, and so walking to           
the right and left about eight or ten yards, according to the length        
of the lines, till I had gotten a little below the level of my eyes,        
and then descending gradually till I came to the bottom; after which I      
mounted again and began the other page in the same manner, and so           
turned over the leaf, which I could easily do with both my hands,           
for it was as thick and stiff as pasteboard, and in the largest folios      
not above eighteen or twenty feet long.                                     
  Their style is clear, masculine, and smooth, but not florid, for          
they avoid nothing more than multiplying unnecessary words, or using        
various expressions. I have perused many of their books, especially         
those in history and morality. Among the rest, I was much diverted          
with a little old treatise, which always lay in Glumdalclitch's bed         
chamber, and belonged to her governess, a grave elderly gentlewoman,        
who dealt in writings of morality and devotion. The book treats of the      
weakness of human kind, and is in little esteem, except among the           
women and the vulgar. However, I was curious to see what an author          
of that country could say upon such a subject. This writer went             
through all the usual topics of European showing how diminutive,            
contemptible, and helpless an animal was man in his own nature; how         
unable to defend himself from the inclemencies of the air, or the fury      
of wild beasts; how much he was excelled by one creature in                 
strength, by another in speed, by a third in foresight, by a fourth in      
industry. He added, that nature was degenerated in these latter             
declining ages of the world, and could now produce only small abortive      
births in comparison of those in ancient times. He said, it was very        
reasonable to think, not only that the species of men were                  
originally much larger, but also, that there must have been giants          
in former ages, which, as it is asserted by history and tradition,          
so it has been confirmed by huge bones and skulls casually dug up in        
several parts of the Kingdom, far exceeding the common dwindled race        
of man in our days. He argued, that the very laws of nature absolutely      
required we should have been made in the beginning, of a size more          
large and robust, not so liable to destruction from every little            
accident of a tile falling from a house, or a stone cast from the hand      
of a boy, or of being drowned in a little brook. From this way of           
reasoning the author drew several moral applications useful in the          
conduct of life, but needless here to repeat. For my own part, I could      
not avoid reflecting how universally this talent was spread, of             
drawing lectures in morality, or indeed rather matter of discontent         
and repining, from the quarrels we raise with nature. And I believe,        
upon a strict inquiry, those quarrels might be shown as ill-grounded        
among us as they are among that people.                                     
  As to their military affairs, they boast that the King's army             
consists of a hundred and seventy-six thousand foot, and thirty-two         
thousand horse: if that may be called an army which is made up of           
tradesmen in the several cities, and farmers in the country, whose          
commanders are only the nobility and gentry, without pay or reward.         
They are indeed perfect enough in their exercises, and under very good      
discipline, wherein I saw no great merit; for how should it be              
otherwise, where every farmer is under the command of his own               
landlord, and every citizen under that of the principal men in his own      
city, chosen after the manner of Venice by ballot?                          
                                                    {P_2|CH_7 ^paragraph 10}
  I have often seen the militia of Lorbrulgrud drawn out to exercise        
in a great field near the city of twenty miles square. They were in         
all not above twenty-five thousand foot, and six thousand horse; but        
it was impossible for me to compute their number, considering the           
space of ground they took up. A cavalier mounted on a large steed,          
might be about a hundred feet high. I have seen this whole body of          
horse, upon a word of command, draw their swords at once, and brandish      
them in the air. Imagination can figure nothing so grand, so                
surprising, and so astonishing. It looked as if ten thousand flashes        
of lightning were darting at the same time from every quarter of the        
sky.                                                                        
  I was curious to know how this prince, to whose dominions there is        
no access from any other country, came to think of armies, or to teach      
his people the practice of military discipline. But I was soon              
informed, both by conversation and reading their histories. For in the      
course of many ages they have been troubled with the same disease to        
which the whole race of mankind is subject; the nobility often              
contending for power, the people for liberty, and the King for              
absolute dominion. All which, however happily tempered by the laws          
of the kingdom, have been sometimes violated by each of the three           
parties, and have once or more occasioned civil wars, the last whereof      
was happily put an end to by this prince's grandfather by a general         
composition; and the militia, then settled with common consent, has         
been ever since kept in the strictest duty.                                 
                                                                            
P_2|CH_8                                                                    
  CHAPTER VIII                                                              
-                                                                           
  I had always a strong impulse that I should some time recover my          
liberty, though it was impossible to conjecture by what means, or to        
form any project with the least hope of succeeding. The ship in             
which I sailed was the first ever known to be driven within sight of        
that coast, and the King had given strict orders, that if at any            
time another appeared, it should be taken ashore, and with all its          
crew and passengers brought in a tumbril to Lorbrulgrud. He was             
strongly bent to get me a woman of my own size, by whom I might             
propagate the breed: but I think I should rather have died than             
undergone the disgrace of leaving a posterity to be kept in cages like      
tame canary birds, and perhaps, in time, sold about the kingdom to          
persons of quality for curiosities. I was, indeed, treated with much        
kindness; I was the favorite of a great King and Queen, and the             
delight of the whole court, but it was upon such a foot as ill              
became the dignity of human kind. I could never forget those                
domestic pledges I had left behind me. I wanted to be among people          
with whom I could converse upon even terms, and walk about the streets      
and fields without fear of being trod to death like a frog or a             
young puppy. But my deliverance came sooner than I expected, and in         
a manner not very common; the whole story and circumstances of which I      
shall faithfully relate.                                                    
  I had now been two years in this country; and about the beginning of      
the third, Glumdalclitch and I attended the King and Queen in a             
progress to the coast of the kingdom. I was carried, as usual, in my        
traveling box, which, as I have already described, was a very               
convenient closet of twelve feet wide. And I had ordered a hammock          
to be fixed by silken ropes from the four corners at the top, to break      
the jolts, when a servant carried me before him on horseback, as I          
sometimes desired, and would often sleep in my hammock while we were        
upon the road. On the roof of my closet, just over the middle of the        
hammock, I ordered the joiner to cut out a hole a foot square, to give      
me air in hot weather as I slept, which hole I shut at pleasure with a      
board that drew backwards and forwards through a groove.                    
  When we came to our journey's end, the King thought proper to pass a      
few days at a palace he has near Flanflasnic, a city within eighteen        
English miles of the seaside. Glumdalclitch and I were much                 
fatigued; I had gotten a small cold, but the poor girl was so ill as        
to be confined to her chamber. I longed to see the ocean, which must        
be the only scene of my escape, if ever it should happen. I                 
pretended to be worse than I really was, and desired leave to take the      
fresh air of the sea, with a page whom I was very fond of, and who had      
sometimes been trusted with me. I shall never forget with what              
unwillingness Glumdalclitch consented, nor the strict charge she            
gave the page to be careful of me, bursting at the same time into a         
flood of tears, as if she had some foreboding of what was to happen.        
The boy took me out in my box about half an hour's walk from the            
palace, towards the rocks on the seashore. I ordered him to set me          
down, and lifting up one of my sashes, cast many a wistful                  
melancholy look towards the sea. I found myself not very well, and          
told the page that I had a mind to take a nap in my hammock, which I        
hoped would do me good. I got in, and the boy shut the window close         
down to keep out the cold. I soon fell asleep, and all I can                
conjecture is, that while I slept, the page, thinking no danger             
could happen, went among the rocks to look for birds' eggs, having          
before observed him from my window searching about, and picking up one      
or two in the clefts. Be that as it will, I found myself suddenly           
awaked with a violent pull upon the ring which was fastened at the top      
of my box for the conveniency of carriage. I felt my box raised very        
high in the air, and then borne forward with prodigious speed. The          
first jolt had like to have shaken me out of my hammock, but                
afterwards the motion was easy enough. I called out several times as        
loud as I could raise my voice, but all to no purpose. I looked             
towards my windows and could see nothing but the clouds and sky. I          
heard a noise just over my head like the clapping of wings, and then        
began to perceive the woeful condition I was in; that some eagle had        
got the ring of my box in his beak, with an intent to let it fall on a      
rock like a tortoise in a shell, and then pick out my body, and devour      
it. For the sagacity and smell of this bird enable him to discover his      
quarry at a great distance, though better concealed than I could be         
within a two-inch board.                                                    
  In a little time I observed the noise of flutter of wings to              
increase very fast, and my box was tossed up and down, like a sign          
post on a windy day. I heard several bangs or buffets, as I thought,        
given to the eagle (for such I am certain it must have been that            
held the ring of my box in his beak), and then all of a sudden felt         
myself falling perpendicularly down for above a minute, but with            
such incredible swiftness that I almost lost my breath. My fall was         
stopped by a terrible squash, that sounded louder to my ears than           
the cataract of Niagara; after which I was quite in the dark for            
another minute, and then my box began to rise so high that I could see      
light from the tops of my windows. I now perceived that I had fallen        
into the sea. My box, by the weight of my body, the goods that were         
in, and the broad plates of iron fixed for strength at the four             
corners of the top and bottom, floated five feet deep in water. I           
did then, and do now, suppose that the eagle which flew away with my        
box was pursued by two or three others, and forced to let me drop           
while he was defending himself against the rest, who hoped to share in      
the prey. The plates of iron fastened at the bottom of the box (for         
those were the strongest) preserved the balance while it fell, and          
hindered it from being broken on the surface of the water. Every joint      
of it was well grooved, and the door did not move on hinges, but up         
and down like a sash, which kept my closet so tight that very little        
water came in. I got with much difficulty out of my hammock, having         
first ventured to draw back the slipboard on the roof already               
mentioned, contrived on purpose to let in air, for want of which I          
found myself almost stifled.                                                
  How often did I then wish myself with my dear Glumdalclitch, from         
whom one single hour had so far divided me! And I may say with              
truth, that in the midst of my own misfortunes I could not forbear          
lamenting my poor nurse, the grief she would suffer for my loss, the        
displeasure of the Queen, and the ruin of her fortune. Perhaps many         
travelers have not been under greater difficulties and distress than I      
was at this juncture, expecting every moment to see my box dashed in        
pieces, or at least overset by the first violent blast, or a rising         
wave. A breach in one single pane of glass would have been immediate        
death: nor could anything have preserved the windows, but the strong        
lattice wires placed on the outside against accidents in traveling.         
I saw the water ooze in at several crannies, although the leaks were        
not considerable, and I endeavored to stop them as well as I could.         
I was not able to lift up the roof of my closet, which otherwise I          
certainly should have done, and sat on the top of it, where I might at      
least preserve myself some hours longer than by being shut up, as I         
may call it, in the hold. Or, if I escaped these dangers for a day          
or two, what could I expect but a miserable death of cold and               
hunger! I was four hours under these circumstances, expecting and           
indeed wishing every moment to be my last.                                  
                                                     {P_2|CH_8 ^paragraph 5}
  I have already told the reader that there were two strong staples         
fixed upon that side of my box which had no window, and into which the      
servant who used to carry me on horseback would put a leathern belt,        
and buckle it about his waist. Being in this disconsolate state, I          
heard or at least thought I beard some kind of grating noise on that        
side of my box where the staples were fixed, and soon after I began to      
fancy that the box was pulled or towed along in the sea; for I now and      
then felt a sort of tugging, which made the waves rise near the tops        
of my windows, leaving me almost in the dark. This gave me some             
faint hopes of relief, although I was not able to imagine how it could      
be brought about. I ventured to unscrew one of my chairs, which were        
always fastened to the floor; and having made a hard shift to screw it      
down again directly under the slipping-board that I had lately opened,      
I mounted on the chair, and putting my mouth as near as I could to the      
hole, I called for help in a loud voice, and in all the languages I         
understood. I then fastened my handkerchief to a stick I usually            
carried, and thrusting it up the hole, waved it several times in the        
air, that if any boat or ship were near, the seamen might conjecture        
some unhappy mortal to be shut up in the box.                               
  I found no effect from all I could do, but plainly perceived my           
closet to be moved along; and in the space of an hour, or better, that      
side of the box where the staples were, and had no window, struck           
against something that was hard. I apprehended it to be a rock, and         
found myself tossed more than ever. I plainly heard a noise upon the        
cover of my closet, like that of a cable, and the grating of it as          
it passed through the ring. I then found myself hoisted up by               
degrees at least three feet higher than I was before. Whereupon I           
again thrust up my stick and handkerchief, calling for help till I was      
almost hoarse. In return to which, I heard a great shout repeated           
three times, giving me such transports of joy, as are not to be             
conceived but by those who feel them. I now heard a trampling over          
my head, and somebody calling through the hole with a loud voice in         
the English tongue: If there be anybody below, let them speak. I            
answered, I was an Englishman, drawn by ill fortune into the                
greatest calamity that ever any creature underwent, and begged, by all      
that is moving, to be delivered out of the dungeon I was in. The voice      
replied, I was safe, for my box was fastened to their ship; and the         
carpenter should immediately come and saw an hole in the cover,             
large enough to pull me out. I answered, that was needless, and             
would take up too much time, for there was no more to be done, but let      
one of the crew put his finger into the ring, and take the box out          
of the sea into the ship, and so into the captain's cabin. Some of          
them upon hearing me talk so wildly thought I was mad; others laughed;      
for indeed it never came into my head that I was now among people of        
my own stature and strength. The carpenter came, and in a few               
minutes sawed a passage about four feet square, then let down a             
small ladder, upon which I mounted, and from thence was taken into the      
ship in a very weak condition.                                              
  The sailors were all in amazement, and asked me a thousand                
questions, which I had no inclination to answer. I was equally              
confounded at the sight of so many pigmies, for such I took them to         
be, after having so long accustomed my eyes to the monstrous objects I      
had left. But the Captain, Mr. Thomas Wilcocks, an honest worthy            
Shropshire man, observing I was ready to faint, took me into his            
cabin, gave me a cordial to comfort me, and made me turn in upon his        
own bed, advising me to take a little rest, of which I had great need.      
Before I went to sleep I gave him to understand that I had some             
valuable furniture in my box, too good to be lost, a fine hammock, a        
handsome field bed, two chairs, a table, and a cabinet; that my closet      
was hung on all sides, or rather quilted, with silk and cotton; that        
if he would let one of the crew bring my closet into his cabin, I           
would open it there before him, and show him my goods. The Captain          
hearing me utter these absurdities, concluded I was raving: however (I      
suppose to pacify me), he promised to give order as I desired, and          
going upon deck sent some of his men down into my closet, from              
whence (as I afterwards found) they drew up all my goods, and stripped      
off the quilting; but the chairs, cabinet, and bedstead, being screwed      
to the floor, were much damaged by the ignorance of the seamen, who         
tore them up by force. Then they knocked off some of the boards for         
the use of the ship, and when they had got all they had a mind for,         
let the hull drop into the sea, which by reason of many breaches            
made in the bottom and sides, sunk to rights. And indeed I was glad         
not to have been a spectator of the havoc they made; because I am           
confident it would have sensibly touched me, by bringing former             
passages into my mind, which I had rather forget.                           
  I slept some hours, but perpetually disturbed with dreams of the          
place I had left, and the dangers I had escaped. However, upon              
waking I found myself much recovered. It was now about eight o'clock        
at night, and the Captain ordered supper immediately, thinking I had        
already fasted too long. He entertained me with great kindness,             
observing me not to look wildly, or talk inconsistently: and when we        
were left alone, desired I would give him a relation of my travels,         
and by what accident I came to be set adrift in that monstrous              
wooden chest. He said, that about twelve o'clock at noon, as he was         
looking through his glass, he spied it at a distance, and thought it        
was a sail, which he had a mind to make, being not much out of his          
course, in hopes of buying some biscuit, his own beginning to fall          
short. That upon coming nearer, and finding his error, he sent out his      
longboat to discover what I was; that his men came back in a fright,        
swearing they had seen a swimming house. That he laughed at their           
folly, and went himself in the boat, ordering his men to take a strong      
cable along with them. That the weather being calm, he rowed round          
me several times, observed my windows, and the wire lattices that           
defended them. That he discovered two staples upon one side, which was      
all of boards, without any passage for light. He then commanded his         
men to row up to that side, and fastening a cable to one of the             
staples, ordered them to tow my chest (as he called it) towards the         
ship. When it was there, he gave directions to fasten another cable to      
the ring fixed in the cover, and to raise up my chest with pulley,          
which all the sailors were not able to do above two or three feet.          
He said they saw my stick and handkerchief thrust out of the hole, and      
concluded that some unhappy men must be shut up in the cavity. I asked      
whether he or the crew had seen any prodigious birds in the air             
about the time he first discovered me. To which he answered, that           
discoursing this matter with the sailors while I was asleep, one of         
them said he had observed three eagles flying towards the north, but        
remarked nothing of their being larger than the usual size, which I         
suppose must be imputed to the great height they were at; and he could      
not guess the reason of my question. I then asked the Captain how           
far he reckoned we might be from land; he said, by the best                 
computation he could make, we were at least a hundred leagues. I            
assured him, that he must be mistaken by almost half, for I had not         
left the country from where I came above two hours before I dropped         
into the sea. Whereupon he began again to think that my brain was           
disturbed, of which he gave me a hint, and advised me to go to bed          
in a cabin he had provided. I assured him I was well refreshed with         
his good entertainment and company, and as much in my senses as ever I      
was in my life. He then grew serious, and desired to ask me freely          
whether I were not troubled in mind by the consciousness of some            
enormous crime, for which I was punished at the command of some             
prince, by exposing me in that chest, as great criminals in other           
countries have been forced to sea in a leaky vessel without                 
provisions; for although he should be sorry to have taken so ill a man      
into his ship, yet he would engage his word to set me safe on shore in      
the first port where we arrived. He added, that his suspicions were         
much increased by some very absurd speeches I had delivered at first        
to the sailors, and afterwards to himself, in relation to my closet or      
chest, as well as by my odd looks and behavior while I was at supper.       
  I begged his patience to hear me tell my story, which I faithfully        
did from the last time I left England to the moment he first                
discovered me. And as truth always forces its way into rational minds,      
so this honest worthy gentleman, who had some tincture of learning,         
and very good sense, was immediately convinced of my candor and             
veracity. But further to confirm all I had said, I entreated him to         
give order that my cabinet should be brought, of which I had the key        
in my pocket (for he had already informed me how the seamen disposed        
of my closet), I opened it in his presence and showed him the small         
collection of rarities I made in the country from where I had been          
so strangely delivered. There was a comb I had contrived out of the         
stumps of the King's beard, and another of the same materials, but          
fixed into a paring of her Majesty's thumb-nail, which served for           
the back. There was a collection of needles and pins from a foot to         
half a yard long; four wasp-stings, like joiners' tacks; some combings      
of the Queen's hair; a gold ring which one day she made me a present        
of in a most obliging manner, taking it from her little finger, and         
throwing it over my head like a collar. I desired the Captain would         
please to accept this ring in return of his civilities, which he            
absolutely refused. I showed him a corn that I had cut off with my own      
hand, from a maid of honor's toe; it was about the bigness of a             
Kentish pippin, and grown so hard that when I returned to England, I        
got it hollowed into a cup, and set in silver. Lastly, I desired him        
to see the breeches I had then on, which were made of a mouse's skin.       
                                                    {P_2|CH_8 ^paragraph 10}
  I could force nothing on him but a footman's tooth, which I observed      
him to examine with great curiosity, and found he had a fancy for           
it. He received it with abundance of thanks, more than such a trifle        
could deserve. It was drawn by an unskillful surgeon, in a mistake,         
from one of Glumdalclitch's men, who was afflicted with the toothache,      
but it was as sound as any in his head. I got it cleaned, and put it        
into my cabinet. It was about a foot long, and four inches in               
diameter.                                                                   
  The Captain was very well satisfied with plain relation I had             
given him, and said he hoped when we returned to England I would            
oblige the world by putting it in paper and making it public. My            
answer was that I thought we were already overstocked with books of         
travels; that nothing could now pass which was not extraordinary;           
wherein I doubted some authors less consulted truth than their own          
vanity, or interest, or the diversion of ignorant readers. That my          
story could contain little besides common events, without those             
ornamental descriptions of strange plants, trees, birds, and other          
animals, or of the barbarous customs and idolatry of savage people,         
with which most writers abound. However, I thanked him for his good         
opinion, and promised to take the matter into my thoughts.                  
  He said he wondered at one thing very much, which was, to bear me         
speak so loud, asking me whether the King or Queen of that country          
were thick of hearing. I told him it was what I had been used to for        
above two years past, and that I admired as much at the voices of           
him and his men, who seemed to me only to whisper, and yet I could          
hear them well enough. But when I spoke in that country, it was like a      
man talking in the street to another looking out from the top of a          
steeple, unless when I was placed on a table, or held in any                
person's hand, I told him, I had likewise observed another thing, that      
when I first got into the ship, and the sailors stood all about me,         
I thought they were the most little contemptible creatures I had            
ever beheld. For indeed while I was in that prince's country, I             
could never endure to look in a glass after my eyes had been                
accustomed to such prodigious objects, because the comparison gave          
me so despicable a conceit of myself. The Captain said that while we        
were at supper he observed me look at everything with a sort of             
wonder, and that I often seemed hardly able to contain my laughter,         
which he knew not well how to take, but imputed it to some disorder in      
my brain. I answered, it was very true; and I wondered how I could          
forbear, when I saw his dishes of the size of a silver three-pence,         
a leg of pork hardly a mouthful, a cup not so big as a nut-shell;           
and so I went on, describing the rest of his household stuff and            
provisions after the same manner. For, although the Queen had               
ordered a little equipage of all things necessary for me while I was        
in her service, yet my ideas were wholly taken up with what I saw on        
every side of me, and I winked at my own littleness as people do at         
their own faults. The Captain understood my raillery very well, and         
merrily replied with the old English proverb, that he doubted my            
eyes were bigger than my belly, for he did not observe my stomach so        
good, although I had fasted all day; and continuing in his mirth,           
protested he would have gladly given a hundred pounds to have seen          
my closet in the eagle's bill, and afterwards in its fall from so           
great a height into the sea; which would certainly have been a most         
astonishing object, worthy to have the description of it transmitted        
to future ages: and the comparison of Phaeton was so obvious, that          
he could not forbear applying it, although I did not much admire the        
conceit.                                                                    
  The Captain having been at Tonquin, was in his return to England          
driven northeastward to the latitude of 44 degrees, and of longitude        
143. But meeting a trade wind two days after I came on board him, we        
sailed southward a long time, and coasting New Holland kept our course      
west-southwest, and then south-southwest till we doubled the Cape of        
Good Hope. Our voyage was very prosperous, but I shall not trouble the      
reader with a journal of it. The Captain called in at one or two            
ports, and sent in his long-boat for provisions and fresh water, but I      
never went out of the ship till we came into the Downs, which was on        
the third day of June, 1706, about nine months after my escape. I           
offered to leave my goods in security for payment of my freight; but        
the Captain protested he would not receive one farthing. We took            
kind leave of each other, and I made him promise he would come to           
see me at my house in Redriff. I hired a horse and guide for five           
shillings, which I borrowed of the Captain.                                 
  As I was on the road, observing the littleness of the houses, the         
trees, the cattle, and the people, I began to think myself in               
Lilliput. I was afraid of trampling on every traveler I met, and often      
called aloud to have them stand out of the way, so that I had like          
to have gotten one or two broken heads for my impertinence.                 
                                                    {P_2|CH_8 ^paragraph 15}
  When I came to my own house, for which I was forced to enquire,           
one of the servants opening the door, I bent down to go in (like a          
goose under a gate) for fear of striking my head. My wife ran out to        
embrace me, but I stooped lower than her knees, thinking she could          
otherwise never be able to reach my mouth. My daughter kneeled to           
ask my blessing, but I could not see her till she arose, having been        
so long used to stand with my head and eyes erect to above sixty feet;      
and then I went to take her up with one hand, by the waist. I looked        
down upon the servants and one or two friends who were in the house,        
as if they had been pigmies, and I a giant. I told my wife, she had         
been too thrifty, for I found she had starved herself and her daughter      
to nothing. In short, I behaved myself so unaccountably, that they          
were all of the Captain's opinion when he first saw me, and                 
concluded I had lost my wits. This I mention as an instance of the          
great power of habit and prejudice.                                         
  In a little time I and my family and friends came to a right              
understanding: but my wife protested I should never go to sea any           
more; although my evil destiny so ordered that she had not power to         
hinder me, as the reader may know hereafter. In the mean time I here        
conclude the second part of my unfortunate voyages.                         
-                                                                           
                THE END OF THE SECOND PART                                  
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                    PART III                                
                                                                            
        A VOYAGE TO LAPUTA, BALNIBARBI, GLUBBDUBDRIB, LUGGNAGG AND JAPAN    
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                  (SEE PLATE 3)                             
                                                                            
P_3|CH_1                                                                    
  CHAPTER I                                                                 
-                                                                           
  I had not been at home above ten days, when Captain William               
Robinson, a Cornish man, Commander of the Hope-well, a stout ship of        
three hundred tons, came to my house. I had formerly been surgeon of        
another ship where he was master, and a fourth part owner, in a voyage      
to the Levant; he had always treated me more like a brother than an         
inferior officer, and hearing of my arrival made me a visit, as I           
apprehended only out of friendship, for nothing passed more than            
what is usual after long absences. But repeating his visits often,          
expressing his joy to find me in good health, asking whether I were         
now settled for life, adding that he intended a voyage to the East          
Indies in two months; at last he plainly invited me, though with            
some apologies, to be surgeon of the ship; that I should have               
another surgeon under me besides our two mates; that my salary              
should be double to the usual pay; and that having experienced my           
knowledge in sea affairs to be at least equal to his, he would enter        
into any engagement to follow my advice, as much as if I had share          
in the command.                                                             
  He said so many other obliging things, and I knew him to be so            
honest a man, that I could not reject his proposal; the thirst I had        
of seeing the world, notwithstanding my past misfortunes, continuing        
as violent as ever. The only difficulty that remained, was to persuade      
my wife, whose consent however I at last obtained by the prospect of        
advantage she proposed to her children.                                     
  We set out the 5th of August, 1706, and arrived at Fort St. George        
the 11th of April 1707. We stayed there three weeks to refresh our          
crew, many of whom were sick. From there we went to Tonquin, where the      
Captain resolved to continue some time, because many of the goods he        
intended to buy were not ready, nor could he expect to be dispatched        
in some months. Therefore in hopes to defray some of the charges he         
must be at, he bought a sloop, loaded it with several sorts of              
goods, wherewith the Tonquinese usually trade to the neighboring            
islands, and putting fourteen men on board, whereof three were of           
the country, he appointed me master of the sloop, and gave me power to      
traffic for two months, while he transacted his affairs at Tonquin.         
  We had not sailed more than three days, when a great storm                
arising, we were driven five days to the north-northeast, and then          
to the east; after which we had fair weather, but still with a              
pretty strong gale from the west. Upon the tenth day we were chased by      
two pirates, who soon overtook us, for my sloop was so deep loaden,         
that she sailed very slow, neither were we in a condition to defend         
ourselves.                                                                  
  We were boarded about the same time by both the pirates, who entered      
furiously at the head of their men, but finding us all prostrate            
upon our faces (for so I gave order) they pinioned us with strong           
ropes, and setting a guard upon us, went to search the sloop.               
                                                     {P_3|CH_1 ^paragraph 5}
  I observed among them a Dutchman, who seemed to be of some                
authority, though he was not commander of either ship. He knew us by        
our countenances to be Englishmen, and jabbering to us in his own           
language, swore we should be tied back to back, and thrown into the         
sea. I spoke Dutch tolerably well; I told him who we were, and              
begged him in consideration of our being Christians and Protestants,        
of neighboring countries, in strict alliance, that he would move the        
Captains to take some pity on us. This inflamed his rage; he                
repeated his threatenings, and turning to his companions, spoke with        
great vehemence, in the Japanese language, as I suppose, often using        
the word Christianos.                                                       
  The largest of the two pirate ships was commanded by a Japanese           
Captain, who spoke a little Dutch, but very imperfectly. He came up to      
me, and after several questions, which I answered in great humility,        
he said we should not die. I made the Captain a very low bow, and then      
turning to the Dutchman, said, I was sorry to find more mercy in a          
heathen, than in a brother Christian. But I had soon reason to              
repent those foolish words; for that malicious reprobate, having often      
endeavored in vain to persuade both the Captains that I might be            
thrown into the sea (which they would not yield to after the promise        
made me, that I should not die), however prevailed so far as to have a      
punishment inflicted on me, worse in all human appearance than death        
itself. My men were sent by an equal division into both the pirate          
ships, and my sloop new manned. As to myself, it was determined that I      
should be set adrift in a small canoe, with paddles and a sail, and         
four days' provisions, which last the Japanese Captain was so kind          
to double out of his own stores, and would permit no man to search me.      
I got down into the canoe, while the Dutchman standing upon the deck,       
loaded me with all the curses and injurious terms his language could        
afford.                                                                     
  About an hour before we saw the pirates, I had taken an observation,      
and found we were in the latitude of 46 N. and of longitude 183.            
When I was at some distance from the pirates, I discovered by my            
pocket glass several islands to the southeast. I set up my sail, the        
wind being fair, with a design to reach the nearest of those                
islands, which I made a shift to do in about three hours. It was all        
rocky; however I got many birds' eggs, and striking fire, I kindled         
some heath and dry seaweed, by which I roasted my eggs. I ate no other      
supper, being resolved to spare my provisions as much as I could. I         
passed the night under the shelter of a rock, strowing some heath           
under me, and slept pretty well.                                            
  The next day I sailed to another island, and then to a third and          
fourth, sometimes using my sail, and sometimes my paddles. But not          
to trouble the reader with a particular account of my distresses,           
let it suffice that on the fifth day I arrived at the last island in        
my sight, which lay south-southeast to the former.                          
  This island was at a greater distance than I expected, and I did not      
reach it in less than five hours. I encompassed it almost around            
before I could find a convenient place to land in, which was a small        
creek about three times the wideness of my canoe. I found the island        
to be all rocky, only a little intermingled with tufts of grass and         
sweet smelling herbs. I took out my small provisions, and after having      
refreshed myself, I secured the remainder in a cave, whereof there          
were great numbers. I gathered plenty of eggs upon the rocks, and           
got a quantity of dry seaweed and parched grass, which I designed to        
kindle the next day, and roast my eggs as well as I could. (For I           
had about me my flint, steel, match, and burning glass.) I lay all          
night in the cave where I had lodged my provisions. My bed was the          
same dry grass and seaweed which I intended for fuel. I slept very          
little, for the disquiets of my mind prevailed over my weariness,           
and kept me awake. I considered how impossible it was to preserve my        
life in so desolate a place, and how miserable my end must be. Yet I        
found myself so listless and desponding that I had not the heart to         
rise, and before I could get spirits enough to creep out of my cave         
the day was far advanced. I walked a while among the rocks; the sky         
was perfectly clear, and the sun so hot that I was forced to turn my        
face from it; when all of a sudden it became obscured, as I thought,        
in a manner very different from what happens by the interposition of a      
cloud. I turned back, and perceived a vast opaque body between me           
and the sun, moving forwards towards the island: it seemed to be about      
two miles high, and hid the sun six or seven minutes, but I did not         
observe the air to be much colder, or the sky more darkened, than if I      
had stood under the shade of a mountain. As it approached nearer            
over the place where I was, it appeared to be a firm substance, the         
bottom flat, smooth, and shining very bright from the reflection of         
the sea below. I stood upon a height about two hundred yards from           
the shore, and saw this vast body descending almost to a parallel with      
me, at less than an English mile distance. I took out my pocket             
perspective, and could plainly discover numbers of people moving up         
and down the sides of it, which appeared to be sloping, but what those      
people were doing, I was not able to distinguish.                           
                                                    {P_3|CH_1 ^paragraph 10}
  The natural love of life gave me some inward motions of joy, and I        
was ready to entertain a hope that this adventure might some way or         
other help to deliver me from the desolate place and condition I was        
in. But at the same time the reader can hardly conceive my                  
astonishment, to behold an island in the air, inhabited by men, who         
were able (as it should seem) to raise or sink, or put it into a            
progressive motion, as they pleased. But not being at that time in a        
disposition to philosophise upon this phenomenon, I rather chose to         
observe what course the island would take, because it seemed for a          
while to stand still. Yet soon after it advanced nearer, and I could        
see the sides of it, encompassed with several gradations of galleries,      
and stairs at certain intervals, to descend from one to the other.          
In the lowest gallery I beheld some people fishing with long angling        
rods, and others looking on. I waved my cap (for my hat was long since      
worn out) and my handkerchief towards the island; and upon its              
nearer approach, I called and shouted with the utmost strength of my        
voice; and then looking circumspectly, I beheld a crowd gather to that      
side which was most in my view. I found by their pointing towards me        
and to each other, that they plainly discovered me, although they made      
no return to my shouting. But I could see four or five men running          
in great haste up the stairs to the top of the island, who then             
disappeared. I happened rightly to conjecture, that these were sent         
for orders to some person in authority upon this occasion.                  
  The number of people increased, and in less than half an hour the         
island was moved and raised in such a manner, that the lowest               
gallery appeared in a parallel of less than a hundred yards distance        
from the height where I stood. I then put myself into the most              
supplicating postures, and spoke in the humblest accent, but                
received no answer. Those who stood nearest over against me seemed          
to be persons of distinction, as I supposed by their habit. They            
conferred earnestly with each other, looking often upon me. At              
length one of them called out in a clear, polite, smooth dialect,           
not unlike in sound to the Italian; and therefore I returned an answer      
in that language, hoping at least that the cadence might be more            
agreeable to his ears. Although neither of us understood the other,         
yet my meaning was easily known, for the people saw the distress I was      
in.                                                                         
  They made signs for me to come down from the rock and go towards the      
shore, which I accordingly did; and the flying island being raised          
to a convenient height, the verge directly over me, a chain was let         
down from the lowest gallery, with a seat fastened to the bottom, to        
which I fixed myself, and was drawn up by pulleys.                          
                                                                            
P_3|CH_2                                                                    
  CHAPTER II                                                                
-                                                                           
  At my alighting I was surrounded by a crowd of people, but those who      
stood nearest seemed to be of better quality. They beheld me with           
all the marks and circumstances of wonder; neither indeed was I much        
in their debt, having never till then seen a race of mortals so             
singular in their shapes, habits, and countenances. Their heads were        
all reclined either to the right or the left; one of their eyes turned      
inward, and the other directly up to the zenith. Their outward              
garments were adorned with the figures of suns, moons, and stars,           
interwoven with those of fiddles, flutes, harps, trumpets, guitars,         
harpsichords, and many other instruments of music, unknown to us in         
Europe. I observed here and there many in the habit of servants,            
with a blown bladder fastened like a flail to the end of a short            
stick, which they carried in their hands. In each bladder was a             
small quantity of dried pease, or little pebbles (as I was                  
afterwards informed). With these bladders they now and then flapped         
the mouths and ears of those who stood near them, of which practice         
I could not then conceive the meaning; it seems the minds of these          
people are so taken up with intense speculations, that they neither         
can speak, nor attend to the discourses of others, without being            
roused by some external taction upon the organs of speech and hearing;      
for which reason those persons who are able to afford it always keep a      
flapper (the original is climenole) in their family, as one of their        
domestics, nor ever walk abroad or make visits without him. And the         
business of this officer is, when two or more persons are in                
company, gently to strike with his bladder the mouth of him who is          
to speak, and the right ear of him or them to whom the speaker              
addresses himself. This flapper is likewise employed diligently to          
attend his master in his walks, and upon occasion to give him a soft        
flap on his eyes, because he is always so wrapped up in cogitation,         
that he is in manifest danger of falling down every precipice, and          
bouncing his head against every post, and in the streets, of                
jostling others, or being jostled himself into the kennel.                  
  It was necessary to give the reader this information, without             
which he would be at the same loss with me, to understand the               
proceedings of these people, as they conducted me the stairs, to the        
top of the island, and from there to the royal palace. While we were        
ascending, they forgot several times what they were about, and left         
me to myself, till their memories were again roused by their                
flappers; for they appeared altogether unmoved by the sight of my           
foreign habit and countenance, and by the shouts of the vulgar,             
whose thoughts and minds were more disengaged.                              
  At last we entered the palace, and proceeded into the chamber of          
presence, where I saw the King seated on his throne, attended on            
each side by persons of prime quality. Before the throne was a large        
table filled with globes and spheres, and mathematical instruments          
of all kinds. His Majesty took not the least notice of us, although         
our entrance was not without sufficient noise, by the concourse of all      
persons belonging to the court. But he was then deep in a problem, and      
we attended at least an hour, before he could solve it. There stood by      
him on each side a young page, with flaps in their hands, and when          
they saw he was at leisure, one of them gently struck his mouth, and        
the other his right ear; at which he started like one awakened on           
the sudden, and looking towards me and the company I was in,                
recollected the occasion of our coming, whereof he had been informed        
before. He spoke some words, whereupon immediately a young man with         
a flap came up to my side, and flapped me gently on the right ear; but      
I made signs, as well as I could, that I had no occasion for such an        
instrument; which, as I afterwards found, gave his Majesty and the          
whole court a very mean opinion of my understanding. The King, as           
far as I could conjecture, asked me several questions, and I addressed      
myself to him in all the languages I had. When it was found that I          
could neither understand nor be understood, I was conducted by the          
King's order to an apartment in his palace (this prince being               
distinguished above all his predecessors for his hospitality to             
strangers), where two servants were appointed to attend me. My              
dinner was brought, and four persons of quality, whom I remembered          
to have seen very near the King's person, did me the honor to dine          
with me. We had two courses of three dishes each. In the first              
course there was a shoulder of mutton, cut into an equilateral              
triangle, a piece of beef into a rhomboides, and a pudding into a           
cycloid. The second course was two ducks, trussed up into the form          
of fiddles; sausages and puddings resembling flutes and hautboys,           
and a breast of veal in the shape of a harp. The servants cut our           
bread into cones, cylinders, parallelograms, and several other              
mathematical figures.                                                       
  While we were at dinner, I made bold to ask the names of several          
things in their language; and those noble persons, by the assistance        
of their flappers, delighted to give me answers, hoping to raise my         
admiration of their great abilities, if I could be brought to converse      
with them. I was soon able to call for bread and drink, or whatever         
else I wanted.                                                              
  After dinner my company withdrew, and a person was sent to me by the      
King's order, attended by a flapper. He brought with him pen, ink, and      
paper, and three or four books, giving me to understand by signs, that      
he was sent to teach me the language. We sat together four hours, in        
which time I wrote down a great number of words in columns, with the        
translations over against them. I likewise made a shift to learn            
several short sentences. For my tutor would order one of my servants        
to fetch something, to turn about, to make a bow, to sit, or stand, or      
walk, and the like. Then I took down the sentence in writing. He            
showed me also in one of his books the figures of the sun, moon, and        
stars, the zodiac, the tropics, and polar circles, together with the        
denominations of many figures of planes and solids. He gave me the          
names and descriptions of all the musical instruments, and the general      
terms of art in playing on each of them. After he had left me, I            
placed all my words with their interpretations in alphabetical              
order. And thus in a few days, by the help of a very faithful               
memory, I got some insight into their language.                             
                                                     {P_3|CH_2 ^paragraph 5}
  The word, which I interpret the Flying or Floating Island, is in the      
original Laputa, whereof I could never learn the true etymology. Lap        
in the old obsolete language signifies high, and untuh, a governor,         
from which they say by corruption was derived Laputa, from Lapuntuh.        
But I do not approve of this derivation, which seems to be a little         
strained. I ventured to offer to the learned among them a conjecture        
of my own, that Laputa was quasi lap outed; lap signifying properly         
the dancing of the sunbeams in the sea, and outed, a wing, which            
however I shall not obtrude, but submit to the judicious reader.            
  Those to whom the King had entrusted me, observing how ill I was          
clad, ordered a tailor to come next morning, and take my measure for a      
suit of clothes. This operator did his office after a different manner      
from those of his trade in Europe. He first took my height by a             
quadrant, and then with a rule and compasses described the                  
dimensions and outlines of my whole body, all which he entered upon         
paper, and in six days brought my clothes very ill made, and quite out      
of shape, by happening to mistake a figure in the calculation. But          
my comfort was, that I observed such accidents very frequent, and           
little regarded.                                                            
  During my confinement for want of clothes, and by an indisposition        
that held me some days longer, I much enlarged my dictionary; and when      
I went next to court, was able to understand many things the King           
spoke, and to return him some kind of answers. His Majesty had given        
orders that the island should move northeast and by east, to the            
vertical point over Lagado, the metropolis of the whole kingdom             
below upon the firm earth. It was about ninety leagues distant, and         
our voyage lasted four days and an half. I was not in the least             
sensible of the progressive motion made in the air by the island. On        
the second morning about eleven o'clock, the King himself in person,        
attended by his nobility, courtiers, and officers, having prepared all      
their musical instruments, played on them for three hours without           
intermission, so that I was quite stunned with the noise; neither           
could I possibly guess the meaning, till my tutor informed me. He said      
that the people of their island had their ears adapted to hear the          
music of the spheres, which always played at certain periods, and           
the court was now prepared to bear their part in whatever instrument        
they most excelled.                                                         
  In our journey towards Lagado, the capital city, his Majesty ordered      
that the island should stop over certain towns and villages, from           
whence he might receive the petitions of his subjects. And to this          
purpose several packthreads were let down with small weights at the         
bottom. On these packthreads the people strung their petitions,             
which mounted up directly like the scraps of paper fastened by              
school boys at the end of the string that holds their kite.                 
Sometimes we received wine and victuals from below, which were drawn        
up by pulleys.                                                              
  The knowledge I had in mathematics gave me great assistance in            
acquiring their phraseology, which depended much upon that science and      
music; and in the latter I was not unskilled. Their ideas are               
perpetually conversant in lines and figures. If they would, for             
example, praise the beauty of a woman, or any other animal, they            
describe it by rhombs, circles, parallelograms, ellipses, and other         
geometrical terms, or by words of art drawn from music, needless            
here to repeat. I observed in the King's kitchen all sorts of               
mathematical and musical instruments, after the figures of which            
they cut up the joints that were served to his Majesty's table.             
                                                    {P_3|CH_2 ^paragraph 10}
  Their houses are very ill built, the walls bevel without one right        
angle in any apartment, and this defect arises from the contempt            
they bear to practical geometry, which they despise as vulgar and           
mechanic, those instructions they give being too refined for the            
intellectuals of their workmen, which occasions perpetual mistakes.         
And although they are dexterous enough upon a piece of paper in the         
management of the rule, the pencil, and the divider, yet in the common      
actions and behavior of life, I have not seen a more clumsy,                
awkward, and unhandy people, nor so slow and perplexed in their             
conceptions upon all other subjects, except those of mathematics and        
music. They are very bad reasoners, and vehemently given to                 
opposition, unless when they happen to be of the right opinion,             
which is seldom their case. Imagination, fancy, and invention, they         
are wholly strangers to, nor have any words in their language by which      
those ideas can be expressed; the whole compass of their thoughts           
and mind being shut up within the two forementioned sciences.               
  Most of them, and especially those who deal in the astronomical           
part, have great faith in judicial astrology, although they are             
ashamed to own it publicly. But what I chiefly admired, and thought         
altogether unaccountable, was the strong disposition I observed in          
them towards news and politics, perpetually enquiring into public           
affairs, giving their judgments in matters of state, and                    
passionately disputing every inch of a party opinion. I have indeed         
observed the same disposition among most of the mathematicians I            
have known in Europe, although I could never discover the least             
analogy between the two sciences; unless those people suppose, that         
because the smallest circle hath as many degrees as the largest,            
therefore the regulation and management of the world require no more        
abilities than the handling and turning of a globe. But I rather            
take this quality to spring from a very common infirmity of human           
nature, inclining us to be more curious and conceited in matters where      
we have least concern, and for which we are least adapted either by         
study or nature.                                                            
  These people are under continual disquietudes, never enjoying a           
minute's peace of mind; and their disturbances proceed from causes          
which very little affect the rest of mortals. Their apprehensions           
arise from several changes they dread in the celestial bodies. For          
instance, that the earth, by the continual approaches of the sun            
towards it, must in course of time be absorbed or swallowed up. That        
the face of the sun will by degrees be encrusted with its own               
effluvia, and give no more light to the world. That the earth very          
narrowly escaped a brush from the tail of the last comet, which             
would have infallibly reduced it to ashes; and that the next, which         
they have calculated for thirty-one years hence, will probably destroy      
us. For if in its perihelion it should approach within a certain            
degree of the sun (as by their calculations they have reason to dread)      
it will conceive a degree of heat ten thousand times more intense than      
that of red-hot glowing iron; and in its absence from the sun, carry a      
blazing tail ten hundred thousand and fourteen miles long; through          
which if the earth should pass at the distance of one hundred thousand      
miles from the nucleus or main body of the comet, it must in its            
passage be set on fire, and reduced to ashes. That the sun daily            
spending its rays without any nutriment to supply them, will at last        
be wholly consumed and annihilated; which must be attended with the         
destruction of this earth, and of all the planets that receive their        
light from it.                                                              
  They are so perpetually alarmed with the apprehensions of these           
and the like impending dangers, that they can neither sleep quietly in      
their beds, nor have any relish for the common pleasures or amusements      
of life. When they meet an acquaintance in the morning, the first           
question is about the sun's health, how he looked at his setting and        
rising, and what hopes they have to avoid the stroke of the                 
approaching comet. This conversation they are apt to run into with the      
same temper that boys discover, in delighting to hear terrible stories      
of sprites and hobgoblins, which they greedily listen to, and dare not      
go to bed for fear.                                                         
  The women of the island have abundance of vivacity: they contemn          
their husbands, and are exceedingly fond of strangers, whereof there        
is always a considerable number from the continent below, attending at      
court, either upon affairs of the several towns and corporations, or        
their own particular occasions, but are much despised, because they         
want the same endowments. Among these the ladies choose their               
gallants: but the vexation is, that they act with too much ease and         
security, for the husband is always so rapt in speculation, that the        
mistress and lover may proceed to the greatest familiarities before         
his face, if he be but provided with paper and implements, and without      
his flapper at his side.                                                    
                                                    {P_3|CH_2 ^paragraph 15}
  The wives and daughters lament their confinement to the island,           
although I think it the most delicious spot of ground in the world;         
and although they live here in the greatest plenty and magnificence,        
and are allowed to do whatever they please, they long to see the            
world, and take the diversions of the metropolis, which they are not        
allowed to do without a particular license from the King; and this          
is not easy to be obtained, because the people of quality have found        
by frequent experience how hard it is to persuade their women to            
return from below. I was told that a great court lady, who had several      
children, is married to the prime minister, the richest subject in the      
kingdom, a very graceful person, extremely fond of her, and lives in        
the finest palace of the island, went down to Lagado, on the                
pretense of health, there hid herself for several months, till the          
King sent a warrant to search for her, and she was found in an obscure      
eatinghouse all in rags, having pawned her clothes to maintain an           
old deformed footman, who beat her every day, and in whose company she      
was taken much against her will. And although her husband received her      
with all possible kindness, and without the least reproach, she soon        
after contrived to steal down again with all her jewels, to the same        
gallant, and has not been heard of since.                                   
  This may perhaps pass with the reader rather for an European or           
English story, than for one of a country so remote. But he may              
please to consider, that the caprices of are not limited by any             
climate or nation, and that they are much more uniform than can be          
easily imagined.                                                            
  In about a month's time I had made a tolerable proficiency in             
their language, and was able to answer most of the King's questions,        
when I had the honor to attend him. His Majesty discovered not the          
least curiosity to inquire into the laws, government, history,              
religion, or manners of the countries where I had been, but confined        
his questions to the state of mathematics, and received the account         
I gave him with great contempt and indifference, though often roused        
by his flapper on each side.                                                
                                                                            
P_3|CH_3                                                                    
  CHAPTER III                                                               
-                                                                           
  I desired leave of this prince to see the curiosities of the island,      
which he was graciously pleased to grant, and ordered my tutor to           
attend me. I chiefly wanted to know to what cause in art or in              
nature it owed its several motions, whereof I will now give a               
philosophical account to the reader.                                        
  The Flying or Floating Island is exactly circular, its diameter 7837      
yards, or about four miles and a half, and consequently contains ten        
thousand acres. It is three hundred yards thick. The bottom or under        
surface, which appears to those who view it from below, is one even         
regular plate of adamant, shooting up to the height of about two            
hundred yards. Above it lie the several minerals in their usual order,      
and over all is a coat of rich mold, ten or twelve feet deep. The           
declivity of the upper surface, from the circumference to the               
center, is the natural cause why all the dews and rains which fall          
upon the island, are conveyed in small rivulets toward the middle,          
where they are emptied into four large basins, each of about half a         
mile in circuit, and two hundred yards distant from the center. From        
these basins the water is continually exhaled by the sun in the             
daytime, which effectually prevents their overflowing. Besides, as          
it is in the power of the monarch to raise the island above the region      
of clouds and vapors, he can prevent the falling of dews and rains          
whenever he pleases. For the highest clouds cannot rise above two           
miles, as naturalists agree, at least they were never known to do so        
in that country.                                                            
  At the centre of the island there is a chasm about fifty yards in         
diameter, from whence the astronomers descend into a large dome, which      
is therefore called Flandona Gagnole, or the Astronomer's Cave,             
situated at the depth of a hundred yards beneath the upper surface          
of the adamant. In this cave are twenty lamps continually burning,          
which from the reflection of the adamant cast a strong light into           
every part. The place is stored with great variety of sextants,             
quadrants, telescopes, astrolabes, and other astronomical instruments.      
But the greatest curiosity, upon which the fate of the island depends,      
is a loadstone of a prodigious size, in shape resembling a weaver's         
shuttle. It is in length six yards, and in the thickest part at             
least three yards over. This magnet is sustained by a very strong axle      
of adamant passing through its middle, upon which it plays, and is          
poised so exactly that the weakest hand can turn it. It is hooped           
round with a hollow cylinder of adamant, four feet deep, as many            
thick, and twelve yards in diameter, placed horizontally, and               
supported by eight adamantine feet, each six yards high. In the middle      
of the concave side there is a groove twelve inches deep, in which the      
extremities of the axle are lodged, and turned round as there is            
occasion.                                                                   
  The stone cannot be moved from its place by any force, because the        
hoop and its feet are one continued piece with that body of adamant         
which constitutes the bottom of the island.                                 
  By means of this loadstone, the island is made to rise and fall, and      
move from one place to another. For with respect to that part of the        
earth over which the monarch presides, the stone is endued at one of        
its sides with an attractive power, and at the other with a repulsive.      
Upon placing the magnet erect with its attracting end towards the           
earth, the island descends; but when the repelling extremity points         
downwards, the island mounts directly upwards. When the position of         
the stone is oblique, the motion of the island is so too. For in            
this magnet the forces always act in lines parallel to its direction.       
                                                     {P_3|CH_3 ^paragraph 5}
                             (SEE PLATE 4)                                  
  By this oblique motion the island is conveyed to different parts          
of the monarch's dominions. To explain the manner of its progress, let      
AB represent a line drawn cross the dominions of Balnibarbi, let the        
line cd represent the loadstone, of which let d be the repelling            
end, and c the attracting end, the island being over C; let the             
stone be placed in the position cd, with its repelling end                  
downwards; then the island will be driven upwards obliquely towards D.      
When it is arrived at D, let the stone be turned upon its axle, till        
its attracting end points towards E, and then the island will be            
carried obliquely towards E; where if the stone be again turned upon        
its axle till it stands in the position EF, with its repelling point        
downwards, the island will rise obliquely towards F, where by               
directing the attracting end towards G, the island may be carried to        
G, and from G to H, by turning the stone, so as to make its                 
repelling extremity point directly downwards. And thus by changing the      
situation of the stone as often as there is occasion, the island is         
made to rise and fall by turns in an oblique direction, and by those        
alternate risings and fallings (the obliquity being not                     
considerable) is conveyed from one part of the dominions to the other.      
  But it must be observed that this island cannot move beyond the           
extent of the dominions below, nor can it rise above the height of          
four miles. For which the astronomers (who have written large               
systems concerning the stone) assign the following reason: that the         
magnetic virtue does not extend beyond the distance of four Miles, and      
that the mineral which acts upon the stone in the bowels of the earth,      
and in the sea about six leagues distant from the shore, is not             
diffused through the whole globe, but terminated with the limits of         
the King's dominions; and it was easy from the great advantage of such      
a superior situation, for a prince to bring under his obedience             
whatever country lay within the attraction of that magnet.                  
  When the stone is put parallel to the plane of the horizon, the           
island stands still; for in that case the extremities of it being at        
equal distance from the earth, act with equal force, the one in             
drawing downwards, the other in pushing upwards, and consequently no        
motion can ensue.                                                           
  This loadstone is under the care of certain astronomers, who from         
time to time give it such positions as the monarch directs. They spend      
the greatest part of their lives in observing the celestial bodies,         
which they do by the assistance of glasses far excelling ours in            
goodness. For although their largest telescopes do not exceed three         
feet, they magnify much more than those of a hundred yards among us,        
and at the same time show the stars with greater clearness. This            
advantage has enabled them to extend their discoveries much farther         
than our astronomers in Europe; for they have made a catalogue of           
ten thousand fixed stars, whereas the largest of ours do not contain        
above one third part of that number. They have likewise discovered two      
lesser stars, or satellites, which revolve about Mars, whereof the          
innermost is distant from the center of the primary planet exactly          
three of his diameters, and the outermost five; the former revolves in      
the space of ten hours, and the latter in twenty-one and a half; so         
that the squares of their periodical times are very near in the same        
proportion with the cubes of their distance from the center of Mars,        
which evidently shows them to be governed by the same law of                
gravitation that influences the other heavenly bodies.                      
                                                    {P_3|CH_3 ^paragraph 10}
  They have observed ninety-three different comets, and settled             
their periods with great exactness. If this be true (and they affirm        
it with great confidence), it is much to be wished that their               
observations were made public, whereby the theory of comets, which          
at present is very lame and defective, might be brought to the same         
perfection with other parts of astronomy.                                   
  The King would be the most absolute prince in the universe, if he         
could but prevail on a ministry to join with him; but these having          
their estates below on the continent, and considering that the              
office of a favorite has a very uncertain tenure, would never               
consent to the enslaving their country.                                     
  If any town should engage in rebellion or mutiny, fall into               
violent factions, or refuse to pay the usual tribute, the King has two      
methods of reducing them to obedience. The first and the mildest            
course by keeping the island hovering over such a town, and the             
lands about it, whereby he can deprive them of the benefit of the           
sun and the rain, and consequently afflict the inhabitants with dearth      
and diseases. And if the crime deserve it, they are at the same time        
pelted from above with great stones, against which they have no             
defense but by creeping into cellars or caves, while the roofs of           
their houses are beaten to pieces. But if they still continue               
obstinate, or offer to raise insurrections, he proceeds to the last         
remedy, by letting the island drop directly upon their heads, which         
makes a universal destruction both of houses and men. However, this is      
an extremity to which the prince is seldom driven, neither indeed is        
he willing to put it in execution, nor dare his ministers advise him        
to an action, which as it would render them odious to the people, so        
it would be a great damage to their own estates, which lie all              
below, for the island is the King's demesne.                                
  But there is still indeed a more weighty reason, why the kings of         
this country have been always averse from executing so terrible an          
action, unless upon the utmost necessity. For if the town intended          
to be destroyed should have in it any tall rocks, as it generally           
falls out in the larger cities, a situation probably chosen at first        
with a view to prevent such a catastrophe; or if it abound in high          
spires, or pillars of stone, a sudden fall might endanger the bottom        
or under surface of the island, which, although it consist, as I            
have said, of one entire adamant two hundred yards thick, might happen      
to crack by too great a shock, or burst by approaching too near the         
fires from the houses below, as the backs both of iron and stone            
will often do in our chimneys. Of all this the people are well              
apprised, and understand how far to carry their obstinacy, where their      
liberty or property is concerned. And the King, when he is highest          
provoked, and most determined to press a city to rubbish, orders the        
island to descend with great gentleness, out of a pretense of               
tenderness to his people, but indeed for fear of breaking the               
adamantine bottom; in which case it is the opinion of all their             
philosophers that the loadstone could no longer hold it up, and the         
whole mass would fall to the ground.                                        
  About three years before my arrival among them, while the King was        
in his progress over his dominions, there happened an extraordinary         
accident which had like to have put a period to the fate of that            
monarchy, at least as it is now instituted. Lindalino, the second city      
in the kingdom, was the first his Majesty visited in his progress.          
Three days after his departure the inhabitants, who had often               
complained of great oppressions, shut the town gates, seized on the         
governor, and with incredible speed and labor erected four large            
towers, one at every corner of the city (which is an exact square),         
equal in height to a strong pointed rock that stands directly in the        
center of the city. Upon the top of each tower, as well as upon the         
rock, they fixed a great loadstone, and in case their design should         
fail, they had provided a vast quantity of the most combustible             
fuel, hoping to burst therewith the adamantine bottom of the island,        
if the loadstone project should miscarry.                                   
                                                    {P_3|CH_3 ^paragraph 15}
  It was eight months before the King had perfect notice that the           
Lindalinians were in rebellion. He then commanded that the island           
should be wafted over the city. The people were unanimous, and had          
laid in stores of provisions, and a great river runs through the            
middle of the town. The King hovered over them several days to deprive      
them of the sun and the rain. He ordered many packthreads to be let         
down, yet not a person offered to send up a petition, but instead           
thereof very bold demands, the redress of all their grievances,             
great immunities, the choice of their own governor, and other like          
exorbitances. Upon which his Majesty commanded all the inhabitants          
of the island to cast great stones from the lower gallery into the          
town; but the citizens had provided against this mischief by conveying      
their persons and effects into the four towers, and other strong            
buildings, and vaults underground.                                          
  The King being now determined to reduce this proud people, ordered        
that the island should descend gently within forty yards of the top of      
the towers and rock. This was accordingly done; but the officers            
employed in that work found the descent much speedier than usual,           
and by turning the loadstone could not without great difficulty keep        
it in a firm position, but found the island inclining to fall. They         
sent the King immediate intelligence of this astonishing event, and         
begged his Majesty's permission to raise the island higher; the King        
consented, a general council was called, and the officers of the            
loadstone ordered to attend. One of the oldest and most expert among        
them obtained leave to try an experiment. He took a strong line of a        
hundred yards, and the island being raised over the town above the          
attracting power they had felt, he fastened a piece of adamant to           
the end of his line, which had in it a mixture of iron mineral, of the      
same nature with that whereof the bottom or lower surface of the            
island is composed, and from the lower gallery let it down slowly           
towards the top of the towers. The adamant was not descended four           
yards, before the officer felt it drawn so strongly downward that he        
could hardly pull it back. He then threw down several small pieces          
of adamant, and observed that they were all violently attracted by the      
top of the tower. The same experiment was made on the other three           
towers, and on the rock with the same effect.                               
  This incident broke entirely the King's measures, and (to dwell no        
longer on other circumstances) he was forced to give the town their         
own conditions.                                                             
  I was assured by a great minister that if the island had descended        
so near the town as not to be able to raise itself, the citizens            
were determined to fix it for ever, to kill the King and all his            
servants, and entirely change the government.                               
  By a fundamental law of this realm, neither the king, nor either          
of his two elder sons, are permitted to leave the island; nor the           
queen, till she is past child-bearing.                                      
                                                                            
P_3|CH_4                                                                    
  CHAPTER IV                                                                
-                                                                           
  Although I cannot say that I was ill treated in this island, yet I        
must confess I thought myself too much neglected, not without some          
degree of contempt. For neither prince nor people appeared to be            
curious in any part of knowledge, except mathematics and music,             
wherein I was far their inferior, and upon that account very little         
regarded.                                                                   
  On the other side, after having seen all the curiosities of the           
island, I was very desirous to leave it, being heartily weary of those      
people. They were indeed excellent in two sciences for which I have         
great esteem, and wherein I am not unversed; but at the same time so        
abstracted and involved in speculation, that I never met with such          
disagreeable companions. I conversed only with women, tradesmen,            
flappers, and court pages, during two months of my abode there, by          
which at last I rendered myself extremely contemptible; yet these were      
the only people from whom I could ever receive a reasonable answer.         
  I had obtained by hard study a good degree of knowledge in their          
language; I was weary of being confined to an island where I                
received so little countenance, and resolved to leave it with the           
first opportunity.                                                          
  There was a great lord at court, nearly related to the King, and for      
that reason alone used with respect. He was universally reckoned the        
most ignorant and stupid person among them. He had performed many           
eminent services for the crown, had great natural and acquired              
parts, adorned with integrity and honor, but so ill an ear for              
music, that his detractors reported he had been often known to beat         
time in the wrong place; neither could his tutors without extreme           
difficulty teach him to demonstrate the most easy proposition in the        
mathematics. He was pleased to show me many marks of favor, often           
did me the honor of a visit, desired to be informed in the affairs          
of Europe, the laws and customs, the manners and learning of the            
several countries where I had traveled. He listened to me with great        
attention, and made very wise observations on all I spoke. He had           
two flappers attending him for state, but never made use of them            
except at court, and in visits of ceremony, and would always command        
them to withdraw when we were alone together.                               
  I entreated this illustrious person to intercede in my behalf with        
his Majesty for leave to depart, which he accordingly did, as he was        
pleased to tell me, with regret: for indeed he had made me several          
offers very advantageous, which however I refused with expressions          
of the highest acknowledgment.                                              
                                                     {P_3|CH_4 ^paragraph 5}
  On the 16th day of February I took leave of his Majesty and the           
court. The King made me a present to the value of about two hundred         
pounds English, and my protector his kinsman as much more, together         
with a letter of recommendation to a friend of his in Lagado, the           
metropolis. The island being then hovering over a mountain about two        
miles from it, I was let down from the lowest gallery, in the same          
manner as I had been taken up.                                              
  The continent, as far as it is subject to the monarch of the              
Flying Island, passes under the general name of Balnibarbi, and the         
metropolis, as I said before, is called Lagado. I felt some little          
satisfaction in finding myself on firm ground. I walked to the city         
without any concern, being clad like one of the natives, and                
sufficiently instructed to converse with them. I soon found out the         
person's house to whom I was ended, presented my letter from his            
friend the grandee in the island, and was received with much kindness.      
This great lord, whose name was Munodi, ordered me an apartment in his      
own house, where I continued during my stay, and was entertained in         
a most hospitable manner.                                                   
  The next morning after my arrival, he took me in his chariot to           
see the town, which is about half the size of London, but the houses        
very strangely built, and most of them out of repair. The people in         
the streets walked fast, looked wild, their eyes fixed, and were            
generally in rags. We passed through one of the town gates, and went        
about three miles into the country, where I saw many laborers               
working with several sorts of tools in the ground, but was not able to      
conjecture what they were about; neither did I observe any expectation      
either of corn or grass, although the soil appeared to be excellent. I      
could not forbear admiring at these odd appearances both in town and        
country, and I made bold to desire my conductor, that he would be           
pleased to explain to me what could be meant by so many busy heads,         
hands, and faces, both in the streets and the fields, because I did         
not discover any good effects they produced; but on the contrary, I         
never knew a soil so unhappily cultivated, houses so ill contrived and      
so ruinous, or a people whose countenances and habit expressed so much      
misery and want.                                                            
  This Lord Munodi was a person of the first rank, and had been some        
years Governor of Lagado, but by a cabal of ministers was discharged        
for insufficiency. However, the King treated him with tenderness, as a      
well-meaning man, but of a low contemptible understanding.                  
  When I gave that free censure of the country and its inhabitants, he      
made no further answer than by telling me that I had not been long          
enough among them to form a judgment, and that the different nations        
of the world had different customs, with other common topics to the         
same purpose. But when we returned to his palace, he asked me how I         
liked the building, what absurdities I observed, and what quarrel I         
had with the dress or looks of his domestics. This he might safely do,      
because every thing about him was magnificent, regular, and polite.         
I answered that his Excellency's prudence, quality, and fortune, had        
exempted him from those defects which folly and beggary had produced        
in others. He said if I would go with him to his country house,             
about twenty miles distant, where his estate lay, there would be            
more leisure for this kind of conversation. I told his Excellency that      
I was entirely at his disposal, and accordingly we set out next             
morning.                                                                    
                                                    {P_3|CH_4 ^paragraph 10}
  During our journey he made me observe the several methods used by         
farmers in managing their lands, which to me were wholly                    
unaccountable; for except in some very few places I could not discover      
one ear of corn or blade of grass. But in three hours' traveling the        
scene was wholly altered; we came into a most beautiful country;            
farmers' houses at small distances, neatly built; the fields enclosed,      
containing vineyards, corn grounds, and meadows. Neither do I remember      
to have seen a more delightful prospect. His Excellency observed my         
countenance to clear up; he told me with a sigh that there his              
estate began, and would continue the same till we should come to his        
house. That his countrymen ridiculed and despised him for managing his      
affairs no better, and for setting so ill an example to the kingdom,        
which however was followed by very few, such as were old, and willful,      
and weak like himself.                                                      
  We came at length to the house, which was indeed a noble                  
structure, built according to the best rules of ancient                     
architecture. The fountains, gardens, walks, avenues, and groves            
were all disposed with exact judgment and taste. I gave due praises to      
every thing I saw, whereof his Excellency took not the least notice         
till after supper, when, there being no third companion, he told me         
with a very melancholy air that he doubted he must thrown down his          
houses in town and country, to rebuild them after the present mode,         
destroy all his plantations, and cast others into such a form as            
modern usage required, and give the same directions to all his              
tenants, unless he would submit to incur the censure of pride,              
singularity, affectation, ignorance, caprice, and perhaps increase his      
Majesty's displeasure.                                                      
  That the admiration I appeared to be under would cease or diminish        
when he had informed me of some particulars, which probably I never         
heard of at court, the people there being too much taken up in their        
own speculations, to have regard to what passed here below.                 
  The sum of his discourse was to this effect. That about forty             
years ago certain persons went up to Laputa, either upon business or        
diversion, and after five months continuance came back with a very          
little smattering in mathematics, but full of volatile spirits              
acquired in that airy region. That these persons upon their return          
began to dislike the management of every thing below, and fell into         
schemes of putting all arts, sciences, languages, and mechanics upon a      
new foot. To this end they procured a royal patent for erecting an          
Academy of Projectors in Lagado; and the humor prevailed so strongly        
among the people, that there is not a town of any consequence in the        
kingdom without such an academy. In these colleges the professors           
contrive new rules and methods of agriculture and building, and new         
instruments and tools for all trades and manufactures, whereby, as          
they undertake, one man shall do the work of ten; a palace may be           
built in a week, of materials so durable as to last forever without         
repairing. All the fruits of the earth shall come to maturity at            
whatever season we think fit to choose, and increase a hundred fold         
more than they do at present, with innumerable other happy                  
proposals. The only inconvenience is, that none of these projects           
are yet brought to perfection, and in the meantime, the whole               
country lies miserably waste, the houses in ruins, and the people           
without food or clothes. By all which, instead of being discouraged,        
they are fifty times more violently bent upon prosecuting their             
schemes, driven equally on by hope and despair; that as for himself,        
being not of an enterprising spirit, he was content to go on in the         
old forms, to live in the houses his ancestors had built, and act as        
they did in every part of life without innovation. That some few other      
persons of quality and gentry had done the same, but were looked on         
with an eye of contempt and ill-will, as enemies to art, ignorant, and      
ill commonwealth's-men, preferring their own ease and sloth before the      
general improvement of their country.                                       
  His Lordship added that he would not by any further particulars           
prevent the pleasure I should certainly take in viewing the grand           
Academy, whither he was resolved I should go. He only desired me to         
observe a ruined building upon the side of a mountain about three           
miles distant, of which he gave me this account. That he had a very         
convenient mill within half a mile of his house, turned by a current        
from a large river, and sufficient for his own family as well as a          
great number of his tenants. That about seven years ago a club of           
those projectors came to him with proposals to destroy this mill,           
and build another on the side of that mountain, on the long ridge           
whereof a long canal must be cut for a repository of water, to be           
conveyed up by pipes and engines to supply the mill; because the            
wind and air upon a height agitated the water, and thereby made it          
fitter for motion; and because the water descending down a declivity        
would turn the mill with half the current of a river whose course is        
more upon a level. He said, that being then not very well with the          
court, and pressed by many of his friends, he complied with the             
proposal; and after employing an hundred men for two years, the work        
miscarried, the projectors went off, laying the blame entirely. upon        
him, railing at him ever since, and putting others upon the same            
experiment, with equal assurance of success, as well as equal               
disappointment.                                                             
                                                    {P_3|CH_4 ^paragraph 15}
  In a few days we came back to town, and his Excellency,                   
considering the bad character he had in the Academy, would not go with      
me himself, but recommended me to a friend of his to bear me company        
thither. My lord was pleased to represent me as a great admirer of          
projects, and a person of much curiosity and easy belief; which indeed      
was not without truth, for I had myself been a sort of projector in my      
younger days.                                                               
                                                                            
P_3|CH_5                                                                    
  CHAPTER V                                                                 
-                                                                           
  This Academy is not an entire single building, but a continuation of      
several houses on both sides of a street, which growing waste was           
purchased and applied to that use.                                          
  I was received very kindly by the Warden, and went for many days          
to the Academy. Every room has in it one or more projectors, and I          
believe I could not be in fewer than five hundred rooms.                    
  The first man I saw was of a meager aspect, with sooty hands and          
face, his hair and beard long, ragged and singed in several places.         
His clothes, shirt, and skin were all of the same color. He had been        
eight years upon a project for extracting sunbeams out of cucumbers,        
which were to be put into vials hermetically sealed, and let out to         
warm the air in raw inclement summers. He told me he did not doubt          
in eight years more he should be able to supply the Governor's gardens      
with sunshine at a reasonable rate; but he complained that his stock        
was low, and entreated me to give him something as an encouragement to      
ingenuity, especially since this had been a very dear season for            
cucumbers. I made him a small present, for my lord had furnished me         
with money on purpose, because he knew their practice of begging            
from all who go to see them.                                                
  I went into another chamber, but was ready to hasten back, being          
almost overcome with a horrible stink. My conductor pressed me              
forward, conjuring me in a whisper to give no offense, which would          
be highly resented, and therefore I dare not so much as stop my             
nose. The projector of this cell was the most ancient student of the        
Academy; his face and beard were of a pale yellow; his hands and            
clothes daubed over with filth. When I was presented to him, he gave        
me a close embrace (a compliment I could well have excused). His            
employment from his first coming into the Academy, was an operation to      
reduce human excrement to its original food, by separating the several      
parts, removing the tincture which it receives from the gall, making        
the odor exhale, and off the saliva. He had a weekly allowance from         
the society, of a vessel filled with human ordure about the size of         
a Bristol barrel.                                                           
  I saw another at work to calcine ice into gunpowder, who likewise         
showed me a treatise he had written concerning the malleability of          
fire, which he intended to publish.                                         
                                                     {P_3|CH_5 ^paragraph 5}
  There was a most ingenious architect who had contrived a new              
method for building houses, by beginning at the roof, and working           
downwards to the foundation, which he justified to me by the like           
practice of those two prudent insects, the bee and the spider.              
  There was a man born blind, who had several apprentices in his own        
condition; their employment was to mix colors for painters, which           
their master taught them to distinguish by feeling and smelling. It         
was indeed my misfortune to find them at that time not very perfect in      
their lessons, and the professor himself happened to be generally           
mistaken; this artist is much encouraged and esteemed by the whole          
fraternity.                                                                 
  In another apartment I was highly pleased with a projector, who           
had found a device of ploughing the ground with hogs, to save the           
charges of plows, cattle, and labor. The method in this: in an acre of      
ground you bury, at six inches distance and eight deep, a quantity          
of acorns, dates, chestnuts, and other mast or vegetables whereof           
these animals are fondest; then you drive six hundred or more of            
them into the field, where in a few days they will root up the whole        
ground in search of their food, and make it fit for sowing, at the          
same time manuring it with their dung. It is true, upon experiment          
they found the charge and trouble very great, and they had little or        
no crop. However, it is not doubted that this invention may be capable      
of great improvement.                                                       
  I went into another room, where the walls and ceiling were all            
hung round with cobwebs, except a narrow passage for the artist to          
go in and out. At my entrance he called aloud to me not to disturb his      
webs. He lamented the fatal mistake the world had been so long in of        
using silk worms, while we had such plenty of domestic insects, who         
infinitely excelled the former, because they understood how to weave        
as well as spin. And he proposed farther that by employing spiders the      
charge of dyeing silks should be wholly saved, whereof I was fully          
convinced when he showed me a vast number of flies most beautifully         
colored, wherewith he fed his spiders, assuring us that the webs would      
take a tincture from them; and as he had them of all hues, he hoped to      
fit everybody's fancy, as soon as he could find proper food for the         
flies, of certain gums, oils, and other glutinous matter to give a          
strength and consistence to the threads.                                    
  There was an astronomer who had undertaken to place a sundial upon        
the great weathercock on the townhouse, by adjusting the annual and         
diurnal motions of the earth and sun, so as to answer and coincide          
with all accidental turnings by the wind.                                   
                                                    {P_3|CH_5 ^paragraph 10}
  I was complaining of a small fit of the colic, upon which my              
conductor led me into a room, where a great physician resided, who was      
famous for curing that disease by contrary operations from the same         
instrument. He had a large pair of bellows with a long slender              
muzzle of ivory. This he conveyed eight inches up the anus, and             
drawing in the wind, he affirmed he could make the guts as lank as a        
dried bladder. But when the disease was more stubborn and violent,          
he let in the muzzle While the bellows were full of wind, which he          
discharged into the body of the patient, then withdrew the                  
instrument to replenish it, clapping his thumb strongly against the         
orifice of the fundament; and this being repeated three or four times,      
the adventitious wind would rush out, bringing the noxious along            
with it (like water put into a pump), and the patient recover. I saw        
him try both experiments upon a dog, but could not discern any              
effect from the former. After the latter, the animal was ready to           
burst, and made so violent a discharge, as was very offensive to me         
and my companions. The dog died on the spot, and we left the doctor         
endeavoring to recover him by the same operation.                           
  I visited many other apartments, but shall not trouble my reader          
with all the curiosities I observed, being studious of brevity.             
  I had hitherto seen only one side of the Academy, the other being         
appropriated to the advancers of speculative learning, of which I           
shall say something when I have mentioned one illustrious person more,      
who is called among them the universal artist. He told us he had            
been thirty years employing his thoughts for the improvement of             
human life. He had two large rooms full of wonderful curiosities,           
and fifty men at work. Some were condensing air into a dry tangible         
substance, by extracting the nitre, and letting the aqueous or fluid        
particles percolate; others softening marbles for pillows and               
pin-cushions; others petrifying the hoofs of a living horse to              
preserve them from foundering. The artist himself was at that time          
busy upon two great designs; the first, to sow land with chaff,             
wherein he affirmed the true seminal virtue to be contained, as he          
demonstrated by several experiments which I was not skillful enough to      
comprehend. The other was, by a certain composition of gums, minerals,      
and vegetables outwardly applied, to prevent the growth of wool upon        
two young lambs; and he hoped in a reasonable time to propagate the         
breed of naked sheep all over the kingdom.                                  
  We crossed a walk to the other part of the Academy, where, as I have      
already said, the projectors in speculative learning resided.               
  The first professor I saw was in a very large room, with forty            
pupils about him. After salutation, observing me to look earnestly          
upon a frame, which took up the greatest part of both the length and        
breadth of the room, he said perhaps I might wonder to see him              
employed in a project for improving speculative knowledge by practical      
and mechanical operations. But the world would soon be sensible of its      
usefulness, and he flattered himself that a more noble exalted thought      
never sprang in any other man's head. Everyone knew how laborious           
the usual method is of attaining to arts and sciences; whereas by           
his contrivance the most ignorant person at a reasonable charge, and        
with a little bodily labor, may write books in philosophy, poetry,          
politics, law, mathematics, and theology, without the least assistance      
from genius or study. He then led me to the frame, about the sides          
whereof all his pupils stood in ranks. It was twenty feet square,           
placed in the middle of the room. The superficies was composed of           
several bits of wood, about the bigness of a die, but some larger than      
others. They were all linked together by slender wires. These bits          
of wood were covered on every square with paper pasted on them, and on      
these papers were written all the words of their language, in their         
several moods, tenses, and declensions, but without any order. The          
professor then desired me to observe, for he was going to set his           
engine at work. The pupils at his command took each of them hold of an      
iron handle, whereof there were forty fixed round the edges of the          
frame, and giving them a sudden turn, the whole disposition of the          
words was entirely changed. He then commanded thirty-six of the lads        
to read the several lines softly as they appeared upon the frame;           
and where they found three or four words together that might make part      
of a sentence, they dictated to the four remaining boys who were            
scribes. This work was repeated three or four times, and at every turn      
the engine was so contrived that the words shifted into new places, as      
the square bits of wood moved upside down.                                  
                                                    {P_3|CH_5 ^paragraph 15}
  Six hours a day the young students were employed in this labor,           
and the professor showed me several volumes in large folio already          
collected, of broken sentences, which he intended to piece together,        
and out of those rich materials to give the world a complete body of        
all arts and sciences; which however might be still improved, and much      
expedited, if the public would raise a fund for making and employing        
five hundred such frames in Lagado, and oblige the managers to              
contribute in common their several collections.                             
                           (SEE PLATE 5)                                    
  He assured me, that this invention had employed all his thoughts          
from his youth, that he had emptied the whole vocabulary into his           
frame, and made the strictest computation of the general proportion         
there is in books between the numbers of particles, nouns, and              
verbs, and other parts of speech.                                           
  I made my humblest acknowledgement to this illustrious person for         
his great communicativeness, and promised if ever I had the good            
fortune to return to my native country, that I would do him justice,        
as the sole inventor of this wonderful machine; the form and                
contrivance of which I desired leave to delineate upon paper, as in         
the figure here annexed. I told him, although it were the custom of         
our learned in Europe to steal inventions from each other, who had          
thereby at least this advantage, that it became a controversy which         
was the right owner, yet I would take such caution, that he should          
have the honor entire without a rival.                                      
  We next went to the school of languages, where three professors           
sat in consultation upon improving that of their own country.               
                                                    {P_3|CH_5 ^paragraph 20}
  The first project was to shorten discourse by cutting                     
polysyllables into one, and leaving out verbs and participles, because      
in reality all things imaginable are but nouns.                             
  The other project was a scheme for entirely abolishing all words          
whatsoever; and this was urged as a great advantage in point of health      
as well as brevity. For it is plain that every word we speak is in          
some degree a diminution of our lungs by corrosion, and consequently        
contributes to the shortening of our lives. An expedient was therefore      
offered, that since words are only names for things, it would be            
more convenient for all men to carry about them such things as were         
necessary to express the particular business they are to discourse on.      
And this invention would certainly have taken place, to the great ease      
as well as health of the subject, if the women, in conjunction with         
the vulgar and illiterate, had not threatened to raise a rebellion,         
unless they might be allowed the liberty to speak with their                
tongues, after the manner of their ancestors; such constant                 
irreconcilable enemies to science are the common people. However, many      
of the most learned and wise adhere to the new scheme of expressing         
themselves by things, which has only this inconvenience attending           
it, that if a man's business be very great, and of various kinds, he        
must be obliged in proportion to carry a greater bundle of things upon      
his back, unless he can afford one or two strong servants to attend         
him. I have often beheld two of those sages almost sinking under the        
weight of their packs, like pedlars among us; who, when they met in         
the streets, would lay down their loads, open their sacks, and hold         
conversation for an hour together; then put up their implements,            
help each other to resume their burdens, and take their leave.              
  But for short conversations a man may carry implements in his             
pockets and under his arms, enough to supply him, and in his house          
he cannot be at a loss. Therefore the room where company meet who           
practise this art, is full of all things ready at hand, requisite to        
furnish matter for this kind of artificial converse.                        
  Another great advantage proposed by this invention was that it would      
serve as a universal language to be understood in all civilized             
nations, whose goods and utensils are generally of the same kind, or        
nearly resembling, so that their uses might easily be comprehended.         
And thus ambassadors would be qualified to treat with foreign               
princes or ministers of state, to whose tongues they were utter             
strangers.                                                                  
  I was at the mathematical school, where the master taught his pupils      
after a method scarce imaginable to us in Europe. The proposition           
and demonstration were fairly written on a thin wafer, with ink             
composed of a cephalic tincture. This the student was to swallow            
upon a fasting stomach, and for three days following eat nothing but        
bread and water. As the wafer digested, the tincture mounted to his         
brain, bearing the proposition along with it. But the success has           
not hitherto been answerable, partly by some error in the quantum or        
composition, and partly by the perverseness of lads, to whom this           
bolus is so nauseous, that they generally steal aside, and discharge        
it upwards before it can operate; neither have they been yet persuaded      
to use so long an abstinence as the prescription required.                  
                                                                            
P_3|CH_6                                                                    
  CHAPTER VI                                                                
-                                                                           
  In the school of political projectors I was but ill entertained, the      
professors appearing in my judgment wholly out of their senses,             
which is a scene that never fails to make me melancholy. These unhappy      
people were proposing schemes for persuading monarchs to choose             
favorites upon the score of their wisdom, capacity, and virtue; of          
teaching ministers to consult the public good; of rewarding merit,          
great abilities, eminent services; of instructing princes to know           
their true interest by placing it on the same foundation with that          
of their people; of choosing for employments persons qualified to           
exercise them; with many other wild impossible chimeras, that never         
entered before into the heart of man to conceive, and confirmed in          
me the old observation, that there is nothing so extravagant and            
irrational which some philosophers have not maintained for truth.           
  But however I shall so far do justice to this part of the Academy,        
as to acknowledge that all of them were not so visionary. There was         
a most ingenious doctor who seemed to be perfectly versed in the whole      
nature and system of government. This illustrious person had very           
usefully employed his studies in finding out effectual remedies for         
all diseases and corruptions, to which the several kinds of public          
administration are subject by the vices or infirmities of those who         
govern, as well as by the licentiousness of those who are to obey. For      
instance, whereas all writers and reasoners have agreed, that there is      
a strict universal resemblance between the natural and the political        
body; can there be anything more evident, than that the health of both      
must be preserved, and the cured by the same prescriptions? It is           
allowed that senates and great councils are often troubled with             
redundant, ebullient, and other peccant humors, with many diseases          
of the head, and more of the heart; with strong convulsions, with           
grievous contractions of the nerves and sinews in both hands, but           
especially the right; with spleen, flatus, vertigos, and deliriums;         
with scrofulous tumors full of fetid purulent matter; with sour frothy      
ructations, with canine appetites and crudeness of digestion,               
besides many others needless to mention. This doctor therefore              
proposed, that upon the meeting of a senate, certain physicians should      
attend at the three first days of their sitting, and at the close of        
each day's debate, feel the pulses of every senator; after which,           
having maturely considered, and consulted upon the nature of the            
several maladies, and the methods of cure, they should on the fourth        
day return to the senate house, attended by their apothecaries              
stored with proper medicines; and before the members sat, administer        
to each of them lenitives, aperitives, abstersives, corrosives,             
restringents, palliatives, laxatives, cephalalgics, icterics,               
apophlegmatics, acoustics, as their several cases required; and             
according as these medicines should operate, repeat, alter, or omit         
them at the next meeting.                                                   
  This project could not be of any great expense to the public, and         
would, in my poor opinion, be of much use for the dispatch of business      
in those countries where senates have any share in the legislative          
power; beget unanimity, shorten debates, open a few mouths which are        
now closed, and close many more which are now open; curb the petulancy      
of the young, and correct the positiveness of the old; rouse the            
stupid, and damp the pert.                                                  
  Again, because it is a general complaint, that the favorites of           
princes are troubled with short and weak memories, the same doctor          
proposed, that whoever attended a first minister, after having told         
his business with the utmost brevity and in the plainest words, should      
at his departure give the said minister a tweak by the nose, or a kick      
in the belly, or tread on his corns, or lug him thrice by both ears,        
or pin into his breech, or pinch his arm black and blue, to prevent         
forgetfulness; and at every levee day repeat the same operation,            
till the business were done or absolutely refused.                          
  He likewise directed, that every senator in the great council of a        
nation, after he had delivered his opinion, and argued in the               
defense of it, should be obliged to give his vote directly contrary;        
because if that were done, the result would infallibly terminate in         
the good of the public.                                                     
                                                     {P_3|CH_6 ^paragraph 5}
  When parties in a state are violent, he offered a wonderful               
contrivance to reconcile them. The method is this. You take a               
hundred leaders of each party, you dispose them into couples of such        
whose heads are nearest of a size; then let two nice operators saw off      
the occiput of each couple at the same time, in such a manner that the      
brain may be equally divided. Let the occiputs thus cut off be              
interchanged, applying each to the head of his opposite party-man.          
It seems indeed to be a work that requires some exactness, but the          
professor assured us that if it were dexterously performed the cure         
would be infallible. For he argued thus; that the two half brains           
being left to debate the matter between themselves within the space of      
one skull, would soon come to a good understanding, and produce that        
moderation, as well as regularity of thinking, so much to be wished         
for in the heads of those who imagine they come into the world only to      
watch and govern its motion: and as to the difference of brains in          
quantity or quality among those who are directors in faction, the           
doctor assured us from his own knowledge that it was a perfect trifle.      
  I heard a very warm debate between two professors, about the most         
commodious and effectual ways and means of raising money without            
grieving the subject. The first affirmed the most just method would be      
to lay a certain tax upon vices and folly, and the sum fixed upon           
every man to be rated after the fairest manner by a jury of his             
neighbors. The second was of an opinion directly contrary, to tax           
those qualities of body and mind for which men chiefly value                
themselves, the rate to be more or less according to the degrees of         
excelling, the decision whereof should be left entirely to their own        
breast. The highest tax was upon men who are the greatest favorites of      
the other sex, and the assessments according to the number and natures      
of the favors they have received; for which they are allowed to be          
their own vouchers. Wit, valor, and politeness were likewise                
proposed to be largely taxed, and collected in the same manner, by          
every person's giving his own word for the quantum of what he               
possessed. But as to honor, justice, wisdom, and learning, they should      
not be taxed at all, because they are qualifications of so singular         
a kind, that no man will either allow them in his neighbor, or value        
them in himself.                                                            
  The women were proposed to be taxed according to their beauty and         
skill in dressing, wherein they had the same privilege with the men,        
to be determined by their own judgment. But constancy, chastity,            
good sense, and good nature were not rated, because they would not          
bear the charge of collecting.                                              
  To keep senators in the interest of the crown, it was proposed            
that the members should raffle for employments, every man first taking      
an oath, and giving security that he would vote for the court, whether      
he won or not; after which the losers had in their turn the liberty of      
raising upon the next vacancy. Thus hope and expectation would be kept      
alive, none would complain of broken promises, but impute their             
disappointments wholly to fortune, whose shoulders are broader and          
stronger than those of a ministry.                                          
  Another professor showed me a large paper of instructions for             
discovering plots and conspiracies against the government. He               
advised great statesmen to examine into the diet of all suspected           
persons; their times of eating; upon which side they lay in bed;            
with which hand they wiped their posteriors; to take a strict view          
of their excrements, and, from the color, the odor, the taste, the          
consistence, the crudeness of maturity of digestion, form a judgment        
of their thoughts and designs. Because men are never so serious,            
thoughtful, and intent, as when they are at stool, which he found by        
frequent experiment; for in such conjunctures, when he used merely          
as a trial to consider which was the best way of murdering the king,        
his ordure would have a tincture of green, but quite different when he      
thought only of raising an insurrection or burning the metropolis.          
                                                    {P_3|CH_6 ^paragraph 10}
  The whole discourse was written with great acuteness, containing          
many observations both curious and useful for politicians, but as I         
conceived not altogether complete. This I ventured to tell the author,      
and offered if he pleased to supply him with some additions. He             
received my proposition with more compliance than is usual among            
writers, especially those of the projecting species, professing he          
would be glad to receive further information.                               
  I told him that in the kingdom of Tribnia, by the natives called          
Langden, where I had sojourned some time in my travels, the bulk of         
the people consist in a manner wholly of discoverers, witnesses,            
informers, accusers, prosecutors, evidences, swearers, together with        
their several subservient and subaltern instruments, all under the          
colors and conduct of ministers of state and their deputies. The plots      
in that kingdom are usually the workmanship of those persons who            
desire to raise their own characters of profound politicians, to            
restore new vigor to a crazy administration, to stifle or divert            
general discontents, to fill their pockets with forfeitures, and raise      
or sink the opinion of public credit, as either shall best answer           
their private advantage. It is first agreed and settled among them,         
what suspected persons shall be accused of a plot; then, effectual          
care is taken to secure all their letters and papers, and put the           
criminals in chains. These papers are delivered to a set of artists,        
very dexterous in finding out the mysterious meanings of words,             
syllables, and letters. For instance, they can discover a                   
close-stool to signify a privy council; a flock of geese, a senate;         
a lame dog, an invader; a codshead, a ---; the plague, a standing           
army; a buzzard, a prime minister; the gout, a high priest; a               
gibbet, a secretary of state; a chamber-pot, a committee of                 
grandees; a sieve, a court lady; a broom, a revolution; a mousetrap,        
an employment; a bottomless pit, the treasury; a sink, the court; a         
cap-and bells, a favorite; a broken reed, a court of justice; an empty      
tun, a general; a running sore, the administration.                         
  When this method fails, they have two others more effectual, which        
the learned among them call acrostics and anagrams. First they can          
decipher all initial letters into political meanings. Thus, N. shall        
signify a plot; B. a regiment of horse; L. a fleet at sea; or secondly      
by transposing the letters of the alphabet in any suspected paper,          
they can discover the deepest designs of a discontented party. So           
for example if I should say in a letter to a friend, Our brother Tom        
has just got the piles, a skillful decipherer would discover that           
the same letters which compose that sentence may be analyzed into           
the following words: Resist -- a plot is brought home -- the tour. And      
this is the anagrammatic method.                                            
  The professor made me great acknowledgments for communicating             
these observations, and promised to make honorable mention of me in         
his treatise.                                                               
  I saw nothing in this country that could invite me to a longer            
continuance, and began to think of returning home to England.               
                                                                            
P_3|CH_7                                                                    
  CHAPTER VII                                                               
-                                                                           
  The continent of which this kingdom is a part extends itself, as I        
have reason to believe, eastward to that unknown tract of America,          
westward to California, and north to the Pacific Ocean, which is not        
above a hundred and fifty miles from Lagado, where there is a good          
port and much commerce with the great island of Luggnagg, situated          
to the northwest about 29 degrees north latitude, and 140 longitude.        
The island of Luggnagg stands southeastward of Japan, about a               
hundred leagues distant. There is a strict alliance between the             
Japanese Emperor and the King of Luggnagg, which affords frequent           
opportunities of sailing from one island to the other. I determined         
therefore to direct my course this way, in order to my return to            
Europe. I hired two mules with a guide to show me the way, and carry        
my small baggage. I took leave of my noble protector, who had shown me      
so much favor and made me a generous present at my departure.               
  My journey was without any accident or adventure worth relating.          
When I arrived at the port of Maldonada (for so it is called) there         
was no ship in the harbor bound for Luggnagg, nor likely to be in some      
time. The town is about as large as Portsmouth. I soon fell into            
some acquaintance, and was very hospitably received. A gentleman of         
distinction said to me that since the ships bound for Luggnagg could        
not be ready in less than a month, it might be no disagreeable              
amusement for me to take a trip to the little island of                     
Glubbdubdrib, about five leagues off to the southwest. He offered           
himself and a friend to accompany me, and that I should be provided         
with a small convenient barque for the voyage.                              
  Glubbdubdrib, as nearly as I can interpret the word, signifies the        
Island of Sorcerers or Magicians. It is about one-third as large as         
the Isle of Wight, and extremely fruitful; it is governed by the            
head of a certain tribe, who are all magicians. This tribe marries          
only among each other, and the eldest in succession is Prince or            
Governor. He has a noble palace, and a park of about three thousand         
acres, surrounded by a wall of hewn stone twenty feet high. In this         
park are several small enclosures for cattle, corn, and gardening.          
  The Governor and his family are served and attended by domestics          
of a kind somewhat unusual. By his skill in necromancy, he has a power      
of calling whom he pleases from the dead, and commanding their service      
for twenty-four hours, but no longer; nor can he call the same persons      
up again in less than three months, except upon very extraordinary          
occasions.                                                                  
  When we arrived at the island, which was about eleven in the              
morning, one of the gentlemen who accompanied me, went to the               
Governor, and desired admittance for a stranger, who came on purpose        
to have the honor of attending on his Highness. This was immediately        
granted, and we all three entered the gate of the palace between two        
rows of guards, armed and dressed after a very antic manner, and            
something in their countenances that made my flesh creep a horror I         
cannot express. We passed through several apartments, between servants      
of the same sort, ranked on each side as before, till we came to the        
chamber of presence, where after three profound obeisances, and a           
few general questions, we were permitted to sit on three stools near        
the lowest step of his Highness's throne. He understood the language        
of Balnibarbi, although it were different from that of his island.          
He desired me to give him some account of my travels; and to let me         
see that I should be treated without ceremony, he dismissed all his         
attendants with a turn of his finger, at which to my great                  
astonishment they vanished in an instant, like visions in a dream,          
when we awake on a sudden. I could not recover myself in some time,         
till the Governor assured me that I should receive no hurt; and             
observing my two companions to be under no concern, who had been often      
entertained in the same manner, I began to take courage, and related        
to his Highness a short history of my several adventures, yet not           
without some hesitation, and frequently looking behind me to the place      
where I had seen those domestic specters. I had the honor to dine with      
the Governor, where a new set of ghosts served up the meat, and waited      
at table. I now observed myself to be less terrified than I had been        
in the morning. I stayed till sunset, but humbly desired his                
Highness to excuse me for not accepting his invitation of lodging in        
the palace. My two friends and I lay at a private house in the town         
adjoining, which is the capital of this little island; and the next         
morning we returned to pay our duty to the Governor, as he was pleased      
to command us.                                                              
                                                     {P_3|CH_7 ^paragraph 5}
  After this manner we continued in the island for ten days, most part      
of every day with the Governor, and at night in our lodging. I soon         
grew so familiarized to the sight of spirits, that the third or fourth      
time they gave me no emotion at all; or if I had any apprehensions          
left, my curiosity prevailed over them. For his Highness the                
Governor ordered me to call up whatever persons I would choose to           
name, and in whatever numbers among all the dead from the beginning of      
the world to the present time, and command them to answer any               
questions I should think fit to ask; with this condition, that my           
questions must be confined within the compass of the times they             
lived in. And one thing I might depend upon, that they would certainly      
tell me truth, for lying was a talent of no use in the lower world.         
  I made my humble acknowledgments to his Highness for so great a           
favor. We were in a chamber from whence there was a fair prospect into      
the park. And because my first inclination was to be entertained            
with scenes of pomp and magnificence, I desired to see Alexander the        
Great, at the head of his army just after the battle of Arbela;             
which upon a notion of the Governor's finger immediately appeared in a      
large field under the window where we stood. Alexander was called up        
into the room; it was with great difficulty that I understood his           
Greek, and had but little of my own. He assured me upon his honor that      
he was not poisoned, but died of a fever by excessive drinking.             
  Next I saw Hannibal passing the Alps, who told me he had not a            
drop of vinegar in his camp.                                                
  I saw Caesar and Pompey at the head of their troops, just ready to        
engage. I saw the former in his last great triumph. I desired that the      
senate of Rome might appear before me in one large chamber, and an          
assembly of somewhat a latter age in counterview in another. The first      
seemed to be an assembly of heroes and demigods; the other a knot of        
pedlars, pickpockets, highway-men, and bullies.                             
  The Governor at my request gave the sign for Caesar and Brutus to         
advance towards us. I was struck with a profound veneration at the          
sight of Brutus, and could easily discover the most consummate virtue,      
the greatest intrepidity and firmness of mind, the truest love of           
his country, and general benevolence for mankind in every lineament of      
his countenance. I observed with much pleasure that these two               
persons were in good intelligence with each other, and Caesar freely        
confessed to me that the greatest actions of his own life were not          
equal by many degrees to the glory of taking it away. I had the             
honor to have much conversation with Brutus; and was told, that his         
ancestor Junius, Socrates, Epaminondas, Cato the younger, Sir Thomas        
More, and himself were perpetually together: a sextumvirate to which        
all the ages of the world cannot add a seventh.                             
                                                    {P_3|CH_7 ^paragraph 10}
  It would be tedious to trouble the reader with relating what vast         
numbers of illustrious persons were called up, to gratify that              
insatiable desire I had to see the world in every period of                 
antiquity placed before me. I chiefly fed my eyes with beholding the        
destroyers of tyrants and usurpers, and the restorers of liberty to         
oppressed and injured nations. But it is impossible to express the          
satisfaction I received in my own mind, after such a manner as to make      
it a suitable entertainment to the reader.                                  
                                                                            
P_3|CH_8                                                                    
  CHAPTER VIII                                                              
-                                                                           
  Having a desire to see those ancients who were most renowned for wit      
and learning, I set apart one day on purpose. I proposed that Homer         
and Aristotle might appear at the head of all their commentators;           
but these were so numerous that some hundreds were forced to attend in      
the court and outward rooms of the palace. I knew and could                 
distinguish those two heroes at first sight, not only from the crowd        
but from each other. Homer was the taller and comelier person of the        
two, walked very erect for one of his age, and his eyes were the            
most quick and piercing I ever beheld. Aristotle stooped much, and          
made use of a staff. His visage was meager, his hair lank and thin,         
and his voice hollow. I soon discovered that both of were perfect           
strangers to the rest of the company, and had never seen or heard of        
them before. And I had a whisper from a ghost, who shall be                 
nameless, that these commentators always kept in the most distant           
quarters from their principals in the lower world, through a                
consciousness of shame and guilt, because they had so horribly              
misrepresented the meaning of those authors to posterity. I introduced      
Didymus and Eustathius to Homer, and prevailed on him to treat them         
better than perhaps they deserved; for he soon found they wanted a          
genius to enter into the spirit of a poet. But Aristotle was out of         
all patience with the account I gave him of Scotus and Ramus, as I          
presented them to him; and he asked them whether the rest of the tribe      
were as great dunces as themselves.                                         
  I then desired the Governor to call up Descartes and Gassendi,            
with whom I prevailed to explain their systems to Aristotle. This           
great philosopher freely acknowledged his own mistakes in natural           
philosophy, because he proceeded in many things upon conjecture, as         
all men must do; and he found, that Gassendi, who had made the              
doctrine of Epicurus as palatable as he could, and the vortices of          
Descartes, were equally exploded. He predicted the same fate to             
attraction, whereof the present learned are such zealous asserters. He      
said that new systems of nature were but new fashions, which would          
vary in every age; and even those who pretend to demonstrate them from      
mathematical principles, would flourish but a short period of time,         
and be out of vogue when that was determined.                               
  I spent five days in conversing with many others of the ancient           
learned. I saw most of the first Roman emperors. I prevailed on the         
Governor to call up Eliogabalus's cooks to dress us a dinner, but they      
could not show us much of their skill, for want of materials. A             
helot of Agesilaus made us a dish of Spartan broth, but I was not able      
to get down a second spoonful.                                              
  The two gentlemen who conducted me to the island were pressed by          
their private affairs to return in three days, which I employed in          
seeing some of the modern dead, who had made the greatest figure for        
two or three hundred years past in our own and other countries of           
Europe; and having been always a great admirer of old illustrious           
families, I desired the Governor call up a dozen or two of kings            
with their ancestors in order for eight or nine generations. But my         
disappointment was grevious and unexpected. For instead of a long           
train with royal diadems, I saw in one family two fiddlers, three           
spruce courtiers, and an Italian prelate. In another, a barber, an          
abbot, and two cardinals. I have too great a veneration for crowned         
heads to dwell any longer on so nice a subject. But as to counts,           
marquesses, dukes, earls, and the like, I was not so scrupulous. And I      
confess it was not without some pleasure that I found myself able to        
trace the particular features, by which certain families are                
distinguished, up to their originals. I could plainly discover from         
whence one family derives a long chin, why a second has abounded            
with knaves for two generations, and fools for two more; why a third        
happened to be crack-brained, and a fourth to be sharpers. Whence it        
came what Polydore Virgil says of a certain great house, Nec vir            
fortis, nec femina casta. How cruelty, falsehood, and cowardice grew        
to be characteristics by which certain families are distinguished as        
much as by their coat of arms. Who first brought the pox into a             
noble house, which has lineally descended in scrofulous tumors to           
their posterity. Neither could I wonder at all this, when I saw such        
an interruption of lineages by pages, lackeys, valets, coachmen,            
gamesters, captains and pickpockets.                                        
  I was chiefly disgusted with modern history. For having strictly          
examined all the persons of greatest name in the courts of princes for      
a hundred years past, I found how the world had been misled by              
prostitute writers, to ascribe the greatest exploits in war to              
cowards, the wisest counsel to fools, sincerity to flatterers, Roman        
virtue to betrayers of their country, piety to atheists, chastity to        
sodomites, informers. How many innocent and excellent persons had been      
condemned to death or banishment, by the practising of great ministers      
upon the corruption of judges, and the malice of factions. How many         
villains had been exalted to the highest places of trust, power,            
dignity, and profit: how great a share in the motions and events of         
courts, councils, and senates might be challenged by bawds, whores,         
pimps, parasites, and buffoons. How low an opinion I had of human           
wisdom and integrity, when I was truly informed of the springs and          
motives of great enterprises and revolutions in the world, and of           
the contemptible accidents to which they owed their success.                
                                                     {P_3|CH_8 ^paragraph 5}
  Here I discovered the roguery and ignorance of those who pretend          
to write anecdotes, or secret history, who send so many kings to their      
graves with a cup of poison; will repeat the discourse between a            
prince and chief minister, where no witness was by; unlock the              
thoughts and cabinets of ambassadors and secretaries of state, and          
have the perpetual misfortune to be mistaken. Here I discovered the         
secret causes of many great events that have surprised the world,           
how a whore can govern the backstairs, the backstairs a council, and        
the council a senate. A general confessed in my presence, that he           
got a victory purely by the force of cowardice and ill conduct; and an      
admiral, that for want of proper intelligence, he beat the enemy to         
whom he intended to betray the fleet. Three kings protested to me,          
that in their whole reigns they never did once prefer any person of         
merit, unless by mistake or treachery of some minister in whom they         
confided; neither would they do it if they were to live again; and          
they showed with great strength of reason that the royal throne             
could not be supported without corruption, because that positive,           
confident, restive temper, which virtue infused into man, was a             
perpetual clog to public business.                                          
  I had the curiosity to enquire in a particular manner, by what            
method great numbers had procured to themselves high titles of              
honor, and prodigious estates; and I confined my inquiry to a very          
modern period; however, without grating upon present times, because         
I would be sure to give no offense even to foreigners (for I hope           
the reader need not be told that I do not in the least intend my own        
country in what I say upon this occasion), a great number of persons        
concerned were called up, and upon a very slight examination,               
discovered such a scene of infamy, that I cannot reflect upon it            
without some seriousness. Perjury, oppression, subornation, fraud,          
panderism, and the like infirmities, were amongst the most excusable        
arts they had to mention, and for these I gave, as it was                   
reasonable, great allowance. But when some confessed they owed their        
greatness and wealth to sodomy or incest, others to the prostituting        
of their own wives and daughters; others to the betraying of their          
country or their prince; some to poisoning, more to the perverting          
of justice in order to destroy the innocent; I hope I may be                
pardoned if these discoveries inclined me little to abate of that           
profound veneration which I am naturally apt to pay to persons of high      
rank, who ought to be treated with the utmost respect due to their          
sublime dignity, by us their inferiors.                                     
  I had often read of some great services done to princes and               
states, and desired to see the persons by whom those services were          
performed. Upon inquiry I was told that their names were to be found        
on no record, except a few of them whom history has represented as the      
vilest rogues and traitors. As to the rest, I had never once heard          
of them. They all appeared with dejected looks, and in the meanest          
habit, most of them telling me they died in poverty and disgrace,           
and the rest on a scaffold or a gibbet.                                     
  Among the rest there was one person whose case appeared a little          
singular. He had a youth about eighteen years old standing by his           
side. He told me he had for many years been commander of a ship, and        
in the sea fight of Actium had the good fortune to break through the        
enemy's great line of battle, sink three of their capital ships, and        
take a fourth, which was the sole cause of Antony's flight, and of the      
victory that ensued; that the youth standing by him, his only son, was      
killed in action. He added that upon the confidence of some merit, the      
war being at an end, he went to Rome, and solicited at the court of         
Augustus to be preferred to a greater ship, whose commander had been        
killed; but without any regard to his pretensions, it was given to a        
youth who had never seen the sea, the son of Libertine, who waited          
on one of the emperor's mistresses. Returning back to his own               
vessel, he was charged with neglect of duty, and the ship given to a        
favorite page of Publicola, the vice-admiral; whereupon he retired          
to a poor farm at a great distance from Rome, and there ended his           
life. I was so curious to know the truth of this story, that I desired      
Agrippa might be called, who was admiral in that fight. He appeared,        
and confirmed the whole account, but with much more advantage to the        
captain, whose modesty had extenuated or concealed a great part of his      
merit.                                                                      
  I was surprised to find corruption grown so high and so quick in          
that empire, by the force of luxury so lately introduced, which made        
me less wonder at many parallel cases in other countries, where             
vices of all kinds have reigned so much longer, and where the whole         
praise as well as pillage has been engrossed by the chief commander,        
who perhaps had the least title to either.                                  
                                                    {P_3|CH_8 ^paragraph 10}
  As every person called up made exactly the same appearance he had         
done in the world, it gave me melancholy reflections to observe how         
much the race of human kind was degenerate among us, within these           
hundred years past. How the pox under all its consequences and              
denominations had altered every lineament of an English countenance,        
shortened the size of bodies, unbraced the nerves, relaxed the              
sinews and muscles, introduced a sallow complexion, and rendered the        
flesh loose and rancid.                                                     
  I descended so low as to desire that some English yeomen of the           
old stamp might be summoned to appear, once so famous for the               
simplicity of their manners, diet and dress, for justice in their           
dealings, for their true spirit of liberty, for their valor and love        
of their country. Neither could I be wholly unmoved after comparing         
the living with the dead, when I considered how all these pure              
native virtues were prostituted for a piece of money by their               
grandchildren, who in selling their votes, and managing at                  
elections, have acquired every vice and corruption that can possibly        
be learned in a court.                                                      
                                                                            
P_3|CH_9                                                                    
  CHAPTER IX                                                                
-                                                                           
  The day of our departure being come, I took leave of his Highness         
the Governor of Glubbdubdrib, and returned with my two companions to        
Maldonada, where after a fortnight's waiting, a ship was ready to sail      
for Luggnagg. The two gentlemen, and some others, were so generous and      
kind as to furnish me with provisions, and see me on board. I was a         
month in this voyage. We had one violent storm and were under a             
necessity of steering westward to get into the tradewind, which             
holds for above sixty leagues. On the 21st of April, 1709, we sailed        
into the river of Clumegnig, which is a seaport town, at the southeast      
point of Luggnagg. We cast anchor within a league of the town, and          
made a signal for a pilot. Two of them came on board in less than half      
an hour, by whom we were guided between certain shoals and rocks,           
which are very dangerous in the passage, to a large basin, where fleet      
may ride in safety within a cable's length of the town wall.                
  Some of our sailors, whether out of treachery or inadvertence, had        
informed the pilots that I was a stranger and a traveler, whereof           
these gave notice to a custom house officer, by whom I was examined         
very strictly upon my landing. This officer spoke to me in the              
language of Balnibarbi, which by the force of much commerce is              
generally understood in that town, especially by seamen, and those          
employed in the customs. I gave him a short account of some                 
particulars, and made my story as plausible and consistent as I             
could; but I thought it necessary to disguise my country, and call          
myself an Hollander, because my intentions were for Japan, and I knew       
the Dutch were the only Europeans permitted to enter into that              
kingdom. I therefore told the officer, that having been shipwrecked         
on the coast of Balnibarbi, and cast on a rock, I was received up           
into Laputa, or the Flying Island (of which he had often heard), and        
was now endeavoring to get to Japan, from whence I might find a             
convenience of returning to my own country. The officer said I must         
be confined till he could receive orders from court, for which he           
would write immediately, and hoped to receive an answer in a                
fortnight. I was carried to a convenient lodging, with a sentry             
placed at the door; however I had the liberty of a large garden, and        
was treated with humanity enough, being maintained all the time at          
the King's charge. I was visited by several persons, chiefly out of         
curiosity, because it was reported that I came from countries very          
remote of which they had never heard.                                       
  I hired a young man who came in the same ship to be an                    
interpreter; he was a native of Luggnagg, but had lived some years          
at Maldonada, and was a perfect master of both languages. By his            
assistance I was able to hold a conversation with those who came to         
visit me; but this consisted only of their questions, and my answers.       
  The dispatch came from court about the time we expected. It               
contained a warrant for conducting me and my retinue to Traldragdubb        
or Trildrogdrib, for it is pronounced both ways as near as I can            
remember, by a party of ten horse. All my retinue was that poor lad         
for an interpreter, whom I persuaded into my service, and at my humble      
request, we had each of us a mule to ride on. A messenger was               
dispatched half a day's journey before us, to give the King notice          
of my approach, and to desire that his Majesty would please appoint         
a day and hour, when it would be his gracious pleasure that I might         
have the honor to lick the dust before his footstool. This is the           
court style, and I found it to be more than matter of form. For upon        
my admittance two days after my arrival, I was commanded to crawl on        
my belly, and lick the floor as I advanced; but on account of my being      
a stranger, care was taken to have it made so clean that the dust           
was not offensive. However, this was a peculiar grace, not allowed          
to any but persons of the highest rank, when they desire an                 
admittance. Nay, sometimes the floor is strewn with dust on purpose,        
when the person to be admitted happens to have powerful enemies at          
court. And I have seen a great lord with his mouth so crammed, that         
when he had crept to the proper distance from the throne, he was not        
able to speak a word. Neither is there any remedy, because it is            
capital for those who receive an audience to spit or wipe their mouths      
in his Majesty's presence. There is indeed another custom, which I          
cannot altogether approve of. When the king has a mind to put any of        
his nobles to death in a gentle indulgent manner, he commands to            
have the floor strewn with a certain brown powder, of a deadly              
composition, which being licked up infallibly kills him in twenty-four      
hours. But in justice to this prince's great clemency, and the care he      
has of his subject's lives (wherein it were much to be wished that the      
monarchs of Europe would imitate him), it must be mentioned for his         
honor, that strict orders are given to have the infected parts of           
the floor well after every such execution; which if his domestics           
neglect, they are in danger of incurring his royal displeasure. I           
myself heard him give directions, that one of his pages should be           
whipped, whose turn it was to give notice about washing the floor           
after an execution, but maliciously had omitted it; by which neglect a      
young lord of great hopes coming to an audience, was unfortunately          
poisoned, although the King at that time had not design against his         
life. But this good prince was so gracious as to forgive the poor page      
his whipping, upon promise that he would do so no more, without             
special orders.                                                             
  To return from this digression; when I had crept within four yards        
of the throne, I raised myself gently upon my knees, and then striking      
my forehead seven times on the ground, I pronounced the following           
words, as they had been taught me the night before, Ickpling                
gloffthrobb squutserumm blhiop mlashnalt zwin tnodbalkguffh                 
slhiophad gurdlubh asht. This is the compliment established by the          
laws of the land for all persons admitted to the King's presence. It        
may be rendered into English thus: May your Celestial Majesty               
outlive the sun, eleven moons and a half. To this the King returned         
some answer, which although I could not understand, yet I replied as I      
had been directed: Fluft drin yalerick dwuldom prastrad mirpush, which      
properly signifies, My tongue is in the mouth of my friend, and by          
this expression was meant that I desired leave to bring my                  
interpreter; whereupon the young man already mentioned was accordingly      
introduced, by whose intervention I answered as many questions as           
his Majesty could put in over an hour. I spoke in the Balnibarbian          
tongue, and my interpreter delivered my meaning in that of Luggnagg.        
                                                     {P_3|CH_9 ^paragraph 5}
  The King was much delighted with my company, and ordered his              
Bliffmarklub or High Chamberlain, to appoint a lodging in the court         
for me and my interpreter, with a daily allowance for my table, and         
a large purse of gold for my common expenses.                               
  I stayed three months in this country out of perfect obedience to         
his Majesty, who was pleased highly to favor me, and made me very           
honorable offers. But I thought it more consistent with prudence and        
justice to pass the remainder of my days with my wife and family.           
                                                                            
P_3|CH_10                                                                   
  CHAPTER X                                                                 
-                                                                           
  The Luggnaggians are a polite and generous people, and although they      
are not without some share of that pride which is peculiar to all           
Eastern countries, yet they show themselves courteous to strangers,         
especially such who are countenanced by the court. I had many               
acquaintance among persons of the best fashion, and being always            
attended by my interpreter, the conversation we had was not                 
disagreeable.                                                               
  One day in much good company I was asked by a person of quality,          
whether I had seen any of their Struldbrugs, or Immortals. I said I         
had not, and desired he would explain to me what he meant by such an        
appellation applied to a mortal creature. He told me, that                  
sometimes, though very rarely, a child happened to be born in a family      
with a red circular spot in the forehead, directly over the left            
eyebrow, which was an infallible mark that it should never die. The         
spot, as he described it, was about the compass of a silver                 
threepence, but in the course of time grew larger, and changed its          
color; for at twelve years old it became green, so continued till           
twenty-five, then turned to a deep blue; at forty-five it grew coal         
black, and as large as an English shilling, but never admitted any          
further alteration. He said these births were so rare, that he did not      
believe there could be above eleven hundred struldbrugs of both             
sexes in the whole kingdom, of which he computed about fifty in the         
metropolis, and among the rest a young girl born about three years          
ago. That these productions were not peculiar to any family, but a          
mere effect of chance; and the children of the struldbrugs                  
themselves were equally mortal with the rest of the people.                 
  I freely own myself to have been struck with inexpressible delight        
upon hearing this account, and the person who gave it me happening          
to understand the Balnibarbian language, which I spoke very well, I         
could not forbear breaking out into expressions perhaps a little too        
extravagant. I cried out as in a rapture: Happy nation where every          
child hath at least a chance for being immortal! Happy people who           
enjoy so many living examples of ancient virtue, and have masters           
ready to instruct them in the wisdom of all former ages! but, happiest      
beyond all comparison are those excellent struldbrugs, who being            
born exempt from that universal calamity of human nature, have their        
minds free and disengaged, without the weight and depression of             
spirits caused by the continual apprehension of death. I discovered my      
admiration that I had not observed any of these illustrious persons at      
court; the black spot on the forehead being so remarkable a                 
distinction, that I could not have easily overlooked and it was             
impossible that his Majesty, a most judicious prince, should not            
provide himself with a good number of such wise and able counselors.        
Yet perhaps the virtue of those reverend sages was too strict for           
the corrupt and libertine manners of a court. And we often find by          
experience that young men are too opinionative and volatile to be           
guided by the sober dictates of their seniors. However, since the King      
was pleased to allow me access to his royal person, I was resolved          
upon the very first occasion to deliver my opinion to him on this           
matter freely and at large, by the help of my interpreter; and whether      
he would please to take my advice or not, yet in one thing I was            
determined, that his Majesty having frequently offered me an                
establishment in this country, I would with great thankfulness              
accept the favor, and pass my life here in the conversation of those        
superior beings the struldbrugs, if they would please to admit me.          
  The gentleman to whom I addressed my discourse, because (as I have        
already observed) he spoke the language of Balnibarbi, said to me with      
a sort of a smile, which usually arises from pity to the ignorant,          
that he was glad of any occasion to keep me among them, and desired my      
permission to explain to the company what I had spoke. He did so,           
and they talked together for some time in their own language,               
whereof I understood not a syllable, neither could I observe by             
their countenances what impression my discourse had made on them.           
After a short silence, the same person told me that his friends and         
mine (so he thought fit to express himself) were very much pleased          
with the judicious remarks I had made on the great happiness and            
advantages of immortal life; and they were desirous to know in a            
particular manner, what scheme of living I should have formed to            
myself, if it had fallen to my lot to have been born a struldbrug.          
  I answered, it was easy to be eloquent on so copious and                  
delightful a subject, especially to me who have been often apt to           
amuse myself with visions of what I should do if I were a king, a           
general, or a great lord; and upon this very case I had frequently run      
over the whole system how I should employ myself and pass the time          
if I were sure to live for ever.                                            
                                                    {P_3|CH_10 ^paragraph 5}
  That if it had been my good fortune to come into the world a              
struldbrug, as soon as I could discover my own happiness by                 
understanding the difference between life and death, I would first          
resolve by an arts and methods whatsoever to procure myself riches. In      
the pursuit of which by thrift and management, I might reasonably           
expect, in about two hundred years to be the wealthiest man in the          
kingdom. In the second place, I would from my earliest youth apply          
myself to the study of arts and sciences, by which I should arrive          
in time to excell all others in learning. Lastly, I would carefully         
record every action and event of consequence that happened in the           
public, impartially draw the characters of the several successions          
of princes and great ministers of state, with my own observations on        
every point. I would exactly set down the several changes in                
customs, language, fashions of dress, diet and diversions. By all           
which acquirements, I should be a living treasury of knowledge and          
wisdom, and certainly become the oracle of the nation.                      
  I would never marry after threescore, but live in an hospitable           
manner, yet still on the saving side. I would entertain myself in           
forming and directing the minds of hopeful young men, by convincing         
them from my own remembrance, experience and observation, fortified by      
numerous examples, of the usefulness of virtue in public and private        
life. But my choice and constant companions should be a set of my           
own immortal brotherhood, among whom I would elect a dozen from the         
most ancient down to my own contemporaries. Where any of these              
wanted fortunes, I would provide them with convenient lodges round          
my own estate, and have some of them always at my table, only mingling      
a few of the most valuable among you mortals, whom length of time           
would harden me to lose with little or no reluctance, and treat your        
posterity after the same manner; just as a man diverts himself with         
the annual succession of pinks and tulips in his garden, without            
regretting the loss of those which withered the preceding year.             
  These struldbrugs and I would mutually communicate our                    
observations and memorials through the course of time, remark the           
several gradations by which corruption steals into the world, and           
oppose it in every step, by giving perpetual warning and instruction        
to mankind; which, added to the strong influence of our own example,        
would probably prevent that continual degeneracy of human nature so         
justly complained of in all ages.                                           
  Add to all this the pleasure of seeing the various revolutions of         
states and empires, the changes in the lower and upper world,               
ancient cities in ruins, and obscure villages become the seats of           
kings. Famous rivers lessening into shallow brooks, the ocean               
leaving one coast dry, and overwhelming another; the discovery of many      
countries yet unknown. Barbarity over-running the politest nations,         
and the most barbarous become civilized. I should then see the              
discovery of the longitude, the perpetual motion, the universal             
medicine, and many other great inventions brought to the utmost             
perfection.                                                                 
  What wonderful discoveries should we make in astronomy, by outliving      
and confirming our own predictions, by observing the progress and           
returns of comets, with the changes of motion in the sun, moon, and         
stars.                                                                      
                                                   {P_3|CH_10 ^paragraph 10}
  I enlarged upon many other topics, which the natural desire of            
endless life and sublunary happiness could easily furnish me with.          
When I had ended, and the sum of my discourse had been interpreted          
as before, to the rest of the company, there was a good deal of talk        
among them the language of the country, not without some laughter at        
my expense. At last the same gentleman who had been my interpreter          
said he was desired by the rest to set me right in a few mistakes,          
which I had fallen into through the common imbecility of human nature,      
and upon that allowance was less answerable for them. That this             
breed of struldbrugs was peculiar to their country, for there were          
no such people either in Balnibarbi or Japan, where he had the honor        
to be ambassador from his Majesty, and found the natives in both those      
kingdoms very hard to believe that the fact was possible; and it            
appeared from my astonishment when he first mentioned the matter to         
me, that I received it as a thing wholly new, and scarcely to be            
credited. That in the two kingdoms above mentioned, where during his        
residence he had conversed very much, he observed long life to be           
the universal desire and wish of mankind. That whoever had one foot in      
the grave was sure to hold back the other as strongly as he could.          
That the oldest had still hopes of living one day longer, and looked        
on death as the greatest evil, from which nature always prompted him        
to retreat; only in this island of Luggnagg the appetite for living         
was not so eager, from the continual example of the struldbrugs before      
their eyes.                                                                 
  That the system of living contrived by me was unreasonable and            
unjust, because it supposed a perpetuity of youth, health, and              
vigor, which no man could be so foolish to hope, however extravagant        
he may be in his wishes. That the question therefore was not whether a      
man would choose to be always in the prime of youth, attended with          
prosperity and health, but how he would pass a perpetual life under         
all the usual disadvantages which old age brings along with it. For         
although few men will avow their desires of being immortal upon such        
hard conditions, yet in the two kingdoms before mentioned of                
Balnibarbi and Japan, he observed that every man desired to put off         
death for some time longer, let it approach ever so late; and he            
rarely heard of any man who died willingly, except he were incited          
by the extremity of grief or torture. And he appealed to me whether in      
those countries I had traveled as well as my own, I had not observed        
the same general disposition.                                               
  After this preface he gave me a particular account of the                 
struldbrugs among them. He said they commonly acted like mortals, till      
about thirty years old, after which by degrees they grew melancholy         
and dejected, increasing in both till they came to fourscore. This          
he learned from their own confession; for otherwise there not being         
above two or three of that species born in an age, they were too few        
to form a general observation by. When they came to fourscore years,        
which is reckoned the extremity of living in this country, they had         
not only all the follies and infirmities of other old men, but many         
more which arose from the dreadful prospect of never dying. They            
were not only opinionative, peevish, covetous, morose, vain,                
talkative, but uncapable of friendship, and dead to all natural             
affection, which never descended below their grandchildren. Envy and        
impotent desires are their prevailing passions. But those objects           
against which their envy principally directed, are the vices of the         
younger sort, and the deaths of the old. By reflecting on the               
former, they find themselves cut off from all possibility of pleasure;      
and whenever they see a funeral, they lament and repine that others         
have gone to a harbor of rest, to which they themselves never can hope      
to arrive. They have no remembrance of anything but what they               
learned and observed in their youth and middle age, and even that is        
very imperfect. And for the truth or particulars of any fact, it is         
safer to depend on common traditions than upon their best                   
recollections. The least miserable among them appear to be those who        
turn to dotage, and entirely lose their memories; these meet with more      
pity and assistance, because they want many bad qualities which abound      
in others.                                                                  
  If a struldbrug happen to marry one of his own kind, the marriage         
is dissolved of course by the courtesy of the kingdom, as soon as           
the younger of the two comes to be fourscore. For the law thinks it         
a reasonable indulgence, that those who are condemned without any           
fault of their own to a perpetual continuance in the world, should not      
have their misery doubled by the load of a wife.                            
  As soon as they have completed the term of eighty years, they are         
looked on as dead in law; their heirs immediately succeed to their          
estates, only a small pittance is reserved for their support, and           
the poor ones are maintained at the public charge. After that period        
they are held incapable of any employment of trust or profit, they          
cannot purchase lands or take leases, neither are they allowed to be        
witnesses in any cause, either civil or criminal, not even for the          
decision of meers and bounds.                                               
                                                   {P_3|CH_10 ^paragraph 15}
  At ninety they lose their teeth and hair, they have at that age no        
distinction of taste, but eat and drink whatever they can get, without      
relish or appetite. The diseases they were subject to still continue        
without increasing or diminishing. In talking they forget the common        
appellation of things, and the names of persons, even of those who are      
their nearest friends and relations. For the same reason they never         
can amuse themselves with reading, because their memory will not serve      
to carry them from the beginning of a sentence to the end; and by this      
defect they are deprived of the only entertainment whereof they             
might otherwise be capable.                                                 
  The language of this country being always upon the flux, the              
struldbrugs of one age do not understand those of another, neither are      
they able after two hundred years to hold any conversation (farther         
than by a few general words) with their neighbors the mortals; and          
thus they lie under the disadvantage of living like foreigners in           
their own country.                                                          
  This was the account given me of the struldbrugs, as near as I can        
remember. I afterwards saw five or six of different ages, the youngest      
not above two hundred years old, who were brought to me at several          
times by some of my friends; but although they were told that I was         
a great traveler, and had seen all the world, they had not the least        
curiosity to ask me a question; only desired I would give them              
slumskudask, or a token of remembrance, which is a modest way of            
begging, to avoid the law that strictly forbids it, because they are        
provided for by the public, although indeed with a very scanty              
allowance.                                                                  
  They are despised and hated by all sorts of people; when one of them      
is born, it is reckoned ominous, and their birth is recorded very           
particularly; so that you may know their age by consulting the              
registry, which however hath not been kept above a thousand years           
past, or at least hath been destroyed by time or public                     
disturbances. But the usual way of computing how old they are, is by        
asking them what kings or great persons they can remember, and then         
consulting history, for infallibly the last prince in their mind did        
not begin his reign after they were fourscore years old.                    
  They were the most mortifying sight I ever beheld, and the women          
more horrible than the men. Besides the usual deformities in extreme        
old age, they acquired an additional ghastliness in proportion to           
their number of years, which is not to be described; and among half         
a dozen, I soon distinguished which was the eldest, although there          
were not above a century or two between them.                               
                                                   {P_3|CH_10 ^paragraph 20}
  The reader will easily believe, that from what I had heard and seen,      
my keen appetite for perpetuity of life was much abated. I grew             
heartily ashamed of the pleasing visions I had formed, and thought          
no tyrant could invent a death into which I would not run with              
pleasure from such a life. The king heard of all that had passed            
between me and my friends upon this occasion, and rallied me very           
pleasantly, wishing I would send a couple of struldbrugs to my own          
country, to arm our people against the fear of death; but this it           
seems is forbidden by the fundamental laws of the kingdom, or else I        
should have been well content with the trouble and expense of               
transporting them.                                                          
  I could not but agree that the laws of this kingdom relating to           
the struldbrugs, were founded upon the strongest reasons, and such          
as any other country would be under the necessity of enacting in the        
like circumstances. Otherwise, as avarice is the necessary                  
consequent of old age, those immortals would in time become                 
proprietors of the whole nation, and engross the civil power, which,        
for want of abilities to manage, must end in the ruin of the public.        
                                                                            
P_3|CH_11                                                                   
  CHAPTER XI                                                                
-                                                                           
  I thought this account of the Struldbrugs might be some                   
entertainment to the reader, because it seems to be a little out of         
the common way, at least I do not remember to have met the like in any      
book of travels that has come to my hands; and if I am deceived, my         
excuse must be, that it is necessary for travelers, who describe the        
same country, very often to agree in dwelling on the same particulars,      
without deserving the censure of having borrowed or transcribed from        
those who wrote before them.                                                
  There is indeed a perpetual commerce between this kingdom and the         
great empire of Japan, and it is very probable that the Japanese            
authors may have given some account of the struldbrugs; but my stay in      
Japan was so short, and I was so entirely a stranger to that language,      
that I was not qualified to make any inquiries. But I hope the Dutch        
upon this notice will be curious and able enough to supply my defects.      
  His Majesty having often pressed me to accept some employment in his      
court, and finding me absolutely determined to return to my native          
country, was pleased to give me his license to depart, and honored          
me with a letter of recommendation under his own hand to the Emperor        
of Japan. He likewise presented me with four hundred and forty-four         
large pieces of gold (this nation delighting in even numbers), and a        
red diamond which I sold in England for eleven hundred pounds.              
  On the 6th day of May, 1709 I took a solemn leave of his Majesty and      
all my friends. This prince was so gracious as to order a guard to          
conduct me Glanguenstald, which is a royal port to the southwest            
part of the island. In six days I found a vessel ready to carry me          
to Japan, and spent fifteen days in the voyage. We landed at a small        
port town called Xamoschi, situated on the southeast part of Japan;         
the town lies on the western point, where there is a narrow strait,         
leading northward into a long arm of the sea, upon the northwest            
part of which, Yedo the metropolis stands. At landing, I showed the         
custom house officers my letter from the King of Luggnagg to his            
Imperial Majesty. They knew the seal perfectly well; it was as broad        
as the palm of my hand. The impression was, a King lifting up a lame        
beggar from the earth. The magistrates of the town hearing of my            
letter, received me as a public minister. They provided me with             
carriages and servants, and bore my charges to Yedo, where I was            
admitted to an audience, and delivered my letter, which was opened          
with great ceremony, and explained to the Emperor by an interpreter,        
who then gave me notice by his Majesty's order, that I should               
signify my request, and, whatever it were, it should be granted for         
the sake of his royal brother of Luggnagg. This interpreter was a           
person employed to transact affairs with the Hollanders; he soon            
conjectured by my countenance that I was a European, and therefore          
repeated his Majesty's commands in Low Dutch, which he spoke perfectly      
well. I answered (as I had before determined) that I was a Dutch            
merchant, shipwrecked in a very remote country, from whence I traveled      
by sea and land to Luggnagg, and then took shipping for Japan, where I      
knew my countrymen often traded, and with some of these I hoped to get      
an opportunity of returning into Europe: I therefore most humbly            
entreated his royal favor, to give order that I should be conducted in      
safety to Nangasac. To this I added another petition, that for the          
sake of my patron the King of Luggnagg, his Majesty would condescend        
to excuse my performing the ceremony imposed on my countrymen, of           
trampling upon the crucifix, because I had been thrown into his             
kingdom by my misfortunes, without any intention of trading. When this      
latter petition was interpreted to the Emperor, he seemed a little          
surprised, and said he believed I was the first of my countrymen who        
ever made any scruple in this point, and that he began to doubt             
whether I was a real Hollander or not, but rather suspected I must          
be a Christian. However, for the reasons I had offered, but chiefly to      
gratify the King of Luggnagg by an uncommon mark of his favor, he           
would comply with the singularity of my humor; but the affair must          
be managed with dexterity, and his officers should be commanded to let      
me pass as it were by forgetfulness. For he assured me, that if the         
secret should be discovered by my countrymen the Dutch, they would cut      
my throat in the voyage. I returned my thanks by the interpreter for        
so unusual a favor, and some troops being at that time on their             
march to Nangasac, the commanding officer had orders to convey me safe      
thither, with particular instructions about the business of the             
crucifix.                                                                   
  On the 9th day of June, 1709, I arrived at Nangasac, after a very         
long and troublesome journey. I soon fell into the company of some          
Dutch sailors belonging to the Amboyna, of Amsterdam, a stout ship          
of 450 tons. I had lived long in Holland, pursuing my studies at            
Leyden, and I spoke Dutch well. The seamen soon knew from whence I          
came last: they were curious to inquire into my voyages and course          
of life. I made up a story as short and probable as I could, but            
concealed the greatest part. I knew many persons in Holland; I was          
able to invent names for my parents, whom I pretended to be obscure         
people in the province of Gelderland. I would have given the captain        
(one Theodorus Vangrult) what he pleased to ask for my voyage to            
Holland; but understanding I was a surgeon, he was contented to take        
half the usual rate, on condition that I would serve him in the way of      
my calling. Before we took shipping, I was often asked by some of           
the crew whether I had performed the ceremony above mentioned. I            
evaded the question by general answers, that I had satisfied the            
Emperor and court in all particulars. However, a malicious rogue of         
a skipper went to an officer, and pointing to me, told him I had not        
yet trampled on the crucifix: but the other, who had received               
instructions to let me pass, gave the rascal twenty strokes on the          
shoulders with a bamboo, after which I was no more troubled with            
such questions.                                                             
                                                    {P_3|CH_11 ^paragraph 5}
  Nothing happened worth mentioning in this voyage. We sailed with a        
fair wind to the Cape of Good Hope, where we stayed only to take in         
fresh water. On the 10th of April we arrived safe at Amsterdam, having      
lost only three men by sickness in the voyage, and a fourth who fell        
from the foremast into the sea, not far from the coast of Guinea. From      
Amsterdam I soon after set sail for England in a small vessel               
belonging to that city.                                                     
  On the 16th of April, 1710, we put in at the Downs. I landed the          
next morning, and saw once more my native country after an absence          
of five years and six months complete. I went straight to Redriff,          
where I arrived the same day at two in the afternoon, and found my          
wife and family in good health.                                             
-                                                                           
               THE END OF THE THIRD PART                                    
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                    PART IV                                 
                                                                            
                           A VOYAGE TO THE HOUYHNHNMS                       
                                                                            
                                                                            
                                  (SEE PLATE 6)                             
                                                                            
P_4|CH_1                                                                    
  CHAPTER I                                                                 
-                                                                           
  I continued at home with my wife and children about five months in a      
very happy condition, if I could have learned the lesson of knowing         
when I was well. I left my poor wife big with child, and accepted an        
advantageous offer made me to be Captain of the Adventure, a stout          
merchantman of 350 tons: for I understood navigation well, and being        
grown weary of a surgeon's employment at sea, which however I could         
exercise upon occasion, I took a skillful young man of that calling,        
one Robert Purefoy, into my ship. We set sail from Portsmouth upon the      
seventh day of August, 1710; on the fourteenth we met with Captain          
Pocock of Bristol, at Teneriffe, who was going to the bay of Campechy,      
to cut logwood. On the sixteenth he was parted from us by a storm; I        
heard since my return that his ship foundered, and none escaped but         
one cabin boy. He was an honest man, and a good sailor, but a little        
too positive in his own opinions, which was the cause of his                
destruction, as it has been of several others. For if he had                
followed my advice, he might have been safe at home with his family at      
this time, as well as myself.                                               
  I had several men die in my ship of calentures, so that I was forced      
to get recruits out of Barbadoes, and the Leeward Islands, where I          
touched by the direction of the merchants who employed me, which I had      
soon too much cause to repent: for I found afterwards that most of          
them had been buccaneers. I had fifty hands on board, and my orders         
were that I should trade with the Indians in the South Sea, and make        
what discoveries I could. These rogues whom I had picked up                 
debauched my other men, and they all formed a conspiracy to seize           
the ship and secure me; which they did one morning, rushing into my         
cabin, and binding me hand and foot, threatening to throw me                
overboard, if I offered to stir. I told them I was their prisoner           
and would submit. This they made me swear to do, and then they unbound      
me, only fastening one of my legs with a chain near my bed, and placed      
a sentry at my door with his piece charged, who was commanded to shoot      
me dead, if I attempted my liberty. They sent me down victuals and          
drink, and took the government of the ship to themselves. Their design      
was to turn pirates, and plunder the Spaniards, which they could not        
do, till they got more men. But first they resolved to sell the             
goods in the ship, and then go to Madagascar for recruits, several          
among them having died since my confinement. They sailed many weeks,        
and traded with the Indians, but I knew not what course they took,          
being kept a close prisoner in my cabin, and expecting nothing less         
than to be murdered, as they often threatened me.                           
  Upon the ninth day of May, 1711, one James Welch came down to my          
cabin; and said he had orders from the Captain to set me ashore. I          
expostulated with him but in vain; neither would he so much as tell me      
who their new Captain was. They forced me into the longboat, letting        
me put on my best suit of clothes, which were as good as new, and a         
small bundle of linen, but no arms except my hanger; and they were          
so civil as not to search my pockets, into which I conveyed what money      
I had, with some other little necessaries. They rowed about a               
league, and then set me down on a strand. I desired them to tell me         
what country it was. They all swore they knew no more than myself, but      
said that the Captain (as they called him) was resolved, after they         
had sold the lading, to get rid of me in the first place where they         
could discover land. They pushed off immediately, advising me to            
make haste, for fear of being overtaken by the tide, and so bade me         
farewell.                                                                   
  In this desolate condition I advanced forward, and soon got upon          
ground, where I sat down on a bank to rest myself, and consider what I      
had best do. When I was a little refreshed I went up into the country,      
resolving to deliver myself to the first savages I should meet, and         
purchase my life from them by some bracelets, glass rings, and other        
toys which sailors usually provide themselves with in those voyages,        
and whereof I had some about me. The land was divided by long rows          
of trees, not regularly planted, but naturally growing; there was           
plenty of grass, and several fields of oats. I walked very                  
circumspectly for fear of being surprised, or suddenly shot with an         
arrow from behind or on either side. I fell into a beaten road,             
where I saw many tracks of human feet, and some of cows, but most of        
horses. At last I beheld several animals in a field, and one or two of      
the same kind sitting in trees. Their shape was very singular and           
deformed, which a little discomposed me, so that I lay down behind a        
thicket to observe them better. Some of them coming forward near the        
place where I lay, gave me an opportunity of distinctly marking             
their form. Their heads and breasts were covered with a thick hair,         
some frizzled and others lank; they had beards like goats, and a            
long ridge of hair down their backs and the foreparts of their legs         
and feet, but the rest of their bodies were bare, so that I might           
see their skins, which were of a brown buff color. They had no              
tails, nor any hair at all on their buttocks, except about the anus;        
which, I presume, nature had placed there to defend them as they sat        
on the ground; for this posture they used, as well as lying down and        
often stood on their hind feet. They climbed high trees, as nimbly          
as a squirrel, for they had strong extended claws before and behind,        
terminating in sharp points, and hooked. They would often spring and        
bound and leap with prodigious agility. The females were not so             
large as the males; they had long lank hair on their heads, but none        
on their faces, nor anything more than a sort of down on the rest of        
their bodies, except about the anus, and pudenda. Their dugs hung           
between their forefeet, and often reached almost to the ground as they      
walked. The hair of both sexes was of several colors, brown, red,           
black, and yellow. Upon the whole, I never beheld in all my travels so      
disagreeable an animal, nor one against which I naturally conceived so      
strong an antipathy. So that thinking I had seen enough, full of            
contempt and aversion, I got up and pursued the beaten road, hoping it      
might direct me to the cabin of some Indian. I had not got far when         
I met one of these creatures full in my way, and coming up directly to      
me. The ugly monster, when he saw me, distorted several ways every          
feature of his visage, and stared as at an object he had never seen         
before; then approaching nearer, lifted up his forepaw, whether out of      
curiosity or mischief, I could not tell. But I drew my hanger, and          
gave him a good blow with the flat side of it, for I dare not strike        
him with the edge, fearing the inhabitants might be provoked against        
me, if they should come to know that I had killed or maimed any of          
their cattle. When the beast felt the smart, he drew back, and              
roared so loud that a herd of at least forty came flocking about me         
from the next field, howling and making odious faces; but I ran to the      
body of a tree, and leaning my back against it, kept them off by            
waving my hanger. Several of this cursed brood getting hold of the          
branches behind, leaped up into the tree, from where they began to          
discharge their excrements on my head; however, I escaped pretty well,      
by sticking close to the stem of the tree, but was almost stifled with      
the filth, which fell about me on every side.                               
  In the midst of this distress, I observed them all to run away of         
a sudden as fast as they could, at which I ventured to leave the tree,      
and pursue the road, wondering what it was that could put them into         
this fright. But looking on my left hand, I saw a horse walking softly      
in the field; which my persecutors having sooner discovered, was the        
cause of their flight. The horse started a little when he came near         
me, but soon recovering himself, looked full in my face with                
manifest tokens of wonder; he viewed my hands and feet, walking             
round me several times. I would have pursued my journey, but he placed      
himself directly in the way, yet looking with a very mild aspect,           
never offering the least violence. We stood gazing at each other for        
some time; at last I took the boldness to reach my hand towards his         
neck, with a design to stroke it, using the common style and whistle        
of jockeys when they are going to handle a strange horse. But this          
animal seeming to receive my civilities with disdain, shook his             
head, and bent his brows, softly raising up his right forefoot to           
remove my hand. Then he neighed three or four times, but in so              
different a cadence, that I almost began to think he was speaking to        
himself in some language of his own.                                        
                                                     {P_4|CH_1 ^paragraph 5}
  While he and I were thus employed, another horse came up; who             
applying himself to the first in a very formal manner, they gently          
struck each other's right hoof before, neighing several times by            
turns, and varying the sound, which seemed to be almost articulate.         
They went some paces off, as if it were to confer together, walking         
side by side, backward and forward, like persons deliberating upon          
some affair of weight, but often turning their eyes towards me, as          
it were to watch that I might not escape. I was amazed to see such          
actions and behavior in brute beasts, and concluded with myself,            
that if the inhabitants of this country were endued with a                  
proportionable degree of reason, they must needs be the wisest              
people upon earth. This thought gave me so much comfort, that I             
resolved to go forward until I could discover some house or village,        
or meet with any of the natives, leaving the two horses to discourse        
together as they pleased. But the first, who was a dapple gray,             
observing me to steal off, neighed after me in so expressive a tone,        
that I fancied myself to understand what he meant; whereupon I              
turned back, and came near him, to expect his farther commands, but         
concealing my fear as much as I could, for I began to be in some pain,      
how this adventure might terminate; and the reader will easily believe      
I did not much like my present situation.                                   
  The two horses came up close to me, looking with great earnestness        
upon my face and hands. The gray steed rubbed my hat all round with         
his right forehoof, and discomposed it so much that I was forced to         
adjust it better, by taking it off, and settling it again; whereat          
both he and his companion (who was a brown bay) appeared to be much         
surprised; the latter felt the lappet of my coat, and finding it to         
hang loose about me, they both looked with new signs of wonder. He          
stroked my right hand, seeming to admire the softness and color; but        
he squeezed it so hard between his hoof and his pastern, that I was         
forced to roar; after which they both touched me with all possible          
tenderness. They were under great perplexity about my shoes and             
stockings, which they felt very often, neighing to each other, and          
using various gestures, not unlike those of a philosopher, when he          
would attempt to solve some new and difficult phenomenon.                   
  Upon the whole, the behavior of these animals was so orderly and          
rational, so acute and judicious, that I at last concluded they must        
needs be magicians, who had thus metamorphosed themselves upon some         
design, and seeing a stranger the way, were resolved to divert              
themselves with him; or perhaps were really amazed at the sight of a        
man so very different in habit, feature, and complexion from those who      
might probably live so remote a climate. Upon the strength of this          
reasoning, I ventured to address them in the following manner:              
Gentlemen, if you be conjurers, as I have good cause to believe, you        
can understand any language; therefore I make bold to let your              
worships know that I am a poor distressed Englishman, driven by his         
misfortunes upon your coast, and I entreat one of you, to let me            
ride upon his back, as if he were a real horse, to some house or            
village where I can be relieved. In return of which favor I will            
make you a present of this knife and bracelet (taking them out of my        
pocket). The two creatures stood silent while I spoke, seeming to           
listen with great attention; and when I had ended, they neighed             
frequently towards each other, as if they were engaged in serious           
conversation. I plainly observed, that their language expressed the         
passions very well, and the words might with little pains be                
resolved into an alphabet more easily than the Chinese.                     
  I could frequently distinguish the word Yahoo, which was repeated by      
each of them several times; and although it was impossible for me to        
conjecture what it meant, yet while the two horses were busy in             
conversation, I endeavored to practice this word upon my tongue; and        
as soon as they were silent, I boldly pronounced Yahoo in a loud            
voice, imitating, at the same time, as near as I could, the neighing        
of a horse; at which they were both visibly surprised, and the gray         
repeated the same word twice, as if he meant to teach me the right          
accent, wherein I spoke after him as well as I could, and found myself      
perceivably to improve every time, though very far from any degree          
of perfection. Then the bay tried me with a second word, much harder        
to be pronounced; but reducing it to the English orthography, may be        
spelt thus, Houyhnhnm. I did not succeed in this so well as the             
former, but after two or three farther trials, I had better fortune;        
and they both appeared amazed at my capacity.                               
  After some further discourse, which I then conjectured might              
relate to me, the two friends took their leave, with the same               
compliment of striking each other's hoof; and the gray made me signs        
that I should walk before him, wherein I thought it prudent to comply,      
till I could find a better director. When I offered to slacken my           
pace, he would cry Hhuun, Hhuun; I guessed his meaning, and gave him        
to understand as well as I could, that I was weary, and not able to         
walk faster; upon which he would stand a while to let me rest.              
                                                                            
P_4|CH_2                                                                    
  CHAPTER II                                                                
-                                                                           
  Having traveled about three miles, we came to a long kind of              
building, made of timber stuck in the ground, and wattled across;           
the roof was low, and covered with straw. I now began to be a little        
comforted, and took out some toys, which travelers usually carry for        
presents to the savage Indians of America and other parts, in hopes         
the people of the house would be thereby encouraged to receive me           
kindly. The horse made me a sign to go in first; it was a large room        
with a smooth clay floor, and a rack and manger extending the whole         
length on one side. There were three nags, and two mares, not               
eating, but some of them sitting down upon their hams, which I very         
much wondered at; but wondered more to see the rest employed in             
domestic business. These seemed but ordinary cattle; however, this          
confirmed my first opinion, that a people who could so far civilize         
brute animals, must needs excel in wisdom all the nations of the            
world. The gray came in just after, and thereby prevented any ill           
treatment which the others might have given me. He neighed to them          
several times in a style of authority, and received answers.                
  Beyond this room there were three others, reaching the length of the      
house, to which you passed through three doors, opposite to each            
other, in the manner of a vista; we went through the second room            
towards the third; here the gray walked in first, beckoning me to           
attend: I waited in the second room, and got ready my presents for the      
master and mistress of the house: they were two knives, three               
bracelets of pearl, a small looking glass, and a bead necklace. The         
horse neighed three or four times, and I waited to hear some answers        
in a human voice, but I heard no other returns than in the same             
dialect, only one or two a little shriller than his. I began to             
think that this house must belong to some person of great note among        
them, because there appeared so much ceremony before I could gain           
admittance. But, that a man of quality should be served all by horses,      
was beyond my comprehension. I feared my brain was disturbed by my          
sufferings and misfortunes: I roused myself, and looked about me in         
the room where I was left alone; this was furnished like the first,         
only after a more elegant manner. I rubbed my eyes often, but the same      
objects still occurred. I pinched my arms and sides to awake myself,        
hoping I might be in a dream. then absolutely concluded, that all           
these appearances could be nothing else but necromancy and magic.           
But I had no time to pursue these reflections; for the gray horse came      
to the door, and made me a sign to follow him into the third room,          
where I saw a very comely mare, together with a colt and foal, sitting      
on their haunches, upon mats of straw, not unartfuUy made, and              
perfectly neat and clean.                                                   
  The mare soon after my entrance, rose from her mat, and coming up         
close, after having nicely observed my hands and face, gave me a            
most contemptuous look; then turning to the horse, I heard the word         
Yahoo often repeated betwixt them; the meaning of which word I could        
not then comprehend, although it were the first I had learned to            
pronounce; but I was soon better informed, to my everlasting                
mortification: for the horse beckoning to me with his head, and             
repeating the word Hhuun, Hhuun, as he did upon the road, which I           
understood was to attend him, led me out into a kind of court, where        
was another building at some distance from the house. Here we entered,      
and I saw three of these detestable creatures, whom I first met             
after my landing, feeding upon roots, and the flesh of some animals,        
which I afterwards found to be that of asses and dogs, and now and          
then a cow dead by accident or discase. were all tied by the neck with      
strong withes, fastened to a beam; they held their food between the         
claws of their forefeet, and tore it with their teeth.                      
  The master horse ordered a sorrel nag, one of his servants, to untie      
the largest of these animals, and take him into the yard. The beast         
and I were brought close together, and our countenances diligently          
compared, both by master and servant, who thereupon repeated several        
times the word Yahoo. My horror and astonishment are not to be              
described, when I observed in this abominable animal a perfect human        
figure: the face of it indeed was flat and broad, the nose                  
depressed, the lips large, and the mouth wide. But these differences        
are common to all savage nations, where the lineaments of the               
countenance are distorted by the natives suffering their infants to         
lie groveling on the earth, or by carrying them on their backs,             
nuzzling with their face against the mother's shoulders. The fore feet      
of the Yahoo differed from my hands in nothing else but the length          
of the nails, the coarseness and brownness of the palms, and the            
hairiness on the backs. There was the same resemblance between our          
feet, with the same differences, which I knew very well, though the         
horses did not, because of my shoes and stockings; the same in every        
part of our bodies, except as to hairiness and color, which I have          
already described.                                                          
  The great difficulty that seemed to stick with the two horses, was        
to see the rest of my body so very different from that of a Yahoo, for      
which I was obliged to my clothes whereof they had no conception.           
The sorrel nag offered me a root, which he held (after their manner,        
as we shall describe in its proper place) between his hoof and              
pastern; I took it in my hand, and having smelt it, returned it to him      
again as civilly as I could. He brought out of the Yahoo's kennel a         
piece of ass's flesh, but it smelt so offensively that I turned from        
it with loathing: he then threw it to the Yahoo, by whom it was             
greedily devoured. He afterwards showed me a wisp of hay, and a             
fetlock full of oats; but I shook my head, to signify that neither          
of these were food for me. And indeed, I now apprehended that I must        
absolutely starve, if I did not get to some of my own species; for          
as to those filthy Yahoos, although there were few greater lovers of        
mankind, at that time, than myself, yet I confess I never saw any           
sensitive being so detestable on all accounts; and the more I came          
near them, the more hateful they grew, while I stayed in that country.      
This the master horse observed by my behavior, and therefore sent           
the Yahoo back to his kennel. He then put his fore hoof to his              
mouth, at which I was much surprised, although he did it with ease,         
and with a motion that appeared perfectly natural, and made other           
signs to know what I would eat; but I could not return him such an          
answer as he was able to apprehend; and if he had understood me, I did      
not see how it was possible to contrive any way for finding myself          
nourishment. While we were thus engaged, I observed a cow passing           
by, whereupon I pointed to her, and expressed a desire to let me go         
and milk her. This had its effect; for he led me back into the              
house, and ordered a mareservant to open a room, where a good store of      
milk lay in earthen and wooden vessels, after a very orderly and            
cleanly manner. She gave me a large bowl full, of which I drank very        
heartily, and found myself well refreshed.                                  
                                                     {P_4|CH_2 ^paragraph 5}
  About noon I saw coming towards the house a kind of vehicle, drawn        
like a sledge by four Yahoos. There was in it an old steed, who seemed      
to be of quality; he alighted with his hind feet forward, having by         
accident got a hurt in his left fore foot. He came to dine with our         
horse, who received him with great civility. They dined in the best         
room, and had oats boiled in milk for the second course, which the old      
horse ate warm, but the rest cold. Their mangers were placed                
circular in the middle of the room, and divided into several                
partitions, round which they sat on their haunches upon bosses of           
straw. In the middle was a large rack with angles answering to every        
partition of the manger; so that each horse and mare ate their own          
hay, and their own mash of oats and milk, with much decency and             
regularity. The behavior of the young colt and foal appeared very           
modest, and that of the master and mistress extremely cheerful and          
complaisant to their guest. The gray ordered me to stand by him, and        
much discourse passed between him and his friend concerning me, as I        
found by the stranger's often looking on me, and the frequent               
repetition of the word Yahoo.                                               
  I happened to wear my gloves, which the master gray observing,            
seemed perplexed, discovering signs of wonder what I had done to my         
fore feet; he put his hoof three or four times to them, as if he would      
signify that I should reduce them to their former shape, which I            
presently did, pulling off both my gloves, and putting them into my         
pocket. This occasioned farther talk, and I saw the company was             
pleased with my behavior, whereof I soon found the good effects. I was      
ordered to speak the few words I understood, and while they were at         
dinner the master taught the names for oats, milk, fire, water, and         
some others; which I could readily pronounce after him, having from my      
youth a great facility in learning languages.                               
  When dinner was done the master horse took me aside, and by signs         
and words made me understand the concern that he was in, that I had         
nothing to eat. Oats in their tongue are called hlunnh. This word I         
pronounced two or three times; for although I had refused them at           
first, yet upon second thoughts I considered that I could contrive          
to make of them a kind of bread, which might be sufficient with milk        
to keep me alive, till I could make my escape to some other country         
and to creatures of my own species. The horse immediately ordered a         
white mare-servant of his family to bring me a good quantity of oats        
in a sort of wooden tray. These I heated before the fire as well as         
I could, and rubbed them till the husks came off, which I made a shift      
to winnow from the grain; I ground and beat them between two stones,        
then took water, and made them into a paste or cake, which I toasted        
at the fire, and ate warm with milk. It was at first a very insipid         
diet, though common enough in many parts of Europe, but grew tolerable      
by time; and having been often reduced to hard fare in my life, this        
was not the first experiment I had made how easily nature is                
satisfied. And I cannot but observe, that I never had one hour's            
sickness while I stayed in this island. 'Tis true, I sometimes made         
a shift to catch a rabbit or bird by springes made of Yahoos' hairs,        
and I often gathered wholesome herbs, which I boiled, or ate as salads      
with my bread, and now and then, for a rarity, I made a little butter,      
and drank the whey. I was at first at a great loss for salt; but            
custom soon reconciled the want of it; and I am confident that the          
frequent use of salt among us is an effect of luxury, and was first         
introduced only as a provocative to drink; except where it is               
necessary for preserving of flesh in long voyages, or in places remote      
from great markets. For we observe no animal to be fond of it but man:      
and as to myself, when I left this country, it was a great while            
before I could endure the taste of it in anything that I ate.               
  This is enough to say upon the subject of my diet, wherewith other        
travelers fill their books, as if the readers were personally               
concerned whether we fared well or ill. However, it necessary to            
mention this matter, lest the world should think it impossible that         
I could find sustenance for three years in such a country, and among        
such inhabitants.                                                           
  When it grew towards evening, the master horse ordered a place for        
me to lodge in; it was but six yards from the house, and separated          
from the stable of the Yahoos. Here I got some straw, and covering          
myself with my own clothes, slept very sound. But I was in a short          
time better accommodated, as the reader shall know hereafter, when I        
come to treat more particularly about my way of living.                     
                                                                            
P_4|CH_3                                                                    
  CHAPTER III                                                               
-                                                                           
  My principal endeavor was to learn the language, which my master          
(for so I shall henceforth call him) and his children, and every            
servant of his house, were desirous to teach me. For they looked            
upon it as a prodigy that a brute animal should discover such marks of      
a rational creature. I pointed to every thing and inquired the name of      
it, which I wrote down in my journal book when I was alone, and             
corrected my bad accent by desiring those of the family to pronounce        
it often. In this employment, a sorrel nag, one of the under servants,      
was ready to assist me.                                                     
  In speaking they pronounce through the nose and throat, and their         
language approaches nearest to the High Dutch or German of any I            
know in Europe; but is much more graceful and significant. The Emperor      
Charles made almost the same observation, when he said that if he were      
to speak to his horse it should be in High Dutch.                           
  The curiosity and impatience of my master were so great, that he          
spent many hours of his leisure to instruct me. He was convinced (as        
he afterwards told me) that I must be a Yahoo, but my teachableness,        
civility, and cleanliness, astonished him; which were qualities             
altogether so opposite to those animals. He was most perplexed about        
my clothes, reasoning sometimes with himself whether they were a            
part of my body; for I never pulled them off till the family were           
asleep, and got them on before they waked in the morning. My master         
was eager to learn from where I came, how I acquired those appearances      
of reason which I discovered in all my actions, and to know my story        
from my own mouth, which he hoped he should soon do by the great            
proficiency I made in learning and pronouncing their words and              
sentences. To help my memory, I formed all I learned into the               
English alphabet, and wrote the words down with the translations. Ibis      
last after some time I ventured to do in my master's presence. It cost      
me much trouble to explain to him what I was doing; for the                 
inhabitants have not the least idea of books or literature.                 
  In about ten weeks time I was able to understand most of his              
questions, and in three months could give him some tolerable                
answers. He was extremely curious to know from what part of the             
country I came, and how I was taught to imitate a rational creature;        
because the Yahoos (whom he saw I exactly resembled in my head, hands,      
and face, that were only visible), with some appearance of cunning,         
and the strongest disposition to mischief, were observed to be the          
most unteachable of all brutes. I answered that I came over the sea         
from a far place, with many others of my own kind, in a great hollow        
vessel made of the bodies of trees. That my companions forced me to         
land on this coast, and then left me to shift for myself. It was            
with some difficulty, and by the help of many signs, that I brought         
him to understand me. He replied, that I must needs be mistaken, or         
that I said the thing which was not. (For they have no word in their        
language to express lying or falsehood.) He knew it was impossible          
that there could be a country beyond the sea, or that a parcel of           
brutes could move a wooden vessel whither they pleased upon water.          
He was sure no Houyhnhnm alive could make such a vessel, nor would          
trust Yahoos to manage it.                                                  
  The word Houyhnhnm, in their tongue, signifies a horse, and in its        
etymology, the perfection of nature. I told my master, that I was at a      
loss for expression, but would improve as fast as I could; and hoped        
in a short time I should be able to tell him wonders: he was pleased        
to direct his own mare, his colt and foal, and the servants of the          
family, to take all opportunities of instructing me, and every day for      
two or three hours he was at the same pains himself. Several horses         
and mares of quality in the neighborhood came often to our house            
upon the report spread of a wonderful Yahoo, that could speak like a        
Houyhnhnm, and seemed in his words and actions to discover some             
glimmerings of reason. These delighted to converse with me: they put        
many questions, and received such answers as I was able to return.          
By all these advantages I made so great a progress that in five months      
from my arrival I understood whatever was spoke, and could express          
myself tolerably well.                                                      
                                                     {P_4|CH_3 ^paragraph 5}
  The Houyhnhnms who came to visit my master with the design of seeing      
and talking with me, could hardly believe me to be a right Yahoo,           
because my body had a different covering from others of my kind.            
They were astonished to observe me without the usual hair or skin,          
except on my head, face, and hands; but I discovered that secret to my      
master, upon an accident which happened about a fortnight before.           
  I have already told the reader, that every night when the family          
were gone to bed it was my custom to strip and cover myself with my         
clothes. It happened one morning early, that my master sent for me          
by the sorrel nag, who was his valet; when he came I was fast               
asleep, my clothes fallen off on one side, and my shirt above my            
waist. I awakened at the noise he made, and observed him to deliver         
his message in some disorder; after which he went to my master, and in      
a great fright gave him a very confused account of what he had seen.        
This I presently discovered; for going as soon as I was dressed to pay      
my attendance upon his Honor, he asked me the meaning of what his           
servant had reported, that I was not the same thing when I slept as         
I appeared to be at other times; that his valet assured him, some part      
of me was white, some yellow, at least not so white, and some brown.        
  I had hitherto concealed the secret of my dress, in order to              
distinguish myself as much as possible from that cursed race of             
Yahoos; but now I found it in vain to do so any longer. Besides, I          
considered that my clothes and shoes would soon wear out, which             
already were in a declining condition, and must be supplied by some         
contrivance from the hides of Yahoos or other brutes; whereby the           
whole secret would be known. I therefore told my master that in the         
country from which I came those of my kind always covered their bodies      
with the hairs of certain animals prepared by art, as well for decency      
as to avoid the inclemencies of air, both hot and cold; of which, as        
to my own person, I would give him immediate conviction, if he pleased      
to command me; only desiring his excuse, if I did not expose those          
parts that nature taught us to conceal. He said my discourse was all        
very strange, but especially the last part; for he could not                
understand why nature should teach us to conceal what nature had            
given. That neither himself nor family were ashamed of any parts of         
their bodies; but however I might do as I pleased. Whereupon I first        
unbuttoned my coat and pulled it off. I did the same with my                
waistcoat; I drew off my shoes, stockings, and breeches. I let my           
shirt down to my waist, and drew up the bottom, fastening it like a         
girdle about my middle to hide my nakedness.                                
  My master observed the whole performance with great signs of              
curiosity and admiration. He took up all my clothes in his pastern,         
one piece after another, and examined them diligently; he then stroked      
my body very gently and looked round me several times, after which          
he said it was plain I must be a perfect Yahoo; but that I differed         
very much from the rest of my species, in the softness and whiteness        
and smoothness of my skin, my want of hair in several parts of my           
body, the shape and shortness of my claws behind and before, and my         
affectation of walking continually on my two hind feet. He desired          
to see no more, and gave me leave to put on my clothes again, for I         
was shuddering with cold.                                                   
  I expressed my uneasiness at his giving me so often the                   
appellation of Yahoo, an odious animal for which I had so utter a           
hatred and contempt. I begged he would forbear applying that word to        
me, and take the same order in his family, and among his friends            
whom he suffered to see me. I requested likewise that the secret of my      
having a false covering to my body might be known to none but himself,      
at least as long as my present clothing should last; for as to what         
the sorrel nag his valet had observed, his Honor might command him          
to conceal it.                                                              
                                                    {P_4|CH_3 ^paragraph 10}
  All this my master very graciously consented to, and thus the secret      
was kept till my clothes began to wear out, which I was forced to           
supply by several contrivances that shall hereafter be mentioned. In        
the meantime he desired I would go on with my utmost diligence to           
learn their language, because he was more astonished at my capacity         
for speech and reason than at the figure of my body, whether it were        
covered or not; adding that he waited with some impatience to hear the      
wonders which I promised to tell him.                                       
  From thenceforward he doubled the pains he had been at to instruct        
me; he brought me into all company, and made them treat me with             
civility, because, as he told them privately, this would put me into        
good humor and make me more diverting.                                      
  Every day when I waited on him, beside the trouble he was at in           
teaching, he would ask me several questions concerning myself, which I      
answered as well as I could; and by these means he had already              
received some general ideas, though very imperfect. It would be             
tedious to relate the several steps by which I advanced to a more           
regular conversation: but the first account I gave of myself in any         
order and length, was to this purpose:                                      
  That I came from a very far country, as I already had attempted to        
tell him, with about fifty more of my own species; that we traveled         
upon the seas, in a great hollow vessel made of wood, and larger            
than his Honor's house. I described the ship to him in the best             
terms I could, and explained by the help of my handkerchief displayed,      
how it was driven forward by the wind. That upon a quarrel among us, I      
was set on shore on this coast, where I walked forward without knowing      
whither, till he delivered me from the persecution of those                 
execrable Yahoos. He asked me who made the ship, and how it was             
possible that the Houyhnhnms of my country would leave it to the            
management of brutes? My answer was that I dare proceed no further          
in my relation, unless he would give me his word and honor that he          
would not be offended, and then I would tell him the wonders I had          
so often promised. He agreed; and I went on by assuring him that the        
ship was made by creatures was myself, who in all the countries I           
had traveled, as well as in my own, were the only governing,                
rational animals; and that upon my arrival here I was as much               
astonished to see the Houyhnhnms act like rational beings, as he or         
his friends could be finding some marks of reason in a creature he was      
pleased to call a Yahoo, to which I owned my resemblance in every           
part, but could not account for their degenerate and brutal nature.         
I said farther that if good fortune ever restored me to my native           
country, to relate my travels here, as I resolved to do, everybody          
would believe that I said the thing which was not; that I invented the      
story out of my own head; and with all possible respect to himself,         
his family and friends, and under his promise of not being offended,        
our countrymen would hardly think it probable, that a Houyhnhnm should      
be the presiding creature of a nation, and a Yahoo the brute.               
                                                                            
P_4|CH_4                                                                    
  CHAPTER IV                                                                
-                                                                           
  My master heard me with great appearances of uneasiness in his            
countenance, because doubting, or not believing, are so little known        
in this country, that the inhabitants cannot tell how to behave             
themselves under such circumstances. And I remember in frequent             
discourses with my master concerning the nature of manhood in other         
parts of the world, having occasion to talk of lying and false              
representation, it was with much difficulty that he comprehended            
what I meant, although he had otherwise a most acute judgment. For          
he argued thus: that the use of speech was to make us understand one        
another, and to receive information of facts; now if anyone said the        
thing which was not, these ends were defeated; because I cannot             
properly be said to understand him; and I am so far from receiving          
information, that he leaves me worse than in ignorance, for I am led        
to believe a thing black when it is white, and short when it is             
long. And these were all the notions he had concerning that faculty of      
lying, so perfectly well understood among human creatures.                  
  To return from this digression; when I asserted that the Yahoos were      
the only governing animals in my country, which my master said was          
altogether past his conception, he desired to know whether we had           
Houyhnhnms among us, and what was their employment: I told him we           
had great numbers, that in summer they grazed in the fields, and in         
winter were kept in houses, with hay and oats, where Yahoo servants         
were employed to rub their skins smooth, comb their manes, pick             
their feet, serve them with food, and make their beds. I understand         
you well, said my master, it is now very plain, from all you have           
spoken, that whatever share of reason the Yahoos pretend to, the            
Houyhnhnms are your masters; I heartily wish our Yahoos would be so         
tractable. I begged his Honor would please to excuse me from                
proceeding any farther, because I was very certain that the account he      
expected from me would be highly displeasing. But he insisted in            
commanding me to let him know the best and the worst: I told him he         
should be obeyed. I owned that the Houyhnhnms among us, whom we called      
horses, were the most generous and comely animals we had, that they         
excelled in strength and swiftness; and when they belonged to               
persons of quality, employed in traveling, racing, or drawing               
chariots, they were treated with much kindness and till they fell into      
diseases or became foundered in the feet; and then they were sold, and      
used to all kind of drudgery till they died; after which their skins        
were stripped and sold for what they were worth, and their bodies left      
to be devoured by dogs and birds of prey. But the common race of            
horses had not so good fortune, being kept by farmers and carriers,         
and other mean people, who put them to great labor, and fed them            
worse. I described, as well as I could, our way of riding, the shape        
and use of a bridle, a saddle, a spur, and a whip, of harness and           
wheels. I added that we fastened plates of a certain hard substance         
called iron at the bottom of their feet, to preserve their hoofs            
from being broken by the stony ways on which we often traveled.             
  My master, after some expressions of great indignation, wondered how      
we dared to venture upon a Houyhnhnm's back, for he was sure that           
the weakest servant in his house would be able to shake off the             
strongest Yahoo, or by lying down and rolling on his back squeeze           
the brute to death. I answered that our horses were trained up from         
three or four years old to the several uses we intended them for; that      
if any of them proved intolerably vicious, they were employed for           
carriages; that they were severely beaten while they were young, for        
any mischievous tricks; that the males, designed for common use of          
riding or draught, were generally castrated about two years after           
their birth, to take down their spirits and make them more tame and         
gentle; that they were indeed sensible of rewards and punishments; but      
his Honor would please to consider, that they had not the least             
tincture of reason any more than the Yahoos in this country.                
  It put me to the pains of many circumlocutions to give my master a        
right idea of what I spoke; for their language does not abound in           
variety of words, because their wants and passions are fewer than           
among us. But it is impossible to represent his noble resentment at         
our savage treatment of the Houyhnhnm race, particularly after I had        
explained the manner and use of castrating horses among us, to              
hinder them from propagating their kind, and to render them more            
servile. He said if it were possible there could be any country             
where Yahoos alone were endued with reason, they certainly must be the      
governing animal, because reason will in time always prevail against        
brutal strength. But considering the frame of our bodies, and               
especially of mine, he thought no creature of equal bulk was so ill         
contrived, for employing that reason in the common offices of life;         
whereupon he desired to know whether those among whom I lived               
resembled me or the Yahoos of his country. I assured him, that I was        
as well shaped as most of my age; but the younger and the females were      
much more soft and tender, and the skins of the latter generally as         
white as milk. He said I differed indeed from other Yahoos, being much      
more cleanly, and not altogether so deformed, but in point of real          
advantage he thought I differed for the worse. That my nails were of        
no use either to my fore or hind feet; as to my fore feet, he could         
not properly call them by that name, for he never observed me to            
walk upon them; that they were too soft to bear the ground; that I          
generally went with them uncovered, neither was the covering I              
sometimes wore on them of the same shape or so strong as that on my         
feet behind. That I could not walk with any security, for if either of      
my hind feet slipped, I must inevitably fall. He then began to find         
fault with other parts of my body, the flatness of my face, the             
prominence of my nose, my eyes placed directly in front, so that I          
could not look on either side without turning my that I was not able        
to feed myself without lifting one of my fore feet to my mouth; and         
therefore nature had placed these joints to answer that necessity.          
He knew not what could be the use of those several clefts and               
divisions in my feet behind; that these were too soft to bear the           
hardness and sharpness of stones without a covering made from the skin      
of some other brute; that my whole body wanted a fence against heat         
cold, which I was forced to put on and off every day with                   
tediousness and trouble. And lastly that he observed every animal in        
this country naturally to abhor the Yahoos, whom the weaker avoided         
and the stronger drove from them. So that supposing us to have the          
gift of reason, he could not see how it were possible to cure that          
natural antipathy which every creature discovered against us; nor           
consequently, how we could tame and render them serviceable.                
However, he would (as he said) debate the matter no farther, because        
he was more desirous to know my own story, the country where I was          
born, and the several actions and events of my life before I came           
here.                                                                       
  I assured him how extremely desirous I was that he should be              
satisfied on every point; but I doubted much whether it would be            
possible for me to explain myself on several subjects whereof his           
Honor could have no conception, because I saw nothing in his country        
to which I could resemble them. That however I would do my best, and        
strive to express myself by similitudes, humbly desiring his                
assistance when I wanted proper words; which he was pleased to promise      
me.                                                                         
                                                     {P_4|CH_4 ^paragraph 5}
  I said my birth was of honest parents in an island called England,        
which was remote from this country, as many days' journey as the            
strongest of his Honor's servants could travel in the annual course of      
the sun. That I was bred a surgeon, whose trade it is to cure wounds        
and hurts in the body, got by accident or violence; that my country         
was governed by a female man, whom we called a Queen. That I left it        
to get riches, whereby I might maintain myself and family when I            
should return. That in my last voyage I was Commander of the ship, and      
had about fifty Yahoos under me, many of which died at sea, and I           
was forced to supply them by others picked out from several nations.        
That our ship was twice in danger of being sunk; the first time by a        
great storm, and the second, by striking against a rock. Here my            
master interposed, by asking me how I could persuade strangers out          
of different countries to venture with me, after the losses I had           
sustained, and the hazards I had run. I said they were fellows of           
desperate fortunes, forced to fly from the places of their birth, on        
account of their poverty or their crimes. Some were undone by               
lawsuits; others spent all they had in drinking, whoring, and gaming;       
others fled for treason; many for murder, theft, poisoning, robbery,        
perjury, forgery, coining false money, for committing rapes or              
sodomy, for flying from their colors, or deserting to the enemy, and        
most of them had broken prison; none of these dared return to their         
native countries for fear of being hanged, or of starving in a jail;        
and therefore were under the necessity of seeking a livelihood in           
other places.                                                               
  During this discourse my master was pleased to interrupt me               
several times; I had made use of many circumlocutions in describing to      
him the nature of the several crimes, for which most of our crew had        
been forced to fly their country. This labor took up several days'          
conversation before he was able to comprehend me. He was wholly at a        
loss to know what could be the use or necessity of practicing those         
vices. To clear up which I endeavored to give some ideas of the desire      
of power and riches, of the terrible effects of lust, intemperance,         
malice and envy. All this I was forced to define and describe by            
putting of cases, and making of suppositions. After which, like one         
whose imagination was struck with something never seen or heard of          
before, he would lift up his eyes with amazement and indignation.           
Power, government, war, law, punishment, and a thousand other things        
had no terms wherein that language could express them, which made           
the difficulty almost insuperable to give my master any conception          
of what I meant. But being of an excellent understanding, much              
improved by contemplation and converse, he at last arrived at a             
competent knowledge of what human nature in our parts of the world          
is capable to perform, and desired I would give him some particular         
account of that land which we call Europe, but especially of my own         
country.                                                                    
                                                                            
P_4|CH_5                                                                    
  CHAPTER V                                                                 
-                                                                           
  The reader may please to observe, that the following extract of many      
conversations I had with my master, contains a summary of the most          
material points which were discoursed at several times for above two        
years; his Honor often desiring fuller satisfaction as I farther            
improved in the Houyhnhnm tongue. I laid before him, as well as I           
could, the whole state of Europe; I discoursed of trade and                 
manufactures, of arts and sciences; and the answers I gave to all           
the questions he made, as they arose upon several subjects, were a          
fund of conversation not to be exhausted. But I shall here only set         
down the substance of what passed between us concerning my own              
country, reducing it into order as well as I can, without any regard        
to time or other circumstances, while I strictly adhere to truth. My        
only concern is that I shall hardly be able to do justice to my             
master's arguments and expressions, which must needs suffer by my want      
of capacity, as well as by a translation into our barbarous English.        
  In obedience therefore to his Honor's commands, I related to him the      
Revolution under the Prince of Orange; the long war with France             
entered into by the said prince, and renewed by his successor the           
present Queen, wherein the greatest powers of Christendom were              
engaged, and which still continued: I computed at his request that          
about a million of Yahoos might have been killed in the whole progress      
of it, and perhaps a hundred or more cities taken, and thrice as            
many ships burnt or sunk.                                                   
  He asked me what were the usual causes or motives that made one           
country go to war with another. I answered they were innumerable,           
but I should only mention a few of the chief. Sometimes the ambition        
of princes, who never think they have land or people enough to govern;      
sometimes the corruption of ministers, who engage their master in a         
war in order to stifle or divert the clamor of the subjects against         
their evil administration. Difference in opinions has cost many             
millions of lives: for instance, whether flesh be bread, or bread be        
flesh; whether the juice of a certain berry be blood or wine;               
whether whistling be vice or a virtue; whether it be better to kiss         
a post, or throw it into the fire; what is the best color for a             
coat, whether black, white, red, or gray; and whether it should be          
long or short, narrow or wide, dirty or clean; with many more. Neither      
are any wars so furious and bloody, or of so long continuance, as           
those occasioned by difference in opinion, especially if it be in           
things indifferent.                                                         
  Sometimes the quarrel between two princes is to which of them             
shall dispossess a third of his dominions, where neither of them            
pretend to any right. Sometimes one prince quarrels with another,           
for fear the other should quarrel with him. Sometimes a war is entered      
upon, because the enemy is too strong, and sometimes because he is too      
weak. Sometimes our neighbors want the things which we have, or have        
the things which we want; and we both fight, till they take ours or         
give us theirs. It is a very justifiable cause of a war to invade a         
country after the people have been wasted by famine, destroyed by           
pestilence, or embroiled by factions among themselves. It is                
justifiable to enter into war against our nearest ally, when one of         
his towns lies convenient for us, or a territory of land, that would        
render our dominions round and complete. If a prince sends forces into      
a nation where the people are poor and ignorant, he may lawfully put        
half of them to death, and make slaves of the rest, in order to             
civilize and reduce them from their barbarous way of living. It is a        
very kingly, honorable, and frequent practice, when one prince desires      
the assistance of another to secure him against an invasion, that           
the assistant, when he has driven out the invader, should seize on the      
dominions himself, and kill, imprison or banish the prince he came          
to relieve. Alliance by blood or marriage is a frequent cause of war        
between princes; and the nearer the kindred is, the greater is their        
disposition to quarrel: poor nations are hungry, and rich nations           
are proud; and pride and hunger will ever be at variance. For these         
reasons, the trade of a soldier is held the most honorable of all           
others; because a soldier is a Yahoo hired to kill in cold blood as         
many of his own species, who have never offended him, as possibly he        
can.                                                                        
  There is likewise a kind of beggarly princes in Europe, not able          
to make war by themselves, who hire out their troops to richer              
nations, for so much a day to each man; of which they keep                  
three-fourths to themselves, and it is the best part of their               
maintenance; such are those in Germany and other northern parts of          
Europe.                                                                     
                                                     {P_4|CH_5 ^paragraph 5}
  What you have told me (said my master) upon the subject of war, does      
indeed discover most admirably the effects of that reason you               
pretend to: however, it is happy that the shame is greater than the         
danger; and that nature has left you utterly uncapable of doing much        
mischief.                                                                   
  For your mouths lying flat with your faces, you can hardly bite each      
other to any purpose, unless by consent. Then as to the claws upon          
your feet before and behind, they are so short and tender, that one of      
our Yahoos would drive a dozen of yours before him. And therefore in        
recounting the numbers of those who have been killed in battle, I           
cannot but think that you have said the thing which is not.                 
  I could not forbear shaking my head and smiling a little at his           
ignorance. And being no stranger to the art of war, I gave him a            
description of cannons, culverins, muskets, carabines, pistols,             
bullets, powder, swords, bayonets, battles, sieges, retreats, attacks,      
undermines, countermines, bombardments, sea fights; ships sunk with         
a thousand men, twenty thousand killed on each side; dying groans,          
limbs flying in the air, smoke, noise, confusion, trampling to death        
under horses' feet; flight, pursuit, victory; fields strewed with           
carcases left for food to dogs, and wolves, and birds of prey;              
plundering, stripping, ravishing, burning, and destroying. And to           
set forth the valor of my own dear countrymen, I assured him that I         
had seen them blow up a hundred enemies at once in a siege, and as          
many in a ship, and beheld the dead bodies come down in pieces from         
the clouds, to the great diversion of the spectators.                       
  I was going on to more particulars, when my master commanded me           
silence. He said whoever understood the nature of Yahoos might              
easily believe it possible for so vile animals to be capable of             
every action I had named, if their strength and cunning squalled their      
malice. But as my discourse had increased his abhorrence of the             
whole species, so he found it gave him a disturbance in his mind, to        
which he was wholly a stranger before. He thought his ears being            
used to such abominable words, might by degrees admit them with less        
detestation. That although he hated the Yahoos of this country, yet he      
no more blamed them for their odious qualities, than he did a gnnayh        
(a bird of prey) for its cruelty, or a sharp stone for cutting his          
hoof. But when a creature pretending to reason could be capable of          
such enormities, he dreaded lest the corruption of that faculty             
might be worse than brutality itself. He seemed therefore confident,        
that instead of reason, we were only possessed of some quality              
fitted to increase our natural vices; as the reflection from a              
troubled stream returns the image of an ill-shapen body, not only           
larger, but more distorted.                                                 
  He added, that he had heard too much upon the subject of war, both        
in this and some former discourses. There was another point which a         
little perplexed him at present. I had informed him, that some of           
our crew left their country on account of being ruined by Law; that         
I had already explained the meaning of the word; but he was at a            
loss how it should come to pass, that the law which was intended for        
every man's preservation, should be any man's ruin. Therefore he            
desired to be further satisfied what I meant by law, and the                
dispensers thereof, according to the present practice in my own             
country; because he thought nature and reason were sufficient guides        
for a reasonable animal, as we pretended to be, in showing us what          
we ought to do, and what to avoid.                                          
                                                    {P_4|CH_5 ^paragraph 10}
  I assured his Honor that law was a science wherein I had not much         
conversed, further than by employing advocates, in vain, upon some          
injustices that had been done me: however, I would give him all the         
satisfaction I was able.                                                    
  I said there was a society of men among us, bred up from their youth      
in the art of proving by words multiplied for the purpose, that             
white is black, and black is white, according as they are paid. To          
this society all the rest of the people are slaves. For example, if my      
neighbor has a mind to my cow, he hires a lawyer to prove that he           
ought to have my cow from me. I must then hire another to defend my         
right, it being against all rules of law that any man should be             
allowed to speak for himself. Now in this case I who am the right           
owner lie under two great disadvantages. First, my lawyer, being            
practiced almost from his cradle in defending falsehood, is quite           
out of his element when he would be an advocate for justice, which          
as an office unnatural, he always attempts with great awkwardness if        
not with ill-will. The second disadvantage is that my lawyer must           
proceed with great caution, or else he will be reprimanded by the           
judges, and abhorred by his brethren, as one that would lessen the          
practice of the law. And therefore I have but two methods to                
preserve my cow. The first is to gain over my adversary's lawyer            
with a double fee, who will then betray his client by insinuating that      
he has justice on his side. The second way is for my lawyer to make my      
cause appear as unjust as he can by the cow to belong to my adversary:      
and this, if it be skillfully done will certainly bespeak the favor of      
the bench.                                                                  
  Now, your Honour is to know that these judges an appointed to decide      
all controversies of property, as well as for the trial of                  
criminals, and picked out from the most dexterous lawyers, who are          
grown old or lazy, and having been biassed all their lives against          
truth and equity, are under such a fatal necessity of favoring              
fraud, perjury, and oppression, that I have known several of them           
refuse a large bribe from the side where justice lay, rather than           
injure the faculty, by doing any thing unbecoming their nature or           
their office.                                                               
  It is a maxim among these lawyers, that whatever has been done            
before may legally be done again: and therefore they take special care      
to record all the decisions formerly made against common justice and        
the general reason of mankind. These, under the name of precedents,         
they produce as authorities, to justify the most iniquitous                 
opinions; and the judges never fail of directing accordingly.               
  In pleading they studiously avoid entering into the merits of the         
cause, but are loud, violent, and tedious in dwelling upon all              
circumstances which are not to the purpose. For instance, in the            
case already mentioned, they never desire to know what claim or             
title my adversary has to my cow; but whether the said cow were red or      
black, her horns long or short, whether the field I graze her in be         
round or square, whether she was milked at home or abroad, what             
diseases she is subject to, and the like; after which they consult          
precedents, adjourn the cause from time to time, and in ten, twenty,        
or thirty years, come to an issue.                                          
                                                    {P_4|CH_5 ^paragraph 15}
  It is likewise to be observed, that this society has a peculiar cant      
and jargon of their own, that no other mortal can understand, and           
wherein all their laws are written, which they take special care to         
multiply; whereby they have wholly confounded the very essence of           
truth and falsehood, of right and wrong; so that it will take thirty        
years to decide whether the field left me by my ancestors for six           
generations belongs to me, or to a stranger three hundred miles off.        
  In the trial of persons accused for crimes against the state the          
method is much more short and commendable: the judge first sends to         
sound the disposition of those in power, after which he can easily          
hang or save the criminal, strictly preserving all due forms of law.        
  Here my master interposing, said it was a pity that creatures             
endowed with such prodigious abilities of mind as these lawyers, by         
the description I gave of them, must certainly be, were not rather          
encouraged to be instructors of others in wisdom and knowledge. In          
answer to which I assured his Honor that in all points out of their         
own trade, they were usually the most ignorant and stupid generation        
among us, the most despicable in common conversation, avowed enemies        
to all knowledge and learning, and equally to pervert the general           
reason of mankind in every other subject of discourse, as in that of        
their own profession.                                                       
                                                                            
P_4|CH_6                                                                    
  CHAPTER VI                                                                
-                                                                           
  My master was yet wholly at a loss to understand what motives             
could incite this race of lawyers to perplex, disquiet, and weary           
themselves, and engage in a confederacy of injustice, merely for the        
sake of injuring their fellow animals; neither could he comprehend          
what I meant in saying they did it for hire. Whereupon I was at much        
pains to describe to him the use of money, the materials it was made        
of, and the value of the metals; that when a Yahoo had got a great          
store of this precious substance, he was able to purchase whatever          
he had a mind to; the finest clothing, the noblest houses, great            
tracts of land, the most costly meats and drinks, and have his              
choice of the most beautiful females. Therefore since money alone           
was able to perform all these feats, our Yahoos thought they could          
never have enough of it to spend or save, as they found themselves          
inclined from their natural bent either to profusion or avarice.            
That the rich man enjoyed the fruit of the poor man's labor, and the        
latter were a thousand to one in proportion to the former. That the         
bulk of our people were forced to live miserably, by laboring every         
day for small wages to make a few live plentifully. I enlarged              
myself much on these and many other particulars to the same purpose;        
but his Honor was still to seek; for he went upon a supposition that        
all animals had a title to their share in the productions of the            
earth, and especially those who presided over the rest. Therefore he        
desired I would let him know what these costly meats were, and how any      
of us happened to want them. Whereupon I enumerated as many sorts as        
came into my head, with the various methods of dressing them, which         
could not be done without sending vessels by sea to every part of           
the world, as well for liquors to drink, as for sauces, and                 
innumerable other conveniences. I assured him that this whole globe of      
earth must be at least three times gone round, before one of our            
better female Yahoos could get her breakfast or a cup to put it in. He      
said that must needs be a miserable country which cannot furnish            
food for its own inhabitants. But what he chiefly wondered at, was how      
such vast tracts of ground as I described should be wholly without          
fresh water, and the people put to the necessity of sending over the        
sea for drink. I replied that England (the dear place of my                 
nativity) was computed to produce three times the quantity of food,         
more than its inhabitants are able to consume, as well as liquors           
extracted from grain, or pressed out of the fruit of certain trees,         
which made excellent drink, and the same proportion in every other          
convenience of life. But, in order to feed the luxury and intemperance      
of the males, and the vanity of the females, we sent away the greatest      
part of our necessary things to other countries, from whence in return      
we brought the materials of diseases, folly, and vice, to spend             
among ourselves. Hence it follows of necessity that vast numbers of         
our people are compelled to seek their livelihood by begging, robbing,      
stealing, cheating, pimping, forswearing, flattering, suborning,            
forging, gaming, lying, fawning, hectoring, voting, scribbling,             
star-gazing, poisoning, whoring, canting, libeling, free thinking, and      
the like occupations: every one of which terms, I was at much pains to      
make him understand.                                                        
  That wine was not imported among us from foreign countries, to            
supply the want of water or other drinks, but because it was a sort of      
liquid which made us merry by putting us out of our senses, diverted        
all melancholy thoughts, begat wild extravagant imaginations in the         
brain, raised our hopes, and banished our fears, suspended every            
office of reason for a time, and deprived us of the use of our              
limbs, till we fell into a profound sleep; although it must be              
confessed, that we always awoke sick and dispirited and that the use        
of this liquor filled us with diseases, which made our lives                
uncomfortable and short.                                                    
  But beside all this, the bulk of our people supported themselves          
by furnishing the necessities or conveniences of life to the rich, and      
to each other. For instance, when I am at home and dressed as I             
ought to be, I carry on my body the workmanship of a hundred                
tradesmen; the building and furniture of my house employ as many more,      
and five times the number to adorn my wife.                                 
  I was going on to tell him of another sort of people, who get             
their livelihood by attending the sick, having upon some occasions          
informed his Honor that many of my crew had died of diseases. But here      
it was with the utmost difficulty that I brought him to apprehend what      
I meant. He could easily conceive that a Houyhnhnm grew weak and heavy      
a few days before his death, or by some accident might hurt a limb.         
But that nature, who works all things to perfection, should suffer any      
pains to breed in our bodies, he thought impossible, and desired to         
know the reason of so unaccountable an evil. I told him we fed on a         
thousand things which operated contrary to each other; that we ate          
when we were not hungry, and drank without the provocation of               
thirst; that we sat whole nights strong liquors without eating a            
bit, which disposed us to sloth, inflamed our bodies, and precipitated      
or prevented digestion. That prostitute female Yahoos acquired a            
certain malady, which bred rottenness in the bones of those who fell        
into their embraces; that this and many other diseases were propagated      
from father to son, so that great numbers come into the world with          
complicated maladies upon them; that it would be endless to give him a      
catalogue of all diseases incident to human bodies; for they could not      
be fewer than five or six hundred, spread over every limb and joint;        
in short, every part, external and intestine, having diseases               
appropriated to them. To remedy which there was a sort of people            
bred up among us, in the profession or pretense of curing the sick.         
And because I had some skill in the faculty, I would in gratitude to        
his Honor let him know the whole mystery and method by which they           
proceed.                                                                    
  Their fundamental is that all diseases arise from repletion, from         
which they conclude that a great evacuation of the body is                  
necessary, either through the natural passage or upwards at the mouth.      
Their next business is from herbs, minerals, gums, oils, shells,            
salts, juices, seaweed, excrements, barks of trees, serpents, toads,        
frogs, spiders, dead men's flesh and bone, birds, beasts and fishes,        
to form a composition for smell and taste the most abominable,              
nauseous and detestable they can possibly contrive, which the               
stomach immediately rejects with loathing; and this they call a vomit;      
or else from the same storehouse, with some other poisonous additions,      
they command us to take in at the orifice above or below (just as           
the physician then happens to be disposed) a medicine equally annoying      
and disgustful to the bowels; which relaxing the belly, drives down         
all before it, and this they call a purge or a cluster. For nature (as      
the physicians allege) having intended the superior anterior orifice        
only for the intromission of solids and liquids, and the inferior           
posterior for ejection, these artists ingeniously considering that          
in all diseases nature is forced out of her seat, therefore to replace      
her in it the body must be treated in a manner directly contrary, by        
interchanging the use of each orifice, forcing solids and liquids in        
at the anus, and making evacuations at the mouth.                           
                                                     {P_4|CH_6 ^paragraph 5}
  But besides real diseases we are subject to many that are only            
imaginary, for which the physicians have invented imaginary cures;          
these have their several names, and so have the drugs that are              
proper for them, and with these our female Yahoos are always infested.      
  One great excellency in this tribe is their skiff at prognostics,         
wherein they seldom fail; their predictions in real diseases, when          
they rise to any degree of malignity, generally portending death,           
which is always in their power, when recovery is not: and therefore,        
upon any unexpected signs of amendment, after they have pronounced          
their sentence, rather than be accused as false prophets, they know         
how to approve their sagacity to the world by a seasonable dose.            
  They are likewise of special use to husbands and wives who are grown      
weary of their mates, to eldest sons, to great ministers of state, and      
often to princes.                                                           
  I had formerly upon occasion discoursed with my master upon the           
nature of government in general, and particularly of our own excellent      
constitution, deservedly the wonder and envy of the whole world. But        
having here accidentally mentioned a minister of state, he commanded        
me some time after to inform him what species of Yahoo I                    
particularly meant by that appellation.                                     
  I told him that a First or Chief Minister of State, who was the           
person I intended to describe, was a creature wholly exempt from joy        
and grief, love and hatred, pity and anger; at least made use of no         
other passions but a violent desire of wealth, power, and titles; that      
he applies his words to all uses, except to the indication of his           
mind; that he never tells a truth but with an intent that you should        
take it for a lie; nor a lie but with a design that you should take it      
for a truth; that those he speaks worst of behind their backs are in        
the surest way of preferment; and whenever he begins to praise you          
to others or to yourself, you are from that day forlorn. The worst          
mark you can receive is a promise, especially when it is confirmed          
with an oath; after which every wise man retires, and gives over all        
hopes.                                                                      
                                                    {P_4|CH_6 ^paragraph 10}
  There are three methods by which a man may rise to be chief               
minister: the first is by knowing how with prudence to dispose of a         
wife, a daughter, or a sister: the second, by betraying or undermining      
his predecessor: and the third is by a furious zeal in public               
assemblies against the corruptions of the court. But a wise prince          
would rather choose to employ those who practice the last of these          
methods; because such zealots prove always the most obsequious and          
subservient to the will and passions of their master. That these            
ministers having all employments at their disposal, preserve                
themselves in power by bribing the majority of a senate or great            
council; and at last, by an expedient called an Act of Indemnity            
(whereof I described the nature to him) they secure themselves from         
after reckonings, and retire from the public, laden with the spoils of      
the nation.                                                                 
  The palace of a chief minister is a seminary to breed up others in        
his own trade: the pages, lackeys, and porter, by imitating their           
master, become ministers of state in their several districts, and           
learn to excel in the three principal ingredients of insolence, lying,      
and bribery. Accordingly they have a subaltern court paid to them by        
persons of the best rank, and sometimes by the force of dexterity           
and impudence arrive through several gradations to be successors to         
their lord.                                                                 
  He is usually governed by a decayed wench or favorite footman, who        
are the tunnels through which all graces are conveyed, and may              
properly be called, in the last resort, the governors of the kingdom.       
  One day in discourse my master, having heard me mention the nobility      
of my country, was pleased to make me a compliment which I could not        
pretend to deserve: that he was sure I must have been born of some          
noble family, because I far exceeded in shape, color, and cleanliness,      
all the Yahoos of his nation, although I seemed to fail in strength         
and agility, which must be imputed to my different way of living            
from those other brutes; and besides I was not only endowed with the        
faculty of speech, but likewise with some rudiments of reason, to a         
degree that with all his acquaintance I passed for a prodigy.               
  He made me observe, that among the Houyhnhnms, the white, the             
sorrel, and the iron grey were not so exactly shaped as the bay, the        
dapple grey, and the black; nor born with equal talents of the mind,        
or a capacity to improve them; and therefore continued always in the        
condition of servants, without ever aspiring to match out of their own      
race, which in that country would be reckoned monstrous and unnatural.      
                                                    {P_4|CH_6 ^paragraph 15}
  I made his Honor my most humble acknowledgments for the good opinion      
he was pleased to conceive of me; but assured him at the same time          
that my birth was of the lower sort, having been born of plain              
honest parents, who were just able to give me a tolerable education;        
that nobility among us was altogether a different thing from the            
idea he had of it; that our young noblemen are bred from their              
childhood in idleness and luxury; that as soon as years will permit,        
they consume their vigor and contract odious diseases among lewd            
females; and when their fortunes are almost ruined, they marry some         
woman of mean birth, disagreeable person, and unsound constitution,         
merely for the sake of money, whom they hate and despise. That the          
productions of such marriages are generally scrofulous, rickety, or         
deformed children; by which means the family seldom continues above         
three generations, unless the wife takes care to provide a healthy          
father among her neighbors or domestics, in order to improve and            
continue the breed. That a weak diseased body, a meagre countenance,        
and sallow complexion, are the true marks of noble blood; and a             
healthy robust appearance is so disgraceful in a man of quality,            
that the world concludes his real father to have been a groom or a          
coachman. The imperfections of his mind run parallel with those of his      
body, being a composition of spleen, dullness, ignorance, caprice,          
sensuality and pride.                                                       
  Without the consent of this illustrious body no law can be                
enacted, repealed, or altered; and these have the decision of all           
our possessions without appeal.                                             
                                                                            
P_4|CH_7                                                                    
  CHAPTER VII                                                               
-                                                                           
  The reader may be disposed to wonder how I could prevail on myself        
to give so free a representation of my own species, among a race of         
mortals who were already too apt to conceive the vilest opinion of          
human kind, from that entire congruity betwixt me and their Yahoos.         
But I must freely confess that the many virtues of those excellent          
quadrupeds placed in opposite view to human corruptions, had so far         
opened my eyes and enlarged my understanding, that I began to view the      
actions and passions of man in a very different light, and to think         
the honor of my own kind not worth managing; which, besides, it was         
impossible for me to do before a person of so acute a judgment as my        
master, who daily convinced me of a thousand faults in myself, whereof      
I had not the least perception before, and which among us would             
never be numbered even among human infirmities. I had likewise learned      
from his example an utter detestation of all falsehood or disguise,         
and truth appeared so amiable to me, that I determined upon                 
sacrificing everything to it.                                               
  Let me deal so candidly with the reader as to confess that there was      
yet a much stronger motive for the freedom I took in my representation      
of things. I had not been a year in this country before I contracted        
such a love and veneration for the inhabitants, that I entered on a         
firm resolution never to return to human kind, but to pass the rest of      
my life among these admirable Houyhnhnms in the contemplation and           
practice of every virtue; where I could have no example or                  
incitement to vice. But it was decreed by fortune, my perpetual enemy,      
that so great a felicity should not fall to my share. However, it is        
now some comfort to reflect that in what I said of my countrymen I          
extenuated their faults as much as I dared before so strict an              
examiner, and upon every article gave as favorable a turn as the            
matter would bear. For indeed who is there alive that will not be           
swayed by his bias and partiality to the place of his birth?                
  I have related the substance of several conversations I had with          
my master, during the greatest part of the time I had the honor to          
be in his service, but have indeed for brevity sake omitted much            
more than is here set down.                                                 
  When I had answered all his questions, and his curiosity seemed to        
be fully satisfied, he sent for me one morning early, and commanding        
me to sit down at some distance (an honor which he had never before         
conferred upon me), he said he had been very seriously considering          
my whole story, as far as it related both to myself and my country;         
that he looked upon us as sort of animals to whose share, by what           
accident he could not conjecture, some small pittance of reason had         
fallen, whereof we made no other use than by its assistance to              
aggravate our natural corruptions, and to acquire new ones which            
nature had not given us. That we disarmed ourselves of the few              
abilities she had bestowed, had been very successful in multiplying         
our original wants, and seemed to spend our whole lives in vain             
endeavors to supply them by our own inventions. That as to myself,          
it was manifest I had neither the strength or agility of a common           
Yahoo, that I walked infirmly on my hinder feet, had found out a            
contrivance to make my claws of no use or defense, and to remove the        
hair from my chin, which was intended as a shelter from the sun and         
the weather. Lastly, that I could neither run with speed, nor climb         
trees like my brethren (as he called them) the Yahoos in this country.      
  That our institutions of government and law were plainly owing to         
our gross defects in reason, and by consequence, in virtue; because         
reason alone is sufficient to govern a rational creature; which was         
therefore a character we had no pretense to challenge, even from the        
account I had given of my own people; although he manifestly perceived      
that in order to favor them I had concealed many particulars, and           
often said the thing which was not.                                         
                                                     {P_4|CH_7 ^paragraph 5}
  He was the more confirmed in this opinion, because he observed            
that as I agreed in every feature of my body with other Yahoos, except      
where it was to my real disadvantage in point of strength, speed and        
activity, the shortness of my claws, and some other particulars             
where nature had no part; so from the representation I had given him        
of our lives, our manners, and our actions, he found as near a              
resemblance in the disposition of our minds. He said the Yahoos were        
known to hate one another more than they did any different species          
of animals; and the reason usually assigned was the odiousness of           
their own shapes, which all could see in the rest, but not in               
themselves. He had therefore begun to think it not unwise in us to          
cover our bodies, and by that invention conceal many of our own             
deformities from each other, which would else be hardly supportable.        
But he now found he had been mistaken, and that the dissensions of          
those brutes in his country were owing to the same cause with ours, as      
I had described them. For if (said he) you throw among five Yahoos          
as much food as would be sufficient for fifty, they will, instead of        
eating peaceably, fall together by the ears, each single one impatient      
to have all to itself; and therefore a servant was usually employed to      
stand by while they were feeding abroad, and those kept at home were        
tied at a distance from each other: that if a cow died of age or            
accident, before a Houyhnhnm could secure it for his own Yahoos, those      
in the neighborhood would come in herds to seize it, and then would         
ensue such a battle as I had described, with terrible wounds made by        
their claws on both sides, although they seldom were able to kill           
one another, for want of such convenient instruments of death as we         
had invented. At other times the like battles have been fought between      
the Yahoos of several neighborhoods without any visible cause; those        
of one district watching all opportunities to surprise the next before      
they are prepared. But if they find their project has miscarried, they      
return home, and, for want of enemies, engage in what I call a civil        
war among themselves.                                                       
  That in some fields of his country there are certain shining              
stones of several colors, whereof the Yahoos are violently fond, and        
when part of these stones is fixed in the earth, as it sometimes            
happens, they will dig with their claws for whole days to get them          
out, then carry them away, and hide them by heaps in their kennels;         
but still looking round with great caution, for fear their comrades         
should find out their treasure. My master said he could never discover      
the reason of this unnatural appetite, or how these stones could be of      
any use to a Yahoo; but now he believed it might proceed from the same      
principle of avarice which I had ascribed to mankind: that he had           
once, by way of experiment, privately removed a heap of these stones        
from the place where one of his Yahoos had buried it: whereupon the         
sordid animal missing his treasure, by his loud lamenting brought           
the whole herd to the place, there miserably howled, then fell to           
biting and tearing the rest, began to pine away, would neither eat nor      
sleep nor work, till he ordered a servant privately to convey the           
stones into the same hole and hide them as before; which when his           
Yahoo had found, he presently recovered his spirits and good humor,         
but took good care to remove them to a better hiding place, and has         
ever since been a very serviceable brute.                                   
  My master farther assured me, which I also observed myself, that          
in the fields where the shining stones abound, the fiercest and most        
frequent battles are fought, occasioned by perpetual inroads of the         
neighboring Yahoos.                                                         
  He said it was common when two Yahoos discovered such a stone in a        
field, and were contending which of them should be the proprietor, a        
third would take the advantage, and carry it away from them both;           
which my master would needs contend to have some kind of resemblance        
with our suits at law; wherein I thought it for our credit not to           
undeceive him; since the decision he mentioned was much more equitable      
than many decrees among us; because the plaintiff and defendant             
there lost nothing beside the stone they contended for, whereas our         
courts of equity would never have dismissed the cause while either          
of them had any thing left.                                                 
  My master, his discourse, said there was nothing that rendered the        
Yahoos more odious than their undistinguishing appetite to devour           
every thing that came in their way, whether herbs, roots, berries, the      
corrupted flesh of animals, or all mingled together; and it was             
peculiar in their temper that they were fonder of what they could           
get by rapine or stealth at a greater distance than much better food        
provided for them at home. If their prey held out, they would eat till      
they were ready to burst, after which nature had pointed out to them a      
certain root that gave them a general evacuation.                           
                                                    {P_4|CH_7 ^paragraph 10}
  There was also another kind of root very juicy, but somewhat rare         
and difficult to be found, which the Yahoos sought for with much            
eagerness, and would suck it with great delight; and it produced in         
them the same effects that wine has upon us. It would make them             
sometimes hug, and sometimes tear one another; they would howl and          
grin, and chatter, and reel, and tumble, and then fall asleep in the        
dirt.                                                                       
  I did indeed observe that the Yahoos were the only animals in this        
country subject to any diseases; which, however, were much fewer            
than horses have among us, and contracted not by any ill treatment          
they meet with, but by the nastiness and greediness of that sordid          
brute. Neither has their language any more than a general                   
appellation for those maladies, which is borrowed from the name of the      
beast, and called Hnea-Yahoo, or the Yahoo's evil, and the cure             
prescribed is a mixture of their own dung and urine forcibly put            
down the Yahoo's throat. This I have since often known to have been         
taken with success, and do freely recommend it to my countrymen, for        
the public good, as an admirable specific against all diseases              
produced by repletion.                                                      
  As to learning, government, arts, manufactures, and the like, my          
master confessed he could find little or no resemblance between the         
Yahoos of that country and those in ours. For he only meant to observe      
what parity there was in our natures. He had heard indeed some curious      
Houyhnhnms observe that in most herds there was a sort of ruling Yahoo      
(as among us there is generally some leading or principal stag in a         
park), who was always more deformed in body and mischievous in              
disposition than any of the rest. That this leader had usually a            
favorite as like himself as he could get, whose employment was to lick      
his master's feet and posteriors, and drive the female Yahoos to his        
kennel; for which he was now and then rewarded with a piece of ass's        
flesh. This favorite is hated by the whole herd, and therefore to           
protect himself, keeps always near the person of his leader. He             
usually continues in office till worse can be found; but the very           
moment he is discarded, his successor, at the head of all the Yahoos        
in that district, young and old, male and female, come in a body,           
and discharge their excrements upon him from head to foot. But how far      
this might be applicable to our courts and favorites, and ministers of      
state, my master said I could best determine.                               
  I dared make no return to this malicious insinuation, which               
debased human understanding below the sagacity of a common hound,           
who has judgment enough to distinguish and follow the cry of the            
ablest dog in the pack, without being ever mistaken.                        
  My master told me there were some qualities remarkable in the             
Yahoos, which he had not observed me to mention, or at least very           
slightly, in the accounts I had given him of human kind. He said those      
animals, like other brutes, had their females in common; but in this        
they differed, that the she Yahoo would admit the male while she was        
pregnant; and that the hes would quarrel and fight with the females as      
fiercely as with each other. Both which practices were such degrees of      
brutality, that no other sensitive creature ever arrived at.                
                                                    {P_4|CH_7 ^paragraph 15}
  Another thing he wondered at in the Yahoos was their strange              
disposition to nastiness and dirt, whereas there appears to be a            
natural love of cleanliness in all other animals. As to the former          
accusation, I was glad to let it pass without any reply, because I had      
not a word to offer upon it in defense of my species, which                 
otherwise I certainly had done from my own inclinations. But I could        
have easily vindicated human kind from the imputation of singularity        
upon the last article, if there had been any swine in that country (as      
unluckily for me there were not), which although it may be a sweeter        
quadruped than a Yahoo, cannot I humbly conceive in justice pretend to      
more cleanliness; and so his Honor himself must have owned, if he           
had seen their filthy way of feeding, and their custom of wallowing         
and sleeping in the mud.                                                    
  My master likewise mentioned another quality which his servants           
had discovered in several Yahoos, and to him was wholly unaccountable.      
He said, a fancy would sometimes take a Yahoo to retire into a corner,      
to lie down and howl and groan, and spurn away all that came near him,      
although he were young and fat, wanted neither food nor water; nor did      
the servants imagine what could possibly ail him. And the only              
remedy they found was to set him to hard work, after which he would         
infallibly come to himself. To this I was silent out of partiality          
to my own kind; yet here I could plainly discover the true seeds of         
spleen, which only seizes on the lazy, the luxurious, and the rich;         
who, if they were forced to undergo the same regimen, I would               
undertake for the cure.                                                     
  His Honor had further observed that a female Yahoo would often stand      
behind a bank or a bush, to gaze on the young males passing by, and         
then appear, and hide, using many antic gestures and grimaces, at           
which time it was observed that she had a most offensive smell; and         
when any of the males advanced, would slowly retire, looking often          
back, and with a counterfeit show of fear, run off into some                
convenient place where she knew the male would follow her.                  
  At other times if a female stranger came among them, three or four        
of her own sex would get about her, and stare and chatter, and grin,        
and smell her all over; and then turn off with gestures that seemed to      
express contempt and disdain.                                               
  Perhaps my master might refine a little in these speculations, which      
he had drawn from what he observed himself, or had been told him by         
others; however, I could not reflect without some amazement, and            
much sorrow, that the rudiments of coquetry, censure, and scandal,          
should have place by instinct in womankind.                                 
                                                    {P_4|CH_7 ^paragraph 20}
  I expected every moment that my master would accuse the Yahoos of         
those unnatural appetites in both sexes, so common among us. But            
nature, it seems, has not been so expert a school mistress; and             
these politer pleasures are entirely the productions of art and             
reason, on our side of the globe.                                           
                                                                            
P_4|CH_8                                                                    
  CHAPTER VIII                                                              
-                                                                           
  As I ought to have understood human nature much better than I             
supposed it possible for my master to do, so it was easy to apply           
the character he gave of the Yahoos to myself and my countrymen; and I      
believed I could yet make farther discoveries from my own observation.      
I therefore often begged his favor to let me go among the herds of          
Yahoos in the neighborhood, to which he always very graciously              
consented, being perfectly convinced that the hatred I bore those           
brutes would never suffer me to be corrupted by them; and his Honor         
ordered one of his servants, a strong sorrel nag, very honest and           
good-natured, to be my guard, without whose protection I dare not           
undertake such adventures. For I have already told the reader how much      
I was pestered by those odious animals upon my first arrival. And I         
afterwards failed very narrowly three or four times of falling into         
their clutches, when I happened to stray at any distance without my         
hanger. And I have reason to believe they had some imagination that         
I was of their own species, which I often assisted myself, by               
stripping up my sleeves, and showing my naked arms and breast in their      
sight, when my protector was with me. At which times they would             
approach as near as they dare, and imitate my actions after the manner      
of monkeys, but ever with great signs of hatred; as a tame jackdaw          
with cap and stockings is always persecuted by the wild ones, when          
he happens to get among them.                                               
  They are prodigiously nimble from their infancy; however, I once          
caught a young male of three years old, and endeavored by all marks of      
tenderness to make it quiet; but the little imp fell a squalling and        
scratching and biting with such violence that I was forced to let it        
go; and it was high time, for a whole troop of old ones came about          
us at the noise, but finding the cub was safe (for away it ran), and        
my sorrel nag being by, they dare not venture near us. I observed           
the young animal's flesh to smell very rank, and the stink was              
somewhat between a weasel and a fox, but much more disagreeable. I          
forgot another circumstance (and perhaps I might have the reader's          
pardon if it were wholly omitted), that while I held the odious vermin      
in my hands, it voided its filthy excrements of a yellow liquid             
substance, all over my clothes; but by good fortune there was a             
small brook hard by, where I washed myself as clean as I could;             
although I dare not come into my master's presence, until I were            
sufficiently aired.                                                         
  By what I could discover, the Yahoos appear to be the most                
unteachable of all animals, their capacities never reaching higher          
than to draw or carry burdens. Yet I am of opinion this defect              
arises chiefly from a perverse, restive disposition. For they are           
cunning, malicious, treacherous, and revengeful. They are strong and        
hardy, but of a cowardly spirit, and by consequence, insolent, abject,      
and cruel. It is observed that the red haired of both sexes are more        
libidinous and mischievous than the rest, whom yet they much exceed in      
strength and activity.                                                      
  The Houyhnhnms keep the Yahoos for present use in huts not far            
from the house; but the rest are sent abroad to certain fields,             
where they dig up roots, eat several kinds of herbs, and search             
about for carrion, or sometimes catch weasels and luhimuhs (a sort          
of wild rat), which they greedily devour. Nature has taught them to         
dig deep holes with their nails on the side of a rising ground,             
wherein they lie by themselves; only the kennels of the females are         
larger, sufficient to hold two or three cubs.                               
  They swim from their infancy like frogs, and are able to continue         
long under water, where they often take fish, which the females             
carry home to their young. And upon this occasion, I hope the reader        
will pardon my relating an odd adventure.                                   
                                                     {P_4|CH_8 ^paragraph 5}
  Being one day abroad with my protector, the sorrel nag, and the           
weather exceeding hot, I entreated him to let me bathe in a river that      
was near. He consented, and I immediately stripped myself stark naked,      
and went down softly into the stream. It happened that a young              
female Yahoo, standing behind a bank, saw the whole proceeding, and         
inflamed by desire, as the nag and I conjectured, came running with         
all speed, and leaped into the water, within five yards of the place        
where I bathed. I was never in my life so terribly frighted; the nag        
was grazing at some distance, not suspecting any harm. She embraced me      
after a most fulsome manner; I roared as loud as I could, and the           
nag came galloping towards me, whereupon she quitted her grasp, with        
the utmost reluctancy, and leaped upon the opposite bank, where she         
stood gazing and howling all the time I was putting on my clothes.          
  This was matter of diversion to my master and his family, as well as      
of mortification to myself. For now I could no longer deny that I           
was a real Yahoo in every limb and feature, since the females had a         
natural propensity to me, as one of their own species. Neither was the      
hair of this brute of a red color (which might have been some excuse        
for an appetite a little irregular), but black as a sloe, and her           
countenance did not make an appearance altogether so hideous as the         
rest of the kind; for, I think, she could not be above eleven years         
old.                                                                        
  Having lived three years in this country, the reader I suppose            
will expect that I should, like other travelers, give him some account      
of the manners and customs of its inhabitants, which it was indeed          
my principal study to learn.                                                
  As these noble Houyhnhnms are endowed by nature with a general            
disposition to all virtues, and have no conceptions or ideas of what        
is evil in a rational creature, so their grand maxim is to cultivate        
reason, and to be wholly governed by it. Neither is reason among            
them a point problematical as with us, where men can argue with             
plausibility on both sides of the question; but strikes you with            
immediate conviction; as it must needs do where it is not mingled,          
obscured, or discolored by passion and interest. I remember it was          
with extreme difficulty that I could bring my master to understand the      
meaning of the word opinion, or how a point could be disputable;            
because reason taught us to affirm or deny only where we are                
certain, and beyond our knowledge we cannot do either. So that              
controversies, wranglings, disputes, and positiveness in false or           
dubious propositions, are evils unknown among the Houyhnhnms. In the        
like manner when I used to explain to him our several systems of            
natural philosophy, he would laugh that a creature pretending to            
reason should value itself upon the knowledge of other people's             
conjectures, and in things where that knowledge, if it were certain,        
could be of no use. Wherein he agreed entirely with the sentiments          
of Socrates, as Plato delivers them; which I mention as the highest         
honor I can do that prince of philosophers. I have often since              
reflected what destruction such a doctrine would make in the libraries      
of Europe, and how many paths to fame would be then shut up in the          
learned world.                                                              
  Friendship and benevolence are the two principal virtues among the        
Houyhnhnms, and these not confined to particular objects, but               
universal to the whole race. For a stranger from the remotest part          
is equally treated with the nearest neighbor, and wherever he goes          
looks upon himself as at home. They preserve decency and civility in        
the highest degrees, but are altogether ignorant of ceremony. They          
have no fondness for their colts or foals, but the care they take in        
educating them proceeds entirely from the dictates of reason. And I         
observed my master to show the same affection to his neighbor's             
issue that he had for his own. They will have it that nature teaches        
them to love the whole species, and it is reason only that makes a          
distinction of persons, where there is a superior degree of virtue.         
                                                    {P_4|CH_8 ^paragraph 10}
  When the matron Houyhnhnms have produced one of each sex, they no         
longer accompany with their consorts, except they lose one of their         
issue by some casualty, which very seldom happens; but in such a            
case they meet again; or when the like accident befalls a person whose      
wife is past bearing, some other couple bestow on him one of their own      
colts, and then go together again till the mother is pregnant. This         
caution is necessary to prevent the country from being overburdened         
with numbers. But the race of inferior Houyhnhnms bred up to be             
servants is not so strictly limited upon this article; these are            
allowed to produce three of each sex, to be domestics in the noble          
families.                                                                   
  In their marriages they are exactly careful to choose such colors as      
will not make any disagreeable mixture in the breed. Strength is            
chiefly valued in the male, and comeliness in the female; not upon the      
account of love, but to preserve the race from degenerating; for where      
a female happens to excel in strength, a consort is chosen with regard      
to comeliness. Courtship, love, presents, jointures, settlements, have      
no place in their thoughts, or terms whereby to express them in             
their language. The young couple meet and are joined, merely because        
it is the determination of their parents and friends: it is what            
they see done every day, and they look upon it as one of the necessary      
actions of a rational being. But the violation of marriage, or any          
other unchastity, was never heard of; and the married pair pass             
their lives with the same friendship and mutual benevolence that            
they bear to all others of the same species who come in their way;          
without jealousy, fondness, quarrelling, or discontent.                     
  In educating the youth of both sexes, their method is admirable, and      
highly deserves our imitation. These are not suffered to taste a grain      
of oats, except upon certain days, till eighteen years old; nor             
milk, but very rarely; and in summer they graze two hours in the            
morning, and as long in the evening, which their parents likewise           
observe; but the servants are not allowed above half that time, and         
a great part of their grass is brought home, which they eat at the          
most convenient hours, when they can be best spared from work.              
  Temperance, industry, exercise and cleanliness, are the lessons           
equally enjoined to the young ones of both sexes; and my master             
thought it monstrous in us to give the females a different kind of          
education from the males, except in some articles of domestic               
management; whereby, as he truly observed, one half of our natives          
were good for nothing but bringing children into the world; and to          
trust the care of our children to such useless animals, he said, was        
yet a greater instance of brutality.                                        
  But the Houyhnhnms train up their youth to strength, speed, and           
hardiness, by exercising them in running races up and down steep            
hills, and over hard stony grounds; and when they are all in a              
sweat, they are ordered to leap over head and ears into a pond or           
river. Four times a year the youth of a certain district meet to            
show their proficiency in running and leaping, and other feats of           
strength and agility; where the victor is rewarded with a song made in      
his or her praise. On this festival the servants drive a herd of            
Yahoos into the field, laden with hay and oats and milk, for a              
repast to the Houyhnhnms; after which these brutes are immediately          
driven back again, for fear of being noisome to the assembly.               
                                                    {P_4|CH_8 ^paragraph 15}
  Every fourth year, at the vernal equinox, there is a                      
representative council of the whole nation, which meets in a plain          
about twenty miles from our house, and continues about five or six          
days. Here they inquire into the state and condition of the several         
districts; whether they abound or be deficient in hay or oats, or cows      
or Yahoos. And wherever there is any want (which is seldom) it is           
immediately supplied by unanimous consent and contribution. Here            
likewise the regulation of children is settled: as for instance, if         
a Houyhnhnm has two males, he changes one of them with another that         
has two females; and when a child has been lost by any casualty, where      
the mother is past breeding, it is determined what family in the            
district shall breed another to supply the loss.                            
                                                                            
P_4|CH_9                                                                    
  CHAPTER IX                                                                
-                                                                           
  One of these grand assemblies was held in my time, about three            
months before my departure, whither my master went as the                   
representative of our district. In this council was resumed their           
old debate, and indeed, the only debate which ever happened in that         
country; whereof my master after his return gave me a very                  
particular account.                                                         
  The question to be debated was whether the Yahoos should be               
exterminated from the face of the earth. One of the members for the         
affirmative offered several arguments of great strength and weight,         
alleging that as the Yahoos were the most filthy, noisome, and              
deformed animal which nature ever produced, so they were the most           
restive and indocible, mischievous and malicious: they would privately      
suck the teats of the Houyhnhnms' cows, kill and devour their cats,         
trample down their oats and grass, if they were not continually             
watched, and commit a thousand other extravagancies. He took notice of      
a general tradition, that Yahoos had not been always in that                
country; but that many ages ago two of these brutes appeared                
together upon a mountain, whether produced by the heat of the sun upon      
corrupted mud and slime, or from the ooze and froth of the sea, was         
never known. That these Yahoos engendered, and their brood in a             
short time grew so numerous as to overrun and infest the whole nation.      
That the Houyhnhnms to get rid of this evil, made a general hunting,        
and at last enclosed the whole herd; and destroying the elder, every        
Houyhnhnm kept two young ones in a kennel, and brought them to such         
a degree of tameness, as an animal so savage by nature can be               
capable of acquiring; using them for draught and carriage. That             
there seemed to be much truth in this tradition, and that those             
creatures could not be Ylnhniamshy (or aborigines of the land),             
because of the violent hatred the Houyhnhnms, as well as all other          
animals, bore them; which although their evil disposition sufficiently      
deserved, could never have arrived at so high a degree, if they had         
been aborigines, or else they would have long since been rooted out.        
That the inhabitants taking a fancy to use the service of the               
Yahoos, had very imprudently neglected to cultivate the breed of            
asses, which were a comely animal, easily kept, more tame and orderly,      
without any offensive smell, strong enough for labor, although they         
yield to the other in agility of body; and if their braying be no           
agreeable sound, it is far preferable to the horrible howlings of           
the Yahoos.                                                                 
  Several others declared their sentiments to the same purpose, when        
my master proposed an expedient to the assembly, whereof he had indeed      
borrowed the hint from me. He approved of the tradition mentioned by        
the honorable member who spoke before, and affirmed that the two            
Yahoos said to be first seen among them had been driven there over the      
sea; that coming to land and being forsaken by their companions they        
retired to the mountains, and degenerating by degrees, became in            
process of time, much more savage than those of their own species in        
the country from where these two originals came. The reason of his          
assertion was that he had now in his possession a certain wonderful         
Yahoo (meaning myself), which most of them had heard of, and many of        
them had seen. He then related to them how he first found me; that          
my body was all covered with an artificial composure of the skins           
and hairs of other animals; that I spoke in a language of my own,           
and had thoroughly learned theirs; that I had related to him the            
accidents which brought me there; that when he saw me without my            
covering I was an exact Yahoo in every part, only of a whiter color,        
less hairy, and with shorter claws. He added how I had endeavored to        
persuade him that in my own and other countries the Yahoos acted as         
the governing, rational animal, and held the Houyhnhnms in                  
servitude; that he observed in me all the qualities of a Yahoo, only a      
little more civilized by some tincture of reason, which however was in      
a degree as far inferior to the Houyhnhnm race as the Yahoos of             
their country were to me; that among other things I mentioned a custom      
we had of castrating Houyhnhnms when they were young, in order to           
render them tame; that the operation was easy and safe; that it was no      
shame to learn wisdom from brutes, as industry is taught by the ant,        
and building by the swallow. (For so I translate the word lyhannh,          
although it be a much larger fowl.) That this invention might be            
practiced upon the younger Yahoos here, which, besides rendering            
them tractable and fitter for use, would in an age put an end to the        
whole species without destroying life. That in the meantime the             
Houyhnhnms should be exhorted to cultivate the breed of asses,              
which, as they are in all respects more valuable brutes, so they            
have this advantage, to be fit for service at five years old, which         
the others are not till twelve.                                             
  This was all my master thought fit to tell me at that time of what        
passed in the grand council. But he was pleased to conceal one              
particular, which related personally to myself, whereof I soon felt         
the unhappy effect, as the reader will know in its proper place, and        
from which I date all the succeeding misfortunes of my life.                
  The Houyhnhnms have no letters, and consequently their knowledge          
is all traditional. But there happening few events of any moment among      
a people so well united, naturally disposed to every virtue, wholly         
governed by reason, and cut off from all commerce with other                
nations, the historical part is easily preserved without burdening          
their memories. I have already observed that they are subject to no         
diseases, and therefore can have no need of physicians. However,            
they have excellent medicines composed of herbs, to cure accidental         
bruises and cuts in the pastern or frog of the foot by sharp stones,        
as well as other maims and hurts in the several parts of the body.          
                                                     {P_4|CH_9 ^paragraph 5}
  They calculate the year by the revolution of the sun and the moon,        
but use no subdivisions into weeks. They are well enough acquainted         
with the motions of those two luminaries, and understand the nature of      
eclipses; and this is the utmost progress of their astronomy.               
  In poetry they must be allowed to excel all other mortals; wherein        
the justness of their similes, and the minuteness, as well as               
exactness of their descriptions, are indeed inimitable. Their verses        
abound very much in both of these, and usually contain either some          
exalted notions of friendship and benevolence, or the praises of those      
who were victors in races and other bodily exercises. Their buildings,      
although very rude and simple, are not inconvenient, but well               
contrived to defend them from all injuries of cold and heat. They have      
a kind of tree, which at forty years old loosens in the root, and           
falls with the first storm: they grow very straight, and being pointed      
like stakes with a sharp stone (for the Houyhnhnms know not the use of      
iron), they stick them erect in the ground about ten inches asunder,        
and then weave in oat straw, or sometimes wattles betwixt them. The         
roof is made after the same manner, and so are the doors.                   
  The Houyhnhnms use the hollow part between the pastern and the            
hoof of their fore feet as we do our hands, and this with greater           
dexterity than I could at first imagine. I have seen a white mare of        
our family thread a needle (which I lent her on purpose) with that          
joint. They milk their cows, reap their oats, and do all the work           
which requires hands, in the same manner. They have a kind of hard          
flints, which by grinding against other stones, they form into              
instruments, that serve instead of wedges, axes, and hammers. With          
tools made of these flints they likewise cut their hay and reap             
their oats, which there groweth naturally in several fields: the            
Yahoos draw home the sheaves in carriages, and the servants tread them      
in certain covered huts, to get out the grain, which is kept in             
stores. They make a rude kind of earthen and wooden vessels, and            
bake the former in the sun.                                                 
  If they can avoid casualties, they die only of old age, and are           
buried in the most obscure places that can be found, their friends and      
relations expressing neither joy nor grief at their departure; nor          
does the dying person discover the least regret that he is leaving the      
world, any more than if he were upon returning home from a visit to         
one of his neighbors. I remember my master having once made an              
appointment with a friend and his family to come to his house upon          
some affair of importance, on the day fixed the mistress and her two        
children came very late; she made two excuses, first for her                
husband, who, as she said, happened that very morning to shnuwnh.           
The word is strongly expressive in their language, but not easily           
rendered into English; it signifies, to retire to his first mother.         
Her excuse for not coming sooner was that her husband dying late in         
the morning, she was a good while consulting her servants about a           
convenient place where his body should be laid; and I observed she          
behaved herself at our house as cheerfully as the rest, and died about      
three months after.                                                         
  They live generally to seventy or seventy-five years, very seldom to      
fourscore: some weeks before their death they feel a gradual decay,         
but without pain. During this time they are much visited by their           
friends, because they cannot go abroad with their usual ease and            
satisfaction. However, about ten days before their death, which they        
seldom fail in computing, they return the visits that have been made        
them by those who are nearest in the neighborhood, being carried in         
a convenient sledge drawn by Yahoos; which vehicle they use, not            
only upon this occasion, but when they grow old, upon long journeys,        
or when they are lamed by any accident. And therefore when the dying        
Houyhnhnms return those visits, they take a solemn leave of their           
friends, as if they were going to some remote part of the country,          
where they designed to pass the rest of their lives.                        
                                                    {P_4|CH_9 ^paragraph 10}
  I know not whether it may be worth observing that the Houyhnhnms          
have no word in their language to express any thing that is evil,           
except what they borrow from the deformities or ill qualities of the        
Yahoos. Thus they denote the folly of a servant, an omission of a           
child, a stone that cuts their feet, a continuance of foul or               
unseasonable weather, and the like, by adding to each the epithet of        
Yahoo. For instance, Hhnm Yahoo, Whnaholm Yahoo, Ynlhmndwihlma Yahoo,       
and an ill-contrived house Ynholmhnmrohlnw Yahoo.                           
  I could with great pleasure enlarge further upon the manners and          
virtues of this excellent people; but intending in a short time to          
publish a volume by itself expressly upon that subject, I refer the         
reader there, and in the meantime, proceed to relate my own sad             
catastrophe,                                                                
                                                                            
P_4|CH_10                                                                   
  CHAPTER X                                                                 
-                                                                           
  I had settled my little economy to my own heart's content. My master      
had ordered a room to be made for me after their manner, about six          
yards from the house; the sides and floors of which I plastered with        
clay, and covered with rushmats of my own contriving; I had beaten          
hemp, which there grows wild, and made of it a sort of ticking; this I      
filled with the feathers of several birds I had taken with springes         
made of Yahoos' hairs, and were excellent food. I had worked two            
chairs with my knife, the sorrel nag helping me in the grosser and          
more laborious part. When my clothes were worn to rags, I made              
myself others with the skins of rabbits, and of a certain beautiful         
animal about the same size, called nnuhnoh, the skin of which is            
covered with a fine down. Of these I likewise made very tolerable           
stockings. I soled my shoes with wood which I cut from a tree and           
fitted to the upper leather, and when this was worn out, I supplied it      
with the skins of Yahoos dried in the sun. I often got honey out of         
hollow trees, which I mingled with water, or ate with my bread. No man      
could more verify the truth of these two maxims, That nature is very        
easily satisfied; and That necessity is the mother of invention. I          
enjoyed perfect health of body, and tranquillity of mind; I did not         
feel the treachery or inconstancy of a friend, nor the injuries of a        
secret or open enemy. I had no occasion of bribing, flattering, or          
pimping to procure the favor of any great man or of his minion. I           
wanted no fence against fraud or oppression; here was neither               
physician to destroy my body, nor lawyer to ruin my fortune; no             
informer to watch my words and actions, or forge accusations against        
me for hire; here were no gibers, censurers, backbiters,                    
pickpockets, highwaymen, housebreakers, attorneys, bawds, buffoons,         
gamesters, politicians, wits, splenetics, tedious talkers,                  
controvertists, ravishers, murderers, robbers, virtuosos; no leaders        
or followers of party and faction; no encouragers to vice, by               
seducement or examples; no dungeon, axes, gibbets, whipping posts,          
or pillories; no cheating shopkeepers or mechanics; no pride,               
vanity, or affectation; no fops, bullies, drunkards, strolling whores,      
or poxes; no ranting, lewd, expensive wives; no stupid, proud pedants;      
no importunate, overbearing, quarrelsome, noisy, roaring, empty,            
conceited, swearing companions; no scoundrels, raised from the dust         
for the sake of their vices, or nobility thrown into it on account          
of their virtues: no lords, fiddlers, judges, or dancing masters.           
  I had the favor of being admitted to several Houyhnhnms, who came to      
visit or dine with my master; where his Honor graciously suffered me        
to wait in the room, and listen to their discourse. Both he and his         
company would often descend to ask me questions, and receive my             
answers. I had also sometimes the honor of attending my master in           
his visits to others. I never presumed to speak, except in answer to a      
question; and then I did it with inward regret, because it was a            
loss of so much time for improving myself; but I was infinitely             
delighted with the station of an humble auditor in such conversations,      
where nothing passed but what was useful, expressed in the fewest           
and most significant words; where the greatest decency was observed,        
without the least degree of ceremony; where no person spoke without         
being pleased himself, and pleasing his companions; where there was no      
interruption, tediousness, heat, or difference of sentiments. They          
have a notion that when people are met together, a silence does much        
improve conversation: this I found to be true; for during those little      
intermissions of talk, new ideas would arise in their thoughts,             
which very much enlivened the discourse. Their subjects are                 
generally on friendship and benevolence, or order and economy;              
sometimes upon the visible operations of nature, or ancient                 
traditions; upon the bounds and limits of virtue; upon the unerring         
rules of reason, or upon some determinations to be taken at the next        
great assembly; and often upon the various excellencies of poetry. I        
may add without vanity that my presence often gave them sufficient          
matter for discourse, because it afforded my master an occasion of          
letting his friends into the history of me and my country, upon             
which they were all pleased to descant in a manner not very                 
advantageous to human kind; and for that reason I shall not repeat          
what they said: only I may be allowed to observe that his Honor, to my      
great admiration, appeared to understand the nature of Yahoos in all        
countries much better than myself. He went through all our vices and        
follies, and discovered many which I had never mentioned to him, by         
only supposing what qualities a Yahoo of their country, with a small        
proportion of reason, might be capable of exerting; and concluded,          
with too much probability, how vile as well as miserable such a             
creature must be.                                                           
  I freely confess that all the little knowledge I have of any value        
was acquired by the lectures I received from my master, and from            
hearing the discourses of him and his friends; to which I should be         
prouder to listen than to dictate to the greatest and wisest                
assembly in Europe. I admired the strength, comeliness, and speed of        
the inhabitants; and such a constellation of virtues in such amiable        
persons produced in me the highest veneration. At first, indeed, I did      
not feel that natural awe which the Yahoos and all other animals            
bear towards them; but it grew upon me by degrees, much sooner than         
I imagined, and was mingled with a respectful love and gratitude, that      
they would condescend to distinguish me from the rest of my species.        
  When I thought of my family, my friends, my countrymen, or human          
race in general, I considered them as they really were, Yahoos in           
shape and disposition, perhaps a little more civilized, and                 
qualified with the gift of speech, but making no other use of reason        
than to improve and multiply those vices whereof their brethren in          
this country had only the share that nature allotted them. When I           
happened to behold the reflection of my own form in a lake or               
fountain, I turned away my face in horror and detestation of myself,        
and could better endure the sight of a common Yahoo than of my own          
person. By conversing with the Houyhnhnms, and looking upon them            
with delight, I fell to imitate their gait and gesture, which is now        
grown into an habit, and my friends often tell me in a blunt way, that      
I trot like a horse; which, however, I take for a great compliment.         
Neither shall I disown that in speaking I am apt to fall into the           
voice and manner of the Houyhnhnms, and hear myself ridiculed on            
that account without the least mortification.                               
  In the midst of all this happiness, and when I looked upon myself to      
be fully settled for life, my master sent for me one morning a              
little earlier than his usual hour. I observed by his countenance that      
he was in some perplexity, and at a loss how to begin what he had to        
speak. After a short silence he told me he did not know how I would         
take what he was going to say; that in the last general assembly, when      
the affair of the Yahoos was entered upon, the representatives had          
taken offense at his keeping a Yahoo (meaning myself) in his family         
more like a Houyhnhnm than a brute animal. That he was known                
frequently to converse with me, as if he could receive some                 
advantage or pleasure in my company; that such a practice was not           
agreeable to reason or nature, nor a thing ever heard of before             
among them. The assembly did therefore exhort him, either to employ me      
like the rest of my species, or command me to swim back to the place        
from where I came. That the first of these expedients was utterly           
rejected by all the Houyhnhnms who had ever seen me at his house or         
their own: for they alleged that because I had some rudiments of            
reason, added to the natural pravity of those animals, it was to be         
feared I might be able to seduce them into the woody and mountainous        
parts of the country, and bring them in troops by night to destroy the      
Houyhnhnms cattle, as being naturally of the ravenous kind, and averse      
from labor.                                                                 
                                                    {P_4|CH_10 ^paragraph 5}
  My master added that he was daily pressed by the Houyhnhnms of the        
neighborhood to have the assembly's exhortation executed, which he          
could not put off much longer. He doubted it would be impossible for        
me to swim to another country, and therefore wished I would contrive        
some sort of vehicle resembling those I had described to him, that          
might carry me on the sea; in which work I should have the                  
assistance of his own servants, as well as those of his neighbors.          
He concluded that for his own part he could have been content to            
keep me in his service as long as I lived; because he found I had           
cured myself of some bad habits and dispositions, by endeavoring, as        
far as my inferior nature was capable, to imitate the Houyhnhnms.           
  I should here observe to the reader, that a decree of the general         
assembly in this country is expressed by the word hnhloayn, which           
signifies an exhortation, as near as I can render it; for they have no      
conception how a rational creature can be compelled, but only               
advised or exhorted, because no person can disobey reason without           
giving up his claim to be a rational creature.                              
  I was struck with the utmost grief and despair at my master's             
discourse, and being unable to support the agonies I was under, I fell      
into a swoon at his feet; when I came to myself he told me that he          
concluded I had been dead (for these people are subject to no such          
imbecilities of nature). I answered in a faint voice that death             
would have been too great a happiness; that although I could not blame      
the assembly's exhortation, or the urgency of his friends, yet, in          
my weak and corrupt judgment, I thought it might consist with reason        
to have been less rigorous. That I could not swim a league, and             
probably the nearest land to theirs might be distant above a                
hundred; that many materials necessary for making a small vessel to         
carry me off, were wholly wanting in this country, which, however, I        
would attempt in obedience and gratitude to his Honor, although I           
concluded the thing to be impossible, and therefore looked on myself        
as already devoted to destruction. That the certain prospect of an          
unnatural death was the least of my evils; for supposing I should           
escape with life by some strange adventure, how could I think with          
temper of passing my days among Yahoos, and relapsing into my old           
corruptions, for want of examples to lead and keep me within the paths      
of virtue? That I knew too well upon what solid reasons all the             
determinations of the wise Houyhnhnms were founded, not to be shaken        
by arguments of mine, a miserable Yahoo; and therefore, after               
presenting him with my humble thanks for the offer of his servants'         
assistance in making a vessel, and desiring a reasonable time for so        
difficult a work, I told him I would endeavor to preserve a wretched        
being; and if ever I returned to England, was not without hopes of          
being useful to my own species by celebrating the praises of the            
renowned Houyhnhnms, and proposing their virtues to the imitation of        
mankind.                                                                    
  My master in a few words made me a very gracious reply, allowed me        
the space of two months to finish my boat; and ordered the sorrel nag,      
my fellow servant (for so this distance I may presume to call him)          
to follow my instructions, because I told my master that his help           
would be sufficient, and I knew he had a tenderness for me.                 
  In his company my first business was to go to that part of the coast      
where my rebellious crew had ordered me to be set on shore. I got upon      
a height, and looking on every side into the sea, fancied I saw a           
small island towards the northeast: I took out my pocket-glass, and         
could then clearly distinguish it about five leagues off, as I              
computed; but it appeared to the sorrel nag to be only a blue cloud;        
for as he had no conception of any country beside his own, so he could      
not be as expert in distinguishing remote objects at sea as we who          
so much converse in that element.                                           
                                                   {P_4|CH_10 ^paragraph 10}
  After I had discovered this island, I considered no farther; but          
resolved it should, if possible, be the first place of my                   
banishment, leaving the consequence to fortune.                             
  I returned home, and consulting with the sorrel nag, we went into         
a copse at some distance, where I with my knife, and he with a sharp        
flint fastened very artificially after their manner to a wooden             
handle, cut down several oak wattles about the thickness of a               
walking-staff, and some larger pieces. But I shall not trouble the          
reader with a particular description of my own mechanics; let it            
suffice to say that in six weeks time, with the help of the sorrel          
nag, who performed the parts that required most labor, I finished a         
sort of Indian canoe, but much larger, covering it with the skins of        
Yahoos well stitched together, with hempen threads of my own making.        
My sail was likewise composed of the skins of the same animal; but I        
made use of the youngest I could get, the older being too tough and         
thick; and I likewise provided myself with four paddles. I laid in a        
stock of boiled flesh, of rabbits and fowls, and took with me two           
vessels, one fined with milk and the other with water.                      
  I tried my canoe in a large pond near my master's house, and then         
corrected in it what was amiss; stopping all the chinks with Yahoos'        
tallow, till I found it staunch, and able to bear me and my freight.        
And when it was as complete as I could possibly make it, I had it           
drawn on a carriage very gently by Yahoos to the seaside, under the         
conduct of the sorrel nag and another servant.                              
-                                                                           
  When all was ready, and the day came for my departure, I took             
leave of my master and lady and the whole family, my eyes flowing with      
tears, and my heart quite sunk with grief. But his Honor, out of            
curiosity, and perhaps (if I may speak it without vanity) partly out        
of kindness, was determined to see me in my canoe, and got several          
of his neighboring friends to accompany him. I was forced to wait           
above an hour for the tide, and then observing the wind very                
fortunately bearing towards the island to which I intended to steer my      
course, I took a second leave of my master; but as I was going to           
prostrate myself to kiss his hoof, he did me the honor to raise it          
gently to my mouth. I am not ignorant how much I have been censured         
for mentioning this last particular. For my detractors are pleased          
to think it improbable that so illustrious a person should descend          
to give so great a mark of distinction to a creature so inferior as I.      
Neither have I forgot how apt some travelers are to boast of                
extraordinary favors they have received. But if these censurers were        
better acquainted with the noble and courteous disposition of the           
Houyhnhnms, they would soon change their opinion.                           
                                                   {P_4|CH_10 ^paragraph 15}
  I paid my respects to the rest of the Houyhnhnms in his Honor's           
company; then getting into my canoe, I pushed off from shore.               
                                                                            
P_4|CH_11                                                                   
  CHAPTER XI                                                                
-                                                                           
  I began this desperate voyage on February 15, 1714-5, at 9 o'clock        
in the morning. The wind was very favorable; however, I made use at         
first only of my paddles; but considering I should soon be weary,           
and that the wind might chop about, I ventured set up my little             
sail; and thus with the help of the tide I went at the rate of a            
league and a half an hour, as near as I could guess. My master and his      
friends continued on the shore till I was almost out of sight; and I        
often heard the sorrel nag (who always loved me) crying out, Hnuy illa      
nyha majah Yahoo, Take care of thyself, gentle Yahoo.                       
  My design was, if possible, to discover some small island                 
uninhabited, yet sufficient by my labor to furnish me with the              
necessaries of life, which I would have thought a greater happiness         
than to be first minister in the politest court of Europe; so horrible      
was the idea I conceived of returning to live in the society and under      
the government of Yahoos. For in such a solitude as I desired I             
could at least enjoy my own thoughts, and reflect with delight on           
the virtues of those inimitable Houyhnhnms, without any opportunity of      
degenerating into the vices and corruptions of my own species.              
  The reader may remember what I related when my crew conspired             
against me and confined me to my cabin. How I continued there               
several weeks without knowing what course we took; and when I was           
put ashore in the long-boat, how the sailors told me with oaths,            
whether true or false, that not in what part of the world we were.          
However, I did then believe us to be about ten degrees southward of         
the Cape of Good Hope, or about 45'degrees souther latitude, as I           
gathered from some general words I overheard among them, being I            
supposed to the southeast in their intended voyage to Madagascar.           
And although this were but little better than conjecture, I resolved        
to steer my course eastward, hoping to reach the south-west coast of        
New Holland, and perhaps some such island as I desired, lying westward      
of it. The wind was full west, and by six in the evening I computed         
I had gone eastward at least eighteen leagues, when I spied a very          
small island about half a league off, which I soon reached. It was          
nothing but a rock, with one creek, naturally arched by the force of        
tempests. Here I put in my canoe, and climbing up a part of the             
rock, I could plainly discover land to the east, extending from             
south to north. I lay all night in my canoe; and repeating my voyage        
early in the morning, I arrived in seven hours to the south-east point      
of New Holland. This confirmed me in the opinion I have long                
entertained, that the maps and charts place this country at least           
three degrees more to the east than it really is; which thought I           
communicated many years ago to my worthy friend Mr. Herman Moll, and        
gave him my reasons for it, although he has rather chosen to follow         
other authors.                                                              
  I saw no inhabitants in the place where I landed, and being unarmed,      
I was afraid of venturing far into the country. I found some shellfish      
on the shore, and ate them raw, not daring to kindle a fire, for            
fear of being discovered by the natives. I continued three days             
feeding on oysters and limpets, to save my own provisions; and I            
fortunately found a brook of excellent water, which gave me great           
relief.                                                                     
  On the fourth day, venturing out early a little too far, I saw            
twenty or thirty natives upon a height, not above five hundred yards        
from me. They were stark naked, men, women, and children, round a           
fire, as I could discover by the smoke. One of them spied me, and gave      
notice to the rest; five of them advanced towards me, leaving the           
women and children at the fire. I made what haste I could to the            
shore, and getting into my canoe, shoved off: the savages observing me      
retreat, ran after me; and before I could get far enough into the sea,      
discharged an arrow, which wounded me deeply on the inside of my            
left knee (I shall carry the mark to my grave). I apprehended the           
arrow might be poisoned, and paddling out of the reach of their             
darts (being a calm day), I made a shift to suck the wound and dress        
it as well as I could.                                                      
                                                    {P_4|CH_11 ^paragraph 5}
  I was at a loss what to do, for I durst not return to the same            
landing-place, but stood to the north, and was forced to paddle; for        
the wind, though very gentle, was against me, blowing northwest. As         
I was looking about for a secure landing-place, I saw a sail to the         
north-northeast, which appearing every minute more visible, I was in        
some doubt whether I should wait for them or no; but at last my             
detestation of the Yahoo race prevailed, and turning my canoe, I            
sailed and paddled together to the south, and got into the same             
creek from whence I set out in the morning, choosing rather to trust        
myself among these barbarians, than live with European Yahoos. I            
drew up my canoe as close as I could to the shore, and hid myself           
behind a stone by the little brook, which, as I have already said, was      
excellent water.                                                            
  The ship came within half a league of this creek, and sent her            
long-boat with vessels to take in fresh water (for the place it             
seems was very well known), but I did not observe it till the boat was      
almost on shore, and it was too late to seek another hiding-place. The      
seamen at their landing observed my canoe, and rummaging it all             
over, easily conjectured that the owner could not be far off. Four          
of them well armed searched every cranny and lurking-hole, till at          
last they found me flat on my face behind the stone. They gazed awhile      
in admiration at my strange uncouth dress, my coat made of skins, my        
wooden-soled shoes, and my furred stockings; from whence, however,          
they concluded I was not a native of the place, who all go naked.           
One of the seamen in Portuguese bid me rise, and asked who I was. I         
understood that language very well, and getting upon feet, said I           
was a poor Yahoo, banished from the Houyhnhnms, and desired they would      
please to let me depart. They admired to hear me answer them in             
their own tongue, and saw by my complexion I must be a European, but        
were at a loss to know what I meant by Yahoos and Houyhnhnms, and at        
the same time fell a laughing at my strange tone in speaking, which         
resembled the neighing of a horse. I trembled all the while between         
fear and hatred: I again desired leave to depart, and was gently            
moving to my canoe; but they laid hold of me, desiring to know what         
country I was of, whence I came, with many other questions. I told          
them I was born in England, from whence I came about five years ago,        
and then their country and ours were at peace. I therefore hoped            
they would not treat me as an enemy, since I meant them no harm, but        
was a poor Yahoo, seeking some desolate place where to pass the             
remainder of his unfortunate life.                                          
  When they began to talk, I thought I never heard or saw any thing so      
unnatural; for it appeared to me as dog or a cow should speak in            
England, or a Yahoo in Houyhnhnm-land The honest Portuguese were            
equally amazed at my strange dress, and the odd manner of delivering        
my words, which however they understood very well. They spoke to me         
with great humanity, and said they were sure the Captain would carry        
me gratis to Lisbon, from whence I might return to my own country;          
that two of the seamen would go back to the ship, inform the Captain        
of what they had seen, and receive his order; in the mean time, unless      
I would give my solemn oath not to fly, they would secure me by force.      
I thought it best to comply with their proposal. They were very             
curious to know my story, but I gave them very little satisfaction;         
and they all conjectured my misfortunes had impaired my reason. In two      
hours the boat, which went laden with vessels of water, returned            
with the Captain's command to fetch me on board. I fell on my knees to      
preserve my liberty; but all was in vain, and the men having tied me        
with cords, heaved me into the boat, from whence I was taken into           
the ship, and from thence into the Captain's cabin.                         
  His name was Pedro de Mendez; he was a very courteous and generous        
person; he entreated me to give some account of myself, and desired to      
know what I would eat or drink; said I should be used as well as            
himself, and spoke so many obliging things, that I wondered to find         
such civilities from a Yahoo. However, I remained silent and sullen; I      
was ready to faint at the very smell of him and his men. At last I          
desired something to eat out of my own canoe; but he ordered me a           
chicken and some excellent wine, and then directed that I should be         
put to bed in a very clean cabin. I would not undress myself, but           
lay on the bed-clothes, and in half an hour stole out, when I               
thought the crew was at dinner, and getting to the side of the ship         
was going to leap into the sea, and swim for my life, rather than           
continue among Yahoos. But one of the seamen prevented me, and              
having informed the Captain, I was chained to my cabin.                     
  After dinner Don Pedro came to me, and desired to know my reason for      
so desperate an attempt, assured me he only meant to do me all the          
service he was able, and spoke so very movingly, that at last I             
descended to treat him like an animal which had some little portion of      
reason. I gave him a very short relation of my voyage, of the               
conspiracy against me by own men, of the country where they set me          
on shore, and of my three years residence there. All which he looked        
upon as if it were a dream or a vision; whereat I took great                
offense, for I had quite forgotten the faculty of lying, so peculiar        
to Yahoos in all countries where they preside, and, consequently the        
disposition of suspecting truth in others of their own I asked him          
whether it were the custom in his country to say the thing that was         
not. I assured him I had almost forgotten what he meant by                  
falsehood, and if I had lived a thousand years in Houyhnhnm-land, I         
should never have heard a lie from the meanest servant, that I was          
altogether indifferent whether he believed me or not, but however,          
in return for his favors, I would give so much allowance to the             
corruption of his nature as to answer any objection he would please to      
make, and then he might easily discover the truth.                          
                                                   {P_4|CH_11 ^paragraph 10}
  The Captain, a wise man, after many endeavors to catch me tripping        
in some part of my story, at last began to have a better opinion of my      
veracity, and the rather, because he confessed he met with a Dutch          
skipper, who pretended to have landed with five others of his crew          
upon a certain island or continent south of New Holland, where they         
went for fresh water, and observed a horse driving before him               
several animals exactly resembling those I described under the name of      
Yahoos, with some other particulars, which the Captain said he had          
forgotten; because he then concluded them all to be lies. But he added      
that since I professed so inviolable an attachment to truth, I must         
give him my word of honor to bear him company in this voyage,               
without attempting any thing against my life, or else he would              
continue me a prisoner till we arrived at Lisbon. I gave him the            
promise he required, but at the same time protested that I would            
suffer the greatest hardships rather than return to live among Yahoos.      
  Our voyage passed without any considerable accident. In gratitude to      
the Captain I sometimes sat with him at his earnest request, and            
strove to conceal my antipathy to human kind, although it often             
broke out, which he suffered to pass without observation. But the           
greatest part of the day I confined myself to my cabin, to avoid            
seeing any of the crew. The Captain had often entreated me to strip         
myself of my savage dress, and offered to lend me the best suit of          
clothes he had. This I would not be prevailed on to accept,                 
abhorring to cover myself with any thing that had been on the back          
of a Yahoo. I only desired he would lend me two clean shirts, which         
having been washed since he wore them, I believed would not so much         
defile me. These I changed every second day, and washed them myself.        
  We arrived at Lisbon, Nov. 5, 1715. At our landing the Captain            
forced me to cover myself with his cloak, to prevent the rabble from        
crowding about me. I was conveyed to his own house, and at my               
earnest request he led me up to the highest room backwards. I conjured      
him to conceal from all persons what I had told him of the Houyhnhnms,      
because the least hint of such a story would not only draw numbers          
of people to see me, but probably put me in danger of being                 
imprisoned, or burned by the Inquisition. The Captain persuaded me          
to accept a suit of clothes newly made; but I would not suffer the          
tailor to take my measure; however, Don Pedro being almost of my size,      
they fitted me well enough. He accoutred me with other necessaries all      
new, which I aired for twenty-four hours before I would use them.           
  The Captain had no wife, nor above three servants, none of which          
were suffered to attend at meals, and his whole deportment was so           
obliging, added to very good human understanding, that I really             
began to tolerate his company. He gained so far upon me that I              
ventured to look out of the back window. By degrees I was brought into      
another room, from whence I peeped into the street, but drew my head        
back in a fright. In a week's time he seduced me down to the door. I        
found my terror gradually lessened, but my hatred and contempt              
seemed to increase. I was at last bold enough to walk the street in         
his company, but kept my nose well stopped with rue, or sometimes with      
tobacco.                                                                    
  In ten days Don Pedro, to whom I had given some account of my             
domestic affairs, put it upon me as a matter of honor and                   
conscience, that I ought to return to my native country, and live at        
home with my wife and children. He told me there was an English ship        
in the port just ready to sail, and he would furnish me with all            
things necessary. It would be tedious to repeat his arguments, and          
my contradictions. He said it was altogether impossible to find such a      
solitary island as I had desired to live in; but I might command in my      
own house, and pass my time in a manner as recluse as I pleased.            
                                                   {P_4|CH_11 ^paragraph 15}
  I complied at last, finding I could not do better. I left Lisbon the      
24th day of November, in an English merchantman, but who was the            
master I never inquired. Don Pedro accompanied me to the ship, and          
lent me twenty pounds. He took kind leave of me, and embraced me at         
parting, which I bore as well as I could. During this last voyage I         
had no commerce with the master or any of his men; but pretending I         
was sick, kept close in my cabin. On the fifth of December, 1715, we        
cast anchor in the Downs about nine in the morning, and at three in         
the afternoon I got safe to my house at Rotherhith.                         
  My wife and family received me with great surprise and joy,               
because they concluded me certainly dead; but I must freely confess         
the sight of them filled me only with hatred, disgust, and contempt,        
and the more by reflecting on the near alliance I had to them. For          
although since my unfortunate exile from the Houyhnhnm country, I           
had compelled myself to tolerate the sight of Yahoos, and to                
converse with Don Pedro de Mendez, yet my memory and imagination            
were perpetually filled with the virtues and ideas of those exalted         
Houyhnhnms. And when I began to consider that by copulating with one        
of the Yahoo species I had become a parent of more, it struck me            
with the utmost shame, confusion, and horror.                               
  As soon as I entered the house, my wife took me in her arms and           
kissed me, at which, having not been used to the touch of that              
odious animal for so many years, I fell in a swoon for almost an hour.      
At the time I am writing it is five years since my last return to           
England: during the first year I could not endure my wife or                
children in my presence, the very smell of them was intolerable,            
much less could I suffer them to eat in the same room. To this hour         
they dare not presume to touch my bread, or drink out of the same cup,      
neither was I ever able to let one of them take me by the hand. The         
first money I laid out was to buy two young stone-horses, which I keep      
in a good stable, and next to them the groom is my greatest                 
favorite; for I feel my spirits revived by the smell he contracts in        
the stable. My horses understand me tolerably well; I converse with         
them at least four hours every day. They are strangers to bridle or         
saddle; they live in great amity with me, and friendship to each            
other.                                                                      
                                                                            
P_4|CH_12                                                                   
  CHAPTER XII                                                               
-                                                                           
  Thus, gentle reader, I have given thee faithful history of my             
travels for sixteen years and above seven months; wherein I have not        
been so studious of ornament as truth. I could perhaps like others          
have astonished you with strange improbable tales; but I rather             
chose to relate plain matter of fact in the simplest manner and style;      
because my principal design was to inform, and not to amuse you.            
  It is easy for us who travel into remote countries, which are seldom      
visited by Englishmen or other Europeans, to form descriptions of           
wonderful animals both at sea and land. Whereas a traveler's chief aim      
should be to make men wiser and better, and to improve their minds          
by the bad as well as good example of what they deliver concerning          
foreign places.                                                             
  I could heartily wish a law was enacted, that every traveler, before      
he were permitted to publish his voyages, should be obliged to make         
oath before the Lord High Chancellor that all he intended to print was      
absolutely true to the best of his knowledge; for then the world would      
no longer be deceived as it usually is, while some writers, to make         
their works pass the better upon the public, impose the grossest            
falsities on the unwary reader. I have perused several books of             
travels with great delight in my younger days; but having since gone        
over most parts of the globe, and been able to contradict many              
fabulous accounts from my own observation, it has given me a great          
disgust against this part of reading, and some indignation to see           
the credulity of mankind so impudently abused. Therefore since my           
acquaintances were pleased to think my poor endeavors might not be          
unacceptable to my country, I imposed on myself as a maxim, never to        
be swerved from, that I would strictly adhere to truth; neither indeed      
can I be ever under the least temptation to vary from it, while I           
retain in my mind the lectures and example of my noble master, and the      
other illustrious Houyhnhnms, of whom I had so long the honor to be         
a humble bearer.                                                            
-                                                                           
      ---Nec si miserum Fortuna Sinonem                                     
                                                    {P_4|CH_12 ^paragraph 5}
      Finxit, vanum etiam, mendacemque improba finget.                      
-                                                                           
  I know very well how little reputation is to be gotten by writings        
which require neither genius nor learning, nor indeed any other             
talent, except a good memory or an exact journal. I know likewise that      
writers of travels, like dictionary-makers, are sunk into oblivion          
by the weight and bulk of those who come after, and therefore lie           
uppermost. And it is highly probable that such travelers who shall          
hereafter visit the countries described in this work of mine, may,          
by detecting my errors (if there be any), and adding many new               
discoveries of their own, jostle me out of vogue, and stand in my           
place, making the world forget that I was ever an author. This              
indeed would be too great a mortification if I wrote for fame: but, as      
my sole intention was the PUBLIC GOOD, I cannot be altogether               
disappointed. For who can read of the virtues I have mentioned in           
the glorious Houyhnhnms, without being ashamed of his own vices,            
when he considers himself as the reasoning, governing animal of his         
country? I shall say nothing of those remote nations where Yahoos           
preside; amongst which the least corrupted are the Brobdingnagians,         
whose wise maxims in morality and government it would be our happiness      
to observe. But I forbear descanting farther, and rather leave the          
judicious reader to own remarks and applications.                           
  I am not a little pleased that this work of mine can possibly meet        
with no censurers: for what objections can be made against a writer         
who relates only plain facts that happened in such distant                  
countries, where we have not the least interest with respect either to      
trade or negotiations? I have carefully avoided every fault with which      
common writers of travels are often too justly charged. Besides, I          
meddle not the least with any party, but write without passion,             
prejudice, or illwill against any man or number of men whatsoever. I        
write for the noblest end, to inform and instruct mankind, over whom I      
may, without breach of modesty, pretend to some superiority, from           
the advantages I received by conversing so long among the most              
accomplished Houyhnhnms. I write without any view towards profit or         
praise. I never suffer a word to pass that may look like reflection,        
or possibly give the least offence even to those who are most ready to      
take it. So that I hope I may with justice pronounce myself an              
author perfectly blameless, against whom the tribes of answerers,           
considerers, observers, reflecters, detecters, remarkers, will never        
be able to find matter for exercising their talents.                        
  I confess it was whispered to me that I was bound in duty as a            
subject of England to have given in a memorial to a Secretary of State      
at my first coming over; because whatever lands are discovered by a         
subject belong to the Crown. But I doubt whether our conquests in           
the countries I treat of, would be as easy as those of Ferdinando           
Cortez over the naked Americans. The Lilliputians I think are hardly        
worth the charge of a fleet and army to reduce them; and I question         
whether it might be prudent or safe to attempt the Brobdingnagians; or      
whether an English army would be much at their ease with the Flying         
Island over their heads. The Houyhnhnms, indeed, appear not to be so        
well prepared for war, a science to which they are perfect                  
strangers, and especially against missive weapons. However,                 
supposing myself to be a minister of state, I could never give my           
advice for invading them. Their prudence, unanimity,                        
unacquaintedness with fear, and their love of their country, would          
amply supply all defects in the military art. Imagine twenty                
thousand of them breaking into the midst of a European army,                
confounding the confounding the ranks, overturning the carriages,           
battering the warriors' faces into mummy by terrible yerks from             
their hinder hoofs. For they would well deserve the character given to      
Augustus: Recalcitrat unclique tutus. But instead of proposals for          
conquering that magnanimous nation, I rather wish they were in a            
capacity or disposition to send a number of their inhabitants for           
civilizing Europe, by teaching us the first principles of honor,            
truth, temperance, public spirit, fortitude, chastity, benevolence,         
and fidelity. The names of all which virtues are still retained             
among us in languages, and are to be met with in modern as well as          
ancient which I am able to assert from my own small reading.                
                                                   {P_4|CH_12 ^paragraph 10}
  But I had another reason which made me less forward to enlarge his        
Majesty's dominions by my discoveries. To say the truth, I had              
conceived a few scruples with relation to the distributive justice          
of princes upon those occasions. For instance, a crew of pirates are        
driven by a storm they know not whither, at length a boy discovers          
land from the topmast, they go on shore to rob and plunder, they see a      
harmless people, are entertained with kindness, they give the               
country a new name, they take formal possession of it for their             
King, they set up a rotten plank or a stone for a memorial, they            
murder two or three dozen of the natives, bring away a couple more          
by force for a sample, return home, and get their pardon. Here              
commences a new dominion acquired with a title by divine right.             
Ships are sent with the first opportunity, the natives driven out or        
destroyed, their princes tortured to discover their gold, a free            
license given to all acts of inhumanity and lust, the earth reeking         
with the blood of its inhabitants: and this execrable crew of butchers      
employed in so pious an expedition, is a modern colony sent to convert      
and civilize an idolatrous and barbarous people.                            
  But this description, I confess, does by no means affect the British      
nation, who may be an example to the whole world for their wisdom,          
care, and justice in planting colonies; their liberal endowments for        
the advancement of religion and learning; their choice of devout and        
able pastors to propagate Christianity; their caution in stocking           
their provinces with people of sober lives and conversations from this      
the mother kingdom; their strict regard to the distribution of              
justice, in supplying the civil administration through all their            
colonies with officers of the greatest abilities, utter strangers to        
corruption; and to crown all, by sending the most vigilant and              
virtuous governors, who have no other views than the happiness of           
the people over whom they preside, and the honor of the King their          
master.                                                                     
  But, as those countries which I have described do not appear to have      
any desire of being conquered, and enslaved, murdered or driven out by      
colonies, nor abound either in gold, silver, sugar, or tobacco; I           
did humbly conceive they were by no means proper objects of our             
zeal, our valor, or our interest. However, if those whom it more            
concerns think fit to be of another opinion, I am ready to depose,          
when I shall be lawfully called, that no European did ever visit these      
countries before me. I mean, if the inhabitants ought to he                 
believed; unless a dispute may arise about the two Yahoos, said to          
have been seen many ages ago in a mountain in Houyhnhnm-land, from          
whence the opinion is, that the race of those brutes has descended;         
and these, for anything I know, may have been English, which indeed         
I was apt to suspect from the lineaments of their posterity's               
countenances, although very much defaced. But, how far that will go to      
make out a title, I leave to the learned in colony-law.                     
  But as to the formality of taking possession in my Sovereign's name,      
it never came once into my thoughts; and if it had, yet as my               
affairs then stood, I should perhaps in point of prudence and               
self-preservation have put it off to a better opportunity.                  
  Having thus answered the only objection that can ever be raised           
against me as a traveler, I here take a final leave of all my               
courteous readers, and return to enjoy my own speculations in my            
little garden at Redriff, to apply those excellent lessons of virtue        
which I learned among the Houyhnhnms, to instruct the Yahoos of my own      
family as far as I shall find them docile animals; to behold my figure      
often in a glass, and thus if possible habituate myself by time to          
tolerate the sight of a human creature; to lament the brutality of          
Houyhnhnms in my own country, but always treat their persons with           
respect, for the sake of my noble master, his family, his friends, and      
the whole Houyhnhnm race, whom these ours have the honor to resemble        
in all their lineaments, however their intellectuals came to                
degenerate.                                                                 
                                                   {P_4|CH_12 ^paragraph 15}
  I began last week to permit my wife to sit at dinner with me, at the      
farthest end of a long table, and to answer (but with the utmost            
brevity) the few questions I ask her. Yet the smell of a Yahoo              
continuing very offensive, I always keep my nose well stopped with          
rue, lavender, or tobacco leaves. And although it be hard for a man         
late in life to remove old habits, I am not altogether out of hopes in      
some time to suffer a neighbor Yahoo in my company, without the             
apprehensions I am yet under of his teeth or his claws.                     
  My reconcilement to the Yahoo-kind in general might not be so             
difficult, if they would be content with those vices and follies            
only which nature has entitled them to. I am not in the least provoked      
at the sight of a lawyer, a pick-pocket, a colonel, a fool, a lord,         
a gamester, a politician, a whore-master, a physician, an evidence,         
a suborner, an attorney, a traitor, or the like; this is all according      
to the due course of things: but when I behold a lump of deformity and      
diseases both in body and mind, smitten with pride, it immediately          
breaks all the measures of my patience; neither shall I be ever able        
to comprehend how such an animal and such a vice could tally together.      
The wise and virtuous Houyhnhnms, who abound in all excellencies            
that can adorn a rational creature, have no name for this vice in           
their language, which has no terms to express anything that is evil,        
except those whereby they describe the detestable qualities of their        
Yahoos, among which they were not able to distinguish this of pride,        
for want of thoroughly understanding human nature, as it shows              
itself in other countries, where that animal presides. But I, who           
had more experience, could plainly observe some rudiments of it             
among the wild Yahoos.                                                      
  But the Houyhnhnms, who live under the government of reason, are          
no more proud of the good qualities they possess, than I should be for      
not wanting a leg or an arm, which no man in his wits would boast           
of, although he must be miserable without them. I dwell the longer          
upon this subject from the desire I have to make the society of an          
English Yahoo by any means not insupportable; and therefore I here          
entreat those who have any tincture of this absurd vice, that they          
will not presume to come in my sight.                                       
-                                                                           
                             THE END                                        
                                                                            
                                                                            

Electronically Enhanced Text  (C) Copyright 1991, 1992, World Library, Inc. 
--------------------------------------------------------------


:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:
:   Earth's Dreamlands    :  Info on: RPG's,  :(313)558-5024 : area code    :
:RPGNet World HQ & Archive: Drugs, Industrial :(313)558-5517 : changes to   :
:  1000's of text files   :  music, Fiction,  :InterNet      : (810) after  :
:   No Elite / No porn    :   HomeBrew Beer.  :rpgnet@aol.com: Dec 1,1993   :
:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:.:

  Below you will find the rules that my friends and I have come up 
with for Battletech.  These rules were meant to augment the existing 
rules, not replace them.  _The Battletech Compendium_ is the ruleook 
referenced throughout this text and is considered necessary for these rules 
to be used fully.
  One of the basic assumptions throughout this entire text is that 
the Clans do not exist.  Granted, some of the technology presented in here 
is Clan in nature or capability, but this system was started before the 
Clans were presented.  The history of the Battletech Universe has also been 
ignored completely.  This is evident with the huge variety of weapons and 
the fact that (for example) LB-X autocannons weigh more than standard 
autocannons.  For any system that is not specifically modifed or covered in 
these rules assume that the standard rules for "Inner Sphere" systems take 
precedence.
  The 2x engine rules were created some time ago, exact date 
forgotten.  These rules are of my design and should be considered 
copyrighted.  The Observer rules were created based upon ideas found in the 
Rec.Games.Mecha archives.  Credit is given at the end.
  The Internal Structure and Armor rules were developed recently and 
are pretty much an adjustment to existing rules plus added systems.  If 
anything appears to have come from FASA then it probably did.
  The Weapons list is a compilation of the existing weapons plus 
those developed by myself, my friends, and others.  The alternate 
ammunitions were an outgrowth of rules presented in the FASA product 
_Unbound_ and material found in the aforementioned archives.  
  The Infantry Rules were developed to make all types of infantry a 
viable selection.  These rules were also intened to make them a little more 
capable of playing a role on the battlefield.
  The Credit Section is where I give credit to those who inspired me 
to put something resembling their work into my compilation.  I tried to 
give credit where it is due, but if you feel slighted I apologize.  One 
source of inspiration and information tht is not credited there is FASA.  
They deserve the credit for anything that resembles material from the 
rulebook and the product _Unbound_.
  If you have any questions, comments, or suggestions feel free to 
send Email to MURRAYMD@UDAVXB.OCA.UDAYTON.EDU or 
  Matt Murray
  144 Medford Apt E
  Dayton OH 45410

        ENJOY!!!


  T W O    E N G I N E    A N D    T W O    C O C K P I T    
  
  The 2xeng and 2xeng2xcockpit mech rules will require that you make 
new mech sheets for these monsters.  With a little bit of work, clear tape, 
and photocopies you can cut up, you can make the sheets no problem.  I'll 
give you what location has how many crits of each thing.

  2 ENGINE MECHS

  The two engine mech is simply a battlemech that has such a high 
speed that the weight or power requirements are so high that two engines 
are requird as opposed to one.  For a mech to have two engines, it must 
pass one of two requirements.  If it doesn't, then the mech will simply use 
one engine.  NOTE: The weight requirements below are based upon standard 
engine weights and are regardless of the possibility of the engines being 
ST or XL engines. 

  For the design of your mech, replace the rules for "Determine 
engine weight" with this list:

  1) Detremine the speed of the mech
  2) Determine the Engine rating
  3) Determine the Engine weight
  4) Check to see if steps 2 or 3 qualify the mech for 2x engine 
     status.  If the mech does qualify, follow ths steps:
    A) If the last digit of the Engine rating is a 5, add 5 to 
       the engine rating making it an even number.
    B) Divide the engine rating by 2 creating the engine 
       ratings of the 2 smaller engines to be used.
    C) Use the smaller engine ratings to determine the engine 
       weights of the two smaller engines.  
    D) Modify the weights of the engines appropriately if you 
       are going to use ST or XL engines.
    E) Add the weights of the engines together to determine the 
       final weight of th engines. 
  (Note: Gyro weight is based upon the engine rating from line 4A.)
      
REQUIREMENTS:

If the mech is 55-100 tons, then the requirements are:

  1) The required engine rating is above 400

      or

  2) The weight of the engine required is 75% or greater than the 
     weight of the mech.

If the mech is 5-50 tons, then the requirements are:

  1) The required engine rating is above 400

      or

  2) The weight of the engine required is 50% or greater than the
     weight of the mech.

  Now that the rules for what mechs are allowed to have 2 engines 
have been established, next are the special rules pertaining to them.

  1) Since the mech has 2 fusion engines, it also has 20 heat sinks.
    A) They can be made double heat sinks.
    B) The number of HS that can be put on to an engine w/out 
       being represented on the critical hit table is based 
       upon the engine rating of each engine, not the combined 
       engine ratings. 
    C) If the engine heat sinks are double HS, then divide the 
       number of heat sinks that can be put on an engine by the 
       number of crits each double heat sink takes up. (This 
       rule is put in so that double heat sinks are not common 
       and do not unbalance the game since heat is the 
       restraining factor in this game.  This rule is also 
       under the assumption that the rules concerning mixing 
       standard and double heat sinks are changed.  If you want 
       to, you can mount double and standard HS on a mech.  All 
       of the heat sinks from the engines must be the same 
       type.  All 20 must be either double or standard, not 
       half&half.  If you keep the original rule saying ALL 
       heat sinks must be the same type, then you may also 
       consider possibly ignore this subrule completely.
  2) A damage track is kept for each engine.  It is possible for a 2x 
     engine mech to recieve 4 engine hits, 2 per engine.  When one of 
     the two engines receives 3 hits, it is destroyed and the move 
     rate of the mech is halved, rounding down.  The destroyed engine 
     also stops producing heat due to damage or moving.  A 2x engine 
     mech is considered destroyed when both engines are destroyed, 
     i.e.: When each engine has received 3 engine hits.  Any HS 
     mounted on the engine and not represented on the crit. hit table 
     for the mech are also destroyed. 
  3) When the internal structure for a side torso has been completely 
     destroyed, that sides engine is also counted as destroyed with the 
     appropriate effects for losing one engine as outlined in rule 2.
  4) The Critical Hit table for a 2x engined mech is different from 
     that you would find on a standard one.
    A) Change the center torso by changing all engine slots 
       (11,12,13,22,23,24) into empty slots that can mount
       equipment.
    B) Change both of the side torsos to this slot 
       configuration:

      Standard  ST Engines  XL Engines

      1. Engine 1. Engine 1. Engine
      2. Engine 2. Engine 2. Engine
      3. Engine 3. Engine 3. Engine
      4. ______ 4. ______ 4. Engine
      5. ______ 5. ______ 5. Engine
      6. ______ 6. ______ 6. Engine

      1. ______ 1. Engine 1. Engine
      2. Engine 2. Engine 2. Engine
      3. Engine 3. Engine 3. Engine
      4. Engine 4. Engine 4. Engine
      5. ______ 5. Engine 5. Engine
      6. ______ 6. Engine 6. Engine

  (As you can see, you have a high to 100% chance of getting an 
   engine hit with the more advanced engines.)
  
  5) If the engines are going to use ST or XL technology, both must 
     be of the same type.
  6) The heat produced from movement is doubled with 2x engine mechs. 
     Walking heat is 2 while running produces 4 heat.
        7) As before, regardless of technology level of the engine, each 
     engine requires only 3 engine hits to be destroyed.
 
  DESIGN NOTES ON 2X ENGINE MECHS:  These rules were written long 
before the clans came into the picture.  They were even written before the 
rules for XL engines were published.  From the time we came out with the 
rules for 2x engine mechs, we have experimented with rules for 2x engine 
tanks (we never goofed with aerospace fighters, but that would be another 
logical growth of the rules.)  The rules we developed never did seem 
balanced and seemed to require a major rewrite of the tank rules, which we 
did for some areas.  If you desire to have 2x engine tanks, you may want to 
take a long hard look at them.  Realize that the limiting factors for 2x 
engine mechs are: loss of internal space, loss of armor protection for the 
engines due to sitting in the side torsos, ease of getting engine hits due to 
doubled number of engine crits, and increased heat for movement.  All of these 
limiting factors are not available for tanks based on the available rules.  
There are no damage locations where tank engines are.  There are no 
internal crit slots for tanks.  Tanks don't have to worry about movement 
heat.  As you can see, tanks were made overly simple so that they were easy 
to play and integrate.  Due to these simplifications, you can't easily 
integrate 2x engine rules for them.  On further investigation, you'll see 
that the same problems exist for aerospace fighters, conventional fighters, 
and the other vehicles.  If you are going to put rules for 2x engines in 
for other vehicles, you will have to rebuild a lot of the game.
  The Clans would probably never have 2x engine mechs.  Their mechs 
tend to point to a huge standardization policy throughout the clans and 
would be very slow to change to 2x engines upon discovering 2x engine 
mechs.  Even with those points of logic out of the way, it should be 
apparent enough that the clans are nasty enough as they are and need no 
further modification.  You will find that 2x engine mechs come only half 
way to meeting the clans on even grounds.  *I* wouldn't want a 100 ton clan 
mech with 2x engines stomping on my face and ripping my lipps off!  
  


  SPECIAL TECHNOLOGY  (ST)  ENGINES

  ST engines were developed primarily to incorporate the weight 
saving capabilities of XL engines without the huge space requirements.  ST 
engines are best described as being halway between standard and XL engines. 
ST engines are best used on one engine mechs that need extra tonnage for 
ballistic weapons and extra space for the weapons themselves.  For 2x 
engine mechs, internal space becomes critically short when both engines are 
made XL, making the use of ST engines predominant.  

  1) ST engines weigh .75 the weight of a standard engine, this in 
     comparison to XL engines that weigh .5 the weight of a standard
     engine.
  2) ST engines require 3 extra crit slots on a critical hit table.  
     These crit slots have already been described for 2x engine 
     mechs.  For one engine mechs, ST engines require one extra slot 
     in each of the 3 torsos.
  3) 3 engine hits are required to destroy an ST engine, regardless 
     if they are in the side or center torsos. 
  4) For figuring the costs of an ST engine, as per p. 128 of _The 
     Battletech Compendium_, use the formula of:
    (10,000 x rating x tonnage) / 75

  NOTES ON ST ENGINES:  As you can see, ST engines are halfway XL 
engines.  That's what they are intended to be.  When I first came up with 
ST engines, I had trouble convincing my friends the need of ST engines.  
They are truly put in for 2x engine mechs, I have never seen their use on 
one engine mechs.  Use them as you please.
  The Clans would probably never use ST engines.  They would more 
then likely use XL engines exclusively.
  Historically, you could say that ST engines are a stepping stone to 
XL engines, with their use relegated primarily to 2x engine mechs.  You 
could also say that Peripheral houses and governments developed them as 
their best effort to reach XL technology.


  2X COCKPIT and 2X ENGINE 2X COCKPIT MECHS

  2x cockpit mechs are a natural outgrowth of mech designs that had 2 
seats in a mech cockpit where one seat was for the mech pilot and the 
other seat was for a commander/observer/nobody useful.  There are 3 types 
of 2x cockpit mechs: one engine 2x cockpit, 2x engine 2x cockpit Alpha, and 
2x engine 2x cockpit Beta.  After the descriptions of the three type of 2x 
cockpit mechs rules will be given for their use.

NOTE:  When examples of the internal structure are shown, there will be two 
empty critical slots with astricks.  These are the slots for "extra" 
sensors to be placed in.  They will be explained later in the rules.

  2X COCKPIT MECHS:

  These designs are achieved through the removal of the cockpit from 
the head and replacing it with a cockpit in each side torso.

  1) The critical hit table is modified by replacing the head with 
     six empty crit slots.  This effectively turns the head from a 
     cockpit center into a weapons platform.  This platform can have a 
     turret like a ground vehicle where the turret mechanism weighs 
     ten percent of the weapons mounted (round up to the nearest half 
     ton).  When the armor has been breached and internals have been 
     scored, roll for turret lock where the turret locks on a roll of 
     1-3.  If the turret locks, it locks facing the hexside that it 
     was firing into that turn.
  2) The side torsos are modified as such:

    LEFT SIDE TORSO     RIGHT SIDE TORSO

    1) Life Support     1) Life Support
    2) Sensors      2) Sensors
  1 3) Cockpit    1 3) Cockpit
    4) _______      4) _______
    5) _______*     5) _______*
    6) Life Support     6) Life Support

    1) _______      1) _______
    2) _______      2) _______
  2 3) _______    2 3) _______
    4) _______      4) _______
    5) _______      5) _______
    6) _______      6) _______

  3) The pilot can be in one side or the other as long as which side 
     has the pilot and which side has the gunner is marked on the 
     sheet before the game begins. 

  2X ENGINE 2X COCKPIT MECHS ALPHA

  These types of mechs are achieved through the addition of a cockpit 
to the center torso.  Traditionally the gunner would be positioned in the 
torso and the pilot would be in the head.  This arrangement can be swapped 
around with little problem, but it would seem more logical to have the 
pilot in the head.

  1) The head cannot be mounted on a turret.
  2) The head and Center torso critical hit tables would look like 
this:

    Center torso    Head

    1) _______    1) Life Support
    2) _______    2) _______*
  1 3) _______    3) Cockpit
    4) Gyro     4) _______
    5) Gyro     5) _______*
    6) Gyro     6) Life Support

    1) Life Support
    2) Sensors
  2 3) Cockpit
    4) Gyro
    5) Sensors
    6) Life Support

  3) To put the gunner in the head, move the sensors from the center 
torso and put them in the #2 and #5 slots in the head.

  2X ENGINE 2X COCKPIT MECHS BETA

  These types of mechs are achieved through putting both of the 
cockpits in the center torso.  The advantage of this arrangement is that the 
head can act as a weapons platform like the rules above state.  The primary 
disadvantage is that whenever the center torso is hit on a 2, both pilots 
take damage and roll for consciousness.

  1) The head can act as a turreted weapons platform as discussed 
above in the rules for 2x cockpit mechs.
  2) The center torso is modified as such:

    CENTER TORSO

    1) Life Support
    2) Gyro
  1 3) Cockpit
    4) Gyro
    5) Gyro
    6) Life Support

    1) Life Support
    2) Sensors
  2 3) Cockpit
    4) Gyro
    5) Sensors
    6) Life Support

  3) The pilot is in the upper cockpit while the gunner is in the 
lower cockpit. Notice also that there are no provisions for there to be 
backup sensors on this type of mech.

  GENERAL RULES COVERING 2X COCKPIT MECHS

  1) There are 2 cockpits on 2x cockpit mechs.  One is for a pilot 
where the other one is for a gunner.  These two pilots work together to 
pilot and fight the mech.  The cumulative effect of these two working 
together and being able to concentrate on their jobs is that the piloting and 
gunnery skills are better.  To reflect these advantages, a mech with two 
cockpits has a -1 bonus on its to hit and piloting target numbers.
  2) The pilot controls the piloting functions of the mech, but he 
can also do weapons firing.  If the gunner should be killed, the pilot can 
take over weapons fire.  The turn after the gunner is killed, the mech can 
not fire weapons but can still move.  This represents the pilot realizing the 
loss of the gunner and switching over gunnery systems to his control.  
After this turn of lost weapons fire, the pilot operates the mech without 
the piloting skill bonus and has a +1 penalty to weapons fire.
  3) The gunner controls the firing functions of the mech, but he can 
also pilot the mech.  If the pilot should be killed, the gunner can take 
over moving the mech.  The turn after the pilot is killed, the mech can not 
move but may continue to fire weapons.  This represents the gunner 
realizing the loss of the pilot and switching over movement systems to his 
control.  After this turn of lost movement, the gunner operates the mech 
without the gunnery bonus and has a +1 penalty to piloting skill.
  4) The bonuses and penalties mentioned above are treated just like 
any of the bonuses and penalties found in the rules and can be made 
cumulative with any other modifiers.  If the players are using the optional 
rules for DNI and VRPP piloting enhancements, they can also be used with 2x 
cockpit mechs.  (The two pilots had better know each other *VERY* well to 
be allowed to use DNI.)
  5) If both the pilot and the gunner are killed, then the mech is 
considered destroyed.     
  6) The Sensors that were deleted from one of the cockpits can be 
left in to serve as backup sensors.  Either one or both of the deleted 
sensors can be left in.  As long as there are two undestroyed Sensors 
critical hit locations remaining on the mech, there is no effect from 
Sensors hits.
  7) When a 2 is rolled onto a torso hit location that has a cockpit 
in it will also damage the pilot/gunner like a head hit. 
  8) When a 2x cockpit mech falls, the pilot must roll two piloting 
skill rolls to determine if both he and the gunner take damage.  Roll each 
one seperately.
  9) When ammunition explodes, each pilot takes one point of damage 
as oppossed to both taking two points.  If one of the pilots is dead, then 
the other takes 2 points of damage.
  10) Life support hits are kept for each cockpit and are seperate 
from each other.  It is possible for one pilot to take hits from excess 
heat and the other to be perfectly fine.
  11) Conciousness rolls for each pilot are done seperately and are 
independant of each other.  It is possible for one pilot to be unconcious 
while the other is not.  If this should happen, treat the unconcious pilot 
to be "temporarely" dead.  Refer to rules 2 & 3 for switchover procedure.  
When the unconcious pilot regains conciousness, he may resume his functions 
at the beginning of the next turn. 

  Design notes on 2x cockpit mechs:  2x cockpit mechs are just about 
the epitome of Battlemech technology when you combine 2x engine 2x cockpit 
rules with ST/XL engine rules.  Throw in any other sundry advanced 
technologies you wish and you will have true war machines.
  These rules were developed well before the Clans came out.  Based 
on the reading I've done, I don't think the clans would go for this type of 
mechs.  Their honor code would seem to dictate that they fight "without 
someone else's help."  Anyway, would you want the Clans to be any more 
powerful?

  C O C K P I T   S E C O N D   S E A T S / O B S E R V E R S 

  Normally the cockpit of a mech has a second seat for a passenger 
but that seat has no special function.  These rules are designed to add 
special seatings for specialty observers.  Note that the people in these 
seats *CAN NOT* control the mech that they are in in any special manner or 
way.  (Exception:  Mech Gunners)  They are only observers.
  If the critical hit location that the second chair takes up is 
destroyed then the passenger is killed and cannot perform their function.  
If the pilot's critical hit location is destroyed then the mech is 
considered destroyed for one cockpit mechs.  2x cockpit mechs are different 
in that the cockpit up in the head (normally the pilot's cockpit) is the 
only cockpit that can have a second chair.  Destruction of the head still 
results in the Observers death as well as the pilot/gunner, but the 2x 
cockpit mech still functions as per the 2x cockpit rules.  (Exception:  
Mech Gunners:  The mech is not considered destroyed if the head is still 
intact and the pilot is unconcious/dead then the gunner can still fire the 
mech's weapons.  Mech gunners can not be used in 2x cockpit mechs.)
  

  Artillery Spotter:  The Artillery Spotter is a trained professional 
in the coordination of off-board artillery fire.  Their seat has range 
finding and communication equipment built in to assist them.
  ADVANTAGES:  The AS mech can act as an oberver for off board 
artillery fire.  Any off board artillery fire using this mech as the 
observer gets a -2 to hit bonus for Observing unit Gunnery Skill as per 
p.49 of _The Battletech Compendium_.
  WEIGHT:  The Artillery Spotter seat weighs 1.5 tons and takes 
up 1 critical location in the head.

  Company Commander:  The company commander can be in a command mech 
that has a trusted pilot piloting his mech while he pays attention to the 
battle.  His attention to the battle plus his training gives his company a 
special advantage over those that do not have a dedicated command mech.
  ADVANTAGES:  The Command Mech and the 11 other mechs designated as 
being in the comapany get a special and seperate Initiative Roll.  They 
roll 2D6 for their Initiative instead of the regular 1D6.
  DISADVANTAGES/REQUIREMENTS:  For the Company Commander to be able 
to do his/her job the command mech must be equipped with 2 C^3 Masters and 
the rest of the company must be set up with the C^3 system as per the rules 
in _The Battletech Compendium_ p.118.  This communication and coordination 
still continues even if LOS between company mates is blocked or there is a 
Guardian operating in the LOS, even if the C^3 does not work.
  WEIGHT:  The Commander's seat weighs 1 ton and takes up 1 critical 
spot in the head.

  Forward Observer:  The Forward Observer is a person trained in the 
coordination and directin of all indirect fire.  S/he can assist in the firing 
of normal artillery fire and indirect missile fire.
  ADVANTAGES:  The FO mech can act as an observer for a unit firing 
LRM or BRM missiles indirectly.  For this fire there is no +1 automatic 
penalty to the to hit and the FO mech can make attacks as normal.  The FO 
mech can also act as a spotter for off board artillery fire, giving a -1 to 
hit bonus for Observing unit Gunnery Skill as per p.49 of _The Battletech 
Compendium_.
  WEIGHT:  The Forward Observer seat weighs 1 tons and 1 critical 
spot in the head.

  Mech Gunner:  The Mech Gunner is a Mechwarrior in a specially 
designed chair that allows the gunner to fire the mech's weapons while the 
normal pilot concentrates on piloting the mech.  While this system has the 
same advantages as 2 cockpits, it still has the inherent disadvantage that 
destroying the head will knock out the mech.
  ADVANTAGES:  The mech with a mech gunner can fire weapons and pilot 
better.  Any Piloting Skill rolls and weapons fire is done at a -1 bonus, 
cumulative with other bonuses and penalties.
  DISADVANTAGES:  The mech gunner in this system cannot be combined 
with the 2 cockpit system, it is either/or.  If the gunner gets knocked out 
via unconciousness or critical hit then the mech cannot fire weapons.  If 
the pilot is knocked out in a similar manner then the mech cannot move.  If 
the head is destroyed then the mech is counted as destroyed.  Otherwise 
refer to rules 8, 9, and the first part of 11 in the 2 cockpit rules for 
assitional information.  Mech Gunner chairs can not be installed on 2x 
cockpit mechs.
  WEIGHT:  The Mech Gunner seat weighs 2 tons and takes up 1 critical 
hit location in the head.

    G Y R O   D E S I G N   C H A N G E S 

  Gyros can be rounded to the nearest half or quarter ton, depending 
on what your are rounding nearest to in your design.


  A L T E R N A T E  I N T E R N A L  S T R U C T U R E S
           and
        A R M O R   

  There are several different types of internal structures, armors, 
and defensive systems that can be used by a mech.  Each are detailed below.

  Endo Steel:  This is the same as presented in the books with the 
exception of changing the number of critical hit locations that are taken 
up.  This is done to make its use more viable.
  TONS:  Half Standard
  Slots:  10

  Nitivir Composite:  This extra strong internal structure is made 
from a laticed composite of Nickel, Titanium, Vanadium, Iridium, and other 
standard metals.  This combonation is heavier and bulkier than standard 
internal structure but is 25% more resilient to damage and allows the mech 
to mount heavier armor.
  The mech with Nitivir Composite multiplies the amount of internal 
points for each of the internal structure areas by 1.25, round .5 up.  This 
new, higher number is the amount of internal structure each area has and is 
used as the base for the max number of armor points that the area can mount.  
If the number of internal structure or armor points in a location exceeds the 
number of circles that the mech sheet has simply write the excess points next 
to the appropriate location.
  TONS:  Standard
  Slots:  10

  Standard Internal Structure:  The standard internal structure is 
not changed at all from the rules.  It is though used as the basis of 
comparison for the other internal structures.

  --- --- --- --- --- --- --- ---

  The below armor types are "base" armors and are not compatible with 
each other.  See the defensive systems below to see which are compatible 
with what.

  Ferro-Fibrous Armor:  This armor is like that presented in the 
rules with changes to make its use more viable.  The Armor Value is 
multiplied by 1.2 instead of 1.12.  (Where did they get 1.12?)
  TONS:  Standard
  Slots:  10

  Ceramo-Steel Armor:  This armor uses the natural heat resistive 
properties of ceramic materials and meshes them within layers of standard 
armor.  Ceramo-Steel armor comes in 2 ratings: Level 1 and Level 2. 
  Level 1 Ceramo-Steel comes with a armor rating multiplier of 1.1 
similar to Ferro-Fibrous and makes the mech invulnerable to energy weapons 
target heat (From lasers, PPCs, etc).  Incindiery Target Heat from Infernos, 
Flamers, and the like still affect the mech normally. 
  Level 2 Ceramo-Steel Armor gets no armor multiplier but makes the 
mech invulnerable to *any* target heat.
  TONS: Standard (for both levels)
  Slots:  10 (for both levels)

  Reflective Armor:  This is an armor where the armor plates have been 
covered in layers of polished metallic flakes.  The effect is to reduce the 
effectiveness of lasers hitting the target.  The disadvantage is that the 
overall armor resiliancy is reduced.
  Reflective Armor reduces the effectiveness of incoming laser fire.  
All laser fire that hits the mounting vehicle has 1 point of damage 
subtracted from it.  EXAMPLE:  A large laser and 2 medium lasers are fired 
at a tank with reflective armor.  The net damage is: 15 (8-1 + 5-1 + 5-1).
  Reflective armor gives less protection than standard armor and  
is expressed by multiplying the number of armor points available by .9.

  Standard Armor:  This ablative armor is not changed from the game, 
yet is used as the basis of comparison for other armors.

  --- --- --- --- --- --- --- ---

  Below are defensive systems that can be designed into a mech in 
addition to other armors/defensive systems.  Refer to the description of 
each one to determine what can armors/systems can be used on the same 
mech/vehicle.

  Blue Shield Project:  This system is a concentrated particle field 
dampener which dissipates incoming PPC fire.
  Blue Shield way 3 tons and takes up one critical hit space in each 
of the mech/vehicle's hit locations.  This system halves the damage of any 
LPPC, PPC, HPPC, or variants.  A critical hit to a Blue Shield slot destroys 
the entire shield.
  Every time that Blue Shield is activated by PPC or HPPC hit roll 
2D6.  On a roll of 2 when hit by a PPC or on a roll of 2 or 3 when hit by 
HPPC the system overloads, destroying all of the shield critical locations 
and inflicting 5 points of internal damage to all of the hit locations 
except for the head which takes one point of internal damage.
  Blue Shield is compatible with all of the armors and can be use 
with the other defensive systems.

  Chameleon System:  This is a system that evaluates the surrounding 
terrain with electronic sensors and changes the color scheme of the armor 
on the mech/vehicle.  It works best when the mounting vehicle is not moving 
and in some type of obscuring terrain.
  The Chameleon System weighs 3 tons and takes up one critical hit 
space in each hit location.  This system adds a +1 to hit penalty to any 
weapons fire against the mounting vehicle when the mounting vehicle is 
standing still, walks/cruises or jumps.  It has no effect when the mounting 
vehicle runs/flanks.  When the mounting vehicle is stationary for the turn 
in a hex that provides terrain modifiers to hit (Woods, smoke, etc.) the 
terrain to hit penalties against the mounting vehicle are used as the 
effects of the Chameleon System.  EXAMPLE: Fred walks his mech that has 
the Chameleon System and ends it in a heavy woods hex.  Since he walked it 
any fire against his mech has a +1 to hit penalty in addition to any other 
modifiers.  The next turn Fred does not move his mech, remaining in the 
heavy woods hex.  The Chameleon System gives any fire against the mech a +4 
to hit penalty (+2 for heavy woods hex that the Chameleon System emulates) 
in addition to the +2 for the heavy woods his mech is in and any other 
modifiers.
  The Chameleon System is not very good at keeping the color 
coordination if the mounting vehicle is running/flanking or jumping.  This 
difficulty can overload the system with disasterous results.  At the end of 
any turn that the mounting vehicle runs/flanks or jumps it must roll 2D6.  
On a roll of 2, 3, or 4 the system has overloaded and explodes.  This destroys 
all of the system's critical locations and inflicts 5 points of internal 
damage to all of the hit locations except for the head which takes one point 
of internal damage.
  The Chameleon System can be used with all armors except Reflective 
Armor and defensive systems except for Reactive Armor.

  Reactive Armor:  This is bolted on armor that protects the mech 
from slow incoming projectiles by using a shaped charge to blow them away.  
It can be combined with any of the other types of armor.  The covering of 
Reactive Armor requires internal support brackets which take up space.
  Reactive Armor requires 1 critical hit space in each of the mech's/ 
vehicle's locations and weighs equal to the mech's/vehicle's tonnage/20.  Any 
missile and certain other weapon attacks made against the target with reactive 
armor do half damage, round fractions up.  The armor location hit must have 
armor points left for this to work or there will be no effect.  Any critical 
hits to the Reactive Armor slots count as no effect.  VTOLs may not have 
reactive armor.  Reactive Armor has no effect upon TSM or Inferno.
  Every time that the mech is hit by missile fire and Reactive Armor 
is used roll 2D6.  On a roll of a 2 the armor has blown back the missile at 
a bad angle.  Apply the half damage to the location hit and then roll for 
another hit location.  This second hit location takes an equal amount of 
damage as the first.
  Reactive Armor is compatible with all armor and defensive systems 
except for Chameleon System.  Reactive Armor will not explode when set 
afire.

    W E A P O N S    T A B L E

TYPE    DAMAGE  HEAT  TAR/HEAT  MIN.  RANGE (S/M/L/Ex./Max.)  
----    ------  ----  --------  ----  -----   
S. Laser  3 1 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
M. Laser  5 3 .5    - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
L. Laser  8 8 1   - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
ER Small Laser  3 2 -   - 1-2/3-4/5-6/7-8/9-10
ER Medium Laser 5 5 .5    - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
ER Large Laser  8 12  1   - 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
S. Pul. Laser 3 2 .5    - 1/2/3/4/5
M. Pul. Laser 6 4 1   - 1-2/3-4/5-6/7-8/9-10
L. Pul. Laser 9 10  2   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Light PPC 5 5 1   4 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
PPC   10  10  2   3 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
Heavy PPC 15  15  3   2 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
ER Light PPC  5 7 1   - 1-8/9-16/17-24/25-32/33-40
ER PPC    10  15  2   - 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
ER Heavy PPC  15  23  3   - 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
Pul. LPPC 6 6 2   3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
Pul. PPC  11  11  3   2 1-4/5-8/9-12/13-15/16-18
Pul. HPPC 16  16  4   1 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Light EDC 5 3 -   3 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
EDC   10  7 1   2 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
Heavy EDC 15  10  2   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Rail Gun  5 0 -   4 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
Rail Cannon 10  1 -   3 1-8/9-16/17-24/25-32/33-40
Gauss Rifle 15  2 -   2 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
Gauss Cannon  20  3 -   1 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
A/C 2   2 0 -   4 1-8/9-16/17-24/25-32/33-40
A/C 5   5 1 -   3 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
A/C 10    10  3 -   - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
A/C 15    15  5 -   - 1-4/5-8/9-12/13-15/16-18
A/C 20    20  7 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
A/C 2  Ultra  2 (x2)  0 -   4 1-8/9-16/17-24/25-32/33-40
A/C 5  Ultra  5 (x2)  1(x2) -   3 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
A/C 10 Ultra  10(x2)  3(x2) -   - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
A/C 15 Ultra  15(x2)  5(x2)   -   - 1-4/5-8/9-12/13-15/16-18
A/C 20 Ultra  20(x2)  7(x2) -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
LB2-X   2 0 -   4 1-8/9-16/17-24/25-32/33-40
LB5-X   5 1 -   3 1-6/7-12/13-18/19-24/25-30
LB10-X    10  3 -   - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
LB15-X    15  5 -   - 1-4/5-8/9-12/13-15/16-18
LB20-X    20  7 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Machine Gun 2 0 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
Vulcan    4 1 -   - 1-2/3-4/5-6/7-8/9-10
Light Cannon  3 0 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Flamer    2 3 3(I)    - 1/2/3/4/5
Flame Thrower 4 5 5(I)    - 1-2/3-4/5-6/7-8/9-10
Coolant Cannon  0 0 (-10)   - 1/2/3/4/5
BRM/6   1D6 2 -   7 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
BRM/12    2D6 4 -   7 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
BRM/18    3D6 6 -   7 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
BRM/24    4D6 8 -   7 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
BRM/30    5D6 10  -   7 1-9/10-18/19-27/28-36/37-45
LRM/5   1/hit 2 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
LRM/10    1/hit 4 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
LRM/15    1/hit 5 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
LRM/20    1/hit 6 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
TSM/1     (5/2)/hit 2 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
TSM/2     (5/2)/hit 4 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
TSM/3     (5/2)/hit 5 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
TSM/4     (5/2)/hit 6 -   6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
MRM/3   1/hit 1 -   3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
MRM/6   1/hit 2 -   3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
MRM/9   1/hit 3 -   3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
MRM/12    1/hit 4 -   3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
SRM/2   2/hit 2 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
SRM/4   2/hit 3 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
SRM/6   2/hit 4 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Streak SRM/2  2x2 2 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Streak SRM/4  2x4 3 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Streak SRM/6  2x6 4 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
CRM/1   3/hit 0 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
CRM/2   3/hit 1 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
CRM/3   3/hit 2 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
CRM/4   3/hit 3 -   - 1/2/3/4/5
Inferno/1 - 2 (5/2)(I)  - 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
Inferno/2 - 1 5/hit(I)  - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
Inferno/3 - 1 3.3/ht(I) 3 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
Inferno/5 - 2 2/hit(I)  6 1-7/8-14/15-21/22-28/29-35
TAG Laser - 0 -   - 1-5/6-10/11-15/16-20/21-25
NARC    - 0 -   - 1-3/4-6/7-9/10-12/13-15
AMS   - 1 -   - Special rules
AML   - 3 -   - Refer to note
PAML    - 1D6 -   - Refer to note
AP pods   1D6-1 0 -   - 0-1 Auto hit
Hatchet   1/5 ton 0 -   - Close combat
Sword   1/10ton 0 -   - Close combat
Buzzsaw   2D6 3 -   - Close combat
Arrow IV  20/10 10  -   - 5 maps
Bolt III  10/5  5 -   - 5 maps
Dart II   5/2 3 -   - 5 maps
Long Tom  20/10 20  -   - 20 maps
Sniper    10/5  10  -       - 14 maps
Thumper   5/2 6 -   - 12 maps
Self Destruct ER/15 A lot ER/30   - 0/1

RANGE     TARGET #  DAMAGE and TARGET HEAT MODIFIERS
-----   --------  --------------------------------
Short (S)    4    Normal Damage
Medium (M)     6    Normal Damage
Long (L)     8    Normal Damage
Extreme (Ex.)   10    Damage&Tar. Ht. x.75 (round .5+ up) 
Maximum (Max.)    12    Damage&Tar. Ht. x.5 (round .5 up)

Note:  Missiles roll on the Extreme Range Missile Hit Chart and the Maximum 
Range Missile Hit Chart when firing at those ranges.  BRM's roll D6-1 at 
Extreme Range and D3 at Maximum Range.


  MISSILE   HIT   CHARTS

    STANDARD  MISSILE  HIT  CHART
    -----------------------------
DIE ROLL    # of MISSILES
       2   3   4   5   6   9   10   12   15   20
    -----------------------------------------------
   2       1   1   1   1   2   3    3    4    5    6
   3       1   1   2   2   2   3    3    4    5    6
   4       1   1   2   2   3   4    4    6    6    9
   5       1   2   2   3   3   5    6    6    9   12
   6       1   2   2   3   4   6    6    8    9   12
   7         1   2   3   3   4   6    6    8    9   12
   8       2   2   3   3   4   7    6    8    9   12
   9       2   3   3   4   5   8    8   10   12   16
  10       2   3   3   4   5   8    8   10   12   16
  11       2   3   4   5   6   9   10   12   15   20
  12       2   3   4   5   6   9   10   12   15   20

    EXTREME  RANGE  MISSILE  HIT  CHART
    -----------------------------------
DIE ROLL    # of MISSILES
       2   3   4   5   6   9   10   12   15   20
    -----------------------------------------------
   2       1   1   1   1   1   1    2    3    3    4
   3       1   1   1   1   1   2    2    3    4    5
   4       1   1   1   1   2   3    3    4    5    7
   5       1   1   2   2   2   4    4    5    6    8
   6       1   1   2   2   2   4    4    6    6    9
   7         1   1   2   2   3   5    5    6    7    9
   8       1   2   2   3   3   5    5    6    7   10
   9       1   2   3   3   4   6    6    7    8   11
  10       1   2   3   3   4   6    6    8    9   12
  11       2   3   3   4   5   7    7    9   11   14
  12       2   3   3   4   5   7    8    9   12   15

    MAXIMUM  RANGE  MISSILE  HIT  CHART
    -----------------------------------
DIE ROLL    # of MISSILES
       2   3   4   5   6   9   10   12   15   20
    -----------------------------------------------
   2       1   1   1   1   1   1    1    2    2    3
   3       1   1   1   1   1   1    2    2    3    3
   4       1   1   1   1   1   2    2    3    3    4
   5       1   1   1   2   2   2    3    3    4    6
   6       1   1   1   2   2   3    3    4    4    6
   7         1   1   2   2   2   3    3    4    5    6
   8       1   1   2   2   2   3    3    4    5    6
   9       1   2   2   2   2   4    4    5    6    8
  10       1   2   2   2   3   4    4    5    6    8
  11       1   2   2   2   3   4    5    6    7   10
  12       1   2   2   3   3   5    5    6    8   10


  CONSTRUCTION    PARTICULARS

WEAPON    TONS  SHOTS/TON CRITICAL  NOTES
------    ----  --------- --------  -----
S. Laser  .5  -   .5    #1
M. Laser  1 -   1   #2
L. Laser  4 -   2   #3
ER Small Laser  .5  -   .5    #1
ER Medium Laser 1 -   1   #2
ER L. Laser 4 -   2   #3
S. Pul. Laser 1 -   1   -2 to hit
M. Pul. Laser 2 -   1   -2 to hit
L. Pul. Laser 6 -   2   -2 to hit
Light PPC 3 -   2   #4
PPC   7 -   3   
Heavy PPC 9 -   4   #4
ER Light PPC  3 -   2   #4
ER PPC    7 -   3   
ER Heavy PPC  9 -   4   #4
Pul. LPPC 4 -   2   -1 to hit
Pul. PPC  8 -   3   -1 to hit
Pul. HPPC 10  -   4   -1 to hit
Light EDC 3.5 20    3   #5
EDC   8 15    5   #5
Heavy EDC 11  10    7   #5
Rail Gun  9 20    4   Explodes for 10
Rail Cannon 12  15    5   Explodes for 15
Gauss Rifle 15  8   7   Explodes for 20
Gauss Cannon  18  4   9   Explodes for 25
A/C 2   3 45    1   #6
A/C 5   4 20    4   #6
A/C 10    10  10    6   #6
A/C 15    12  7   8   
A/C 20    14  5   10    
A/C 2  Ultra  4 45    2   Double shot, #6
A/C 5  Ultra  6 20    4   Double shot, #6
A/C 10 Ultra  13  10    7   Double shot, #6
A/C 15 Ultra  14.5  7   9   Double shot
A/C 20 Ultra  16  5   11    Double shot
LB2-X   3.5 45    1   Shotgun w/-1,#6,#7
LB5-X   5 20    4   Shotgun w/-1,#6,#7
LB10-X    11  10    7   Shotgun w/-1,#6,#7
LB15-X    13  7   8.5   Shotgun w/-1,#1
LB20-X    15  5   10    Shotgun w/-1
Machine Gun .5  200   .5    #1
Vulcan    1 100   1   
Light Cannon  1 100   1   
Flamer    1 -   1   #8
Flame Thrower 2 -   1   #8
Coolant Cannon  1 2   N/A (1)   #9
BRM/6   3 14    2   #10
BRM/12    6 10    4   #10
BRM/18    9 6   6   #10
BRM/24    12  5   8   #10
BRM/30    15  4   10    #10
LRM/5   2 24    1   
LRM/10    5 12    2   
LRM/15    7 8   3   
LRM/20    10  6   5   
TSM/1   2 18    1   #11
TSM/2   5 9   2   #11
TSM/3   7 6   3   #11
TSM/4   10  4   5   #11
MRM/3   1 50    1   #12
MRM/6   2 25    2   #12
MRM/9   3 15    3   #12
MRM/12    4 10    4   #12
SRM/2   1 50    1   
SRM/4   2 25    1   
SRM/6   3 15    2   
Streak SRM/2  1.5 50    1   
Streak SRM/4  3 25    2   
Streak SRM/6  4.5 15    2   
CRM/1   .5  50    .5    #13
CRM/2   1 25    1   #13
CRM/3   1.5 15    1.5   #13
CRM/4   2 10    2   #13
Inferno/1 3 9   2   #14
Inferno/2 2 25    2   #14
Inferno/3 2 25    2   #14
Inferno/5 3 12    2   #14
TAG Laser 1 -   1   #15   
NARC    3 6   2   #16
Artemis   1 -   1   #17
AMS   .5  50    1   #18
AML   1.5 -   2   #18
PAML    3 -   2   #18
AP pods   .5  one shot  0   
Hatchet   1/15 ton    1/15 ton
Sword   1/15 ton    1/15 ton  -2 to hit
Buzzsaw   4 -   2 Att roll 2 dest. saw
Arrow IV  15  5   15    
Bolt III  10  10    10
Dart II   7 20    7
Long Tom  30  5   30    
Sniper    20  10    20    
Thumper   15  20    15    
Icewind   .5  one shot  0   #19
C^3 Master  5 -   5
C^3 Slave 1 -   1
Beagle    1.5 -   2
Guardian  1.5 -   2
AAR   1per5 -   1per5 tons  #20
GAR   1per5 -   1per5 tons  #21
Target Comp.  1per5 -   1per5 tons  
Infantry pods 4.5 1 Platoon 3   #22
BAIP    2 1 Star    2   #23
Self Destruct 1 Your mech!  1   #24

  1) The .5 critical means that 2 of these weapons can be fitted into 
one location.  If this location gets hit, both weapons are lost.  The two 
weapons can be considered "banked" as per the rules below.  Any weapn that 
takes up x.5 critical hit locations can fit another .5 critical hit 
location item with one of its lines.  Example: An LBX-15 takes up 8.5 
critical hit locations.  On one of the lines a small laser can share the 
same line as one of the 9 LBX-15 lines.  Another example would be where a 
CRM/3 has 1.5 tons of ammo assigned to it.  The first line would be 
"CRM/3," the second would read "CRM/3 & 1/2 ton ammo," and the last line 
would read "1 ton CRM/3 ammo."  

  2) The .5 Target Heat means that for every 2 medium lasers that 
hit, the target receives 1 point of heat.  Refer to the Target Heat rules 
found below.

  3) The large laser and variants had their weights reduced to make 
them more competitive with other weapons.  It seemed that the large laser 
was not worth the weight of the weapon, therefore the weight is reduced on 
this weapons list.

  4) These two weapons seemed like natural outgrowthes of the 
standard PPC.  The pulse PPC's also seemed like they should belong somehow. 
Their only special rule is that there is a -1 to hit for them as opposed to 
the -2 for the pulse lasers.

  5) The Electrical Discharge Cannon is an energy weapon designed 
around the principle of discharging huge amounts of electrical energy into 
the target.  For the EDC to fire, a discharge coil is needed.  As this coil 
burns out everytime the weapon fires, the weapon is designed to have a new 
coil placed in the receptacle and the burned out one cycled out in a way 
similar to an autocannon reload system.  Thus in the listing for the weapon 
under ammunition the number gives how many coils.
    A)  The "ammunition" for the EDC is not truly ammo.  When 
  it is hit it does not explode.
    B)  The EDC will cause collateral damage to units in water 
  hexes.  If the EDC hits a target in or above (like hovercraft or 
  LAM at 1 elevation) water the EDC does full damage to all targets 
  in that hex.  Any units in or above water 1 hex away will receive 
  full damage minus 5 points.  Any units in or above water 2 hexes 
  away will receive full damage minus 10 points of damage.  Any unit 
  3 or more hexes away is safe from collateral damage.

  6)  The weights of the lighter autocannons were lowered because 
they were perceived to be to heavy for them to be worth taking.  The 
benefits of low heat and high range were not enough to counter the drawbacks
of very high weight and possibility of ammo explosions.  It got to the point 
that all A/C 2 through A/C 10 were replaced with different weapons due to 
their attractiveness.  Therefore the weights of some of the A/C were 
reduced.

  7) The weights of the LBX autocannons were made higher than the 
standard models to compensate for the fact that they were better than 
standard autocannons.  Granted, these changes to the various autocannons 
are not historical, but then again, who plays historically?

  8) The Flamer and the Flame Thrower are modified to make them more 
worth their weight.  In addition to doing their damage, these weapons incur 
"incindiery" target heat upon their target.  The target heat from these 
weapons will remain on the target for 3 turns.  Any additional target 
heat beyond 10 points carries over for an additional 3 turns.  Refer to the 
target heat rules below.

  9) The coolant cannon is "weapon" that does no damage and is 
designed to cool down mech in one of two methods.  The first is to take any 
flame/inferno heat that is sticking to the target and eliminate it.  Any 
flame/inferno heat fired upon the target after it has been cooled will act 
normally.  This first method of cooling will take precedence over the 
second method.  (This first method of "attack" is similar to blowing out a 
candle or using a fire extinguisher to put out a fire.)
    The second method of "attack" for a coolant cannon is to 
eliminate 10 points of heat generated that turn by the target.  This can be 
done only if the target has no flame/inferno target heat generating at the 
time.  If the target has less than 10 points of flame/inferno heat 
generateing at the time, for example 6 points, the coolant cannon would 
eliminate the 6 points of fame/inferno heat and reduce the heat generated 
by the target by 4.  In general terms, the coolant cannon does -10 points 
of target heat.  It will eliminate up to 10 points of flame/inferno heat.  
Any remaining coolant cannon "damage" will reduce that turns heat output 
for the target by the remaining amount.
    Coolant cannons can only be mounted on ground vehicles 
since the volume of the coolant is too large to mount on a battlemech.  If 
rules are made such that a coolant cannon were to take up crits, the number 
is listed in parentheses.

  10) Bombardment Range Missiles (BRM)  BRM's are an extreme range 
weapon designed to saturate an area with warheads.  It is a rather erratic 
weapon in its performance, but this is compensated for by its long range.
    A) BRM's do not roll on the missile hit chart to determine 
  the number of missiles that hit.  Instead, a number of D6 are rolled to 
  determine the number that hit.  When firing at Extreme Range a 
  number of D6-1 are rolled and the number of D3 when firing at 
  Maximum range.
    B) The damage that a BRM does is distributed as an LRM would 
  would.  Every 5 points of damage is rolled for.
    C) If Artemis is tied in to a BRM, an extra D6 is rolled to 
  determine the number of missiles that hit.  If the number of missiles 
  that would hit is greater than the rating of the launcher, then simply
  all of the missiles hit.     
    D) BRM's may indirect fire just as LRM's can.

  11) Tactical Support Missiles (TSM)  TSM's are an area effect, mech 
mounted, reloadable weapon system based loosely on the LRM.  It utilizes an 
airburst schrapnel charge to spread its damage over an area.
    A) TSM's do 5 points of damage to any units in the target hex 
  and 2 points of damage to any units one hex away from the target 
  hex.  (The 6 surrounding hexes)
    B) Like artillery, TSM's attack hexes rather than units.  
  The to hit roll is modified only by intervening terrain and the 
  attacking unit's movement and condition, never by the movement or 
  condition of units in the hex.
    C) To determine the number of missiles that hit, roll on 
  the Missile Hit Chart under the appropriate number.  (Obviously the 
  TSM/1 is a hit or miss deal.)
    D) Roll for scatter for any TSM's that did not hit their 
  intended target hex.  Use the Artillery scatter method.  Roll each 
  missile seperately.
    E) The firing of TSM's cannot be modified or helped by the 
  following systems: Artemis, AAR, GAR, NARC, TAG, or anything 
  else that would improve the accuracy or damage of the missile.  
  (This restriction does not apply to 2x cockpit mechs, C^3, or 
  pilot/gunners that have an improved gunnery skill.) This reflects the 
  fact that the TSM is a ballistic missile that air bursts over the 
  target and cannot really be guided to the explosion point.  Another 
  reason is because these things are nasty enough as they are! 
    F)  When TSM ammunition explodes due to heat or critical 
  hit each missile explodes for 7 points of damage.

  12) MRM's (Medium Range Missiles)  Medium Range Missiles were 
developed as support weapons that would have a longer range than SRM's but 
shorter range than LRM's. 
    A) To resolve a missile hit from an MRM, conduct it in a 
  manner similar to an LRM except that MRM hit in groups of 3 as 
  opposed to in groups of 5 as with LRM.
    B) MRM can not be fired in indirect fire mode.  They are, 
  except as noted previouslly, functionally similar to LRM.

  13) CRM (Close Range Missiles) are an functionally similar to SRM's 
except that they do 3 points of damage per missile that hits.

  14) Inferno weapons.  The only changes from the Inferno rules as 
listed on p.60 of _The Battletech Compendium_ are listed below. 
    A) The max target heat that Infernos (of any kind) can deliver 
  is 10 instead of 6.
    B) Inferno/1 is based upon the TSM/1.  Use notes 11B, 11D, and 
  11E for additional information.  The Inferno/1 delivers 5 target 
  heat to anything in the target hex and 2 target heat to anything in 
  the 6 immediately surrounding hexes.
    C) While the Geneva Conventions and the rules may prohibit 
  the use of incindiery weapons against infantry, we warmongers will 
  not.  The number of men killed by an inferno attack is equal to the 
  target heat inflicted.  

  15) TAG Laser.  The TAG laser appeared to be too limited in scope 
for your average warmonger.  To make the TAG laser more useful for its 
weight it was decided to make it helpful for normal missile attacks in 
addition to your average Arrow IV attack.  In addition to its normal 
functions, the TAG laser can be used by a mech about to make a missile 
attack against a target.  Fire the TAG laser first.  If it hits then any 
*one* missile launcher may be fired at that target with a to hit modifier 
of -1 since the TAG laser has a more definate lock on the target and feeds 
its information to the selected missile launcher.  Multiple TAG lasers are 
needed for multiple launcher assists and can only assist in missile shots 
at the TAGed target. TAG can be combined with any missile launcher or 
targeting enhancement.  TAG is useless with Thunder and Swarm munitions.  
There is no additional cost to launchers or munitions to use TAG.  The C^3 
system's capability to emulate TAG does not get the -1 to hit missile 
bonus.

  16)  NARC Pods.  The NARC as presented in the rules is, well, to 
put it bluntly, pretty wimpy.  Here are the modifications suggested:
    A)  Any missile equipped attack against a NARCed target 
  has a -1 to hit and a +2 on the missile chart instead of just the 
  +2 to missile hit chart modifier as presented in the rules 
  originally.
    B)  Record the hit location of where the NARC beacon will 
  hit.  Once that location has been destroyed (Mech arm destroyed or 
  blown off) then the NARC beacon is lost also.
    C)  NARC and Artemis are still incompatible.
    D)  The idea of special NARC missiles has been discarded.  
  All normal missiles and those not specifically mentioned are "NARC 
  compatible."

  17) Artemis.  The only change to the Artemis is that Artemis 
assisted BRM attacks get an additional D6 (D6-1, D3) to determine the 
number of missiles that hit.

  18) Anti-Missile System (AMS) Ammunition, Anti-Missile Laser (AML), 
and Pulse Anti-Missile Laser (PAML)
    Was somebody smoking dope at FASA and not invite us?  Why does 
the original rules state that AMS get only 12 reloads?  Especially if you 
can expend all 12 in one shot?  And treat an AMS ammo hit as machine gun ammo? 
Hello?  Is this thing on?
    A)  Increase AMS ammunition to 50 shots per ton.  Even that 
  is being mean.  
    B)  The Anti Missile Laser is an energy weapon based 
  version of the AMS.  It operates exactly like an AMS except that 
  there is no ammunition to go with the weapon.  After the AML has 
  been used roll 2D6.  If a two is rolled then the focusing mechanism 
  has been overstressed and has broken.  The AML cannot be used until 
  repaired.
    C)  The Pulse Anti-Missile Laser is a pulse energy weapon 
  based version of the AMS.  It operates exactly like an AML except 
  that the PAML can engage twice per turn and the heat generated is 
  1D6 per engaging.  After each time that the PAML is engaged roll 
  2D6, if a two is rolled the PAML's focusing device is damaged.  
  This will knock out the PAML until repaired.  If the PAML is 
  damaged on it's first use of the turn then it cannot be used again, 
  that turn or for the rest of the game.

  19) Icewind.  The Icewind system is not an offensive weapon but a 
defensive heat reducing system.  It is a bottle of non-flammable gas in 
liquid state under compression.  When the ambiant temperature of the mech 
reaches a preset level the easy melt cap of the bottle melts, releasing a 
cold cloud of vapor into the interior of the mech, cooling the mech off.
    A)  For every Icewind installed put a line on the heat 
  scale.  This represents the setting of the Icewind.  If multiple 
  Icewinds are mounted settings can be put on the same line. 
    B)  Resolve the heat buildup for the mech normally.  If the 
  final heat level for that turn is above the rating of the 
  Icewind(s) then each Icewind that it is above releases.  For each 
  Icewind that releases reduce the heat scale by 4 points.  That is 
  the final heat level for the mech for that turn.
    C)  Once an Icewind has gone off it is gone for the game.  
  In a campaign an Icewind can be reloaded same as doing a quick 
  reload yet requires a coolant truck.

  20)  Anti Aircraft Radar (AAR)  AAR is a special targeting system 
that is used against any aerial target (Aerospace fighters, conventional 
fighters, VTOL, and LAM in LAM mode but not mechs that are simply jumping.)
    A)  For any attacks that are made against aerial targets 
  that utilize AAR the movement to hit modifiers are halved.  
  Example:  A mech with AAR that is running (+2 to hit) is trying to 
  fire on a VTOL flying 11 hexes (+5 to hit).  The total modifier to 
  hit is +7.  Since the mech is using AAR the total movement based to 
  hit modifier is +3.5 which is rounded up to +4. 
    B)  AAR does not compensate for any other to hit modifiers 
  that might accumulate, such as heat, terrain, or pilot.
    C)  AAR may be used by the affected targets listed in 
  parenthesis above against other such targets.  AAR may not be used 
  against targets on the ground.
    D)  AAR does not have to be linked to all weapons on a 
  mech/vehicle.  If AAR is linked to only certain weapons then only 
  those weapons get the benefits of the AAR.
    E)  AAR weighs 1 ton for every 5 tons of weapons that it is 
  tied into.  It takes up one critical for every ton of weight.
    F)  Once the AAR has taken one critical it is destroyed.  
  The AAR cannot be mounted in the legs.
    G)  Guardian ECM nullifies the capabilities of AAR if the 
  defender has Guardian or the line of sight from the AAR using unit 
  to the defender passes within 6 hexes of an enemy AAR.

  21)  Ground Attack Radar (GAR) Ground Attack Radar is in game terms 
functionally similar to AAR except that it can only be used by aerial 
targets to fire upon ground targets.  (GAR is the AAR that *can* be used 
against targets on the ground as mentioned in rule 19C.)  
    A)  GAR can not be used to help in the fire of strafing 
  runs.  GAR is used for firing upon individual targets while 
  strafing saturates an area with fire.
    B)  GAR can not be used by ground mechs/vehicles for use 
  against other ground targets.  The only way for LAM to use 
  GAR is for them to be flying in either LAM or fighter mode.  VTOLs 
  or any other flying craft that has landed may not use GAR.
    C)  For any attacks that are made against ground targets 
  that utilize GAR the movement to hit modifiers are halved.  
  Example:  A LAM in Airmech mode with GAR that is jumping (+3 to hit) 
  is trying to fire on a mech running 6 hexes (+2 to hit).  The total 
  modifier to hit is +5.  Since the LAM is using GAR the total movement 
  based to hit modifier is +2.5 which is rounded up to +3. 
    D)  GAR does not compensate for any other to hit modifiers 
  that might accumulate, such as heat, terrain, or pilot.
    E)  GAR does not have to be linked to all weapons on a 
  mech/vehicle.  If GAR is linked to only certain weapons then only 
  those weapons get the benefits of the AAR.
    F)  GAR weighs 1 ton for every 5 tons of weapons that it is 
  tied into.  It takes up one critical for every ton of weight.
    G)  Once the AAR has taken one critical it is destroyed.  
  The AAR cannot be mounted in the legs.
    H)  Guardian ECM nullifies the capabilities of AAR if the 
  defender has Guardian or the line of sight from the AAR using unit 
  to the defender passes within 6 hexes of an enemy AAR.

  22)  Infantry Pods are special cargo carriers that come with one 
platoon of jump infantry that are mounted on mechs. The criticals that the 
pods take represent special internal bracing for seating and life support 
equipment.  The infantry take no damage from weapons hits to the mech 
because they are in an armored pod, as opposed to hanging on the sides of 
the mech.  The pod and/or exit doors are normally mounted/facing the back 
or the top of the mech.  While these pods tend to grossly distort the 
normal profile of the mech they do not make it any easier to target.
    A)  The jump infantry may dismount from the mech as per 
  regular infantry except that the mech does not need to expend 1mp.  
  Remounting is per regular rules.  Remember that infantry may not 
  move or fire the turn that they dismount.  The reaon that 1mp does 
  not have to be expended is because the infantry can jump down and 
  land safely while the mech is moving.
    B)  The pods must be mounted in the torsos, head, or arms.  
  If mounted in the arms the mech may not make make any physical 
  attacks involving the arms while infantry are in their pod(s).  If 
  the head or arm is "blown off" with 3 critical hits and the 
  infantry are still in their pod(s) they suffer 2D6 casualties.
    C)  When the Infantry Pod has suffered 1 critical hit any 
  infantry still in the pods suffer 1D6 casualties and 1 casualty when 
  the heat scale is 15-25 and 2 when it is 25+.  Double this number if 
  the Infantry Pod has suffered 2 critical hits.  On the second 
  critical hit 2D6 remaining infantry are destroyed.  Any infantry 
  in the pod when it suffers its third critical hit are destroyed.
    D)  The platoon of jump infantry comes free with the pod 
  and does not have to be payed for in any manner.
  
  23)  Battlearmor Infantry Pods (BAIP) are just like Infantry Pods 
except that they carry one star (5 man team) of Battlearmor.  The rules 
below will either refer you to the rules above or modify it.  These rules 
are different and should not be confused with the *Mechanized Battlearmor* 
rules on p.44-45 of _The Battletech Compendium_.
    A)  Refer to note 22A.
    B)  Same as note 22B except that when the location is 
  "blown off" each trooper suffers 1D6 damage.
    C)  When this type of infantry pod suffers 1 critical hit 
  each trooper takes 1D6 points of damage.  On the second critical 
  hit all remaining troopers are destroyed.  Battlearmor suffer no 
  damage for excessive heat.
    D)  When a BAIP is mounted on the mech it does not come 
  with the Battle armor troops free.  Each point of Battle Armor 
  counts as a 5 ton mech and most be "bought" as such.  They may be 
  mounted in the BAIP at the start of the game.

  24)  Self Destruct is a system for voluntarily making your mech 
into a small ultrahot ball of thermal destruction.  It takes the reactor 
fuel and dumps it into the reactor, after which the magnetic bottle is 
allowed to decay rapidly.  The end result is a metallic vapor where the 
mech used to be and blast marks for meters!!!
    A)  The Self Destruct Device weighs one ton and takes up 
  one critical hit location which must be located in one of the torsos.
    B)  When activated the device destroys the mech and 
  anything in the same hex.  Anything 1 hex away takes damage equal 
  to the engine rating divided by 15.  If the mech is a 2x engine mech 
  then the engine rating used is the sum of the 2 engine ratings.  If 
  one of the engines has been destroyed due to damage then the total 
  engine rating is based upon the one operating engine.
    C)  The device is activated during the weapons attack phase 
  as if it were a weapon.  No weapons may be fired if the device is 
  to be activated.
    D)  Units taking damage take target heat equal to 1/2 the 
  damage taken, round down.  This target heat lasts for that turn 
  only, similar to energy weapon target heat.
    E)  Units that self destruct are destroyed and count 
  towards the victory of the enemy.   
    F)  It is assumed that the pilot(s) give themselves enough 
  time to eject before the explosion.  Those of us that created these 
  rules really don't care, but some of you might.  After all, life is 
  cheap, mechs aren't.

    TARGET  HEAT  RULES

  These rules were created to simulate the fact that when certain 
weapons hit they are going to create additional heat upon their target.  
Certain weapons are designed for this task while others create target heat 
do to the huge energy conversion of their damage.
  The types of weapons that create target heat can be divided up into 
two general groups:  energy weapons and incindiery weapons.  These two 
weapons groups are treated seperately within these rules.  The target heat 
that a weapon inflicts upon a target is listed in the TAR/HEAT column of 
the weapons damage chart.  Incindiery weapons are marked with an (I).

  TARGET HEAT FROM ENERGY WEAPONS:  When an energy weapon hits a 
target it will recieve target heat.  The heat that the target recieves 
affects it only for the turn that the weapon hit.  The target heat that a 
target recieves is treated as heat generated by the mech that turn.  There 
is no limit to the amount of energy weapon target heat that a unit can 
receive.
  EXAMPLE:  During turn 1 a mech has walked (+1 heat), fired 2 PPC 
(+20 heat), and was hit by a PPC and 2 medium lasers (+3 heat).  Its heat 
sinks must dissipate 24 heat that turn.  The next turn the same mech runs 
(+2 heat), fires 2 PPC (+20 heat), and is hit by, among other weapons, 1 
large laser and 3 medium lasers (+2.5 heat, rounded down to 2).  This turn 
the mech must dissipate 24 heat.  Notice that none of the energy weapon 
target heat from turn 1 did not carry over to the next turn.

  TARGET HEAT FROM INCINDIERY WEAPONS:  Incindiery weapons are 
generally inferno launchers and flamers/flamethrowers.  They are marked on 
the weapons damage chart in the TAR/HEAT column with an (I).  Incindiery 
weapon target heat is described on p.60 of _The Battletech Compendium_ 
under the heading of Infernos.  The only additions to those rules is: 
the max heat that a target can receive is 10 instead of 6, Inferno 
Launchers have to roll to determine the number of missiles that explode 
close enough to the target to generate target heat, and flamers/ 
flamethrowers are considered in the same class as inferno launchers.

      WEAPON  BANKING  RULES

  Weapons can be mounted in pairs on the same weapon mount.  This is 
known as "banking."  
  A)  Banked weapons must be mounted in the same area of the 
mech/vehicle.  For mechs both weapons must be completely in the hit 
location area.  Example:  A pair of A/C 20's could not be banked on a mech 
since 2 of them would not fit in any one hit location, be it a torso or an 
arm.  A pair of Heavy PPC could be banked in an arm since it has 8 critical 
locations and 2 HPPC would take up 8 critical slots.  The above pair of A/C 
20's could be banked in the turret of a tank, but not on a mech. Remember 
that Lower Arm and Hand actutors can be removed for more criticals.
  B)  The weapons banked must be of the exact same type.  Exception:  
Missile launchers of the same type but of different size can be banked.  
  C)  Any weapon except for artillery weapons can be banked. 
  D)  Banked weapons can fire together as one weapon.  For this only 
one to hit roll is made.  If the bank hits then both weapons hit in the 
same location.  If the to hit roll is missed then both weapons miss.  
Banked weapons do not have to be fired as a bank, they may be fired 
independently.
  E)  Non-Energy weapons that are fired banked must both use the same 
type of ammunition.  Different types of alternate ammunitions cannot be 
used.  
  F)  two .5 critical space weapons in the same critical slot are 
automatically counted as being banked.  For other weapons to be counted as 
banked there must be some discernable mark connecting the two weapons.
  G)  If one banked weapon is destroyed there is no effect upon the 
other weapon.  It may only fired independently though, and not banked with 
another weapon.

    ALTERNATE  AMMUNITIONS  FOR  WEAPONS

  This section is a listing of the various types of different 
munitions that can be used for weapons.  The basic format will be:
WEAPON:  This will tell what weapon the ammo may be used for.
DESCRIPTION:  This will give a description plus necessary special rules.
ADVANTAGES:  Self explanatory
DISADVANTAGES:  Self explanatory

  Note:  All of the Alternate Ammunitions must be used as reloads in 
full or half ton increments.  A part of a ton of one type of ammunition 
cannot be mixed with a complementary part of a ton of another type.  Be 
prepared that some 20th Century acronyms are used using different words.  
This reflects that the names will change to reflect changing technology.  
Other types use a name from history to represent what they are loosely 
based upon.  All ammunition types must be specified before the start of the 
game.  Any unspecified reloads are assumed to be standard.

Cannister Shot Ammunition
  WEAPON: Rail Gun, Rail Cannon, Gauss Rifle, and Gauss Cannon
  DESCRIPTION:  Cannister Shot is where the standard round slug is 
replaced with a container of submunitions.  The net effect is that the 
damage is spread all over the target hit.  Cannister is a less volatile 
(and less effective) version of Silver Bullet ammunition.
  ADVANTAGES:  When a target has been it with Cannister Shot roll on 
the standard Missile Hit Chart under the column for the damage that the 
weapon does.  This is the amount of damage that the weapon does.  Roll for 
hit location for each point of damage (as per the LB-X autocannon cluster 
munitions.)
  DISADVANTAGES: Due to the size and shape of the Cannister shot 
round Gauss Cannons only get 10 shots per ton of reloads, the Gauss Rifle 6, 
and the Gauss Cannon 3 shots per ton.

Chain Shot Ammunition
  WEAPON: Rail Gun, Rail Cannon, Gauss Rifle, and Gauss Cannon
  DESCRIPTION:  Chain Shot takes a round of shot and replaces it with 
2 hollow hemispheres connected by a heavy chain.  The tendency for the 
chain to wrap around part of a mech creates problems for the pilot of the 
target mech.  The reduced volume of the shot reduces the damage done.
  Take the base damage for the weapon firing and divide it by 3.  
This is the damage that each of the 2 halves will do.  When the weapon hits 
each of the halves will hit a potentially different hit location.  To 
represent the wrapping possibility of the chain the hit location procedure 
is modified.  For each half roll a D6 to represent the direction that the 
half will hit from.  A roll of 1 means damage is rolled on the front, 2 
goes to the right side front (Roll on the right side hit location table, 
torso damage goes on the front), 3 to the right side rear, 4 to the rear, 
5 to the left side rear, and 6 rolls on the left side front.  Once the 
direction has been determined roll 2D6 for location as per normal rules.
  ADVANTAGES:  When hit the target must make a piloting skill roll 
with a +2 penalty, +4 if both halves hit the legs.  If this is failed then 
the target mech falls.  Any piloting skill rolls after being hit by chain 
shot are at a +1 penalty until the mech expends 1 MP to free itself of the 
chain.  Each chain shot that accumulates gives an additional +1 penalty to 
the Piloting Skill Roll.  Example:  A mech has been hit by 3 chain shots in 
one turn.  Trying to get back up will require a piloting skill roll with a 
+3 penalty due to the 3 chain shots hanging fom it.  After getting back up 
the mech expends 2 MP to free itself of 2 chain shots.  From here the mech 
makes piloting skill rolls with a +1 penalty due to the remaining chain 
shot hanging from it.
  DISADVANTAGES:  Since the Chain Shot is very unpredictable in its 
ballistic characteristics there is a +2 to hit penalty.  Vehicles do not 
have to make a piloting skill roll when first hit, but still have the 
piloting skill roll penalties just as mechs.

Nested Slug Ammunition
  WEAPON: Rail Cannon, Gauss Rifle, and Gauss Cannon
  DESCRIPTION:  Nested Slug Ammunition uses a nested set of Rail Gun 
rounds instead of one large round.  It distributes the damage over several 
areas.  The round still does full damage, it just divides it over 2, 3, or 
4 areas.
  ADVANTAGES:  NS ammo divides the damage into groups of 5 points.  
Roll for damage location for the 2 or 3 groups of 5 damage points 
seperately.
  DISADVANTAGES: Due to the size and shape of the NS round Gauss 
Cannons only get 10 shots per ton of reloads, the Gauss Rifle 6, and the 
Gauss Cannon 3 shots per ton.

Silver Bullet Ammunition
  WEAPON: Rail Gun, Rail Cannon, Gauss Rifle, Gauss Cannon
  DESCRIPTION:  Silver Bullet ammo is a single round with an 
explosive charge in the center.  This charge is used to explode the round 
near its target.  If a hit is made using SB ammo roll to determine the 
amount of damage on the 5, 10, 15, or 20 column of the missile hit chart.
Distribute each point of damage individually (like an LBX autocannon 
round).
  ADVANTAGES:  When firing SB ammo there is a -1 to hit modifier.
  DISADVANTAGES:  In addition to the weapon doing damage when hit as 
per normal rules the ammo will explode when hit by a critical hit or 
exploding due to heat.  When exploding there will be 5, 10, 15, or 20 
points of damage per round exploded, explosion strength per round based 
upon original damage value of weapon.

Smart Rock Ammunition
  WEAPON: Rail Gun, Rail Cannon, Gauss Rifle, Gauss Cannon
  DESCRIPTION:  Smart Rocks replace some of the shot mass with a 
small guidance system and compressed gas steering rockets.
  ADVANTAGES: There is a -1 to hit bonus when firing at medium 
range, a -2 to hit when firing at long range, -3 to hit at extreme range 
and -4 to hit at maximum range with Smart Rocks.
  DISADVANTAGES:  When firing smart rocks there is a +1 additional to 
hit modifier when firing inside minimum range.  Weapon damage is reduced  
also.  Rail Guns score 2 points of damage, Rail Cannons score 5, Gauss Rifles 
score 7 points, and Gauss Cannons score 10 points when firing Smart Rocks.

Armor Peircing Discarding Sabot (APDS) Ammunition
  WEAPON: Auto cannons, LB-X autocannons, Ultra auto cannons
  DESCRIPTION:  APDS ammo replaces the normal round with a smaller, 
high velocity, high density penetrator round inside a sabot.
  ADVANTAGES:  APDS ammo does some internal damage when the round 
hits.  Refer to the chart below.

  A/C or LBX  Armor Damage  Internal Damage
  ----------  ------------  ---------------
      2        1      1
      5        3      2
      10         7      3
      15        10      5
      20        13      7

  DISADVANTAGES:  The APDS round is a high compression round that 
autocannons have trouble handling.  Whenever APDS rounds are fired roll a 
second 2D6 for a stress check.  If a 2 or a 3 is rolled the autocannon has 
broken some linkage on it.  That autocannon may still fire but has a +2 to 
hit penalty.  If the autocannon continues to fire APDS roll a stress check 
with a 2, 3, 4, or 5 as a failure.  If the autocannon fails this second 
check it is considered destroyed.  Autocannon Ultras that fire 2 APDS 
rounds roll stress checks twice.  LB-X Autocannons get a -1 bonus on the 
stress check roll.   When APDS ammo takes a critical hit or explodes the 
internal damage produced is twice that for normal exploding ammo.

Bolt Thrower (BT) Ammunition
  WEAPON: Auto Cannons, LB-X Cannons, Ultra auto cannons
  DESCRIPTION:  Bolt Thrower ammunition is a standard auto cannon 
round that has roughly half the round's mass removed to accomadate a solid 
fuel propellent.  This propellent increases the range of the round 
significantly.
  ADVANTAGES:  When using Bolt Thrower ammo the classes of 
autocannons have these ranges:

  Class Short Medium  Long  Extreme  Maximum  Damage
  ----- ----- ------  ----  -------  -------  ------
    2 1-12  13-24 25-36  37-48    49-60      1
    5 1-9 10-18 19-27  28-36    37-45      3
   10 1-8  9-16 17-24  25-32    33-40      5
   15 1-6  7-12 13-18  19-24    25-30      8
   20 1-5  6-10 11-15  16-20    21-25     10

    NOTE:  Minimum Ranges are not affected.
  DISADVANTAGES:  As can be seen from the table above the damage 
produced is 50% of the normal autocannon round due to the reduction in 
mass.

Cluster Ammunition:
  WEAPON: LB-X Autocannons
  DESCRIPTION:  Cluster Ammunition is the standard cluster round that 
the LB-X autocannons use as presented on p.120 in _The Battletech 
Compendium_.
  ADVANTAGES:  As per the rules.
  DISADVANTAGES:  Only LB-X autocannons can use these rounds.

Flechette Ammunition:
  WEAPON: LB-X Autocannons
  DESCRIPTION:  Flechette Ammunition is similar to Cluster ammunition 
except that it is specially designed for taking out infantry, battlearmor, 
and clearing trees.
  ADVANTAGES:  Flechette Ammunition does double normal damage versus 
infantry and battlearmor.  Flechette retains the -1 to hit bonus of LB-X 
Cluster rounds.  When firing LB10X or bigger with Flechette rounds to clear 
heavy woods instead of reducing the heavy woods to a light woods as per the 
rules these rounds will reduce them to a rough hex.
  DISADVANTAGES:  When firing this ammunition versus mechs or 
vehicles apply a -2 penalty to the roll on the Missile Hit Chart to determine 
the amount of damage.  Any rolls below 2 are treated as a 2.

HEAP Ammunition:
  WEAPON: Auto Cannons, LB-X Cannons, Ultra auto cannons
  DESCRIPTION:  High Explosive Armor Piercing rounds use a shaped 
charge chemical warhead that burns through the armor to produce armor and 
internal structure damage.
  ADVANTAGES:  HEAP rounds do some internal damage and target heat in 
addition to the armor damage.  Refer to the chart below.

A/C or LBX  Armor Dam.  Internal Dam. Target Heat
----------  ----------  ------------- ----------- 
    2        1      1      1
    5        3      1      2
    10         6      2      3
    15         9      3      4
    20        12      4      5
   
  DISADVANTAGES:  HEAP rounds use a directional charge to do their 
damage.  If the round(s) hit at the wrong angle then the blast is 
ineffective.  To represent this these rounds have a +1 to hit penalty.  
Against Level 1 Ceramo-Steel armor HEAP rounds do no target heat on the 
target and against Level 2 Ceramo-Steel armor HEAP rounds do only armor 
damage, no Internal or Target Heat damage.  Due to the slow speed of these 
rounds Reactive Armor can affect them.  Apply the 1/2 damage rule from 
Reactive Armor to these rounds also when fired against a target with 
Reactive Armor.

Bangalor Missiles
  WEAPON: MRM, TSM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  Bangalor missiles have for a warhead several line 
charges acting as Bangalor Torpedoes (an Army engineer obstacle clearing 
charge).  These line charges also have landing spikes that allow them to 
land without bouncing or to stick to the side of buildings.
  ADVANTAGES:  Bangalor missiles can do either of two things:
    Minefield clearing: Bangalor missiles can be used to attack 
mined hexes of any type.  Bangalor missiles will reduce the attack strength 
of a mined hex by the number of missiles/attack strength per hex in the attack. 
EXAMPLE:  A hex that has been mined by a 20 point FASCAM is attacked by 5 
point Bangalor attack.  Assuming that the attack hits the mined hex will have 
its attack strength reduced by 5 down to 15.  
  Preset conventional minefields (as per p.60-61 of _The Battletech 
Compendium_) have an attack strength of 6 and Command Detonated hexes have a 
strength of 10 (assuming the hex is attacked blindly in hopes that it is 
mined).  Vibrabomb hexes that are attacked have their sensitivity rating 
lowered by the Bangalor missile attack strength.  When the rating reaches 0 
the vibrabomb detonates as if tripped.
    Building/fortification destruction:  Bangalor missiles do 
double damage against buildings or any structure that has its strength 
listed in CF.
  DISADVANTAGES:  Bangalor missiles do no damage against mechs, 
vehicles, or infantry.  TAG, Artemis, and NARC work only when firing 
Bangalors against buildings.

FASCAM Missiles, FASCAM Artillery Rounds
  WEAPON: MRM, TSM, LRM, BRM, All Artillery Weapons
  DESCRIPTION:  FASCAM Missiles and FASCAM Artillery Rounds deliver 
Field Artillery SCatterable fAmily of Mines.  Each warhead contains an even 
mix of anti-vehicle and anti-personnel mines.
  ADVANTAGES:  FASCAM missiles are treated just like Thunder LRM as 
described on p.121 of _The Battletech Compendium_.  FASCAM Artillery Rounds 
deliver minefields over an area of 7 hexes: the target hex and the 6 
surrounding.  FASCAM Artillery Rounds deliver minefields in strengths equal 
to the damage that they would do normally.  EXAMPLE:  A Long Tom is firing 
a FASCAM shell.  When the shell lands the hex hit will have a 20 point 
minefield and each of the 6 surrounding hexes will have a 10 point 
minefield.  FASCAM TSM are handled in a manner similar to FASCAM Artillery 
Rounds except that the attack values are 5/2 per missile that lands in the 
target hex.  
  DISADVANTAGES:  The number of reloads per ton is half that for 
normal missiles/artillery rounds.  FASCAM missiles are not affected by TAG, 
Artemis, or NARC.

Fuel-Air Explosive (FAE) Missiles
  WEAPON: TSM
  DESCRIPTION:  FAE missiles replace the standard explosive charges 
of TSM missiles with a Thermite ignited canister of hydrocarbon fuel.  The 
resulting explosion produces armor damage and target heat.
  ADVANTAGES:  Each FAE missile does 3 points of damage/ 2 points 
of incindiery target heat to the target hex and 1 point of damage/ 1 point 
of incindiery target heat to the 6 surrounding hexes.  The incindiery 
target heat lasts for 3 turns as per the Inferno rules.
  DISADVANTAGES:  FAE missiles use the inferno rules concerning 
checking for ammo explosion due to heat.  If FAE missile ammunition does 
explode due to heat or critical hit each missile explodes for 10 points of 
damage.

Smoke Missiles
  WEAPON: TSM
  DESCRIPTION:  Smoke Missiles are designed to fill the target hex 
and adjacent hexes with smoke.
  ADVANTAGES:  Each missile will produce a 1 elevation high 
smoke cloud in the target hex and the 6 adjacent hexes that lasts for 1 
turn for each missile that hits that hex.
  DISADVANTAGES:  These missiles do no damage to any unit in the 
target hexes.  

Swarm Missiles
  WEAPON: MRM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  Swarm missiles are special missiles using hundreds of 
submunitions able to saturate an area.
  ADVANTAGES:  Swarm missiles are used just as the description on 
p.121 of _The Battletech Compendium_ for Swarm LRMs.  For the BRM to 
determine the number of missiles that hit a secondary target use a D6 for 
every 6 missiles remaining, disregarding remaining portions of 6. 
  DISADVANTAGES:  The number of reloads per ton is half that for 
normal missiles.

  TOW Missiles
  WEAPONS: MRM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  TOW Missiles are optically tracked, wire guided 
missiles.  They operate in a manner similar to FTL missiles in that only 
some of the missiles in a rack are wire guided while the rest follow.
  ADVANTAGES:
    -3 to hit if firing unit is stationary
    -2 to hit if firing unit walked/cruised
    -1 to hit if firing unit ran/flanked
  addit.  -1 to hit if target is the only target to be attacked
  DISADVANTAGES: Double all terrain to hit modifiers to reflect the 
possibility of guide wire snap.  Above advantages are lost if firing unit 
plans to enagage in close combat.  If the firing unit takes the advantages 
then it may not make close combat attacks.  TOW missiles may not be fired 
indirectly.  TOW missiles are not affected by NARC, Artemis, or Guardian.

Follow The Leader (FTL) Missiles
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM, MRM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  A modification to the guidance system of the missiles 
has the majority of the missiles in a rack follow one missile.  
  ADVANTAGES:  FTL missiles do not scatter their damage all over the 
target but concentrate in one location.  Example:  If an LRM 20 rack fires 
with FTL missiles and hits with 12 missiles the missiles will all hit on 
one damage location area as opposed to 5 in one area, 5 in another, and 2 
in a third.
  DISADVANTAGES:  For FTL missiles to work the lead missile must be 
one that hits.  Occasionally the targetting systems will follow the wrong 
missile.  Firing with FTL missiles has a +2 Fire Modifier penalty. 

Radar Guided Missiles (RG)
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM, MRM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  The crude guidance system of the missile has been 
replaced by a rough radar unit.  These guidance systems are not very good, 
yet not overly affected by Guardian ECM.
  ADVANTAGES:  
    -1 to hit light mechs
    -2 to hit medium mechs
    -3 to hit heavy mechs
    -4 to hit assault mechs
  addit.  -1 to hit if target has been hit by NARC
  DISADVANTAGES:  RG missiles when fired have any terrain to hit 
modifiers doubled.  If the target is within 6 hexes of an enemy ECM unit 
then the above modifiers are ignored and there is a +1 to hit.  If fired 
indirect and miss their original target then roll another to hit for any 
one randomly determined target within the 6 hexes immediately surrounding 
the target.  If the to hit is made then the missiles hit that unit instead.
Keep doing this procedure until an alternate target is hit or all possible 
alternate targets within the 6 hexes have been missed.  (If any 
clarifications are needed, the rules are similar to those involving Swarm 
missiles except that only one target is hit.)  RG missiles are not affected 
by Artemis or TAG lasers.   Multiply the number of reloads by .75 for Radar 
Guided missiles.  RG missiles are not affected by Artemis.

Radiation Seeking Missiles
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM, MRM, LRM, BRM
  DESCRIPTION:  These missiles rely upon the emitions of special 
electronics to home in on their target.  They are not very good if the 
target does not have special electronic gear operating.
  ADVANTAGES:  The missiles have a -2 to hit bonus against any units 
that have active Guardian, Beagle, AAR, or GAR.  For targets that have a 
NARC attached to them double the NARC bonuses.
  DISADVANTAGES:  The missiles have a +2 to hit penalty against any 
unit that does not have the above systems operating.

Heat Seeking (HS) Missiles
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM
  DESCRIPTION:  The HS warheads replace part of the explosive payload 
with an infrared guidance system.
  ADVANTAGES:  HS missiles receive a to hit bonus equal to the target 
mech's Fire Modifier from heat buildup (if any) from the beginning of the 
turn. In addition, if the target is receiving incindiery target heat from 
Infernos or Flamers/Flame Throwers there is a to hit bonus equal to the 
square of the target heat generated by the incidiery weapons, rounded down.  
Example:  A mech has ben hit by a Flame Thrower and is receiving 5 incindiery 
target heat.  The square root of 5 is 2.23 which is rounded down to 2.  Any 
HS missiles fired at that mech get a to hit bonus of -2.  If the missiles score 
critical hits then they are automatically heat sinks before anything else.
  DISADVANTAGES:  HS SRM do 1 point while HS CRM do 2 points of damage 
per missile that hits (as well as blow up for that amount in ammo 
explosions.)  If the heat scale of the target mech is 0 then Heat Seeking 
missiles have a +2 to hit. HS missiles are not affected by Artemis or NARC.

Laser Guided Missiles (LGM)
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM, MRM
  DESCRIPTION:  LGM require the guidance of a TAG laser to work 
effectively.  When the TAG laser hits the target then there is a marked 
increase in the percentage of missiles that hit.  When the TAG laser 
misses then the probability of a hit decreases
  ADVANTAGES:  LGM get a +3 on the Missile Hit Chart if the target is 
TAGed by the firing mech.  The -1 to hit for each missile launcher tied 
into a TAG laser as per the TAG laser note above still applies.  LGM that 
are following a TAG beam do not get to hit penalties due to Chameleon 
System.
  DISADVANTAGES:  The announcement to fire LGM and TAG laser(s) must 
be made and adhered to before any dice are rolled.  If LGM and TAG are 
fired and no TAG laser hits then the LGM *must* be fired with a +2 to hit.  
Only TAG laser(s) fired from the firing mech can TAG a target for LGM to 
get their bonusses.  LGM can be fired without the intention to TAG the 
target with a +2 to hit penalty.  

Tandem Charge (TC) Warhead Missiles
  WEAPONS: CRM, SRM
  DESCRIPTION:  The TC warhead contains two shaped charge warheads 
where one punches a hole in the armor allowing the second to damage the 
internal structure.
  ADVANTAGES:  CRM with TC warheads do 2 points of armor and one 
point of internal structure damage per missile.  SRM with TC warheads do 1 
point of armor and 1 point of internal damage.  If the area hit has no 
armor then each missile that hits does 1 point of damage due to the 
narrowness of the impact area.
  DISADVANTAGES:  The number of reload shots per ton is multiplied by 
.75, round down.  This represents the extra room required to hold the 
larger warheads.  For ammo explosions, treat each TC CRM as having a 4 
point warhead and each TC SRM as having a 3 point warhead.  TC warhead 
internal damage against its target roll to score critical hits on the 
Critical Hits Effects table with a -3 modifier.  (TC warheads score only 
1 critical on a roll of 11 or 12.)

Beehive Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These shells are effectively huge shotgun shells used 
to fire directly upon approaching enemy.  They are primarily used as a last 
ditch weapon to beat back unwanted interlopers, making use of this shell 
rare.  Under normal circumstances a gun train might have 1 ton per gun of 
reloads.  On rare occasions when artillery guns are expected to be very 
close to the fighting 2-3 tons of reloads per gun are carried.
  ADVANTAGES:  These shells make the artillery guns act just like 
LB-X autocannons.  Take the base damage of the gun (20 for Long Toms, 10 
for Snipers, and 5 for Thumpers) and roll 2D6 under that number on the 
Missile Hit chart *twice*.  These 2 values are added together to determine 
the damage done.  Each point of damage is allocated seperately.  
EXAMPLE: (The Shot from Hell) A Long Tom fires a Beehive Artillery round at 
an approaching mech and hits.  Since the Long Tom does 20 points of base 
damage it rolls under the 20 column of the Missile Hit Chart twice.  The 
Long Tom miraculously rolls an 11 and a 12 doing 40 points of damage.  
Somebody had more than just a bad hair day...
  DISADVANTAGES:  The range of these rounds in hexes is equal to the 
number of boards that the gun can fire normal rounds.  The base to hit 
number is 9 regardless of range. 

Copperhead Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These are missiles that are shot from the tube of the 
gun towards the general area of impact.  In flight on the descent the 
missiles rocket motor takes over and allows the missile to home in on a 
TAGed target.
  ADVANTAGES:  Follow the rules in the last three paragraphs of the 
last column under the rules for "Arrow IV Missile Artillery System" on 
p. 117 of _The Battletech Compendium_.  These rules apply to Copperhead 
Artillery Shells.  The Long Tom Copperhead does 20 points of artillery 
damage to the target and 5 points to any other unit in the hex.  The 
Sniper Copperhead does 10 points of artillery damage to the target and 2 
points to any other unit in the hex. The Thumper Copperhead does 5 points 
of artillery damage to the target and 1 point to any other unit in the hex.
  DISADVANTAGES:  These shells cannot be used as standard artillery 
shells.  They must be used as TAG homing missiles.  They cannot carry any 
special kind of warhead.

Dam Buster Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Arrow IV, Bolt III, Dart II, Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These shells replace their normal high explosive 
warheads with a concussionary charge.  These have the capability to clear 
minefields by setting off the mines and to damage buildings better.  These 
were first developed by a Long Tom gunner to destroy a dam that, with its 
destruction, was able to knock out a company of enemy mechs.
  ADVANTAGES:  The target and adjacent hex damage of these shells are 
used to reduce the attack strength of mine hexes as per the rules for 
Bangalor missiles.  These shells will also do double damage to any 
structure with a CF rating.  EXAMPLE: Should a three hex long building be 
hit in the center hex by a Long Tom Dam Buster then it would receive 80 
points of damage. (20x2 for the center hex of the building + 10x2 + 10x2 
for each of the adjacent hexes of the building)
  DISADVANTAGES:  These shells do 1/4 damage to infantry, vehicles, or 
mechs.

Illumination Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Dart II, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These shells shoot a round that has a brightly 
burning peice of metal (usually Magnesium) with a parachute attached.  
These shells are used to eliminate the effects of darkness during night 
fights.
  ADVANTAGES:  Fire this shell as if it were a normal shell.  When 
the hex of impact is determined this is actually the hex above which the 
illumination shell floats down on its parachute.  This hex will drift in 
the direction of the wind for each turn that it is up.  The illumination 
covers an area with a radius of 10 hexes for 3 turns. 

Smoke Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Arrow IV, Bolt III, Dart II, Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These smoke round rules replace those on p. 49 of 
_The Battletech Compendium_.
  ADVANTAGES:   
  Arrow IV & Long Tom:  These smoke rounds produce a 2 elevation high 
smoke cloud in the target hex and the 6 adjacent hexes that lasts for 3 
turns.
  Bolt II & Sniper:  These smoke rounds produce a 1 elevation high 
smoke cloud in the target hex and the 6 adjacent hexes that lasts for 3 
turns.
  Dart II and Thumper:  These smoke rounds produce a 1 elevation high 
smoke cloud in the target hex and the 6 adjacent hexes that lasts for 1 
turn.

Telemetry Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Arrow IV, Bolt III, Dart II, Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  These shells are used to better adjust fire with 
artillery guns using a signal that orbitting geo-positional satellites pick 
up.  The satellites then tell the firing crew, within 10 meters, where the 
shell landed.  The shell also releases a small marker cloud that observers 
can use to better observe where the shell landed.
  ADVANTAGES:  These shells allow artillery peices to adjust fire 
against fixed positions without the need of an observer.  If these shells 
are fired with the help of an observer then there is a -2 bonus for 
adjusting fire with the next shot.  The bonuses do not add on to each other 
if Telemetry shells are used 2 or more times in a row.  These bonuses are 
cumulative with observer and artillery gunner modifiers.
  The hex that a Telemetry shell lands in counts as a "pre-registered 
hex" as per p. 48 of _The Battletech Compendium_ once the shell has landed.  
Any shots against this hex automatically hit.
  DISADVANTAGES:  These shells do no damage at all.  The bonus will 
only help the gun/launcher that fired the shell or any gun/launcher that is 
connected to the firing unit via C^3.  It is not possible for one gun to do 
the sounding shots for another gun unless they are connected by C^3 as per 
the C^3 rules.

White Phospherous Artillery Shells
  WEAPONS:  Arrow IV, Bolt III, Dart II, Long Tom, Sniper, Thumper
  DESCRIPTION:  The "Willie Pete" White Phosperous (WP) round is the 
field artillery version of Inferno missiles.  This safer medium of 
delivering incindieries does not last as long as Inferno liquid, yet is the 
only kind that can stand the shock of firing without exploding.
  ADVANTAGES:  Given below is a table showing the target heat that WP 
shells deliver to the units in the hex of impact and the 6 surrounding 
hexes.  Target is heat listed as X/Y is treated where X is the target heat 
that any units in the hex of impact receive and Y is the target heat that 
any units in a surrounding hex take.  

Damage Rating Turn 1  Turn 2  Turn 3  Turn 4
------------- ------  ------  ------  ------
20/10    10/10   10/5   5/2   2/0
10/5     10/5   5/2   2/0
5/2     5/2   2/0

NOTE:  The Damage rating is the damage that the weapon would do if it were 
to fire a regular shell.  Obviously a bigger shell will do more heat 
longer.
  DISADVANTAGES:  WP rounds do no damage, only target heat.  WP 
rounds are treated just like Infernos for purposes of interactions with 
Coolant Cannons.  (If the Coolant Cannon were to use liquid oxygen instead 
of liquid nitrogen then double the heat inflicted, up to 20.)


    E X P A N D E D   I N F A N T R Y   R U L E S

  These rules are written to rectify the rules for infantry in 
Battletech.  This is done under the following assumptions:
  1)  When determining the size of a balanced game each side will 
determine its size in tons instead of some financial unit such as C-Bills.
  2)  If sides are determined in tons then the various types of 
infantry are inherently different in capability.  
  3)  If the various types of infantry are different incapability 
then one or a few types will be taken over all the others.  This eliminates 
some of the diversity that commanders can expect on the battlefield and 
some of the realistic options that a commander can use in determining 
his/her force composition.
  With these reasons the rules for infantry will be changed or 
expanded to make their use more defined and balanced.

  Equivelant tonnage: Free for standard infantry. They weigh no tons  
when determining their "cost."  The only requirement is that they be 
transported onto the battlefield in some vehicle or mech.  For transport by 
mech refer to the infantry pods in the weapons list and notes.  For transport 
by vehicle refer to the Infantry Carrier rules in _The Battletech Compendium_ 
on page 44.
  Battlearmor are handled differently from standard infantry in that 5 
tons must be "paid" for each point of 5.  Battlearmor does not have to be 
carried on to the field via APC yet may be desirable.

  Movement modifiers:  This ill defined subject is addressed and 
changed here.  Infantry recieve a -1 to hit bonus if they do not move and 
no penalties for moving.  Since infantry do not have a "running" speed there 
are no like modifiers.  Jump infantry and battlearmor that jump as part of 
their movement get a +1 to hit penalty.

  Infantry type modifications:  Since all movement types of infantry 
"cost" the same, there must be some way to make all the infantry from rifle 
up to SRM platoons equal.  Below are the rules changes, if any, to the 
various types of infantry and battlearmor to make them equal.

  Rifle Platoons:  The special advantage that Rifle Platoons get is 
that when they score damage and roll for location, that location may be 
shifted up or down by one.  This shows that the soldiers are better able to 
control and call their shots.  EXAMPLE:  A rifle platoon has hit a mech 
from the front and has rolled a 6 for damage location, giving a right torso 
hit for the 5 point group.  The rifle platoon has the option of shifting that 
damage location roll from a 6 to a 5 or 7, hitting the right leg or the center 
torso.  The last 2 points are rolled to hit 11, left arm.  The rifle 
platoon may shift it to 10, left arm again, or to 12, head.  Obviously it 
will be shifted to the head.

  Machine Gun Platoons:  Machine gun platoons recieve a -1 to hit 
bonus due to hit due to the directed high rate of fire of their weapons.

  Flamer Platoons:  Flamer platoons get the bonus of doing heat 
damage in addition to their normal damage.  They inflict 3 turns of 
incindiery heat as per the target heat rules equal to their damage value.  
EXAMPLE:  A flamer platoon with 16 men hits a mech doing 5 points of damage 
and 5 points of target heat which lasts for 3 turns.

  Laser Platoons:  Laser platoons inflict 1 point of target heat for 
every 7 infantrymen in the platoon, round fractions down.

  SRM Platoons:  SRM platoons may not use any of the different SRM 
warheads or guidance systems available for mech mounted SRMs.

  Machine Gun Battlearmor:  Machine gun battlearmor recieve a -1 to 
hit bonus due to the directed high rate of fire.

  Flamer Battlearmor:  Flamer battlearmor use the flamer rules as 
presented in the weapons list.

  Small Laser Battlearmor:  No changes.

CREDIT FOR IDEAS:
  Below is listed the folks and their ideas that went into the 
creation of these weapons/systems.  Some of these ideas were taken without 
their permission from the rec.games.mecha archives (Sorry if you don't like 
it, but *YOU'RE* the one that posted it!) and some were taken from real 
Battletech stuff.  If you have any questions, comments, quips, death 
threats, bribes, or constructive criticisms drop me some private Email at 
MURRAYMD@UDAVXB.OCA.UDAYTON.EDU.  I'll let you figure out the legalities...

  JESSE.TAYLOR@BBS.OIT.UNC.EDU
    Anti-Missile Laser
    Infantry Pods (Battle Armor Infantry Pods are an outgrowth 
      of this idea by myself.)
  CLARKA@NETCOM.COM
    Pulse Anti-Missile Laser
  ROLEARY@ST.NEPEAN.UWS.EDU
    TOW Missiles
    Laser Guided Missiles
    Radar Guided Missiles
  EMEU09@CASTLE.ED.AC.UK
    Cockpit Second Seats/Observers (basic idea)
    
    
    345345


Background for Cool Darkness

  Sinclair was one of the first people to develop electromagnetic 
devices and weapons.  He created the first series of needlers and gaussian 
weaponry and has been creating state-of-the-art weaponry ever since.  
The Sinclair K2 is a single hand-held needler that is not-so common 
among well armed groups or people of the lower class.  It uses longer 
needles than the K1, a single-hand needler that uses 3" needles, 80 per 
four inch mag.  These needles are 5" long with a 5" mag holding 50.  It's 
wider than a K1 and is used primarily for penetration and power against 
armored individuals.  Most K2's are semiauto while the K1 has on-the-fly 
switching from semi to full auto capabilities.  Cerated, armor piercing 
and explosive needles are available into the military, security and black 
markets.

  Polymetals are alloys of metals that have polymer composites 
fabricated into the material at the time of final molding.  This allows for 
improved chemical and physical properties of the material while 
improving its strength and the ability to keep a sharp edge.  It also aids 
in reinforcing materials such as strengthening armor plating and 
bullet-proof jackets.

  The story takes place somewhere around 2030 in a fast growing 
suburb of Philadelphia.




        Cool Darkness
          by Matthew Carpenter



      Chapter 1 : Mark of the Huntress  

  "Awe, shit.  Man this is too much for one night" Dave sighed.
Five hours on the net after a full day's work at the office was enough
for a 24 hour day.  He slouched back into his recliner and turned on the 
built in massage, pulled the plugs from his system and blankly stared at 
the ceiling.
  "Too bad you still got a few hours before it's over."  He loosened
his tie and unbuttoned the top button of his white shirt.  A midnight
snack should be good he thought to himself.  He sleepily stood up 
between rolls of computer paper and electronic cables snaking through 
the small den of his apartment in Philly.  'Thank god the lights are off or 
I'd really have a headache.'  Dave walked out of the room, still thinking 
over the latest ideas from work involving the net connections between 
North America and Europe.  'Goddamn bureaucrats think they know 
everything.  Hell, they probably couldn't even tell if I changed their 
comm links from DC to LA.'  The walk to the refrigerator was short.  The 
light from inside blinded him shortly since it was the only light on in 
the house.  'I wonder what Cryon is up to tonight.  They haven't been 
going out as much lately as they used to.'  A thought that sounded like 
something was getting ready to go down, but with no background.  They 
haven't done anything lately that would hint to it.  He didn't like that.
  He pulled an open jar of pickles out of the frig and a container of 
mustard, opened the bread drawer and got a loaf of old bread that was on
the brink of molding.  Some meat and a bag of chips followed.  He sat 
down at the small round table next the to kitchen entrance and began 
making a sandwich.  He took a bite.  'Damn thing is getting stale.  I 
wonder how Nick is doing?  The last time I talked with him must've been 
2 weeks ago.'  He swiveled around in his chair to a wall panel and entered 
the code for  a direct telecom interconnect.
  The video jumped up and Nick's tired face showed up on the 
screen.
  "Nick, how you doin' man?" squawked Dave getting ready to take 
another bite out of his sandwich.
  "Dave...Do you know what time it is?"
  "Yeah, but I couldn't sleep.  What's up.  I haven't.."
  Blink.  Blink.  A monitor light went on.  Someone's at the door, 
thought Dave.  'Who the hell would come at a time like this?'
  "Hang on, someone's at the door."
  "At this time of night?"  It was too late.  Dave was already up and 
heading for the door.  Opening up another panel, the lights went on and 
Dave spoke through the intercom mic.
  "Who's there?"
  The monitor light blinked again.
  "I said who's there!?"  'No answer.  No answer.'  Something's up.  
He began walking away from the door.  
  "Get out Nick.  Somethin's up!"  yelled Dave from across the room.
  "What's going on over there Dave!?"
  THUD..THUD.  CRACK!  Dave's door popped partly open as the 
bottom hinge cracked out of the door frame.  THUD..THUD..SMASH!  The 
top hinge nearly exploded open with force as the door toppled to one 
side, rendering the computer and physical locking mechanisms 
completely ineffective.  Dave scurried backward as a large man slowly 
walked into the apartment, stepping on the discarded door.  Dark short 
hair and a dark skinned face sat on top of a set of shoulders and a huge 
frame as he pulled something out of his dark, tattered overcoat.  Dave 
turned to run towards his den when a silent shot was fired into his left 
leg.  
  "Aaauuuuu!" screamed Dave as he fell into the table where he had 
just begun his midnight snack.  The telecom monitor flicked off as Dave 
moved to face his attacker.  He side slouched into his chair, holding his 
leg.  A needle stuck out of it by about an inch, leaving a small circular 
blood stain forming on his dress pants.
  The man walked up to Dave shooting another two silent shots into 
his leg, making him scream in pain.  A large hand wrapped itself around 
Dave's throat and began picking him up.  His face reddened and his eyes 
began to bulge as he was suspended in mid air by his attacker's 
suffocating grip.  His grip was hard, almost too hard as Dave reached up 
with both hands to grasp it.
  "Who the hell are you!" Dave spit out having more difficulty 
breathing.  The light from the room was in his eyes so he couldn't see his 
enemy's face.  He didn't remember running into him before, he was sure 
of that.  A shot was fired at the control panel on the wall, but not by his 
attacker who had put his gun down on the dining table.  Another shot 
and the panel exploded in an array of sparks and flames.  A final shot 
was fired at the lights which exploded out, darkening the apartment 
once more.  Dave flinched from the spraying glass.  He was lifted a little 
higher as his assailant's other fist flew into Dave's lower ribs, making a 
noticeable cracking sound as it shattered a few, knocking the wind out of 
Dave.  He was then turned around and thrown into the opposite wall of 
his den a few feet away.  His attacker turned around to pick up his gun, 
which gave Dave a little time to move out of the way by crawling into his 
den amongst the electronics and wires.  Two more shots were fired 
directly into his leg as he was almost fully in, leaving him immobile 
from the pain with only the sounds of heavy footsteps echoing toward 
the den's entrance.
  The split, mangy tails of a cheap grayish-black overcoat dangled 
at the ankles of Dave's pursuer.  Combat boots and a dark cat burglar's 
baggy suit shown underneath the opened coat, as a Sinclair K2 was being 
placed back in it's shoulder harness, then covered by the thick fiber-
metal mesh coat.  He couldn't see a face or even a head from his 
encumbered position on the carpeted floor.  Dave just stared at his large 
enemy, unable to move from the pain in his cracked ribs, and the 5 inch 
needles sticking out of his left leg.  The only taste from his interrupted 
midnight snack away from the net was of blood.
  "Next time, don't fuck with Nestroth, Dave" came a quiet but stern 
female voice from the doorway; the type that could be sweet if it didn't 
send a shiver down your spine, but would scare the hell out of you if 
caught in a dark alley on Halloween.  
  Dave tried looking past his pursuer.  He knew that voice, he knew 
it from somewhere.  Nestroth gave him a hint, but there was no match.  
Not with that female voice.  It just sounded so familiar, but then again it 
didn't.  He just couldn't place it.  He had run into Nestroth a few times 
trying to break a few systems, but he'd never tangled with them, at least 
not to his knowledge.  Every time he had run into them, they either 
kicked him out or he got out himself.  He knew Nestroth was not one to be 
messed with, anywhere.  Anyone who did normally either was found 
dead or never found.  That didn't help Dave's thinking as he stared at his 
victor with only the thought of death running around in his head.  'If 
only I could think of what got me into this in the first place' Dave 
thought to himself, hoping for a chance to get out of it one way or the 
other.
  A hand slapped against the left shoulder of the overcoat.  Slowly 
and with enough coolness to chill ice, he moved to one side of the 
doorway without losing sight of his prey.  Blue and red streaks of light 
shined in from the neon streetlights through the opposing windows, 
leaving less to be hidden in the not-so-well kept apartment.  A few 
computer screens flickered and with the outside light, showed the 
mounds of electronics and scrap papers lying all over the small room.  
An athletically slender female figure covered only with a skintight body 
suit and a pair of stainless steel spiked heels, entered the room with the 
finesse and grace of a cat, and noticeably the cunning of one as well.  
Her slender body left little to the imagination as she snaked towards 
Dave.  Shiny metallic nail polish glistened on her fingertips in the 
sporadic changing lights.  Her footsteps made no noise as her spiked 
heels sank into the thick carpet and almost pierced through the material 
underneath.  Her bodysuit was mostly black with the exception of a dark 
red artistic line running across the main body of it, creating fading 
curls of color along an arm and the opposite leg.  Her hair matched the 
entire outfit; dark and slightly long, but not touching her shoulders.
  "Stand up shithead" she hissed walking to within inches of his 
pale face.
  "I..I...I can't.  My leg.." he whimpered.
  "Just do it or I'll have Nemesis stand you up whether you like it or 
not!"
  Remembering his encounter a few moments ago with 'Nemesis', 
he painfully began to bring himself up to a hunched over position, still 
holding his leg in pain.  He looked near her fearing the consequences of 
eye contact.  Blood trickled from his left leg and stained his business 
pants as he favored the other leg; the polymetal needles still sticking out 
of his leg.
  "Last night will be the last time you go after Cryon, Dave.  Do we 
understand each other?"
  "I didn't go against Cryon last night, honest I didn't" he sputtered 
back.  Sweat beads were forming on his head as her hot breath touched 
his face, while she pushed her face within an inch of his.
  "Don't bullshit me Dave.  Nestroth ran into you last night while 
going against Cryon and you fucked us up!  Don't make me..".
  "I haven't run into Nestroth in weeks and that was only an 
accident, really.  I don't want any trouble with Nestroth.  Come on, 
they're too big for me" he shakingly replied.  "Hell, I don't even know 
you guys.  That's how long it's been since I....".
  Backing away from his face, she retracted a set of 4 inch claws 
that lay at her waistside which had gone unnoticed until now.  Her 
eyebrows still in a devilish frown.  Her breathing still calm.  Her lips 
tight with fury, contrary to Dave's sweating, pale face.  A dark red stain 
was forming on his white shirt where Nemesis had punched him earlier.
  Raising her hand, "You may call me Slash" was her only reply as 
her claws extended to a solid 7 inches, and left his head lying next to his 
crumpled body as the blue light shined off the blood dripping from her 
otherwise spotless weapon of choice.  The only sound was a distant 
humming from the changing neon lights, and a grinning Nemesis.




      Cool Darkness
        by Matthew Carpenter



    Chapter 2 : Welcome to the Jungle

  "Enter Password" spit the computer controlled lock of a small 
warehouse on the other side of town; the dirty side of town.  Trash lay all 
around the alleyway and the light blowing smog that seems to inhabit 
the entire city rolled by, bring papers and dust with it.  Slash entered the 
neural code embedded into Nestroth's security ROM chip, implanted into 
her skull, and took her security card back as the graffitied, grayish 
metal alley door unlocked.  She walking in just as smoothly as she had 
done entering Dave's apartment, with Nemesis behind her shutting the 
door with the echoing thud of a vault.

  The semi-lit corridor weaved to the right a little bit.  The corridor 
was surrounded by old wooden crates piled on metal warehouse frames 
slightly beginning to rust from the humidity of the city air.  A metal 
catwalk lingered just above Nemesis' head as they walked into the open 
meeting room of Nestroth.  This was one of there meeting places.  One 
that was used after the fact.  The whole warehouse was only 50 by 50 feet, 
but it was perfect for their purposes:  small enough to be unnoticed; 
large enough to be useful.  There was a bar on the opposing wall from 
the entrance.  A pool table, a few TV's, a bar and a stereo made up the 
majority of the hall while the computer links and weapon banks were 
closest to the left wall.  Everything a person could want after a job, while 
still maintaining some security to the place.  A glance around from Slash 
produced a few scanners locked on them, verifying who's who.  A guard 
armed appropriately watched from the right catwalk that continued 
around the entire warehouse.  Dressed in normal street clothes, he raised 
his gloved right hand as a sign of hello to Slash.  She slightly nodded 
hello and continued looking around.

  A few desks were scattered around the room with paperwork, 
blueprints and other 'necessities' on top or laid out on built in desk 
monitors.  A medium sized man with an open white jacket, yellow shirt 
and nice slacks looked to be jacked in at one of the desks in a lounge 
chair.  The only thing was there was no cable.  A metal band with 
blinking LEDs wrapped around the back of his head connecting his two 
ports, but weren't connected to anything else.  His eyes blinked and he 
raised his head from his propped up arms to notice the two.  A few lights 
flashed on and off on his headgear and he raised his right arm to the 
back of it.  A few seconds later, the two sides of the device connected to 
his ports popped off and he placed the gear down onto the table.  A small 
stretch and a wipe of the eyes and he stood up reaching for the beer in 
front of him.

  Slash walked towards him as she noticed out of the corner of her 
eye, Nemesis going to a sofa on the far side of the room to throw his 
jacket down.  

  "So what did you bring me?" he asked, not changing his blank 
expression.

  "Merry Christmas , Nebulus" Slash retorted in a painfully sly tone 
of voice and a slight grin as she pulled Dave's head out of the black bag 
she was holding.

  "Not bad.  What else did you bring me?" Nebulus asked raising an 
eyebrow, taking another drink without removing his eyes from her.

  "The last time he said he ran into us was a few weeks ago" she said 
dropping his head into the disposal system next to the desk without a 
thought or a look.  "He denied going after Cryon last night.  He died with 
his story in tact so either he was one devoted liar, or he was too scared to 
make up a fake story.  In any case, we've got copies of his records for the
past two months including his work on the international nets and his
individual activities around the sites."

  Nemesis had put his coat down and returned to the discussion.  
Standing about half a foot over Nebulus, his body was highlighted from 
the lighting array suspended from the ceiling by chains.  His skin was 
very dark brown with tints of gray that seemed even darker behind 
Nebulus' white jacket.  His black tank top showed off his large muscles 
that had obviously been enhanced through drugs.  His black hair was cut 
in a spiked military fashion and he still wore his shades, even though 
the lighting inside wasn't that illuminating.

  "Or else he was there and tried to make us believe he wasn't.  You 
should've pulled more info out of him before you killed him.  Now we 
don't know what's going on" retorted Nebulus.  He slouched back into his 
padded chair and enabled the foot rest.  He closed his eyes, running his 
hand through his military style blond hair only to let out of a frustrated 
sigh that was meant to be heard.  He leaned back with his eyes closed as 
the other two members of the group who had been at the bar the whole 
time, came up to the table.

  "Hey kids, how's it goin'?  Did you and Davey-boy have fun 
tonight or what."  It was Zlik.  Slash hated his humor, especially when it 
wasn't in taste.  He walked closer to her side egging her on with his 
cock-eyed smirking that drove her nuts.  "Come on, tell old Zlik what 
happened baby."

  "Knock it off Zlik.  Why don't you take you and your filthy street 
'garb' somewhere where I can't smell it." darted Slash, eyeing him with 
one of those 'Don't push me looks'.  "We got enough problems without 
your nonsense."  Zlik was from the streets and probably will always be 
there as well.  He grew up there, hangs there now, and will forever have 
a name with those who have long purple hair that hangs to one side.

  "Goddamn skinny son of a .." murmured Slash.

  "Cool it children" snapped Nebulus, opening his eyes and 
furrowing his brow again.  "Jack, what do we have on the nets for the 
past few hours from Dave's area?"

  "Nothing to my knowledge.  The whole sector's been quiet since 
he got off" replied Jack in a gentlemen's voice, standing next to Nemesis.  
Actually, he stood underneath Nemesis.  He was very short and stocky, in 
fact he was getting on the fat side.  That's the problem with netrunning 
all day and all night.  Jack was the type of individual who got so hooked 
into the system that if he had his choice, he would never get out.  Unless 
of course he had to.  But that was never.  That's how he got his name, 
Jack.  Constantly jacking in and out of the nets, only to get back in as 
soon as possible.  He gambles with everything he gets into and most of 
the time, if and when rarely caught, he barely makes it out without 
being traced or ICEd.  But that's how he wanted to run his life:  on the 
edge, at least from the perception of the net.

  "Get me updated on Cryon ASAP, Jack, and make sure they're not 
screwing around with our side of the board!" demanded Nebulus.

  "Sure thing boss" replied Jack, still in his business shirt, business 
appearance, and business attitude.  Hey slowly walked away from the 
group and reached another desk a little distance away from the informal 
meeting.  He picked up the same headgear as Nebulus had and put it on, 
eventually peering off into space, or cyberspace as the case may be.

  "What the hell is that thing he's got on his head?" questioned 
Slash, a little perturbed that she hadn't been updated on the new tech 
yet.

  "It's an experimental wireless connect between your ports and a 
jack in site.  But like I said, it's only experimental, so it doesn't leave this 
room" explained Nebulus, calming down slightly.  "We stole the idea and 
some of the design from Cryon.  The rest came from industry with the 
holes filled in by Jack and his tech buddies at Nortech."

  "He's still working there?" asked Zlik, wising up a bit.  The party 
began to disperse, each individual going there own way.  "Awe screw it 
man" snobbed Zlik heading for the corridor leading to the alleyway.  The 
metal door slammed shut once he was out and the room was dead quiet 
with the exception of the echoing metallic slam of the door.  Everyone 
that wasn't jacked in was still looking at the corridor that Zlik just 
walked through.

  "When the hell is he going to get a life and stop being a street 
bum!?" complained Slash.

  "He's one of the best street informants I've ever known, Slash.  
Just get off his back" grumbled a low, direct voice.

  She turned around, looking at Nemesis who never had a lot to say.  
"Is that so.  Then why does he always dress like he's still on the streets?"

  "Because he is."  With that Nemesis grabbed his coat from the sofa 
and proceeded to follow Zlik's exit, never loosing sight of Slash.

***************

  "Don't let her get to you man, she's just bein' a bitch tonight 
cause we didn't get what we wanted from Dave" said Nemesis after 
catching up to Zlik.  His shades were still on even though it was 
approaching two in the morning.  The two of them walked for a while 
and finally made it to the noisy part of town.  The bars and joints 
stretched for a few blocks and never shut down as long as it was dark 
outside.  This was the night spot; where everyone came who was anyone, 
at four in the morning that is.

  "So what happened with the job with Dave?" asked Zlik.

  "We took him out well, but Nebulus wasn't impressed with the info 
we got from him.  I think Nebulus thinks someone's out for us.  Hell, it 
wouldn't surprise me, that's for sure."

  "At least it would make life interesting for once."

  "True."  They walked side by side down the sidewalk towards there 
favorite spot - Black Oil.  The only place on the strip that was almost 
pitch black dark inside and that served the hardest drinks, only.  It was a 
nice place.  The bar was always packed and the back rooms always full.  
It was mostly inhabited by deckers, samurai, informants or people just 
there for business.  Frankly, the bar wasn't even built to be a bar, but 
that never surfaced in conversation.

  Zlik was almost as tall as Nemesis, but a hell of a lot skinnier.  His 
tattered street clothes, long purple hair and terrible street accent set 
him apart from his companion.  A little harassment from the local girls 
and a few psychos that were missing more than a couple of brain cells 
made the trip seem normal.  The streets were cluttered with garbage and 
debris from the riots a few days ago.  Most of the street lights were out or 
on there way to go out.  Most of the cars on the streets had a few bumps 
or bruises, many having broken windows or shattered lights.  The alleys 
were filled with drunken street people sitting in the wall crevices and 
dealers making their nightly pay.  It might be the summer, but for some 
reason the night was a little cooler than normal.

  Before long, the Black Oil neon sign was a few doors down.  A 
small crowd had formed out front of the closed doors of the place with 
people just hangin' out.  A little pushing and shoving and the two got 
past the crowd of people who wanted to look cool by the bar, but didn't 
want to go in.

  Past the doors, the bar was dark as night.  Smoke filled the air and 
seemed to hover like a cloud just above people's heads.  There was just 
about enough room to walk around the place without hugging each 
other in the process.  A pool table could be spotted across the room in the 
far right corner from the foyer landing where Nemesis and Zlik stood 
side by side, each looking around for someone or something.  Most of the 
people here were dressed to kill.  The styles ranged from very slick to 
very sleazy, but all with the intent to intimidate.  The bar was centered 
in the middle of the place, raised a step above the floor to make it a little 
more formidable for stools.  It was nice, though, compared to the others 
in town.  All the walls were old fashioned wood with paintings and 
electronic art scattered around.  At least there was no graffiti on the 
inside of the joint.  Looking around produced a second floor of mostly 
wooden tables surrounding the outside walls of the place.  Round 
hanging pool lights hung from the ceiling with most of the lights either 
broken or turned off.

  Zlik started down the half flight of stairs without noting Nemesis' 
intentions for the evening.  But that was his style.  He grew up on this 
side of town, was one of the first to come to the bar when it was first 
opened, and will probably be one of those who are killed in it as well.  
Nemesis watched him slowly push his way toward the far side of the bar 
and begin talking with a few friends that normally were found here 
after midnight.  Nemesis, on the other hand, slowly made his way to the 
opposite side to watch a game of pool before going to the bar for a drink.

  "So what's new on the streets" questioned the guy slowly 
drinking a Toxic Rum next to Zlik, his long bleached hair almost 
touching the tip of the glass during each sip.

  "Depends on what side of the tracks you're from."

  "The down side."

  "Cryon is on the move again and no one knows what's going on."

  "I thought they weren't screwing around on the nets yet?  Last I 
heard, they weren't going after any company takeovers or anything" he 
said with a concerned yet questionable tone of voice, still just looking at 
his shot.

  "Their RAD just jumped and their in the market.  Nestroth's 
chasin' the rabbit so make sure the field is clear" noted Zlik.  He hated 
discussing names in company, but that was life on the streets.  "How's 
you're girl friend?"

  "Which one?" he asked in disgust.

  "Charles."

  "Watch your back.  Deckers are out tonight and it's gonna be a 
while until sex is as good as it used to be."

  "Who's spreading the disease?"

  "Mogul's back."  Spotting an old girl friend across the room, Zlik 
got up from the bar and began his way towards her, noting his friend 
with only a tap on the bar before leaving.  Information and friends are 
two different things when it comes to who's chasing who.  Anyway, most 
of the 'friends' that you make in a place like this can't be trusted further 
than the shot they drink from.

  'Mogul is back' thought Zlik on his way across the bar.  'This is 
not good.  The last time they were back proved to be a challenge in more 
ways than just survival.  Mogul was one of those groups that just looked 
for conflicts with other groups.  Nestroth normally didn't mind 
competition when going after a company or something like that, but 
when a gang gets involved with business, business gets bloody.'

  "Hey sexy!  How's it goin'!?"  yelled Zlik.

  "Well if it isn't Zlik.  I haven't seen you here for a while.  Where 
the hell you been hiddin' out lately?" replied Shiela.

  "I've been around.  You sure look awful different since we went 
out last year.  So who you datin' now babe?"  Her black leather clad body 
and curly-long, dyed black hair contrasted to her old street image of 
baggy pants and oversized shirts.  Her face was even more pale now.  Her 
appearance almost was of the dead instead of who he remembered her to 
be.

  "Nobody special.  He's right here."  She turned around and pulled 
on the shoulder of a large man standing behind her talking with a small 
bunch of guys dressed in the same black leather attire.  He turned 
around to face Zlik.  "I told you he'd be here honey" she said looking 
directly into Zlik's eyes with a devil's grin only Glasya could wear.

  "So this is the mighty Zlik of Nestroth!" he said taking a step 
closer and shoving his glass into Shiela's hand.  "Don't tell me you've 
come back for seconds with her MATE!"  He might be a little drunk, but 
he was definitely pissing Zlik off with his attitude; one of the few things 
which Zlik didn't tolerate.

  "Where the fuck did you pick him up Shiela!?  Pirates Are Us or 
Assholes Anonymous!!!?" attacked Zlik with his irate attitude aimed 
directly at Shiela.

  "Good-bye Zlik" was her only monotone reply as her grin turned 
sour and she retreated towards the bar, walking behind her man.

  "Oh, fine, walk off with a nice good-bye babe!  Hey, don't forget 
your beer belly bozo here bitch!" yelled Zlik not moving from his 
position.  His attack was still muffled by the crowd around them.  No one 
paid any attention to quarrels like that, anymore.

  Giving a daring glare in her direction, his neck was violently 
grabbed by Shiela's lover.  

  "She picked me up at Mogul, you shitty piece of street slime.  How 
do you feel about that, Dick!?"  Zlik's eyebrow's raised instantly at the 
thought of what he was in now, just in time for a double sided dagger to 
be thrust into his stomach by his adversary.  His mouth dropped open 
and his eyes shut from the pain.  His body almost being totally supported 
by the hand still clenching his neck, making his breathing more 
difficult.  The knife twisted in his side and his brow furrowed more until 
all he could do is scream out in pain.  The crowd around him began to 
notice the action, but it was too late.  His back began to arch and his 
knees started bending slowly as the life drained out of his body, staining 
his shirt, and began to form a reflective puddle on the floor underneath 
him.

  "MOGULLLLLLLLLL!!!!!!!!!!" screamed Zlik, thrusting his right 
elbow outward.  An old fashioned quick release snubnose appeared in his 
palm and directed itself towards the chest of his killer.  Four shots were 
fired before his body crumpled to the bloody wooden floor, his right arm 
sticking straight upward with the gun still resting in his palm.  He was 
soon followed by his killer to the floor.  His leather armor lined jacket 
not enough against good old Teflon II coated ammunition, bringing him 
down nearly on top of Zlik.  Their blood staining each other's body.  The 
crowd going silent momentarily to see who was involved this night 
while the bartender called the cops, then resuming with the normal 
discussions of the evening.  Another night, another death.  Pretty 
normal for nighttime in Philly, or any major city for that matter.

  Shiela slowly made her way to the entrance and existed alone, 
mingling with a few others who didn't want to be around when the cops 
showed up to collect the bodies.  Nemesis, too far away to do anything but 
watch his friend die, and hear the gunshots at the last moment, kept and 
eye on her and followed her out of the establishment.  He'd met her a few 
times before, but never really got to know her.  He never really liked 
her in the first place.  Trusted would probably be a better word.  Now he 
knew why.  Mogul on the other hand meant something, something very 
serious.  Mogul was a gang that ran a last year and tried terrorizing 
certain underground groups.  Nestroth was one of the groups that 
brought them down.  Unfortunately, they didn't wipe them out 
completely.

  Shiela began down the strip and soon turned into a known 
alleyway.  Nemesis followed, cautiously surveying his position.  He 
started into the alley, but she was already gone.  Impossible.  The alley is 
too long and he was too close to lose her that fast.  He didn't like it.  He 
didn't like it one bit.  A few more meters in and he stopped, switching his 
cybernetic retina implants from night vision to thermal infra-red 
sensing.  He walked a few more meters with his jacket loosely buttoned.  
He finally stopped completely and looked around.  As he looked up he 
caught a glimpse of part of a person who must have been peering out of 
a window from above.  More likely sighting him in, which he confirmed 
with another retina switch to ultraviolet reflective, picking up the faint 
outlines of a needler rifle.

  "Nice try, Nemesis" came a voice that echoed through the alley.  It 
was Shiela all right.  Nothing mistaking that slyish voice.  He turned 
around, obviously out of position.  Two men, however, were between him 
and the streets, and the alley behind him meant dealing with his 
airborne sniper.  His right hand slowly snaked towards his jacket.

  "Don't even think about it asshole."  The two men in front of him 
took out their weapons, pinning him in.  "You go back to Nestroth and 
tell them we're back, Nemesis.  And, by the way, give Nebulus this 
message!?"  Two needler shots were fired from above into his shoulder.  
He immediately sank to the ground and crashed into a trash bin, holding 
his 'injured' shoulder.  "You take that to Nebulus!"

  The two men in the alley put their weapons away as they made 
their way back to the streets.  Nemesis lay there for a few minutes until 
he judged the situation as relatively safe to move.  He removed the 
needles from his jacket, simulating their penetration and induced pain.  
He walked out holding his shoulder.  He walked out without his friend.  
Heading back, passed the bar, gave him only one thought: Mogul is back 
and Cryon is on the move.  What the hell is going on?




      Cool Darkness
        by Matthew Carpenter



  Chapter 3 : The Finer Things in Life...Just Got Worse

  "And here is the room where the hunter/killers will be operating 
from, General.  Each station will house one person and the collective will 
send necessary information to the GN-12 over there" pointed a research 
engineer for Cryon who was showing General Stark the first labs that 
would be used in Operation Revolt:  a joint military/government 
operation headed by members of the CIA, NSA, and USAF Electronic 
Security Command.  Behind the glassed in walls of the studio-like lab, the 
tour of the labs had come to an end for one of the leading officials in the 
implementation of the operation, as well as the leading researchers, 
programmers and engineers of Cryon and Nortech.  General Stark 
standing out by being the only one not in a normal suit with visible 
hardware and ports.

  "Very impressive, Dr. Rudenburg, very impressive." spoke 
General Stark looking at the GN-12 comp.  "Just how fast is that computer 
and will it give us instantaneous time to react if a priority is at hand?"

  "It's a 10 teraflops machine packaged in a secured housing that 
will be able to handle hundreds of users without slowing down a bit.  The 
computer has been programmed specifically to handle that type of a 
situation, should it arise.  With the latest advances made by Nortech in 
the human/computer interface field, the computer will be an extension 
of everyone working in the nets as well as off them.  The operation will 
begin as scheduled in two weeks.  You can be assured of that!" he stated 
with a grin as if he had sealed a done deal.  "If you come this way, we can 
move onto the final discussion of the networking reorder program and 
how we will integrate each level of defense as the time arises."

  The glass panels they were behind separated them from the most 
diabolical security system ever created by man.  Each station consisting 
of a 'coffin' where men would be connected into the computers and nets 
24 hours a day kept alive with a revolutionary new life support system.  
The General stood there for a last glimpse of the entire project.  His 
decorated chest rose and fell deeply with every deep breath.  'The 
teraflops computers.  The neural links.  The net connections and security 
systems.  So it all comes down to this.' the General thought to himself 
giving the place a once over, then moving on without a change of facial 
expression.  

  "So this project will enable us to monitor all of the Milnet sites 
and government linkup locations at any given time from anywhere, 
right?"

  "Exactly.  The hunter/killers will be spread out over the nets and 
gateways, constantly monitoring and tracking any conspicuous netters 
or runners as the case may be.  All the info will be processed here and 
we will be able build case files on perpetrators, or eliminate them if the 
risk is too high."

  "Sounds good to me.  We're practically fightin' a war on the nets 
as it is with all the netrunnin' that's been goin' on in the past few years.  
It's about goddamn time we got the hardware on our side to stop these 
punks" said the General.  His brow was more furrowed than before, 
remembering the numerous break-ins into his department alone over 
the past five years.  "Goddamn kids" he quietly spoke to himself, looking 
ahead with great anticipation for this project.  'Just wait until we fry 
'em' he smirked.

******************

  A few days later, a bare-chested dark-skinned bodybuilder was 
curling more weight than normal in front of a mirror at the local gym.  
A 'fake' medical bandage was taped to his left shoulder, giving him an 
incentive to pump more iron.  His biceps bulged every time the curl bar 
was lifted above waist level.  'I'm gonna kill Mogul, 18.  Kill Mogul, 19.  
Kill Mogul, 20.'  "Goddamn!" he said putting the bar back on its bench and 
flexing in front of the mirror.  He looked over himself with confidence.  
A full four hour workout finished again.  'Lookin' hot man, lookin' hot.'  
A cool sweat covered most of his unclothed body.  His spandex shorts 
noticeably wet as well.  He looked over his sculptured grayish tanned 
muscles until his gaze made it to his shades.  The dark purplish reflection 
in the mirror of his glasses spawned a frowning brow from Nemesis.  
'More muscles, more killing power!'  He picked the bar back up and 
curled another 10 reps, just to let the thought sink in, real deep, still 
counting by how many times he was going to kill Mogul.  He looked back 
at the mirror, breathing a little heavier than before.  His eyebrows now 
making a "V" shape in his forehead.  'That's it!  It's personal now, Mogul!  
You're MINE!'  

  He swiftly grabbed his bag and headed out the front of the gym 
into the warm summer afternoon.  His workout might be over, but his 
adrenaline was running high at the moment.  Flashbacks of Zlik and him 
being together for the first time.  Hitting the bars, scamming 
information, working with Nestroth.  Then the memory of the bar came 
back to him.  He saw the pain going through his friend's face.  He saw 
him stare death square in the face and then take his revenge before 
letting death take him.  And then, the only thought that entered his head 
was of Sheila.  "BITCH!"

  "Hey, Nemesis!"  A slap on the chest broke him from his day 
dreaming.  "Hey, man, you there today!?" asked Nebulus, catching him on 
his way down the street.

  "What do you want!?  I thought you never came out in daylight?" 
retaliated Nemesis.

  "Hey, calm down.  I was just coming up to see you in the gym and 
work out for a little while."

  "Then why are you in clothes that normally aren't seen outside of 
a club?"

  "OK, so I wasn't going to work out.  I was going to watch you" 
Nebulus said with a grin.  "Come on, let's get outta here.  My car's right 
over here."  They walked together towards the car, but Nemesis stopped a 
few steps away.  The whole thing was still eating him away, and Sheila 
was still in his head.

  "I don't think so; I'm really not in the mood right now, Nebulus."

  "Look, I know you're upset about what happened to Zlik, we all 
are, but there's work to do."

  "I don't care about work right now, damn it!  All I care about is 
taking Mogul down once and for all and NOW!" yelled Nemesis, becoming 
more furious by the moment.

  "Look asshole, I don't give a shit about how you feel or what you 
want to do!  There's work to do and I need you in one piece.  Now get you 
fuckin' ass in my goddamn car before I slice that rinkly stomach of 
yours open!" Nebulus retaliated pulling out a double sided rigid blade.

  The two just looked at each other for a second or two.  Finally, 
Nemesis moved towards the car, shouldering into Nebulus just to get a 
little frustration out on his way to grabbing the door.  Nebulus moved out 
of the way slightly, but ran the blade against Nemesis' stomach anyways.  
Nemesis just opened the door, loudly threw his bag in the back and 
slammed the door shut, letting his built-up anger go up in smoke.  
'Goddamn son of a bitch' he thought to himself as Nebulus got in the car 
and started driving away from the curb.

  "Didn't hurt a bit I bet, did it?" asked a frustrated Nebulus.

  "No."

  "How many layers of that shit have you put in you now...what are 
you up to four, five, twenty one or so..?" kidded Nebulus.

  Nemesis smirked.  His anger obviously starting to fade with the 
thought of his friend's humor.  "Only four.  Anymore would make it look 
unnatural.  And it's not shit, it's reinforced synthetic skin."

  "Unnatural.  You're only the one person in my life that I've ever 
seen with gray skin.  And a bodybuilder at that.  I thought you never put 
anything into your body that wouldn't help you grow muscles?"

  "It doesn't go into me; it's just sewn on the top five or so layers of 
skin."

  "Great.  A bodybuilder that has four layers of reinforced Kevlar 
Type II skin sewn into his skin so he's not only stronger than everyone 
else, he also has skin that's tougher than an alligator's."  The trip was 
silenced from then on by Nemesis' straight face and Nebulus' concern 
for what was going on with the nets.  Reality came back too quickly.  
Turning towards the west side of the city, Nemesis could tell that they 
were going to Nebulus' apartment.

  'What the fuck are we going to his house for?' Nemesis asked 
himself looking around.  The surrounding buildings, annoying traffic 
and light smog offered no answer.  Soon the apartment complex was up 
ahead.  Solar collectors sat atop the six story box shaped complex, soaking 
up as much sun from the hot day as possible.  An underground parking 
garage door swung open as the car passed the entrance into the 
driveway, allowing them access to Nebulus' traditional parking spot:  
directly opposite of the door on the far end of the garage.  Nemesis 
grabbed his bag and the two went up to the third floor apartment, 
getting in with the standard code key card.  The gray polymetal door 
swung open and the two entered the foyer.  Thick light colored carpet 
covered the floor of the spacious apartment.  Nemesis walked into the 
living room directly in front of him and looked out the full window at 
the nearby city.  'Pretty sad' he thought to himself, putting his bag down 
on a nearby sofa.  Nebulus followed and sat down, turning the TV on.

  "So what the hell are we doing here anyways?" demanded 
Nemesis, still staring out the window.

  "The others will be here soon enough.  Like I said, there's work to 
be done."

  "Then why don't you tell me just what the fuck is going on then, 
if it's so goddamn important!?" he retaliated spinning around to face 
Nebulus.  Nebulus sat there for a moment, still watching TV.  The volume 
was low enough it might as well have been off.  The spokesperson from 
ESPN was finishing a remote assignment to California on the discussion 
of the new steroids, the ones that had no physical or mental side effects.  

  "So, are you going to start taking the new steroids to help 
improve your strength?  I heard they can't hurt you at all." Nebulus said 
still watching TV.  Without receiving a reply, he turned to face Nemesis 
who was still waiting for an answer.  "All right.  Jack got word today 
from one of his friends in Nortech that said that Operation Revolt was 
scheduled to begin in two weeks."

  That hit a soft spot in Nemesis' pissed off mood.  'Two weeks.  Holy 
shit.  I didn't think they were going to be ready for at least a few more 
months.'  His mood switched from anger to passive worry, convincing 
him that sitting down was a good idea after all.  'How the fuck did they 
get that far ahead without our knowledge?'

  Nebulus went back to watching ESPN's coverage of body building 
which quickly grasped part of his companion's attention as well.  Within 
fifteen minutes, the program was nearing it's end when a message from 
the front panel sounded  "There is a visitor at the front door."  Nebulus 
got up and turned on the video monitor which vividly showed Slash and 
Jack.  

  "Who is it?" he asked anyways monotonely.

  "Open up, Nebulus." came back Slash's cool voice.

  "Lookin' good Slash."  He verified their presence with another 
window on the wall panel, displaying the thermal image of two people 
standing in the hallway outside his apartment door, taken from a sensor 
array strategically placed outside his room.  The door opened, and the two 
entered the room.

  "Don't you wish." said Slash as she walked past Nebulus in her 
civilian attire:  short heels, stockings that almost showed under a short 
summer skirt,  and a tight sleeveless top.  Jack followed her in, looking 
very concerned with the present state of affairs.  Being an employee of a 
company that his 'computer group' was about to attack and disable, put 
him in a very bad, not to mention stressful position.  The door slid shut 
behind him and locked with an advanced security lock that also included 
locking out telecom messages.

  Jack put himself in his normal office chair that sat at the near 
side of the couch, placed there just for him.  Normally it was used as a 
foot rest or end table, but Jack always sat in office chairs, no matter 
where he was.  Slash made her way to the cushy chair on the far side of 
the room that was within arms reach of Nemesis' side of the sofa.

  "I'm really sorry about Zlik, Nemesis.  I want you to know that." 
said Slash in a very sincere tone of voice.

  Nemesis gave her his thank you look and quickly moved to face 
Nebulus who was sitting back down on the sofa to address the group in 
one of their most important meetings of the year.

  "Thank you all for coming on such short notice.  I hope this 
hasn't complicated your jobs, but like I said, this is very important.  
Yesterday, Jack came to me with a very important message a friend at 
work had given to him involving Cryon's initiative, Operation Revolt.  
Jack, would you please brief the group on that matter?"

  "I received the following message from one of my contacts who 
keeps me informed on information with this project.  As you know, we 
were going after the project just for the capabilities to stay online 24 
hours a day.  But this changes things completely.  The message says:

    1-     OR to take over nets.  Hunter/killer
    group to use LSS to keep punks off nets.
    MIL/GOV//MIL/GOV/unknown-deadly     -3

  The reason why this changes everything are the hunter/killer 
groups and the involvement of the government and military.  This is one 
of the first times that the government and military have gone after 
totally securing the nets.  To begin with it will be applied to the 
government and military nets, but I think it will eventually spread to 
even the simplest network interface on the local level, purposely 
designed to keep unauthorized personnel out, period.  They are playing 
for keeps this time.  I think the answer to the question about why has 
Cryon been going after other companies and mil sites is right here as 
well.  They've been breaking into places left and right as a testing 
ground for what they can do and how effective their system is.  We've 
been watching the whole damn project run it's prototypes and beta tests 
all along.  The people that were in the tests are the ones we will be up 
against when the game begins, if this project succeeds in starting on 
time."  He ran his hand through his thinning hair.  His shirt collar was 
long unbuttoned and his tie loose.  "This puts me in one awkward 
position, but that's why I got with you guys in the first place.  This 
project will essentially shut down the nets from the outside, and I can't 
see anyway of getting around it."

  "Yea, but they can't KILL you.  I mean, all they can do is find out 
who you are and where you're getting in from.  That's old news I 
thought." attacked Slash.  She knew her way around net tech and was 
pretty up to date on the present state of it, but what she hated the most 
was not being informed on what was out there and this put a noticeable 
hitch in her tone.

  "With the new system, there's no telling what they can do.  They 
could decide not to attack you, trace you back to your deck.  From there 
they could get every bit of information on you without you knowing it.  
Set bugs.  Implant viruses.  Build cases about you.  Contact others to see if 
you have any weaknesses.  Destroy your personal file and plant a virus 
to destroy every copy of it you launch.  Who knows.  These guys are 
playing hardball and they're playing for keeps!"

  The room was completely silent with the exception of a thousand 
thoughts of concern coming from each person sitting there.

  "Well, I guess this means that Mogul is on the back burner" 
sighed Nemesis, folding his hands together in his lap.  A few grins 
appeared quickly looking to relieve the stress of the room.

  "We need a plan of attack to begin with" said Slash slouching 
back in her chair, allowing the bottoms of her stocking to show without 
concern.  Nemesis was the first to notice and the only one to stare, 
unnoticed of course.  His CRI's zoomed in on one area, trying to get a 
closer picture.  'Business is business, but pleasure is pleasure' he thought 
to himself.  He never could grasp cyberspace that well and couldn't 
concentrate on it that much since he had never jacked in before and 
probably never would.

  "Fine.  First:  Jack, you need to keep gathering as much info as 
possible from the nets and from work.  We need to know what we're 
going up against and when.  Second:  Slash, I need you to assess Cryon's 
security.  Work with your security company to get into the place and see 
what you can dig up.  Third:  Nemesis, I need you to resecure all of our 
sites, systems, apartments and personal gear.  I want to be ready for 
anything that hits us, either from Cryon or Mogul.  Also I need you to be 
our street info man.  There probably isn't much on the streets now, but I 
want to get as much of a jump on this as possible.  Also, keep a close eye 
on Mogul.  Keep them out of range, but don't overextend yourself without 
backup, and only under extreme circumstances.  Cryon takes priority 
until further notice.  Meanwhile, I will make contact with some of the 
higher ups I know and will converge all info to you all.  Keep all 
information pertaining to this thing as secret as possible.  Don't use the 
nets at all and make sure you're not being tracked!"

  The meeting soon broke up, each person going their individual 
way.  There was nothing more that really needed to be said, or could be 
said.  They needed more information and without it were dead in the 
water.  Nebulus walked back to the large window in the living room and 
looked out at the city below.  It was getting late in the afternoon, but 
work was just beginning.  'So they've finally come up with a way to shut 
us out, huh.  So it's all come to this.  And if ICE weren't enough.  Now I 
have to combat another person on the net who is playing Mr. Security 
Officer, standing between me and my objective.  That is, if they ever get 
into the nets!  That's it.  We'll have to kill the project before it even 
becomes operational!'

***************

  Five days had passed and the group was together once again, this 
time to compare information.  If nothing else, they were all more 
worried and more intense with every move they made.  Here was a 
technology and a capability so revolutionary in the field of computer 
security that it could wipe out the majority of cracking that goes on 
within any and all nets.

  The four sat around one of the tables in the back room at Hot 
Kicks, a private club owned by Nebulus on the better side of town.  It was 
an almost middle class joint, if there was a middle class any more.  If 
there was it was called surviving with a little more.  The joint was classy.  
It was where all the sophisticated people went who wanted to see live 
nude dancing and strippers that wouldn't make you vomit.  There was 
both male and female entertainment as well as artwork, decks, 
holographics, laser shows and live or holographic music.  It was a 
hangout for artsy types, social groupies, or horny people.  The room they 
were in was behind all the glitter and glamour of the place.  It was the 
business area of the joint.

  "Well, I guess I'll be the one to start things" spoke Jack, eagerly 
wanting the meeting to begin so that he could get as much of a jump on 
the project as possible.  Being the netrunner of the group, he needed as 
much prep time as possible, and the most info as well.  "The project is 
still scheduled to start on time in nine days.  The beta testing that has 
been going on over the past four months, has included over 25 
businesses, 20 military installations, and 10 government sites.  Successful 
cracks were made in all cases and successful defense routines were 
completed without problems.  The people who will be in the nets will be 
on life support for one month at a time.  They will be receiving fluids, 
muscle stimuli and other necessities while in the nets.  They will be 
connecting into the nets through a large comp that I suspect is a 
supercomputer, but have not yet confirmed.  With this type of computing 
power, they will be able to bring a lot of software into the nets with them 
and will be able to be monitored from outside, while still maintaining 
contact with the others in the nets.  ICE could never touch the killing 
power that this could produce" Jack finished with a seriously straight 
face.

  "Cryon's physical security is very tight.  My security firm is 
presently supporting ten positions within the company, none of which 
are located near this project.  Security systems and facility maps are 
located within the main system there, and should be breakable without 
much trouble, once you get past the outer systems.  I can arrange to have 
two of our special tactics team help us with the break in.  They're 
specifically trained for this sort of thing and we have no records of them 
at all."

  "Yea, but can they be trusted?" darted Jack, obviously feeling the 
pressure of breaking into a place this big, and going against an 
operation of this magnitude.

  "My people are loyal to me.  As long as we keep them from the 
truth and don't have them go all the way in, we should be ok.  In any 
case, they are expendable if problems arise.  Are there any other 
questions?" challenged Slash.  She wouldn't have come up with the idea 
if she didn't think it weren't safe, and she hated people who attacked her 
judgments.

  "All right.....Nemesis" called Nebulus, keeping the meeting in 
order.

  "All security systems and meeting places have been tested, 
verified and put on maximum alert sequences.  If anything even comes 
close to messin' with our stuff, it'll be eliminated.  The word on the street 
is nothin'.  This project is the quietest one I've ever heard of.  Nobody's 
even heard of it yet.  Mogul is still around, but they don't seem to be 
movin' anytime in the next few days.  They're mainly getting contacts 
and settin' up sites.  All personal gear has been maintained and weapon 
banks are in full, working condition.  They'll be ready when the time 
comes to jump."

  "Last but not least, the big guys will be comin' into town on the 
day the project is implemented.  Hotel reservations were made months 
ago and security teams have been assigned from the normal companies.  
I scrounged some extra cash in case we needed anything to further our 
chances of survival.  This one's gonna be the big hit for this year, that's 
for sure" said Nebulus moving to the front of his chair and putting his 
arms down on the table.

  "What is that supposed to mean?" asked Slash.

  "We are going to attack this project before it can be implemented 
and we're gonna go into Cryon to do it."

  "Are you nuts!?  There's no fuckin' way we can attack from 
within Cryon!" bitched Jack, standing up to contest the whole plan.

  "If we let them into the nets, we're dead.  They win, we loose.  
They will be more powerful than ICE ever could think of being.  You 
should know that, Jack" Nebulus retaliated disgustingly as if talking to a 
high school punk that never learned to think with an open mind.  

  'Great.  He's already starting to crack and the fun hasn't even 
begun' thought Slash looking disappointingly at Jack.

  Nebulus got up from his seat and walked over to Jack, who had 
walked away from the table to unbutton his shirt even more.  Slash and 
Nemesis looked at each other with that 'Oh, great' look, knowing each 
other couldn't wait for the action.

  Nebulus put his hands in his baggy pants pockets as he stood next 
to Jack.  "Look.  I know you're in a really bad position if anything goes 
wrong.  But you're in it with us and you know you want to go through 
with it.  Just relax and take an anti-stress pill and calm down.  I need you 
in one piece to pull this off from the inside or we're not going 
anywhere."  He walked away knowing that Jack wouldn't let him down.  
Every now and then when they did something big, Jack was the one to 
get nervous.  He was great on the nets and could crack more than most, 
but his nerves were made of shit until the actual time came to work.

  "So where's my woman, Nebulus?" asked Nemesis jokingly.

  "Julia is downstairs waitin' for ya' in the dressin' room."  

  "Julia this time, huh."  Since the meeting was essentially over, 
Nemesis decided to go play, leaving the group behind to drink or do 
whatever they wanted to.

  "How pathetic" mumbled Slash as her combative partner left the 
room.  He paid no attention to her comment, as usual.




        Cool Darkness
          by Matthew Carpenter



      Chapter 4 : Pawn to Rook 4

  "How the hell do you expect me to come up with that kind of 
security information by tomorrow morning?  There's got to be a dozen or 
more hard locks on that place, not to mention getting around ICE" 
complained Jack, trying to make Nebulus understand the tight security 
at Cryon.

  "Jack, take a chill pill.  So it'll take a few more hours than normal.  
Just get it done as soon as possible.  We need as much info as possible so 
we can pull this off."

  "And what if we can't?  Why the hell is getting this stuff off line 
so important anyways?  It's not like we're trying to protect every 
netrunner in the country."  Nebulus dropped a few tablets on the desk 
the two were sitting at.  Jack watched them rolled around on a pile of 
computer paper until they spun around and stopped toward one edge.  By 
the time Jack looked up at Nebulus, he had already walked away, 
thinking about something else.  To Nebulus, nothing was impossible.  It 
was just a matter of coming up the right plan of attack.

  "Shit" mumbled Jack to himself, picking up the two pills.  
'Probably only iron tablets' he thought putting them in his mouth and 
downing them with the Coke sitting on his desk.  'Everything must be 
duplicated.  All security systems must be located and analyzed.  Personnel 
and schedules must be analyzed.  What a fuckin' bitch!'  He jacked back 
into Cryon gathering the last bit of information that was necessary to 
invade as he always called it.

  A few hours later, the group was together once again for last 
checks on the plan of attack.  The meeting place was the same warehouse 
that Nemesis and Slash had gone to after taking out Dave.  Kind of ironic 
since it is usually a place to go after the fact.  It quaintly went along with 
Nebulus' ego, though.  Good for dealing in the black markets; bad for 
dealing with friends.  But then again, they all did live on the edge just 
for that rush of adrenaline.  For Nemesis, that was his drug of choice.

  "So are we gonna go in and tear this place up or what" Nemesis 
said loudly sitting down at the large meeting table that was probably 
designed to be a stretch dining room table.  It had been refinished and 
had a monitor array placed into it so that it took up most of the table face.  
He placed his combat boots up on the table and faced the head of the table 
where Nebulus sat.

  "Pig" joked Slash, sitting across from him.

  "So who are your friends, Slash?" asked Nemesis, gathering a 
straight face, ready for business.

  Slash turned to her right where one of her two 'friends' were 
seated.  He was dressed in almost all black leather, with a black hair cut 
resembling Nemesis' with a gold earring to top it off with style.  "This is 
Aberdon.  And she is Donna" pointed Slash, looking at her other friend 
who was sitting next to Nemesis who noted her long stocking-clad legs.  
Her miniskirt and skimpy top left little to the imagination and much to 
be desired, at least as far as Nemesis was concerned, who was becoming 
aroused as his eyes caressed her legs very slowly.

  "And what do you do for a living" he smirked eyeing her over his 
shoulder, getting as much of a lookover as he could get away with.

  "Looks like I'll be coverin' your ass macho man" she replied with 
a nasty tone of voice, never letting her intimidating facial expression 
change.

  He laughed.  He laughed sarcastically loud.  "So where do we stand 
on info?" he said dropping his bullshit like a mercury weight.

  "We've got most of the blueprints for the place in question 
including security and surveillance systems, piping and electrical, and 
nets.  Security schedules are being analyzed by the comps still and tap in 
sites are being assessed as to hard connects" came back Jack who sat at 
the other head of the table.  He touched the table screen a few times and 
a general blueprint of the main floor and grounds came into view.  "This 
is the general layout of the place, he said adding mini windows of the 
basement levels.  The target site is on the absolute bottom floor of the 
building, and it's pretty heavily guarded and secured.  It's going to take a 
lot to get to it" he said with a little worry.  He was getting used to the 
situation and finally excited about the job, but still slightly intimidated 
with the size of the operation.  It was the largest job he'd ever done and it 
was one of the few that involved both people on the nets and in the 
physical objective site.

  "Piece of cake" confidently spoke up Aberdon.

  "Yea?  So how would you attack it!?" attacked Slash.  Nebulus sunk 
a little deeper in his chair, awaiting this test.

  "Once the electronics are secure, a team will go in the rear 
security zone by entering this loading zone, here" he said pointed to a 
grid on the monitor.  "From there, one of us will take over that physical 
security site to control the area.  From there, whoever's runnin' will lead 
the group through checkpoints by disarming systems and allowing them 
to enter secured sectors.  Any guards can be removed by our new 
security guard and diverted temporarily.  Then it's just a matter of 
pullin' things together.  Piece of cake."

  "Not bad...not bad" spoke Nebulus, sitting back up in his chair.  
"Almost like we had talked about earlier."  Putting his elbows on the 
table, he glanced over the prints one more time.  The room was silent.  
All eyes were on Nebulus since he had the final say on the plan.  He stood 
up and took off his jacket, placing it on the back of the chair.

  "But it won't work.  The security layout would never get you past 
the main gate.  Cryon doesn't accept night deliveries.  No one goes in or 
out after dark, period" said Jack, standing his ground against a plan as 
simple as that.  "So the question is, how do we get to the dock without 
being noticed at all."

  "Sewer system.  It's the oldest trick in the book, but I bet you it 
would work" said Nemesis.

  "Don't be stupid.  A company like that isn't dumb enough to leave 
their pipes clear" snapped Slash, expecting more from an experienced 
front man.

  "Yea, but all the outside pipes aren't connected to the inside pipes.  
They're all for rain, not sewage.  Look.  There's not one connection from 
the building pipes to the outside pipes.  In fact, it looks like all the inner 
pipes go down to the basement and out the bottom of the structure 
through smaller pipes into an underground piping system I would guess.  
There's a man hole near the docks that I bet connects to the city sewers" 
pondered Jack, getting more intrigued with the possibilities of actually 
pulling this stunt off.

  "Check it out.  Make sure they're clean and that the pipes are 
large enough for men with equipment to get through.  If it is, we'll go 
with it.  I had a similar idea to the one proposed.  I'll pose as a guard and 
help the team get through each level of security.  Nemesis, get me a wish 
list of equipment to get the job done.  Then you and Aberdon get the stuff 
ready.  Slash, you and Donna look over every micron of this plan and 
make sure it works.  Make detailed notes on everything we will need to 
know about this place.  Jack, continue working on info and breaking 
systems.  Also, get the ROMS ready to write to with the info Slash gives 
you.  Meanwhile, I'll get some party favors.  Aberdon and Donna, you are 
staying with us until this is over, understand!"  commanded Nebulus.  
This was it.  If there were any questions, now was the time to bring it up.  
Once the plan was set, it was set.  There were no objections.

  August 21.  Friday, early morning.  The humid air hung stagnate 
outside the metal door of a warehouse in the shipping district.  Launch 
Site 13 as it was called.  All missions were started here.  This one was just 
bigger than most.  Usually, it was mainly netrunning to get information.  
This time it involved flesh and blood almost more than fiber optic cables.  
Nemesis stood outside the door waiting for the rest to arrive.  He looked at 
his watch.  '3:49.  One minute to go' he thought.  A lone docking light far 
away painted a soft, white brush stroke of light across his bare chest and 
the warehouse behind him.  'Forty seconds to go.'

  The dull hum of a van came from around the far side of the 
warehouse, moving slowly along the gravel drive.  The headlights were 
turned off as the garage size door of the warehouse began to open, 
spilling an ambient light onto the gravel.  Nemesis opened the personnel 
door behind him and walked through closing it behind him and locking 
it.  The black beaten up van crept past the open garage to turn around 
and enter backwards.  The garage door began to close as Nemesis walked 
up to the back of the van and opened the doors with a sharp creaking.  
The gang was here.  

  "Right on time" he said.

  "Time to party" said Slash being the first to get out of the crowded 
van.  Everyone in the back were sitting on A3 cases that were unloaded 
first by Nemesis and Aberdon.  Stacking them sideways to each other, 
Nebulus brought the pass card up, giving the privilege to Donna who 
aggressively ran it through the bar reader of the first one she came to.  
The green light on the handle block went on and an internal lock 
disengaged with a soft pop.  She opened it up and everyone looked in.

  "My, my, aren't we gonna have fun tonight" glowed Slash looking 
at the case full of explosives.  

  "C4-type II, IRAPM's, concussion bombs, hand grenades, 
hey....where's my grenade launcher?" joked Nemesis looking at Nebulus.

  "Look in case two.  Each one of you has a personal case that is 
openable with that card.  Everything you need is in there.  Merry 
Christmas kids."

  "How much did this cost you anyways?" asked Slash with a grin.

  "After I told them why we were going in, they practically gave it 
to me just to secure their other investments.  To answer your question, 
no you can't keep it" he replied with a grin that stretched from ear to 
ear.

  The transformation began.  Everyone began getting their clothes 
on and their body armor secured.  All of the smiles had left by the time 
4:00 AM rolled around.  Weapons were checked and rechecked.  
Ammunition and explosives were properly attached and weapons slung.  
Jack had already disappeared into the basement of the place; a secret 
room under the floor where the master comps were located.  The comps 
sucked power directly from the power station that was not more than a 
quarter mile away.  That way the general power loss could be attributed 
to humidity or any other stupid, unexplainable phenomenon.

  "On line in one minute!" yelled Nebulus from his makeup case.  
Everyone was already ready, checking each other over.  Nebulus jacked 
in quickly checking on Jack's status.

  "On line!"

  The four got side by side.  The seriousness and concentration 
hung in the air almost as thick as the humidity.  Beads of sweat had 
formed on every one's forehead.  Foot steps were heard from the far side 
of the warehouse and Jack soon appeared out of the homemade wooden 
office, heading towards the group.  

  "Are you ready?" questioned Nebulus.

  "Comps are set.  Once you get in, you'll have less than 10 minutes 
to complete the job, which in this case is plenty of time.  One minute to 
secure the desk.  Two minutes to get to subbasement 4.  One minute for 
diversions and gaining access.  Three minutes for setting the bombs and 
getting out.  That leaves you with one minute to blow the place and two to 
get out" said Jack.

  "And that's worse case scenario, right?" asked Nebulus, hinting 
that Jack was underestimating their abilities.

  "Yeah.  In reality, you'll probably do it in half that time, so just 
keep me informed of where you are and everything will go OK.  I'll be 
able to track you anyways, so don't worry too much."

  "All right.  See you in a few then."

  "Good luck, and if everything goes wrong, I'll just blow the net if 
I can.  That way, any system assignment will be destroyed."

  "Good deal.  Lets get going" said Nebulus looking back at his 
group.  Dressed in solid black from head to toe stood the attack team.  
Expanded honeycomb titanium armor plated Spectra 3000 body armor 
hugged every curve of their bodies, protecting them from most 
firepower out today.  Explosives and equipment was strategically secured 
to the armor for quick, but easy use.  After a quick checkover, they took 
their seats in the back of the van with Nebulus navigating and Donna 
driving.  It took twenty minutes to get there.  The corporation had a 
large complex just outside of city limits.  An old apartment complex had 
been renovated and made into an employees park which housed 
thousands of people.  The six story concrete apartments stood above a not 
so beautiful street that had it's fair share of crime, vandalism and street 
gangs.  The van was parked in an alley just out of site of the complex.

  "Comms on.  Mic check" said Nemesis. Everyone donned their 
small headset/mic.  Nebulus had a lapel mike with a single ear speaker 
that had been placed under the fake skin of his disguise that finished the 
security officer uniform he wore under his wet suit.

  "One."  "Two."  "Three."  "Four."  "Five." the group replied in order.

  "Sounding good everyone.  Jack, check in" came back Nebulus.

  The line was dead for a second.  "God here.  RYLAC."

  "How can he hear us?" asked Donna looking over at Nebulus.

  "He wrote a program to interface his deck with a comm system.  It 
shows up as a two-way speaker in his environment.  Sync watches on 
4:56 on five, four, three, two, one, mark."  Watches were synced.  
"Injection time people."  Each person, including Nemesis, took out a small 
packet that contained three vials with needles.  Nemesis took out the first 
vial which contained a clear liquid and injected himself with the 
adrenalizer, designed as a short term super steroid with little side effects.  
The first needle was placed back and the second vial was injected in the 
same area of the arm.  This one was a sense and reflex enhancer 
designed by the military.  It would give them better combat reflexes 
when they needed it.  This was followed by a third injection of a pain 
killer.  It was designed to not activate until a large amount of pain was 
inflicted, then it just temporarily deadened the area's nerve system.  
Designer drugs, designed for combat.  Perfect for terrorist raids.

  "5:00.  Time to go people" said Nebulus fastening his wet suit shut.  
Face masks were put on, covering everything but their eyes, and 
equipment and weapons were gathered.  The five exited the van silently 
and moved over the man hole located a few feet from the van.  A quick 
jimmy with a bar and the lid slid over with a low screech.  A quick look 
around and Nebulus was the first in, followed by the two newbees as 
Nemesis viewed it.  

  "I hope we can trust these two!" firmly whispered Nemesis to 
Slash, who gave him her look of approval before jumping in.  Within 
seconds the whole team was in the sewer system.  Pipes lined the old 
concrete and stone walls.  The water level was only thigh deep so it didn't 
prove to be very cumbersome.  

  "You checked this place out OK, right 3?" asked Nebulus over the 
comm.

  "Two gates were cleared.  Everything is a go."

  Night vision glasses allowed easy travel through the system for 
the first fifty or so feet until voices were heard from behind.  Everyone 
stopped.  Aberdon, who was trailing, turned around, crouching to the 
water level.  It sounded like kids.  Then it was as two street punks stuck 
their heads down into the sewers looking for the vanished group of 
strangers.  One reached a hand down below his head, visibly carrying a 
flash light.  Before he tuned it on, two silent needler shots were fired and 
the bodies of two dead kids splashed into the water below, creating a little 
wake that was eventually felt by the assassin.

  "Too bad" said Nemesis leading the group once again through the 
small cavern.  "Let's go."  They traveled through the sewers with very 
little trouble.  The tunnels were relatively flat and the footing was still 
firm due to the recent construction of Cryon some 10 years ago.  Nemesis' 
night vision led them on until the man hole cover was reached near the 
loading docks of the company.  "God.  How does the weather look?" asked 
Nebulus, who had unzipped the top part of his suit after reaching the 
ladder which led to the surface.

  Jack had been in the net for some time now, checking on 
programs, root operations, and watching out for ICE.  "Security checking 
will be done in one minute" came back Jack.

  'One minute.  Come on.  Hurry up' thought Nemesis, quite eager to 
get this job started.  The adrenalizer was beginning to take effect.  
Watches were being checked until the second before the security 
program checker was finished, exactly 5:10 AM.

  "Go" said Jack.  Nebulus had already shed his wet suit and Nemesis 
had slid the man hole cover out of the way while being covered by 
Donna.  Nebulus was the first out, quickly running up to the docking 
door.  He was quickly followed by the rest of the group who crouched by 
the sides of the door, waiting for Nemesis to put the cover back on.  He 
finished and regrouped with the team who had taken off their glasses to 
allow their eyes to adjust to the indoor light emanating from the door.  
Nebulus entered.  He quickly walked down the hallway and turned left 
towards the security desk that monitored that side of the complex.  The 
security guard at the desk came into view and stood up as he approached 
the desk.

  "Who are you and what are you doing in this section of the 
building?" the guard asked in a not so calm tone of voice.  Obviously the 
security had been upgraded for Operation Revolt.

  Nebulus walked around so that he was next to the guard.  "We've 
got a problem in section 5" he replied bringing his arm from behind his 
back.  He thrust his hand forward into the guards throat, knocking him 
out with a stunner.  The guard shakingly fell to the floor and was kicked 
under the desk.  TV monitors lined the panel in front of him that had 
four jack in sites.  

  "God this is one.  Secure all personnel sensors and override all 
subsystems in this section to me" spoke Nebulus outloud into his comm 
mic.  

    Jack looked down onto the gaming board on the 
  table in front of him.  An elaborate table top created like 
  an old model train scene had been transformed into a 
  World War II battlefield.  Moving armies in Eastern Europe 
  moved on the forest-like layout depicting the different 
  programs going on.  He immediately spotted the correct 
  security program that monitored the security personnel's 
  heart rate from individual sensors mounted on their 
  watch bands.  He touched his finger to a spot near the 
  army foot soldier representing the algorithm and blinked 
  into the battlefield in front of the corporal with his 
  superuser privileges and general's uniform.  He   
  immediately attacked the young soldier with his bayonet-
  tipped M1 rifle and fought him down to the ground where 
  he thrust the nine inch bayonet blade into the soldiers 
  chest, terminating the program's operation.  He returned 
  to his chair in front of the table again, this time wearing 
  a replica of Patton's uniform.  "Done" was his reply to 
  Nebulus.

  "Team in" ordered Nebulus who took control of the video cameras, 
freezing them onto walls.  He jumped into cyberspace with his God given 
superuser access to check for personnel in the area.  A map of the floor 
came up with personnel locations and details.  He jumped out, routing the 
ground floor and the first three basements to the monitors in front of 
him.  

  The team quickly arrived, hauling their over-and-under 
weapons, and party favors with them.  A quick look at the monitors and 
Nemesis was off first seeking the entrance to the elevators.  Slash took 
off after him, followed by the two others right behind.  The corridors 
were lightly painted and had industrial carpet lining most of the halls.  
A few more turns through the halls and the group came to a halt behind 
a wall, separating them from the two security officers stationed at the 
elevator.

  "One.  Problem at elevator" whispered Nemesis into his mic.

  "Security at elevator 4, sector 6g : move promptly to sector 5g and 
report back in to gate on arrival" announced Nebulus, speaking into the 
security's comm.  The guards looked at each other for a moment, 
questioning the command from their security base.

  "Request secure ID verification" came back one of the guards.

  "ID hold out 764421 confirm" replied Nebulus, reading the code 
from one of the monitors.  The guard motioned to his partner and the two 
walked off towards sector 5g, watching the offices as they went.  As they 
moved out of site, the lights indicating that the elevator was moving 
down turned on.  The group stayed still.

  "One.  Someone's on the..." spoke Slash.

  "Team.  Backtrack to stairs.  Take first flight down and move 
towards sector 2."  Donna spun around and headed back first, frantically 
leading the group.  If they were caught now, the show would be over 
right then.  The stairs soon appeared in a side corridor and were entered.   
The heavy fire-proof door was shut with a soft thud and Slash was the 
first to go down the concrete stairs.  The walls were solid white and were 
dimly lit by night security lights.  

  The door to the first subbasement was reached and opened.  Slash 
peered around and saw no one.  The walls were only four feet tall in this 
sector.  Offices were separated by a few grids of these as far as she could 
tell by the dim light.  Shadows snaked down the halls, carving light into 
odd shapes and strokes by the bookcases and supporting pillars.  The 
team entered the floor and proceeded right along the hallway.  

  "No guards until the elevator" spoke Nebulus into his comm.  The 
team hugged the right wall, silently treading down the hallway, 
stopping every twenty feet to check to make sure no guards were 
walking rounds within the offices.  Just because the security monitors 
didn't show any guards, there was no absolute guarantee.

  Sector 2 was finally reached.  Nemesis looked at his watch.  
5:11:43.  Just a bit behind schedule, but nothing significant enough to 
worry about.

  "Let's take the stairs from now on" whispered Donna.  "That way, 
they can't track us."

  "Forget it.  The elevator's right nearby" darted Nemesis 
continuing on in the general direction of the elevator.  'Who the fuck 
does she think she is!  This is my plan and my attack.  She's just along for 
the ride!'  They reached the corner of the hallway in front of the 
elevator.

  "Watch out!  There's..." trailed Nebulus.

  "One.  What's it like?" asked Nemesis, itching to get into a fight 
right about now.

  "Hold it right there!  Don't move!" yelled a guard from behind the 
group.  They slowly turned around as two more guards came from the 
elevator area.  They all had on armored vests and carried high caliber 
handguns, all pointed at the group.  "Sidney, call into base and notify 
them to send more people!" commanded the first guard, still pointing his 
gun at Slash.  "Drop it now!"

  Nemesis faced the two guards that had come from the elevator and 
slowly started to pivot around towards Aberdon who was right behind 
him.  Slash and Donna began to put their weapons on the ground, 
crouching in anticipation.

  "Base, this is" spoke a guard into his comm.

  "Now!" yelled Nemesis, laying down a spray of needlers at the two 
guards in front of him.  Aberdon spun around in Slash's direction 
cutting the first guard to pieces with an array of silenced hard 
ammunition.  Three guards now lay dead on the floor, their blood 
staining the carpet underneath them.

  "I told you we needed armor piercers" spoke Nemesis at Aberdon.  
"Anything less, wouldn't have killed them."

  "Too bad for standard armor vests.  Next time, wear something 
better than that" scoffed Slash grinning over the dead bodies.

  "Team, what's up?" asked Nebulus over the comm.

  "Thanks for the warning, one.  We just waxed three of 'em" 
replied Nemesis, dragging one into an office room.  The other two were 
placed under the desks in one of the nearby offices as well in hope of 
temporarily concealing their presence.

  The elevator door was opened and the group entered, pressing the 
button for subbasement 4 on the panel.  The doors shut and the elevator 
began to move down.

  "Guards in sector 2DD, report to sector 4DD immediately" spoke 
Nemesis into the security comm.  He looked back at the monitors, 
bringing up the bottom two levels.  'More guards at the key points.  More 
security blockades to bypass.  Shit.  Guards are moving in on the elevator 
in sector 2DD.'

    "One, this is God.  Security ID failed.  They won't listen to you 
now.  Presently blocking communications to other sectors."

  "What the hell happened" asked Nebulus getting quite pissed by 
now that the plan was getting fucked up.

  "The security is tighter than I thought.  Out."

  The elevator stopped, but it wasn't at subbasement 4.  The team 
looked around and at the panel, trying to find out what was wrong.  
"Team, this is God.  Break out of the top hatch and find another way back 
into the building.  Security is on to you."

  "Shit!" yelled Nemesis very mad that the plan had failed.

  "We're still in so don't fuck up!" yelled Slash.  

  "Everybody, get back!" yelled Aberdon, pushing the group to the 
opposing side of the elevator from the doors.  He aimed his grenade 
launcher from under his gun, and fired at the floor, just under the doors.  

  "NO!!!!" yelled Slash.  Before she could do anything about it, the 
grenade impacted on the floor and exploded filling the cabin with fire, 
smoke and a shock wave that threw everyone to the floor.  The far side of 
the floor blew out destroying the lower part of the doors as well.  Slowly, 
Slash looked up to view the damage, her ears were ringing from the 
blast.  Black smoke filled the cabin allowing almost no visibility.  

  "Two.  What the hell can you see?" she asked Nemesis, pulling him 
to sit up.

  He switched his eyes to infra-red and then to ultraviolet, trying 
to get a better picture of the cabin.  "The floor's about half gone and the 
doors are severely damaged."  The cabin swayed a little in the elevator 
shaft as the team began to regain itself.

  "One this is three.  How the hell do we get out of here!" screamed 
Slash into her comm.  The earphone just buzzed; the diaphragm 
completely shredded from the shock wave.  "One this is three, come in."  
Nothing.  "Shit!  We're cut off!  Why the fuck did you blow the elevator 
like that you moron!?  You killed the goddamn comms!" she yelled 
throwing her comm to the ground.

  "Wait.  Elevator ladder.  Come on" said Nemesis venturing into the 
grayish-black smoke, his mask temporarily giving him a filter to breath 
through.  His adrenaline pushing him onward, Nemesis crouched near 
the hole and reached out for the rung of the ladder nearest to him.

  "God, this is one.  Secure fire alarms and all security sectors not 
in this area.  I want my team to be shut off from everyone else.  We've 
lost communications with them."  

    Jack stood up from his playing board and 
  proceeded to another one :  another level of security.  He 
  sat down at the second board dressed in a Civil War 
  General's uniform.  The gold braids from his blue epaulets 
  dangled near the surface as he closely looked over the 
  terrain.  He found where he wanted to be and placed his 
  finger at the spot only to appear there instantly.  

    He stood in the Union Army's camp under overcast 
  skies looking around for the program he wanted to kill.  
  "Young man, come here!" he yelled in a northern accent 
  at one of the messenger boys.

    "Yes sir" the boy said breathing hard from 
  carrying messages as he stood at attention in front of 
  General Jack.  His weathered uniform and tattered pants 
  could hardly be classified as a uniform, but yet it worked 
  well with his position.

    "Where can I find the lad who's carryin' the 
  message about the fire?"

    "That'd be me, sir.  I'm sorry I haven't gotten it out 
  yet, but they blocked my normal way out and I can't get 
  by."

    "Why don't you give the message to me and I'll 
  make sure that it gets out, son" he said holding his gloved 
  hand outward to the young boy.

    "But sir, I.."

    "Now, son!" he commanded, lowering his voice to a 
  thunderous growl.

    "Yes sir." he replied giving Jack the message.  He 
  looked confused with the order, but was not about to 
  disobey a general.

    "Now git goin' kid."  The boy turned slowly around 
  and then started to walk off looking for another problem 
  to report.  Then he collapsed about ten feet from Jack as 
  his head exploded from the .50 caliber flint lock pistol ball 
  that pierced the back of his head.  No one paid attention as 
  they were not programmed to monitor his operation.  He 
  landed face first into the muddy ground as Jack put the 
  gun back in it's holster at his side and blinked out of the 
  board, leaving the message to be erased.

  Nebulus had yet to be nervous, but he wasn't exactly calm 
anymore as he found the remote sensing information and popped it up 
on the screen of one of his monitors.  After a little searching he changed 
the monitors to display the motion sensor and thermal sensor 
information from the different floors.  'Elevator shaft.  What the fuck 
are they doing in a goddamn elevator shaft?' he thought to himself.

  "Hold it right there, mister!" yelled a guard from behind Nebulus.  
"Don't move, don't even breathe!"  The guard and his two counterparts 
slowly walked around, surrounding him at the guard desk.  "Do you 
really think we were that stupid!?" asked the guard.

  "Who the hell are you and what are you doing in my sector?" 
confronted Nebulus, unfamiliar with the uniforms.  The guards were 
decked out in military-style commando garb, carrying heavy caliber 
rifles and explosives.

  "We're the other half of the security that you didn't take into 
consideration in your plan.  Now shut up!"

  "Hey!  There is no other side of security that I don't know about!  
Now put those guns down before I notify security and make this a big 
mess!" ordered Nebulus, standing up to face the leader of the group who 
stood on the other side of the security desk across from him.  'Shit.  
Heavy bore weapons, needlers, grenades and explosives.  They really are 
military.  Lieutenant DeGrace.  Oh, shit...' he thought to himself as his 
eyes looked down to the ground in front of his adversaries' boots.  A 
single hand stuck out underneath the desk.

  "Mistake number one, asshole.  Now sit down" said Lieutenant 
DeGrace.  He slowly gripped the arms of the chair and sat down, hoping 
that the commandos wouldn't take notice of what was on the monitors 
yet.  'Come on Jack.  Call me.  Call me.'

  "One this is God."

  "One is dead" was his only reply.  The monitors blinked out and 
Nebulus' comm went dead as one of the commando's behind him grabbed 
him by the throat and forced him to the ground backwards, shoving a 
needler into his throat as his head firmly hit the floor.

  "Your body armor won't protect you from this, now will it" 
sneered the commando, living for the fight.  Nebulus just laughed, and 
continued to laugh sarcastically until he was silenced with the butt of a 
gun against his head.

  "The hunt is on" spoke the Lieutenant into his comm.

    "Damn.  Now what the fuck am I supposed to do?" 
  Jack talked to himself in the net, surrounded by the 
  playing fields and game boards of the blue lit room.  "Wait.  
  Who took him out?"  He moved from board to board 
  checking all the different systems that were running, 
  personnel marks, timelines and on.  With a single 
  thought, twenty more boards came into play on the 
  ceiling above his head.  It was just like the feet of the 
  tables were nailed to the ceiling.  "Ah, I love tesseracts!" 
  Jack announced with a smile as he changed perspective 
  and jumped onto the ceiling to view the new playing 
  fields :  thermal and motion sensors of every floor in their 
  sector.  "Time for some fun!"

  By now the team had climbed down the elevator shaft ladder to 
within sight of the fourth subbasement.    Nemesis lead the way down 
with Donna, Slash and Aberdon following closely behind.  Their weapons 
slung and both hands holding onto the ladder, Nemesis pondered what an 
easy target they would be if anyone would open one of the doors and find 
them there.

  "Team this is God...God....God..." echoed one of the speakers in the 
shaft.  Slash looked around, trying to find the source without any luck.  

  "God, where are you!" Slash yelled, clinging onto the ladder, not 
allowing herself to look down.

  "I can't hear you, but I know where you are.  Keep going and 
hurry up.  One is dead so get out as soon as possible."

  "Shit!" screamed Slash.  The reality of the challenge was at hand.  
'Have we come this far only to be finished off.  Goddamn it.  I knew it was 
too big!' she thought to herself, as they descended closer to the elevator 
door.

  They reached subbasement 4 in no time and stopped to gather 
their weapons for an assault.  "Guys, we're one minute behind schedule.  
Since Nebulus is out, I say we just take out everything in our way and get 
out in the same manner" Nemesis said, looking back up the ladder.  'Nice 
ass, Donna.  We'll have to fuck when we get out of here.'

  "Let's do it!" snarled Slash.  'Pay back time.  Now the fun begins.'

  As the team climbed away from the door, Nemesis pulled out a 
magnetic explosive and secured it to the doors, sliding down the ladder in 
time for the doors to be completely destroyed.  Aberdon was the first into 
the hall.  The doors were shredded onto the floor nearby and the bodies 
of two guards lay among the scattered debris.  A quick look around and 
the shielded doors were closing quickly, locking the area out due to the 
explosion.  The team reassembled in the hall.

  "Team, this is God.  I can talk you through to the strike zone.  Go 
forward to the first door and I'll open it!" he ordered.  The team took off.  
Jack looked onto the master board for the sector, viewing what was going 
on.  "Enemy on other side, door opening now!" he yelled into the 
microphone next to him on the table.  The team crouched next to the 
walls as the door slid open.  Four guards were waiting just like Jack had 
said, and were soon disposed of by a sneak attack of needlers and hard 
ammo as the door opened.  They ran ahead down the hall, now lit by 
security lights.  The concrete walls and hard metal doors concealed labs 
and computer rooms by the dozens as they continued down the straight, 
tiled hallway.

  "Six guards commin' from the right hallway!" yelled Jack.  
Nemesis and the team slowed down and slid next to the facing wall of the 
hallway.  "Shutting blockade" said Jack as the solid metal shielding door 
fell into place, locking the guards out of range.  The group continued on.  

  Running towards the next intersection, Nemesis veered towards 
the left hallway.  They turned into the hallway, only to be stopped by a 
solid door, again.  Slash and Donna ran back a few steps, watching their 
backs.

  "God, we got a door" yelled Nemesis, knowing that he wouldn't be 
heard anyways.  

  "Incoming!" yelled Slash as a squad of commandos came down the 
hallway in full force.  Donna opened up and let out a spray of hard 
ammo, hitting a few, but having little effect.

  "Shit!  They're armored!" she yelled as the two men got in 
position.  Scraping fire bounced off the walls around Donna as she fell to 
the ground, trying to get out of the way of the action.

  "Now!" yelled Aberdon.  He and Nemesis ducked around the corner 
with their weapons, laying down fire.  The commandos taking cover 
against some of the walls that led into other hallways began putting 
down another layer of ammo at the two.  Donna jumped out a little to 
thrown down a flash mine.  She was nicked by two rounds in the chest 
and fell backward just as the mine exploded, sending up a high intensity 
flash explosion.  Slash jumped out just as it went off and fired two mini-
grenades which impacted directly above the cowering attackers.  
Aberdon and Nemesis took off down the hallway after the commando 
position and engaged themselves in the fight by firing at the 
commandos at point blank range.  Taking a few hits each, they pressed 
through the group until they were out of ammunition.  The smoke from 
the grenades had cleared and there were only a few more left.  Nemesis 
picked up the nearest one and slammed his fist into his face, crushing 
every bone from the impact.  The commando grabbed Nemesis' arm just 
as he was thrown into the wall behind him and forgotten about as 
Nemesis' attacked his next victim.  Soon the floor was littered with 
bloodied camouflage, their broken armor not strong enough against 
specialized armor piercing rounds.  Slash and Donna joined the two men 
in the middle of the battlefield.

  "Now this is what I call a fight!" yelled Nemesis allowing his 
adrenalizer to get the most of him.  

  "Military commandos.  Looks like we underestimated Cryon a little 
bit.  Let's move" said Slash, leading the team back to the door.  Reloads 
and armor checks were made.  Scrape marks in her armor were only left 
in Donna's chest where she was hit.

  "5:14:39" said Nemesis.

  "Team, God here.  Door opening in 2 seconds."

  "It's about goddamn time" hissed Aberdon.  The door slid upward 
surprising the group who was ready for anything now.  Another squad 
of commandos were lying on the ground, as if they had collapsed.  

  "Nerve gas is great isn't it" came Jack's voice over the speakers.

  "That boy's crazy" blurted Slash.  They relaxed their weapons 
enough to start running down the hallway towards the last blockade.  

  Jack watched intently at the movement of the team from within 
the computers.  "OK.  Alarms deactivated.  Explosives deactivated.  
Communications deactivated" he spoke to himself.  He constantly went 
over the area again and again in a split seconds making sure that 
nothing would go wrong once the team was in place.

  The last blockade was passed without any problems.  Labs with 
built in windows now lined the concrete substructure.  The halls were 
relatively dark, but shadows from the security night lights lined the 
walls.  

  "The lab should be up around the next corner" cautiously spoke 
Slash to Nemesis who was running side by side with her in the wide 
corridors.  Weapons pointed forward, they slowed to a brisk walk to 
within inches of the intersection that led to the target site.  'There's got 
to be a squad here' repeated Nemesis in his head.  'Come on, let's go, let's 
go!' anxiously thought Slash, ready to get the job over with.

  "Intruder is using armor piercers.  Stop them at all costs.  It's up 
to you, McGletspy" Lieutenant DeGrace's voice came over the military 
comm to the guards posted out front of the labs for Project Revolt.

  'Time to start the show' thought Nemesis to himself.  He pointed to 
his eyes while holding a flash mine in his fingers.  Everyone 
understood.  They took their positions around each other, ready for 
attack as Nemesis slid the flash mine smoothly across the floor in the 
direction of the target.  A second later, Nemesis' polarized CRI's viewed 
the four guards decked out in armored gear and heavy bore weapons as 
the flash mine went off, not too far from their position in front of the 
metal lab door.  Heavily armored in urban camouflage, Kevlar II body 
armor and carrying anti-terrorist attack gear, the four commandos 
opened fire immediately after the flash dimmed.  Their anti-radiation 
goggles protecting them from the burn of the mine allowed their 
weapons to pinpoint Nemesis' head in their sites, only to miss by his fast 
reflexes.

  "Four in armor!" yelled Nemesis over his shoulder while bringing 
his gun up for an assault.  The barrage silenced for a millisecond.  

  "Get back!" screamed Slash, pulling Donna with her.  A 
minigrenade exploded on the corner wall and was followed by three 
more that left more shrapnel than damaged concrete.

  "Hold this" said Aberdon shedding his equipment pack, 
containing some of the explosives.  "Let's do it!" he yelled, throwing two 
grenades into the hallway.  Right after impact, he and Nemesis began 
the attack by charging into the intersecting hallway to face the 
commandos head on.   Spraying needlers and hard ammo, the firing line 
pressed forward towards the commandos.  Without time to react from the 
grenade, the commandos began taking damage as the onslaught 
continued on.  Their armor being torn away from the ammunition, the 
guards soon fell to the ground without an escape route.  A quick release 
from one of the commandos launched a minigrenade at the line.  Moving 
out of its way, Aberdon and Nemesis lost position as the grenade exploded 
behind them.  Unsatisfied, however, Nemesis took control by directly 
attacking one of the commandos in close combat.  Weakened from the 
fire fight, the commando fought to gain balance as Nemesis picked him 
up off the ground by the throat, throwing his gun to the side for the 
challenge.  Kicking with his bloodied leg and grabbing with his hands, 
the commando fought until Nemesis slammed his fist into his face.  The 
anti-gas goggles exploded under the pressure.  The commando went limp 
in Nemesis' hands as he pulled his fist out of the commando's face, 
leaving only a crushed and bleeding lifeless body to slump to the ground 
with a release of his grip.  One other commando ran towards Nemesis, but 
was cut short as Aberdon gunned him down, finding weak points in the 
sides of his armor.  Nemesis reached down towards one of his kills of the 
day to get another weapon in time to head kill one of the other guards 
preparing to fire on Aberdon.  Weapons pointed at the head of the 
remaining one, Lieutenant McGletspy.

  Panting from the adrenaline rush, Nemesis lowered his barrel to 
walk closer to the Lieutenant.  The Lieutenant's leg and chest were 
bleeding from needlers.  He held his chest with his hand under his shirt, 
provocatively looking at the approaching Nemesis.

  "Eat me mother fucker!" yelled the Lieutenant, holding in his 
now exposed hand a death mine :  a high explosive that personnel carry 
for hopeless situations.  

  "Get out!" yelled Nemesis, running backwards and diving for the 
nearest intersecting hallway only a few steps away.  Aberdon let out a 
few rounds into the Lieutenant's skull but not in time to silence the 
mine.  A millisecond later, it erupted into a ball of fire, engulfing 
Aberdon.  A cloud of fire flew down the corridors, running over the rest 
of the party that had taken cover by kissing the ground.  The shockwave 
from the blast echoed its anger down the corridors until the fire itself 
had died away.  Slowly Nemesis pulled himself up off of the ground.  
Putting out a few fires that had started on his suit, he gradually made his 
way back to the battlefield.  

  Donna and Slash stood at the tip of a large blood pool.  Aberdon's 
body was now in six pieces, his extremities lying on the ground near 
him.  Blood stains and body parts cluttered the ceiling, walls and floor 
where the commandos had been.  All their bodies were now soaked, 
burning and scattered all about the hall.  Donna moved over to Nemesis 
and handed him her gun.

  "Gimme your K1 and let's get this over with" she softly spoke.  
Nemesis' large hand took hold of the grip and pointed it towards the 
facing locked door.  He let loose a minigrenade which exploded, 
destroying the locking mechanism on the door.  Donna turned back 
around towards the door only to be handed Nemesis' K1.

  The lab was lined with liquid beds and computer terminals with 
the large computer in the back.  The whole room was barely large 
enough to contain the ten beds.  The group got straight to work laying 
down the explosive packs and detonation arrays around the beds and 
supercomputer.

  "Sync check" said Nemesis as the last one was placed down.  
Donna took out the detonator and confirmed that they were all properly 
synced.

  "5:16:12.  Time to move" said Slash, exiting the room first.  Donna 
put on the last pack containing the party favors and left last, detonator 
in hand.  The trek back down the halls was fairly simple.  Their boots left 
a trail of bloodied bootprints from the last battle as they jogged down the 
hallways.  The thought of where was Jack was on everyone's mind since 
they had had no contact with him for the past few minutes.  A few more 
jogs to the left and right put them back at the stairwell.

  "5:16:49.  Let's do it" said Slash looking at Donna.  Nemesis went 
into the stairwell and proceeded to go up a flight and a half, checking 
for more guards.  Slash followed, but not as far since she was Donna's 
backup.  Donna was the last in and shut the door until only her hand 
with the detonator was sticking out, making sure that the structure 
would not interfere with the detonation.

  "Here we go!" she yelled up the stairs.  'Do it' she told herself as 
she pushed the trigger button down and pulled her arm in quickly.  
Donna began running upstairs as the explosions in the lab rocked the 
basement in a stunning blaze of fire and thunder.  Sonic blasts blew out 
many of the windows as it ran down the hallways only to be followed by 
clouds of fire that engulfed everything in site.  Multiple explosions could 
be distantly heard as the team regrouped on the third subbasement level 
and continued upward toward the main floor.

  "Watch it!" yelled Slash as they made their way to the bottom of 
the first floor's stairs.  An infrared antipersonnel mine was seen on the 
wall next to one of the bottom stairs.  A look skyward showed the 
explosive sitting, waiting for it's target to come through it's invisible 
trip line.  Carefully stepping over the trip line, Nemesis led the way to 
the top door.  'This is just too easy of an escape' he thought to himself 
remembering many other raids whose exit was much tougher than it's 
entrance.  He unfastened two grenades from his armor and proceeded to 
throw them into the hallway, shutting the stairwell door quickly behind 
them.  

  "Grenade!!!" yelled a guard from inside the hallway.  Nemesis' 
guess was right.  The two exploded relatively at the same time.  Nemesis 
quickly entered the smoky hallway and proceeded to fire at the four 
commandos who had taken posts on opposite sides of the stairwell door.  
Slash and Donna soon jumped into the hallway, taking posts on either 
side of Nemesis, guarding against additional intrusion.  A few quick looks 
around only produced the four dead bodies on the ground.  Nemesis 
reloaded.

  The party turned right from the stairwell door and proceeded 
with caution to the next intersection.  They moved slowly with their 
weapons pointed straight ahead, searching for the way out while still 
knowing that they had to return to the original entrance to not only get 
out, but to also find out what happened to Nebulus.  The first intersection 
was clear.

  "Donna.  String a mine across here" ordered Nemesis who 
continued to move on.  Donna handed the mine to Slash who plastered it 
to the opposing wall while Donna strung the device across the 
intersection.  

  The lights began to flicker on and off.  Then the siren was heard.  
The team stopped to look around.  The electronic whirring of the fire 
alarm filled the entire hallway with its annoying tone.  "Code 1 fire alert 
in subbasement 4.  All personnel must evacuate these premises 
immediately" spoke a recorded voice from the speakers that Jack had 
been using previously.  'Why the hell are the alarms going off if Jack 
had control of the situation?' questioned Nemesis.

  "Jack must be out as well" said Slash.  "Let's get the fuck out of 
here!"  The team took off down the hallway.  It was time to leave Cryon 
once and for all.  The operation had taken long enough.  Half of the team 
was either dead or taken out of the picture somehow.   

  "Donna.  Give me your gun and start preparing some party 
favors" yelled Slash taking Donna's gun.  Donna took off her pack and 
sorted through the explosives and grenades, ready to hand them out 
when people needed to die.  Passing another intersection, the team saw 
the back of the chair at the security desk.  Nemesis waved his hand back 
at Donna and she put in it a high explosive, enough of a bang to destroy 
the room.

  "Hey man, catch!" yelled Nemesis.  Nebulus turned around only to 
see the explosive heading his way.  The guards hiding behind the walls 
still had their guns pointed at him if he screwed up.  But then, what else 
could he do.  The team stopped their advance and Nemesis shot two 
minigrenades into the room.  Nebulus jumped from his chair and 
sprinted towards his team as the grenades went off and the explosive 
landed on the chair.  The team took cover just as gun fire was heard, but 
was soon silenced by the deadening thunder of the explosive as it 
completely destroyed everything and everyone in the room.

  "Glad you still know what you're doin'" said Nebulus looking at 
the team.

  "We figured something was up, so I decided to make sure no one 
was in the room" replied Nemesis.  

  "There may be more guards down the hallway."

  "Let's go."  Getting up once again, the team continued down the 
hall and fought through the fire and debris of the security room.  
Finally advancing down the final hall, Nemesis emptied his gun of 
minigrenades and destroyed the entrance door and hopefully 
everything else that could attack them.  Donna dropped off the party 
favors and they carefully exited the docking entrance.  Nemesis was first 
away from the entrance and proceeded to move aside the manhole cover.  
The group got into the hole and Donna, being last as usual, pressed the 
detonator, igniting the explosives left in the pack.  The docking area of 
the building erupted in fire and exploded sending debris everywhere.  
But, the team had already begun the trip through the sewers.  The job 
was over.  It was time to go home.

  Sitting in the van on the way back into the city, no one talked.  
The van took a corner and drove by the Cryon building, getting a good 
look at all the police and fire department personnel who were attacking 
the multiple fires in the building.  The deep color of fire offset the light 
grayish color building in the morning light.  The sun had just started to 
come up, but was still pretty early before daybreak.  They soon turned 
into the city, taking their masks off.




      Cool Darkness
        by Matthew Carpenter



    Chapter 5 : A Thorn in Paradise



  "So what the hell happened in there?" questioned Nemesis 
looking towards the front of the van in Nebulus' direction.

  "I was watching you more than I was watching myself" told a 
disgusted Nebulus, completely shamed by his performance or lack there 
of.

  "At least you know a sign when you see one.  What happened to 
Jack?"

  "What do you mean, what happened to Jack" rudely snapped 
Nebulus who turned around to give Nemesis the evil eye.

  "We lost him before we got to the strike zone.  Where'd he go?  I 
thought he was supposed to follow us all the way out."

  "I don't know.  Maybe he bumped into ICE or something.  Why 
don't we get back there quickly and find out" Nebulus pointed out to 
Donna who pushed her foot into the floor, accelerating the van as she 
drove on into the city.

  Not soon enough for Nebulus' liking, the van pulled in front of 
the garage door of the warehouse.  Nemesis calmly hopped out of the 
back door of the van and proceeded to open the door.  The van came to a 
quiet stop with the garage door crashing down behind it.  The lights 
were still on; the office door to the underground comps was still shut.

  "Jack!  Hey Jack!  Where the hell are you shit-head!?" yelled 
Nemesis, feeling a little funny about the whole situation.  Walking to the 
back of the van, he picked up his rifle and proceeded to walk towards the 
office door.  He was followed by Nebulus and eventually Slash, who had 
had enough of Jack's clowning around.  Screwing around on the nets is 
one thing, but leaving a team in the thick of a job is another.  

  They approached the office door and found it still locked from the 
inside.  Nebulus walked over to a nearby desk, reached into the top 
drawer and picked up a magnetic key.  He returned to the door and 
inserted the flat key into the slot just under the door handle which 
produced a soft pop as the lock disengaged.  Nebulus opened the door and 
the group peered in.  The office was still the same :  a few file cabinets, a 
metal desk with a wooden, rocking office chair, a single light at the desk 
with another one in the ceiling, and a small hand comp sitting at the 
right of the desk.

  'Nothing is missing.  Everything is cool...except' thought Nebulus.  
"Jack's gone."

  "What!?" wined Nemesis in disbelief of wherever Nebulus had 
derived this idea.

  "The chair's here.  He should be sitting in it down in the room" 
stated Nebulus loosing his cool.

  "Bullshit.  He and I changed that last week 'cause he wanted a 
padded chair so his butt wouldn't hurt so much" slapped Nemesis.

  "Huh!?!?" 

  "Come on" said Nemesis entering the room and pressing the 
correct sequence of keys on the hand comp to enable the elevator to the 
comp room.  Slash moved the chair out of the way as the plate under the 
leg area of the desk slowly began its decent into the comp room.  Within 
10 seconds it had hit bottom, about 12 feet below in the concrete dungeon 
where Jack roamed.

  "Jack.  Hey, Jack..you down there!?" yelled Slash.  No answer.

  "He's probably still in the nets.  He'll never respond like that" 
spoke Nebulus.

  "Well there's only one way to find out" said Nemesis as he hang 
dropped from the desk edge into the dark pit.

  "Don...hunnn....you moron" Slash sighed under her breath.  'He 
never thinks about traps.'  "Watch out for traps."  Nemesis never heard 
her voice; his concentration on where he was and not what people were 
doing topside.  He pivoted left in the direction of the comp room.  The 
corridor to the room was normal sized with a low ceiling.  The walls were 
made of cold concrete that still flaked grit when rubbed against.  It was 
dark with a few streaks of light coming from the room, barely lighting 
enough for someone to see.  Nemesis changed his eyes to night vision to 
see that was up with Jack.

  'All right Jack, where the hell are you man.'  He peered into the 
comp room.  The two main comps on the far wall were humming as usual, 
the short ceiling making them look larger than normal.  He walked 
further into the room.  The four workstations were still running with 
their monitors running lines of info across them constantly.  'Jack.  
Where the hell are you.'  He lowered his rifle.  In fact he lowered it until 
the barrel almost scraped the ground.  He stood completely erect and 
walked over to the wall where the control panel was.  A single touch and 
a second panel came up.  He closed his eyes as he turned the ceiling light 
on.  His eyes were switched back to normal vision and he opened his 
eyelids.

  "Come on down, guys!" yelled Nemesis as he looked over at Jack 
who was still slouched in his padded chair, still jacked into the nets.

  "What's the deal!?" yelled back Slash.

  "He's here.  Still in the net."  The elevator platform began to move 
back up and in no time the rest of the team minus Donna was in the comp 
room.  "I guess he's still in the net."

  "What the hell's he still doin' in there?" replied Slash quite 
disgusted at Jack now that he was still here and had left them in Cryon.

  "He must've run into something." sighed Nebulus looking at his 
foot as it tapped lightly on the concrete floor.  'What could he have run 
into?  ICE?  Naw, couldn't be.  He's too good for that.  Then again...  Naw, 
he must be screwin' around or somethin'.  But why would he leave us in 
Cryon to go screw around somewhere?  I wonder if they got this thing up 
and running before we got there.  Or what if they had another site, or if 
we attacked the wrong site!  Couldn't be.  We planned this thing to 
perfectly to hit the wrong site.  Yeah, sure.' he thought to himself, 
especially after how badly they fucked the whole deal up.  'Well, there's 
only one way to find out.'  Looking up he said "I'm goin' in" and started to 
walk towards the workstation next to Jack's.

  "What!  You can't be serious.  Let's just pull the plug and get him 
back" screeched Slash.

  "Yeah, right.  And possibly loose him forever.  He might be into 
something serious, and there's only one way to find out." replied 
Nebulus, putting a wireless jack next to his ports.

  "I thought you could track someone like that for cryin' out loud!"

  "We'll see about that."  With that he sat in the chair and jacked in, 
wireless of course.

  "Well, let's get them prepared for a long trip.  I can't see them 
coming back any time soon" softly spoke Slash.  She and Nemesis turned 
to the one cabinet that had little components and things in it.  The door 
was opened and two IV's were taken out by Slash.  She walked over to the 
two and began to get Jack ready for insertion.  Nemesis in the mean time 
began preparing the two nutrient bags.  In no time, both Jack and 
Nebulus were outfitted with medical nutrient bags that fed into their 
system.  That way they at least wouldn't dehydrate.

    Nebulus stood up from a kneeling position on the 
  asphalt street of an unknown city.  It was dark, actually 
  gray in color and the clouds in the sky were moving very 
  fast.  The surrounding buildings stood like monuments 
  compared to Nebulus' small body.  A little piece of 
  newspaper skipped by along the ground behind his feet.  
  The long street he was looking down seemed to go on 
  forever.  The city was completely deserted.  
  
    "Strange" he told himself outloud.  "Oh, well, let's 
  get going."  He began walking in the direction of the first 
  gate to get into mainstream cyberspace.  A few steps and 
  he leaned forward to the ground and shape changed into a 
  sleek black sports car, one of the new European cars that 
  can top 300 mph.  Fat tires, no rear view mirrors; kinda 
  like an old Countach he thought to himself as he squealed 
  his tires and flew down the streets.  

    "Great.  Traffic jam already."  In the near distance 
  he could see lots of people trying to get into the gateway.  
  "Always a bunch of jerks who don't know there way 
  around the block yet."  With a glance skyward, he pulled 
  off the ground and moved a story or two above the rest of 
  the traffic.  Flying over the crown was fun.  The first 
  gateway was breached easily and he soon got back onto 
  the road and cruised into the highways, the internet 
  highways that connected to everywhere in the world, and 
  then some.

    After only a little time, his speed began to slow.  
  Actually he began to slow immensely, eventually coming 
  to a complete stop.  'What the hell is going on?' he thought 
  to himself, checking all of his systems.  Then he began to 
  shape change back into a person, except he hadn't chosen 
  to do so.  'Somebody's taking control of my environment.'  
  Then he began to fly backwards, completely out of 
  control.  He fought to stabilize and he tried to stop, but 
  eventually was thrown back into the crowd of people 
  waiting at the gateway entrance.  With an additional 
  thrust, he was tossed into the crowd, landing on the hard 
  asphalt just like everyone else had.

    "What the hell is going on!" he yelled at the top of 
  his lungs as he stood up, wiping himself off.  The area 
  around he began to change and soon he was standing on a 
  computer generated grid.  No streets.  No buildings.  Just 
  grids.  He continued to look around, finally running his 
  identifier program.  In a few seconds an arrow appeared 
  pointing in the direction off to his right, toward the 
  gateway.  He started to push his way in that direction, 
  searching for Jack.  The gateway soon became clearer to 
  him as it was a large billboard sign which read :


    The Cyberspace Mob now rules the nets 

        Pay to Enter.  Pay at your OWN Risk


    "What the hell is going on, here!" he yelled.

    "Oh shut up up there you asshole!" came from 
  someone behind him.  He turned around to see who the 
  hell was yelling at him in a crisis like this.

    "Fuck you buddy!" he yelled back, not knowing 
  who had yelled at him.  He continued to push his way 
  towards the front.  Eventually he got within a few 
  hundred feet of the gateway and recognized Jack only a 
  few steps in front of him.

    "Jack, what the hell is going on here man!?" asked 
  Nebulus as he reached his companion.

    "What the hell are you doing here?  I thought you 
  were still in Cryon."
  
    "I was.  We got back already.  What the hell 
  happened to you?"

    'Take a look.  One second I was in, the next I was 
  pulled out by these guys.  Do you believe this shit.  They've 
  taken over all the surrounding gateways and there's no 
  way in or out to another gateway."

    "What do you mean.  You can't even break it?"
  
    "No one can" explained Jack in a sorrowful tone of 
  voice.  "I've found a few friends here and they can't break 
  it.  Whoever made this isn't working for the government, 
  military or a company.  This is straight from the 
  underground.  All I can figure is that it's written in a new 
  AI language that actually learns who you are and how to 
  keep you from getting into the gateway if you haven't 
  paid."

    "You mean to tell me that someone is holding the 
  gateway hostage?"

    "Yep.  The funny part is that no one has any idea 
  who could've pulled a stunt like this off.  This is beyond 
  professional.  I can't even tell where it's coming from."  
  The two stood around almost as lost as everyone else.  It 
  was getting more crowded as time went on and eventually, 
  Nebulus had had enough.

    "Get a site set up so we can start attacking this 
  thing from the inside out."

    "Yeah right" replied Jack completely disgusted 
  now.  "Don't you think I've tried it already in about a 
  thousand configurations, only to get tossed back without 
  getting any further into the system.  I told you once you 
  moron, the more you do the more it understands about 
  you, which means that it can stop you easier every time 
  you try something new."

    "So how do we get the fuck through" blazed a 
  beyond frustrated Nebulus.

  "So what should we do now?" asked Nemesis, peering towards the 
elevator.  After standing there for ten minutes, his patience had run out 
and a bar run was the first thing that ran into his head.  "I know.  How 
about some Black Oil?"

  "That dump.  Naw, I'm not in the mood" casually replied Slash.  

  "How about Hot Kicks" she said with a sly grin growing on her face as 
she looked into Nemesis' eyes.

  "You gotta be kiddin' me.  We don't fit into a place like that."

  "That doesn't keep you from screwin' every chic with big tits, 
long legs, and stockings pulled up to her crotch that works there now 
does it?" she kidded pulling him towards the elevator.

  "Jealous?" he asked with a smirk.

  "I'm coming in my pants just thinking about you" she joked as 
they stood on the elevator platform.  She pressed her hand against the 
wall where a hidden panel was and the platform began to rise.  

  Topside, they walked out of the office to find Donna sitting in one 
of the office chairs in front of a desk off to the side of the warehouse.

  "Everything OK with Jack?"

  "Who knows.  Nebulus went into the matrix to fetch him" replied 
Slash.  "Hey.  We're gonna go to a bar.  Wanna come?"

  "Sure.  But first, where's my money?" she said getting back down 
to business.

  "Nebulus handles that and he is preoccupied right now."  Donna 
wasn't too pleased about this.  In fact she was getting quite pissed off as 
she stood up to face Slash.  "Chill woman.  It's not like we're gonna forget 
you.  Jeez."

  "Hey.  A job is a job.  Now it's done and I want my money!"

  "Look honey, you ain't gonna get paid until he gets out of the nets 
so why don't you just pack that bitchy attitude of yours away and chill 
out until he is free.  This job ain't done until we're all back and we got 
two in the nets!"  snarled Slash, frowning her brow.

  Nemesis looked on at the 'cat fight' as he called it between the 
two.  'Wait a minute.'  He looked at Donna's forehead.  'Zoom in.  More.  
There.  Now look at that.  Sweat.  And it's not even hot here, either.'  He 
moved his gaze down to her hands.  'Same thing, and even a little 
twitchy.'  He panned back up to her chest which was expanding and 
contracting a little faster and larger than he would've expected.  He 
switched his eyes to IR, trying to get a thermal scan of her body.  To no 
avail, the combat suit that she still wore blocked most of the signals 
coming from her body and canceled his experiment.

  "All right.  Chill out.  Why don't you take a shower and get 
changed and I will pull Nebulus out in time for him to pay you.  Then we 
can go to the bars.  OK?" stated Nemesis.

  "Where the hell am I gonna..."

  "There's a shower in the bathroom over there" he said pointing to 
a door along the office wall, "and your extra clothes that you brought are 
still in the van, right?"

  "Don't EVEN think about pullin' somethin' stupid, Nemesis" she 
warned with a glare.  Nemesis didn't move and didn't loose eye contact 
until she turned around to get her stuff out of the van.  Slash took his 
arm and turned him to fact her.

  "What the fuck do you think you're doing?" she scowled in a low 
voice.

  "Trust me."

    By now, Jack and Nebulus had jumped in and out of 
  cyberspace at least a dozen times, trying to trick the 
  gateway or get past it somehow.  Each time they would 
  bring in different attack programs and loose them just as 
  quickly as the 'Cyberspace Mob' would find them and 
  erase them, or make them unusable.  There were now 
  about five people in a group around Jack and Nemesis; all 
  of whom knew each other through one facet or another. 

    "So where do we go from here?" sighed one of the 
  guys.

    "We have to find another way around it.  
  Everything we've tried has failed.  Period.  And I can't see 
  any way around it" said Jack.

    "So the cybermaster Jack has finally met his 
  match.  How interesting" stated Nebulus, getting more 
  excited at the prospect of what seemed like the ultimate 
  challenge.

    "I wouldn't say that so soon.  It's just going to take 
  some time to figure out how to get around it" replied Jack, 
  letting the comment fly over his head.

    "So where are we?" asked one of Jack's friends.

    "Simple.  We can't get past without paying, which 
  is completely absurd.  We know it's not being done by the 
  government, military, a company, Mogul, Nestroth and a 
  few other groups.  But that leaves a lot of names that, 
  although I can't figure who could've masterminded this, 
  could be responsible for it" stated Jack.

    Someone else spoke up.  "Well, attack and defense 
  programs don't work.  It can tell who we are and seems to 
  know our strengths and weaknesses.  Camouflaging 
  doesn't help since it kills that first.  I don't think if we 
  sent ICE against it it would even work."

    "What!  Are you nuts.  How the hell would you SEND 
  ICE after it.  There's nowhere to keep it connected to to 
  run it" heckled another.

    "Yes there is and that's exactly what we're gonna 
  do" spoke Jack, standing up and pacing around in a very 
  small circle.  "We can attach it to the gateway itself.  It's 
  identifier must still exist or we couldn't have gotten here."

    "Yeah, but it'll already know how to kill ICE."

    "Yeah, but I know a way to make it so they can't 
  track it or disarm it" ecstatically spoke Jack.  "Everyone 
  jump out and meet me at my comp room in 1 hour."

  Donna came out of the bathroom wearing a short mini with tights 
underneath it, highlighting her legs with black spandex.  Her wet hair 
left trickles of water on her leather short jacket that covered a tank top.  

  'Switch to IR.  Focus and zoom on chest area.  Just as I thought.'  
"You definitely look sexy tonight, woman" yelled Nemesis from across 
the warehouse.  He hopped off the desk he was sitting on and approached 
her.

  "So where's Nebulus with my money, macho man?" she said with 
a smirk in her smile.

  "This way, my lady" he said, raising his left hand, palm up, to take 
hers as a rightful gentleman should.  She placed her right hand in his 
with a flirtatious smile.  He slowly started to turn around and Donna 
began to take a step forward to accompany him.  

  Quickly, Nemesis spun back in her direction, landing a bone-
breaking fist in her stomach.  Instantaneously, she fell to the ground as 
if life had been sucked out of her.  She laid on the ground in a fetal 
position, holding her stomach, completely unable to breath from the 
attack.  Nemesis looking over to Slash who was sitting at a desk, giving 
her the signal.  She rose from her chair carrying a needle.  Nemesis 
reached down and gripped Donna's jacket firmly by the shoulders and 
ripped it down her arms so that they were bare from her shoulder to her 
elbow.  She winced in pain, still unable to breath.  Nemesis reached his 
hand up and received the needle from Slash.

  "Nighty night, my little spy" cooed Nemesis with a devil's grin, as 
he injected her with the tranquilizer.

  "Nighty night, bitch" spit Slash.




      Cool Darkness
        by Matthew Carpenter



      Chapter 6 : A Slap in the Face



  "Whew.  Man oh man.  This one's gonna hurt" said a sweaty 
Jack as he faced his sidearm, Nebulus.  He stood up and staggered 
over to the bathroom stall that was on the other side of the 
elevator to relieve himself.  Nebulus just sat there rubbing his 
eyes.  After a few seconds he stood and walked over to the elevator 
platform and momentarily waited for the chair to come down.

  "Where the hell you goin'?" yelled Jack from the stall.

  "I'm gonna check on the others and tell them what's up.  
We're gonna need some info from the streets and fast ...." he 
trailed off in his own thought as the chair arrived.  He sat down 
and got to the office floor in no time, listening to Jack rant and 
rave about what he had just said.  Nebulus' brow was furrowed, 
now, and time had taken it's toll on him.  He walked out of the 
office to notice the van was missing.  "Goddamn, stupid son's of 
bitches!" he yelled, spinning around to look at the whole 
warehouse.  "Those dumn fuck's!  If it's the last thing I told them 
it's to stay put!  Jesus!" he fumed slamming a fist into the desk he 
began to sit at.  A thousand swear words ran through his mind 
and his head began to throb.  Closing his eyes, he sat back in the 
hard wood chair thinking about the job, running his fingers 
through his hair.  'Of course, we first had to fuck the job up.  
Then we actually had to run into this damn mob.  Who the hell 
would dare to be a mob on the nets.  Who would have the 
capabilities.  Hmmmmm.  "The government" his eyes flashed 
open.  "Nah.  Couldn't be" he said to himself with a quirky smile 
that almost gleamed with getting the answer, and then laughed at 
it's stupidity.  "But it would be the perfect front to run us 
down....legally.  Well, kind of.  Shit."

  He opened the top desk drawer and took out a few plastic 
bottles of pills.  He popped a few in his mouth and downed them 
with a flat can of Coke that had probably been there more than a 
day.  

  "What's the matter with you!" yelled Jack from the office's 
entrance.  "How many times have I told you not to get drugged 
before you jack in.  Especially now.  What the hell do you ..."

  "Oh shut up and take this!" said Nebulus throwing a bottle 
to Jack.  He caught it with a rattle and looked up very disgusted 
almost in disbelief at what Nebulus was implying.  "Relax, it's 
caffeine.  It'll wake you up."

  "I'm not tired" replied Jack walking towards Nebulus.  He 
screwed the cap off the bottle and put a pill in his mouth.  He 
reached the table, putting the closed bottle down and picking up 
the can of Coke.

  "That's been there awhile, you know" muttered Nebulus.

  "I know.  I opened it last week" he said with a smirk.

*************

  Slash had been driving the van through the back streets of 
the city for about ten minutes until she came to the designated 
spot Nemesis had told her to go to.  The tall buildings surrounding 
them sent shadows out to swallow up the surrounding sidewalks, 
almost requiring a street lights to light up the broken and 
graffittied walls that surrounded them.  

  "So where the hell do we go from here?" she asked, leaning 
over her shoulder to get a glimpse of Nemesis' back.  He was 
leaning over Donna who was still out cold.  Her arms were tied 
together with unbreakable plastic ties that were laced from her 
wrists up to her elbows.  Her hands had turned pale from lack of 
blood in her hands.  Her legs were tied in a similar manner, one 
that Nemesis found a certain liking to.

  "There should be a garage door around here somewhere 
that has the word 'Ixzer' graffettied on it in red" replied Nemesis 
who had turned to look out the front windshield.  "Just go slow 
and we should  be able to see it better."

  "I can't see a goddamn thing with Ixzer on it" whined 
Slash, getting quite frustrated with the whole secretive situation.  
'First you don't tell me where we're going, then what we're doing.  
You dumb shit!  I don't see why I ever listen to you.'  She slowly 
eased her foot on the accelerator and let the van drift down the 
alleyway, nearly scraping the sides of it on one of the buildings.

  "Stop here.  Turn the engine off" spoke Nemesis in a 
hushed voice as he popped the sliding door open and slowly 
began to push it out of his way.

  "What's the silence for man?  I don't see any Ixzer."

  Without a reply, he jumped out of the van, landing his 
combat boots on the broken asphalt and turned around to scoop 
up the still unconscious Donna.  Throwing her over his shoulder, 
he walked in front of the van and stood in front of the garage 
door.  Slash got out and stood behind him still unsure of what was 
about to happen.  'Switch to UV.'  Ixzer appeared on the door, just 
as he had said.  He slowly moved to the wall on the left side of the 
door and allowed Donna to slide from his shoulder, landing 
soundly on the concrete with a thud.

  "Well I see we're in a good mood today" smirked Slash 
getting a kick out of Nemesis' behavior.  'He's finally back to his 
old self' she smiled to herself, looking down at Donna.  'Bitch.'  
Her smile was broken as the wall Nemesis was touching broke 
open and a small camera appeared in front of his face.  She took a 
step back, getting into a combat stance.  Her claws extended 
instantly.  He never moved.

  "Enter password" stated a speaker originating from near 
the camera.

  "Zephia 12 Luther Mia" replied Nemesis.  The camera 
disappeared as the wall rebuilt itself, hiding the broken area.  A 
couple of loud noises came from within the garage and the door 
slowly began to open.  Nemesis bent over and scooped up Donna's 
body and began walking into the garage.  Slash followed a little 
hesitantly behind her companion, still with her claws out and 
ready.  She really hated being uninformed.

  "Stop right there!" came a deep, husky male voice from 
within the darkness of the garage.  The two of them had barely 
gotten ten feet within the building.  

  "Who's there!" yelled Slash from behind her companion.

  "Nemesis.  How's it goin' mon?"

  "Not too bad Doc.  Got a little present for you."

  "Another hooker.  Don't you know I gave them up for 
lent?"

  "No hookers this time.  A tinker toy to take apart."

  By now, Slash was completely confused.  'What the hell is 
going on?  How is this guy and where the hell is he?' she thought 
trying to look into the darkness.

  "Do we get to have some fun this time?"

  "You got it."

  "Bring her in."  The lights flashed on, slightly blinding 
Slash for a second.  The garage door immediately slammed down 
into the concrete that startled the always calm Slash.

  "Will someone please tell me what the fuck is going on!" 
yelled Slash at the top of her lungs.  Nemesis turned around 
slowly eyeing her weirdly.

  "Slash, meet Doc.  He's a techie friend of mine.  He likes to 
take things apart and see how they work."  He turned towards Doc 
and began walking in his general direction.  "Doc, this is my 
friend Slash.  She's with Nestroth" he said pointing a thumb in 
her direction.  

  "Hey ya sexy" he said looking her over.  She looked him 
over back.  He stood almost as tall as Nemesis, but had black hair 
down to the middle of his back that flowed as he turned around to 
lead Nemesis to the door behind him.  He walked with a limp to the 
left side and had a cybernetic left arm as well.  'He must've gotten 
into something' thought Slash to herself as she began to follow 
the two men towards the door, her claws finally retracting.  It 
was unlocked with a pass card and led to a set of stairs leading 
downward.  Doc led them down.  Nemesis bumped Donna's head on 
the door frame.  Slash just had to let out a small laugh at that.

  They arrived at a another door that lead into a cybernetics 
lab, or something that looked like one.  Donna was placed on the 
medical table in the middle of the room.  There were tools of all 
sorts lining the walls and hanging from the ceiling.  Off to the 
left side were large tools for more heavy equipment, including 
what looked like a modified military gatlin gun.

  "I take it you like weaponry, sweetie?" smirked Doc seeing 
Slash look the gun over.  She looked at him with an anticipated 
smile that said yes.  "Hmm.  Maybe I'll let you take her for a ride 
tonight."  He turned towards Nemesis who was cutting Donna's 
bonds with one of Doc's molecularly sharp blades.

  "So what the hell's with this chic anyways?" asked Doc.

  "She worked with us on our last project, but she's got 
something in her chest that I think is a bug.  It's the only thing 
that explains why we ran into shit."

  "How do you know?"

  "Look at her under IR.  You'll see something really black 
there."

  "So you want to cut her open and see what we can see?"

  "Let's see if she will talk first."  The two men took her arms 
and legs, cuffing them to the four corners of the table securely.  
Doc took out an antidote for the sleeping chemical Nemesis used 
on her, and injected her with it.  In a few moments she came to 
trying to wipe her eyes with no luck from the restraints.  She 
looked up to see Nemesis looking right into her face.  Doc was 
busy putting on a surgeon's hat, mask and gloves.  'Interesting 
difference from the mechanics suit there Doc' Slash told herself 
as she too walked towards Donna.

  "Who are you working for Donna?" asked Nemesis in a 
very calm voice.

  "What the hell are you doing?  Untie me at once, you 
moron!" she screamed back testing her restraints.

  "I don't think so sweetie.  I think you set us up, which is 
why you've got a bug in your chest.  So why don't you just tell us 
what is going on" he said politely.

  "I'm not working for anyone.  And I don't have anything 
in my chest you, idiot!  Now let me go!" she screamed.  Doc walked 
around and attached two electrodes to her head and turned on a 
scanner that monitored certain parts of the brain for 
brainwaves.  "What the hell is that?  Who is he?"

  "Donna, I'm only going to ask you one more time, before I 
cut your chest open and find out what the hell you have in there.  
Now, tell me, who are you working for" he said in a very deep 
voice that began to frighten Donna even more.  His frowned brow 
made her look at him with wide eyes, fearing that he was serious.  
She thought for a moment, and then just made her eyelids very 
narrow and matched his frown with hers.

  "Fuck off bastard" she replied in a low tone.  Nemesis bent 
down until his face was less than a centimeter away from hers 
without changing his expression.

  "Have it your way, my dear."  He moved his lips down to 
hers and gave her a small kiss on the lips.  She didn't kiss him 
back.  He withdrew his face from hers, standing straight up, and 
removed the electrodes from her head.  "We won't be needing 
these" he said tossing them to Doc.  He looked back down at Donna 
and saw the fear in her eyes, yet also saw her determination as 
well.  He moved his right hand up to his left shoulder and quickly 
sent it flying across Donna's face, slapping her cheek so that the 
side of her face bounced off the table.  Blood began to trickle 
from the corner of her mouth as she turned to glare back at 
Nemesis whose facial expression still had not changed.

  "You asshole.  I'm gonna kill you, you son of a bitch!" she 
screamed.  Starting to violently pull on her restraints, she yelled 
and screamed until Doc had had enough.

  "Time to put her to sleep, I think."

  "Not this time.  I want her to feel this" snarled Nemesis.  
Donna barely caught what he said and gasped a little in 
anticipation.  Nemesis nodded to Slash who was getting a kick out 
of the torture being induced by Nemesis.  'It's good to have him 
back' she thought to herself.  She walked to Donna's right side 
and smiled at her.  Donna only caught a glimpse of her out of her 
peripheral vision.  Stroking her stomach, Slash began feeling 
Donna's lower ribs and stomach.  Then raised her strong arm and 
let the side of her fist slam into Donna's stomach, just below her 
sternum.  Donna sucked in her breath and pulled at her cuffs as 
her face turned red from her breath being knocked of out her.  
She finally relaxed a little and began taking short breaths.

  Nemesis stood above her head still and pulled her jacket 
away as much as possible from her chest.  He then reached into 
her top and in one swift pull, ripped the top of it and her bra 
open.  She struggled underneath him to no evail as his hands 
went further down to grab the divided material at the edge of the 
tear.  In another pull, her top was in two and he pulled the parts 
to the sides to reveal her bare chest and white breasts.  Her 
nipples were slightly hard from her treatment, something that 
Slash took note of.  She slowly caressed both of Donna's breasts, 
allowing her touch to become rougher as her claws extended a 
few inches from her fingertips.  Her slight smile of playfulness 
changed to a devilish grin as she moved her fingers to the 
underside of Donna's breasts and pushed her claws into the skin 
below them.  Not wanting to be outdone by what was sure to be 
effective torture by Nemesis, Slash began to drag her claws down 
towards Donna's navel.

  "Now who are you working for Donna?" asked Slash now 
enjoying the fun as well.

  "Nobody!  I swear I'm not working for anybody!" she 
screamed.  Tears were now running from her eyes as she tossed 
her head from side to side.  Slash only pushed in harder until 
blood coated much of her lower stomach.

  'I've had enough of this shit' thought Nemesis as he 
reached over for the molecularly sharp blade he had cut her 
bonds with.  He placed the edge of it next to the tendon in her 
right peck.  Slash reluctantly pulled her claws out of Donna as 
she saw what Nemesis was about to do.  "Donna, why did you set us 
up.  Tell me or you will regret it" he spoke in a stern voice after 
waiting impatiently for an answer.

  "Go to hell!" she yelled.  The pain and realization of the 
situation, finally breaking her.

  "Fine.  Slash put a gag in her mouth.  I don't want any of 
her childish screams to hurt my ears"  he said.  Slash complied by 
stuffing a dirty rag in her mouth and stepped back as Nemesis 
began slowly cutting the tendon in her peck.  Her screams were 
muffled by the rag, but her tears and struggling movements only 
made the pain worse.  The tendon finally broken and Donna let 
out a ear-piercing shriek as the tears rolled down her face freely.

  "That's enough, Nemesis" said Doc as he came over to 
Nemesis who was getting ready to start on the other shoulder.  He 
placed the end of a silver device that looked like a gun to Donna's 
throat and pulled the trigger.  She jerked and then collapsed to 
the table, unconscious.  

  "Making her squirm is not going to get the info you want 
man."

  "You know how much I hate people who stab me in the 
back."

  "Let's just get what you came for and forget about it, all 
right?" spoke Doc in a soft tone of voice, a little shocked by the 
whole situation.

  "You're the doc.  Let's see what's in her chest."  He removed 
the blade from her shoulder and stepped back as Doc began to 
stop the bleeding in Donna's stomach with a laserstitch.  After 
removing the gag in her mouth, he began working on stopping 
the extensive bleeding from her shoulder.  To Nemesis' wishes, he 
finally cut into her chest with a scalpel.  Doc brought over a few 
instruments to determine just where and what the black box in 
her chest really was, then began to go after the prize.

  "Jesus Christ!  This thing is really in her.  Someone really 
did a good job on her when they put it in."  Doc continued to try 
and get a better look at the black thin box that was lodged under 
Donna's sternum, near her collar bone.  "How the hell could she 
breath for cryin' out load?"  The frown on Doc's face spelled a 
tough job, and probably one done by a pro.  He continued to open 
her up enough to get at the box and finally cut the thin metal 
rings that were securing it to her sternum.  A soft digital pulse 
emanated from Donna's direction, and then a hushed pop silenced 
all sound in the room.  Her head and body jerked slightly and 
then went limp again.  Her heart drastically slowed until coming 
to a complete stop within seconds of the diminished sound.

  "Damn" softly stated Doc, keeping his hands still.

  "What?" questioned Slash and Nemesis almost in unison.

  "Shoulda known.  Oh well.  Let's see what we can see."  He 
slowly pulled the box out from under Donna's sternum, not 
bothering to put her back together more than letting the torn 
skin slide back into place.  Taking the box over to the sink, he 
removed most of the blood from the box with a damp towel and put 
it under a lamp to get a better look at it.  'Edging at the sides, not 
too tough.  No markings, no noticeable points, oh hey, there's the 
trigger mechanism' he thought looking at a very small silver 
line down the inside of the clips.  Nemesis and Slash becoming 
bored with the subject at hand, retired to opposite sides of the 
room to lean on the walls, waiting for something to come out of 
the box that would give them a clue to Donna's true loyalties.

  Doc picked the box up and moved it over to the work table 
and placed it on a ceramic flat plate that was situated under one of 
his analyzers.  Within a few minutes he had run IR, UV, X-ray and 
a few other tests just to see what was in the middle of the black 
box.  He then took a small tool and began wedging the corner of it 
open until the lid popped up.  Slowly, he lifted it off and revealed 
the small transmitter board that the X-ray scan had shown.

  "So what do we got?" gruffly asked Nemesis, still 
pessimistically leaning on the wall.

  "Transmitter box.  It essentially controlled the bomb.  
However, it could have been triggered by someone else with some 
form of an electronic signal."

  "So she had a fail safe in her, huh?"  he said moving closer 
to Donna again.  He brushed her cheek with his index finger and 
moved his face close to hers.  "You got outta this easy wench" he 
whispered to her.  Standing up, he moved over to take the box in 
his hand.  "So can you figure out who made it or who could 
detonate it?" he asked looking at Doc.

  "Maybe.  It'll take some time."

  "Contact me in the usual way in one day" replied Nemesis 
as he handed the box back to Doc and motioned Slash to following 
him out the door.  

  "What about your woman?"

  "Oh yeah."  Nemesis grabbed a nearby trash bag and 
worked it over Donna's head and torso after removing her bonds.  
He scooped her up so that she was crunched upside down into the 
bag and then proceeded to head up the stairs.

  As Doc verified the garage door closing from his wall 
monitor he dialed into his telecom and waited while the security 
codes played their game before opening a screen.

  "What is it?" came Nebulus' tired voice.

  "We've got a few problems."

******************

  "So what the hell are you going to do with her?" 
reprimanded Slash as she drove into the next alleyway.

  "Pull up next to that dumpster over there?"  The van 
stopped and Nemesis pulled Donna's body out of the van, throwing 
it into the dumpster without a care.  He returned to the van to 
fetch a can of gasoline and proceeded to pour some of the can's 
contents onto Donna's body.  He returned to the van and picked 
up an old oil rag.  Lighting it, the van began to move away as he 
threw it into the dumpster and slid the van's side door shut.
[corrections to typos made 6/22/94 by PDCChristy@aol.com]
Original etext came from the Online Book Initiative (OBI)
via the Internet Wiretap


[obi/Joseph.Conrad/heart.of.darkness.txt]

Joseph Conrad: The Heart of Darkness


                        I
  The Nellie, a cruising yawl, swung to her anchor
without a flutter of the sails, and was at rest. The flood
had made, the wind was nearly calm, and being bound
down the river, the only thing for it was to come to
and wait for the turn of the tide.
  The sea-reach of the Thames stretched before us
like the beginning of an interminable waterway. In
the offing the sea and the sky were welded together
without a joint, and in the luminous space the tanned
sails of the barges drifting up with the tide seemed to
stand still in red clusters of canvas sharply peaked,
with gleams of varnished spirits. A haze rested on the
low shores that ran out to sea in vanishing flatness.
The air was dark above Gravesend, and farther back
still seemed condensed into a mournful gloom, brood-
ing motionless over the biggest, and the greatest, town
on earth.
  The Director of Companies was our captain and our
host. We four affectionately watched his back as he
stood in the bows looking to seaward. On the whole
river there was nothing that looked half so nautical.
He resembled a pilot, which to a seaman is trust-
worthiness personified. It was difficult to realize his
work was not out there in the luminous estuary, but
behind him, within the brooding gloom.
  Between us there was, as I have already said some-
where, the bond of the sea. Besides holding our hearts
together through long periods of separation, it had
the effect of making us tolerant of each other's yarns
-- and even convictions. The Lawyer -- the best of old
fellows -- had, because of his many years and many
virtues, the only cushion on deck, and was lying on the
only rug. The Accountant had brought out already a
box of dominoes, and was toying architecturally with
the bones. Marlow sat cross-legged right aft, leaning
against the mizzenmast. He had sunken cheeks, a
yellow complexion, a straight back, an ascetic aspect,
and, with his arms dropped, the palms of hands out-
wards, resembled an idol. The Director, satisfied the
anchor had good hold, made his way aft and sat down
amongst us. We exchanged a few words lazily. After-
wards there was silence on board the yacht. For some
reason or other we did not begin that game of domi-
noes. We felt meditative, and fit for nothing but
placid staring. The day was ending in a serenity of
still and exquisite brilliance. The water shone pacifi-
cally; the sky, without a speck, was a benign immen-
sity of unstained light; the very mist on the Essex
marsh was like a gauzy and radiant fabric, hung from
the wooded rises inland, and draping the low shores
in diaphanous folds. Only the gloom to the west,
brooding over the upper reaches, became more sombre
every minute, as if angered by the approach of the sun.
  And at last, in its curved and imperceptible fall, the
sun sank low, and from glowing white changed to a
dull red without rays and without heat, as if about to
go out suddenly, stricken to death by the touch of
that gloom brooding over a crowd of men.
  Forthwith a change came over the waters, and the
serenity became less brilliant but more profound. The
old river in its broad reach rested unruffled at the
decline of day, after ages of good service done to the
race that peopled its banks, spread out in the tranquil
dignity of a waterway leading to the uttermost ends
of the earth. We looked at the venerable stream not
in the vivid flush of a short day that comes and departs
for ever, but in the august light of abiding memories.
And indeed nothing is easier for a man who has, as
the phrase goes, "followed the sea" with reverence
and affection, than to evoke the great spirit of the past
upon the lower reaches of the Thames. The tidal cur-
rent runs to and fro in its unceasing service, crowded
with memories of men and ships it had borne to the
rest of home or to the battles of the sea. It had known
and served all the men of whom the nation is proud,
from Sir Francis Drake to Sir John Franklin, knights
all, titled and untitled -- the great knights-errant of
the sea. It had borne all the ships whose names are
like jewels flashing in the night of time, from the
Golden Hind returning with her round flanks full of
treasure, to be visited by the Queen's Highness and
thus pass out of the gigantic tale, to the Erebus and
Terror, bound on other conquests -- and that never
returned. It had known the ships and the men. They
had sailed from Deptford, from Greenwich, from
Erith -- the adventurers and the settlers; kings' ships
and the ships of men on 'Change; captains, admirals,
the dark "interlopers" of the Eastern trade, and the
commissioned "generals" of East India fleets. Hunters
for gold or pursuers of fame, they all had gone out
on that stream, bearing the sword, and often the torch,
messengers of the might within the land, bearers of a
spark from the sacred fire. What greatness had not
floated on the ebb of that river into the mystery of
an unknown earth! . . . The dreams of men, the
seed of commonwealths, the germs of empires.
  The sun set; the dusk fell on the stream, and lights
began to appear along the shore. The Chapman light-
house, a three-legged thing erect on a mud-flat, shone
strongly. Lights of ships moved in the fairway -- a
great stir of lights going up and going down. And
farther west on the upper reaches the place of the
monstrous town was still marked ominously on the
sky, a brooding gloom in sunshine, a lurid glare under
the stars.
  "And this also," said Marlow suddenly, "has been
one of the dark places of the earth."
  He was the only man of us who still "followed the
sea." The worst that could be said of him was that he
did not represent his class. He was a seaman, but he
was a wanderer, too, while most seamen lead, if one
may so express it, a sedentary life. Their minds are
of the stay-at-home order, and their home is always
with them -- the ship; and so is their country -- the sea.
One ship is very much like another, and the sea is
always the same. In the immutability of their sur-
roundings the foreign shores, the foreign faces, the
changing immensity of life, glide past, veiled not by
a sense of mystery but by a slightly disdainful igno-
rance; for there is nothing mysterious to a seaman
unless it be the sea itself, which is the mistress of his
existence and as inscrutable as Destiny. For the rest,
after his hours of work, a casual stroll or a casual spree
on shore suffices to unfold for him the secret of a
whole continent, and generally he finds the secret not
worth knowing. The yarns of seamen have a direct
simplicity, the whole meaning of which lies within the
shell of a cracked nut. But Marlow was not typical
(if his propensity to spin yarns be excepted), and to
him the meaning of an episode was not inside like a
kernel but outside, enveloping the tale which brought
it out only as a glow brings out a haze, in the likeness
of one of these misty halos that sometimes are made
visible by the spectral illumination of moonshine.
  His remark did not seem at all surprising. It was
just like Marlow. It was accepted in silence. No one
took the trouble to grunt even; and presently he said,
very slow --
  "I was thinking of very old times, when the
Romans first came here, nineteen hundred years ago --
the other day.... Light came out of this river
since -- you say Knights? Yes; but it is like a running
blaze on a plain, like a flash of lightning in the clouds.
We live in the flicker -- may it last as long as the old
earth keeps rolling! But darkness was here yesterday.
Imagine the feelings of a commander of a fine -- what
d'ye call 'em? -- trireme in the Mediterranean, or-
dered suddenly to the north run overland across the
Gauls in a hurry; put in charge of one of these craft
the legionaries -- a wonderful lot of handy men they
must have been, too -- used to build, apparently by the
hundred, in a month or two, if we may believe what
we read. Imagine him here -- the very end of the
world, a sea the colour of lead, a sky the colour of
smoke, a kind of ship about as rigid as a concertina --
and going up this river with stores, or orders, or what
you like. Sand-banks, marshes, forests, savages, --
precious little to eat fit for a civilized man, nothing but
Thames water to drink. No Falernian wine here, no
going ashore. Here and there a military camp lost in
a wilderness, like a needle in a bundle of hay -- cold,
fog, tempests, disease, exile, and death -- death skulk-
ing in the air, in the water, in the bush. They must
have been dying like flies here. Oh, yes -- he did it.
Did it very well, too, no doubt, and without thinking
much about it either, except afterwards to brag of
what he had gone through in his time, perhaps. They
were men enough to face the darkness. And perhaps
he was cheered by keeping his eye on a chance of pro-
motion to the fleet at Ravenna by and by, if he had
good friends in Rome and survived the awful climate.
Or think of a decent young citizen in a toga -- perhaps
too much dice, you know -- coming out here in the
train of some prefect, or tax-gatherer, or trader even,
to mend his fortunes. Land in a swamp, march
through the woods, and in some inland post feel the
savagery, the utter savagery, had closed round him --
all that mysterious life of the wilderness that stirs in
the forest, in the jungles, in the hearts of wild men.
There's no initiation either into such mysteries. He
has to live in the midst of the incomprehensible,
which is also detestable. And it has a fascination, too,
that goes to work upon him. The fascination of the
abomination -- you know, imagine the growing regrets,
the longing to escape, the powerless disgust, the sur-
render, the hate."
  He paused.
  "Mind," he began again, lifting one arm from the
elbow, the palm of the hand outwards, so that, with
his legs folded before him, he had the pose of a
Buddha preaching in European clothes and without a
lotus-flower -- "Mind, none of us would feel exactly
like this. What saves us is efficiency -- the devotion to
efficiency. But these chaps were not much account,
really. They were no colonists; their administration
was merely a squeeze, and nothing more, I suspect.
They were conquerors, and for that you want only
brute force -- nothing to boast of, when you have it,
since your strength is just an accident arising from the
weakness of others. They grabbed what they could get
for the sake of what was to be got. It was just robbery
with violence, aggravated murder on a great scale,
and men going at it blind -- as is very proper for those
who tackle a darkness. The conquest of the earth,
which mostly means the taking it away from those
who have a different complexion or slightly flatter
noses than ourselves, is not a pretty thing when you
look into it too much. What redeems it is the idea
only. An idea at the back of it; not a sentimental pre-
tence but an idea; and an unselfish belief in the idea --
something you can set up, and bow down before, and
offer a sacrifice to..."
  He broke off. Flames glided in the river, small
green flames, red flames, white flames, pursuing, over-
taking, joining, crossing each other -- then separating
slowly or hastily. The traffic of the great city went on
in the deepening night upon the sleepless river. We
looked on, waiting patiently -- there was nothing else
to do till the end of the flood; but it was only after a
long silence, when he said, in a hesitating voice, "I
suppose you fellows remember I did once turn fresh
water sailor for a bit," that we knew we were fated,
before the ebb began to run, to hear about one of
Marlow's inconclusive experiences.
  "I don't want to bother you much with what hap-
pened to me personally," he began, showing in this
remark the weakness of many tellers of tales who
seem so often unaware of what their audience would
best like to hear; "yet to understand the effect of it on
me you ought to know how I got out there, what I
saw, how I went up that river to the place where I
first met the poor chap. It was the farthest point of
navigation and the culminating point of my experi-
ence. It seemed somehow to throw a kind of light on
everything about me -- and into my thoughts. It was
sombre enough, too -- and pitiful -- not extraordinary
in any way -- not very clear either. No, not very clear.
And yet it seemed to throw a kind of light.
  "I had then, as you remember, just returned to
London after a lot of Indian Ocean, Pacific, China
Seas a regular dose of the East -- six years or so, and
I was loafing about, hindering you fellows in your
work and invading your homes, just as though I had
got a heavenly mission to civilize you. It was very fine
for a time, but after a bit I did get tired of resting.
Then I began to look for a ship -- I should think the
hardest work on earth. But the ships wouldn't even
look at me. And I got tired of that game, too.
  "Now when I was a little chap I had a passion for
maps. I would look for hours at South America, or
Africa, or Australia, and lose myself in all the glories
of exploration. At that time there were many blank
spaces on the earth, and when I saw one that looked
particularly inviting on a map (but they all look that)
I would put my finger on it and say, 'When I grow
up I will go there.' The North Pole was one of these
places, I remember. Well, I haven't been there yet,
and shall not try now. The glamour's off. Other places
were scattered about the Equator, and in every sort of
latitude all over the two hemispheres. I have been in
some of them, and . . . well, we won't talk about
that. But there was one yet -- the biggest, the most
blank, so to speak -- that I had a hankering after.
  "True, by this time it was not a blank space any
more. It had got filled since my boyhood with rivers
and lakes and names. It had ceased to be a blank space
of delightful mystery -- a white patch for a boy to
dream gloriously over. It had become a place of dark-
ness. But there was in it one river especially, a mighty
big river, that you could see on the map, resembling
an immense snake uncoiled, with its head in the sea, its
body at rest curving afar over a vast country, and its
tail lost in the depths of the land. And as I looked at
the map of it in a shop-window, it fascinated me as a
snake would a bird -- a silly little bird. Then I remem-
bered there was a big concern, a Company for trade
on that river. Dash it all! I thought to myself, they
can't trade without using some kind of craft on that lot
of fresh water -- steamboats! Why shouldn't I try to
get charge of one? I went on along Fleet Street, but
could not shake off the idea. The snake had charmed
me.
  "You understand it was a Continental concern, that
Trading society; but I have a lot of relations living on
the Continent, because it's cheap and not so nasty as it
looks, they say.
  "I am sorry to own I began to worry them. This
was already a fresh departure for me. I was not used
to get things that way, you know. I always went my
own road and on my own legs where I had a mind to
go. I wouldn't have believed it of myself; but, then --
you see -- I felt somehow I must get there by hook or
by crook. So I worried them. The men said 'My dear
fellow,' and did nothing. Then -- would you believe
it? -- I tried the women. I, Charlie Marlow, set the
women to work -- to get a job. Heavens! We]l, you
see, the notion drove me. I had an aunt, a dear enthu-
siastic soul. She wrote: 'It will be delightful. I am
ready to do anything, anything for you. It is a glorious
idea. I know the wife of a very high personage in the
Administration, and also a man who has lots of influ-
ence with,' etc., etc. She was determined to make no
end of fuss to get me appointed skipper of a river
steamboat, if such was my fancy.
  "I got my appointment -- of course; and I got it
very quick. It appears the Company had received news
that one of their captains had been killed in a scuffle
with the natives. This was my chance, and it made me
the more anxious to go. It was only months and
months afterwards, when I made the attempt to re-
cover what was left of the body, that I heard the
original quarrel arose from a misunderstanding about
some hens. Yes, two black hens. Fresleven -- that was
the fellow's name, a Dane -- thought himself wronged
somehow in the bargain, so he went ashore and started
to hammer the chief of the village with a stick. Oh,
it didn't surprise me in the least to hear this, and at the
same time to be told that Fresleven was the gentlest,
quietest creature that ever walked on two legs. No
doubt he was; but he had been a couple of years al-
ready out there engaged in the noble cause, you know,
and he probably felt the need at last of asserting his
self-respect in some way. Therefore he whacked the
old nigger mercilessly, while a big crowd of his people
watched him, thunderstruck, till some man -- I was
told the chief's son -- in desperation at hearing the old
chap yell, made a tentative jab with a spear at the
white man -- and of course it went quite easy between
the shoulder-blades. Then the whole population
cleared into the forest, expecting all kinds of calamities
to happen, while, on the other hand, the steamer Fres-
leven commanded left also in a bad panic, in charge of
the engineer, I believe. Afterwards nobody seemed to
trouble much about Fresleven's remains, till I got out
and stepped into his shoes. I couldn't let it rest,
though; but when an opportunity offered at last to
meet my predecessor, the grass growing through his
ribs was tall enough to hide his bones. They were all
there. The supernatural being had not been touched
after he fell. And the village was deserted, the huts
gaped black, rotting, all askew within the fallen en-
dosures. A calamity had come to it, sure enough. The
people had vanished. Mad terror had scattered them,
men, women, and children, through the bush, and
they had never returned. What became of the hens I
don't know either. I should think the cause of progress
got them, anyhow. However, through this glorious
affair I got my appointment, before I had fairly begun
to hope for it.
  "I flew around like mad to get ready, and before
forty-eight hours I was crossing the Channel to snow
myself to my employers, and sign the contract. In a
very few hours I arrived in a city that always makes
me think of a whited sepulchre. Prejudice no doubt. I
had no difficulty in finding the Company's offices. It
was the biggest thing in the town, and everybody I
met was full of it. They were going to run an over sea
empire, and make no end of coin by trade.
  "A narrow and deserted street in deep shadow, high
houses, innumerable windows with venetian blinds, a
dead silence, grass sprouting between the stones, im-
posing carriage archways right and left, immense
double doors standing ponderously ajar. I slipped
through one of these cracks, went up a swept and un-
garnished staircase, as arid as a desert, and opened the
first door I came to. Two women, one fat and the
other slim, sat on straw-bottomed chairs, knitting black
wool. The slim one got up and walked straight at me
-- still knitting with downcast eyes -- and only just as
I began to think of getting out of her way, as you
would for a somnambulist, stood still, and looked up.
Her dress was as plain as an umbrella-cover, and she
turned round without a word and preceded me into a
waiting-room. I gave my name, and looked about.
Deal table in the middle, plain chairs all round the
walls, on one end a large shining map, marked with
all the colours of a rainbow. There was a vast amount
of red -- good to see at any time, because one knows
that some real work is done in there, a deuce of a lot
of blue, a little green, smears of orange, and, on
the East Coast, a purple patch, to show where the
jolly pioneers of progress drink the jolly lager-beer.
However, I wasn't going into any of these. I was
going into the yellow. Dead in the centre. And the
river was there -- fascinating -- deadly -- like a snake.
Ough! A door opened, a white-haired secretarial head,
but wearing a compassionate expression, appeared, and
a skinny forefinger beckoned me into the sanctuary. Its
light was dim, and a heavy writing-desk squatted in
the middle. From behind that structure came out an
impression of pale plumpness in a frock-coat. The
great man himself. He was five feet six, I should
judge, and had his grip on the handle-end of ever so
many millions. He shook hands, I fancy, murmured
vaguely, Was satisfied with my French. Bon voyage.
  "In about forty-five seconds I found myself again in
the waiting-room with the compassionate secretary,
who, full of desolation and sympathy, made me sign
some document. I believe I undertook amongst other
things not to disclose any trade secrets. Well, I am
not going to.
  "I began to feel slightly uneasy. You know I am
not used to such ceremonies, and there was something
ominous in the atmosphere. It was just as though I
had been let into some conspiracy -- I don't know --
something not quite right; and I was glad to get out.
In the outer room the two women knitted black wool
feverishly. People were arriving, and the younger one
was walking back and forth introducing them. The
old one sat on her chair. Her flat cloth slippers were
propped up on a foot-warmer, and a cat reposed on her
lap. She wore a starched white affair on her head, had
a wart on one cheek, and silver-rimmed spectacles hung
on the tip of her nose. She glanced at me above the
glasses. The swift and indifferent placidity of that
look troubled me. Two youths with foolish and cheery
countenances were being piloted over, and she threw at
them the same quick glance of unconcerned wisdom.
She seemed to know all about them and about me, too.
An eerie feeling came over me. She seemed uncanny
and fateful. Often far away there I thought of these
two, guarding the door of Darkness, knitting black
wool as for a warm pall, one introducing, introducing
continuously to the unknown, the other scrutinizing
the cheery and foolish faces with unconcerned old
eyes. Ave! Old knittter of black wool. Morituri te
salutant. Not many of those she looked at ever saw
her again -- not half, by a long way.
  "There was yet a visit to the doctor. 'A simple for-
mality,' assured me the secretary, with an air of taking
an immense part in all my sorrows. Accordingly a
young chap wearing his hat over the left eyebrow,
some clerk I suppose -- there must have been clerks
in the business, though the house was as still as a
house in a city of the dead -- came from somewhere
up-stairs, and led me forth. He was shabby and care-
less, with inkstains on the sleeves of his jacket, and
his cravat was large and billowy, under a chin shaped
like the toe of an old boot. It was a little too early for
the doctor, so I proposed a drink, and thereupon he
developed a vein of joviality. As we sat over our ver-
mouths he glorified the Company's business, and by
and by I expressed casually my surprise at him not
going out there. He became very cool and collected
all at once. 'I am not such a fool as I look, quoth
Plato to his disciples,' he said sententiously, emptied
his glass with great resolution, and we rose.
  "The old doctor felt my pulse, evidently thinking
of something else the while. 'Good, good for there,' he
mumbled, and then with a certain eagerness asked me
whether I would let him measure my head. Rather
surprised, I said Yes, when he produced a thing like
calipers and got the dimensions back and front and
every way, taking notes carefully. He was an un-
shaven little man in a threadbare coat like a gaberdine,
with his feet in slippers, and I thought him a harmless
fool. 'I always ask leave, in the interests of science, to
measure the crania of those going out there,' he said.
'And when they come back, too?' I asked. 'Oh, I never
see them,' he remarked; 'and, moreover, the changes
take place inside, you know.' He smiled, as if at some
quiet joke. 'So you are going out there. Famous.
Interesting, too.' He gave me a searching glance, and
made another note. 'Ever any madness in your fam-
ily?' he asked, in a matter-of-fact tone. I felt very
annoyed. 'Is that question in the interests of science,
too?' 'It would be,' he said, without taking notice of
my irritation, 'interesting for science to watch the
mental changes of individuals, on the spot, but . . .'
'Are you an alienist?' I interrupted. 'Every doctor
should be -- a little,' answered that original, imperturb-
ably. 'I have a little theory which you messieurs who
go out there must help me to prove. This is my share
in the advantages my country shall reap from the
possession of such a magnificent dependency. The
mere wealth I leave to others. Pardon my questions,
but you are the first Englishman coming under my
observation . . .' I hastened to assure him I was not
in the least typical. 'If I were,' said I, 'I wouldn't be
talking like this with you.' 'What you say is rather
profound, and probably erroneous,' he said, with a
laugh. 'Avoid irritation more than exposure to the
sun. Adieu. How do you English say, eh? Good-bye.
Ah! Good-bye. Adieu. In the tropics one must before
everything keep calm.' . . . He lifted a warning
forefinger. . . 'Du calme, du calme, Adieu.'
  "One thing more remained to do -- say good-bye to
my excellent aunt. I found her triumphant. I had a
cup of tea -- the last decent cup of tea for many days --
and in a room that most soothingly looked just as you
would expect a lady's drawing-room to look, we had a
long quiet chat by the fireside. In the course of these
confidences it became quite plain to me I had been
represented to the wife of the high dignitary, and
goodness knows to how many more people besides, as
an exceptional and gifted creature -- a piece of good
fortune for the Company -- a man you don't get hold
of every day. Good heavens! and I was going to take
charge of a two-penny-half-penny river-steamboat with
a penny whistle attached! It appeared, however, I
was also one of the Workers, with a capital -- you
know. Something like an emissary of light, something
like a lower sort of apostle. There had been a lot of
such rot let loose in print and talk just about that time,
and the excellent woman, living right in the rush of
all that humbug, got carried off her feet. She talked
about 'weaning those ignorant millions from their
horrid ways,' till, upon my word, she made me quite
uncomfortable. I ventured to hint that the Company
was run for profit.
  " 'You forget, dear Charlie, that the labourer is
worthy of his hire,' she said, brightly. It's queer how
out of touch with truth women are. They live in a
world of their own, and there has never been anything
like it, and never can be. It is too beautiful altogether,
and if they were to set it up it would go to pieces
before the first sunset. Some confounded fact we men
have been living contentedly with ever since the day
of creation would start up and knock the whole thing
over.
  "After this I got embraced, told to wear flannel, be
sure to write often, and so on -- and I left. In the
street -- I don't know why -- a queer feeling came to me
that I was an impostor. Odd thing that I, who used to
clear out for any part of the world at twenty-four
hours' notice, with less thought than most men give to
the crossing of a street, had a moment -- I won't say
of hesitation, but of startled pause, before this com-
monplace affair. The best way I can explain it to you
is by saying that, for a second or two, I felt as though,
instead of going to the centre of a continent, I were
about to set off for the centre of the earth.
  "I left in a French steamer, and she called in every
blamed port they have out there, for, as far as I
could see, the sole purpose of landing soldiers and
custom-house officers. I watched the coast. Watching a
coast as it slips by the ship is like thinking about an
enigma. There it is before you -- smiling, frowning,
inviting, grand, mean, insipid, or savage, and always
mute with an air of whispering, 'Come and find out.'
This one was almost featureless, as if still in the mak-
ing, with an aspect of monotonous grimness. The edge
of a colossal jungle, so dark-green as to be almost
black, fringed with white surf, ran straight, like a
ruled line, far, far away along a blue sea whose glitter
was blurred by a creeping mist. The sun was fierce,
the land seemed to glisten and drip with steam. Here
and there greyish-whitish specks showed up clustered
inside the white surf, with a flag fiying above them
perhaps. Settlements some centuries old, and still no
bigger than pinheads on the untouched expanse of
their background. We pounded along, stopped, landed
soldiers; went on, landed custom-house clerks to
levy toll in what looked like a God-forsaken wilder-
ness, with a tin shed and a flag-pole lost in it; landed
more soldiers to take care of the custom-house clerks,
presumably. Some, I heard, got drowned in the surf;
but whether they did or not, nobody seemed particu-
larly to care. They were just flung out there, and on
we went. Every day the coast looked the same, as
though we had not moved; but we passed various
places -- trading places with names like Gran' Bas-
sam, Little Popo; names that seemed to belong to
some sordid farce acted in front of a sinister back-cloth.
The idleness of a passenger, my isolation amongst all
these men with whom I had no point of contact, the
oily and languid sea, the uniform sombreness of the
coast, seemed to keep me away from the truth of things,
within the toil of a mournful and senseless delusion.
The voice of the surf heard now and then was a posi-
tive pleasure, like the speech of a brother. It was some-
thing natural, that had its reason, that had a meaning
Now and then a boat from the shore gave one a mo-
mentary contact with reality. It was paddled by
black fellows. You could see from afar the white of
their eyeballs glistening. They shouted, sang; their
bodies streamed with perspiration; they had faces
like grotesque masks -- these chaps; but they had bone,
muscle, a wild vitality, an intense energy of move-
ment, that was as natural and true as the surf along
their coast. They wanted no excuse for being there.
They were a great comfort to look at. For a time I
would feel I belonged still to a world of straightfor-
ward facts; but the feeling would not last long. Some-
thing would turn up to scare it away. Once, I remem-
ber, we came upon a man-of-war anchored off the
coast. There wasn't even a shed there, and she was
shelling the bush. It appears the French had one of
their wars going on thereabouts. Her ensign dropped
limp like a rag; the muzzles of the long six-inch guns
stuck out all over the low hull; the greasy, slimy swell
swung her up lazily and let her down, swaying her
thin masts. In the empty immensity of earth, sky, and
water, there she was, incomprehensible, firing into a
continent. Pop, would go one of the six-inch guns; a
small flame would dart and vanish, a little white smoke
would disappear, a tiny projectile would give a feeble
screech -- and nothing happened. Nothing could hap-
pen. There was a touch of insanity in the proceeding,
a sense of lugubrious drollery in the sight; and it was
not dissipated by somebody on board assuring me
earnestly there was a camp of natives -- he called them
enemies! -- hidden out of sight somewhere.
**  "We gave her her letters (I heard the men in that
lonely ship were dying of fever at the rate of three
a day) and went on. We called at some more places
with farcical names, where the merry dance of death
and trade goes on in a still and earthy atmosphere as
of an overheated catacomb; all along the formless
coast bordered by dangerous surf, as if Nature herself
had tried to ward off intruders; in and out of rivers,
streams of death in life, whose banks were rotting into
mud, whose waters, thickened into slime, invaded the
contorted mangroves, that seemed to writhe at us
in the extremity of an impotent despair. Nowhere
did we stop long enough to get a particularized im-
pression, but the general sense of vague and oppres-
sive wonder grew upon me. It was like a weary
pilgrimage amongst hints for nightmares
  "It was upward of thirty days before I saw the
mouth of the big river. We anchored off the seat of
the government. But my work would not begin till
some two hundred miles farther on. So as soon as I
could I made a start for a place thirty miles higher up.
  "I had my passage on a little sea-going steamer.
Her captain was a Swede, and knowing me for a
seaman, invited me on the bridge. He was a young
man, lean, fair, and morose, with lanky hair and a
shuffling gait. As we left the miserable little wharf,
he tossed his head contemptuously at the shore. 'Been
living there?' he asked. I said, 'Yes.' 'Fine lot these
government chaps -- are they not?' he went on, speak-
ing English with great precision and considerable bit-
terness. 'It is funny what some people will do for a
few francs a month. I wonder what becomes of that
kind when it goes upcountry?' I said to him I expected
to see that soon. 'So-o-o!' he exclaimed. He shuffled
athwart, keeping one eye ahead vigilantly. 'Don't be
too sure,' he continued. 'The other day I took up a
man who hanged himself on the road. He was a
Swede, too.' 'Hanged himself! Why, in God's name?'
I cried. He kept on looking out watchfully. 'Who
knows? The sun too much for him, or the country
perhaps.'
  "At last we opened a reach. A rocky cliff appeared,
mounds of turned-up earth by the shore, houses on a
hill, others with iron roofs, amongst a waste of exca-
vations, or hanging to the declivity. A continuous noise
of the rapids above hovered over this scene of in-
habited devastation. A lot of people, mostly black
and naked, moved about like ants. A jetty projected
into the river. A blinding sunlight drowned all this
at times in a sudden recrudescence of glare. 'There's
your Company's station,' said the Swede, pointing to
three wooden barrack-like structures on the rocky
slope. 'I will send your things up. Four boxes did you
say? So. Farewell.'
  "I came upon a boiler wallowing in the grass, then
found a path leading up the hill. It turned aside for
the boulders, and also for an undersized railway-truck
lying there on its back with its wheels in the air. One
was off. The thing looked as dead as the carcass of
some animal. I came upon more pieces of decaying
machinery, a stack of rusty rails. To the left a clump
of trees made a shady spot, where dark things seemed
to stir feebly. I blinked, the path was steep. A horn
tooted to the right, and I saw the black people run. A
heavy and dull detonation shook the ground, a puff
of smoke came out of the cliff, and that was all. No
change appeared on the face of the rock. They were
building a railway. The cliff was not in the way or
anything; but this objectless blasting was all the work
going on.
  "A slight clinking behind me made me turn my
head. Six black men advanced in a file, toiling up the
path. They walked erect and slow, balancing small
baskets full of earth on their heads, and the clink
kept time with their footsteps. Black rags were wound
round their loins, and the short ends behind waggled
to and fro like tails. I could see every rib, the joints of
their limbs were like knots in a rope; each had an
iron collar on his neck, and all were connected together
with a chain whose bights swung between them,
rhythmically clinking. Another report from the cliff
made me think suddenly of that ship of war I had
seen firing into a continent. It was the same kind of
ominous voice; but these men could by no stretch of
imagination be called enemies. They were called
criminals, and the outraged law, like the bursting
shells, had come to them, an insoluble mystery from
the sea. All their meagre breasts panted together, the
violently dilated nostrils quivered, the eyes stared
stonily uphill. They passed me within six inches, with-
out a glance, with that complete, deathlike indifference
of unhappy savages. Behind this raw matter one of the
reclaimed, the product of the new forces at work,
strolled despondently, carrying a rifle by its middle.
He had a uniform jacket with one button off, and
seeing a white man on the path, hoisted his weapon to
his shoulder with alacrity. This was simple prudence,
white men being so much alike at a distance that he
could not tell who I might be. He was speedily re-
assured, and with a large, white, rascally grin, and a
glance at his charge, seemed to take me into partner-
ship in his exalted trust. After all, I also was a part of
the great cause of these high and just proceedings.
  "Instead of going up, I turned and descended to the
left. My idea was to let that chain-gang get out of
sight before I climbed the hill. You know I am not
particularly tender; I've had to strike and to fend off.
I've had to resist and to attack sometimes -- that's only
one way of resisting -- without counting the exact cost,
according to the demands of such sort of life as I had
blundered into. I've seen the devil of violence, and
the devil of greed, and the devil of hot desire; but,
by all the stars! these were strong, lusty, red-eyed
devils, that swayed and drove men -- men, I tell you.
But as I stood on this hillside, I foresaw that in the
blinding sunshine of that land I would become ac-
quainted with a flabby, pretending, weak-eyed devil
of a rapacious and pitiless folly. How insidious he
could be, too, I was only to find out several months
later and a thousand miles farther. For a moment I
stood appalled, as though by a warning. Finally I
descended the hill, obliquely, towards the trees I had
seen.
  "I avoided a vast artificial hole somebody had been
digging on the slope, the purpose of which I found it
impossible to divine. It wasn't a quarry or a sandpit,
anyhow. It was just a hole. It might have been con-
nected with the philanthropic desire of giving the
criminals something to do. I don't know. Then I
nearly fell into a very narrow ravine, almost no more
than a scar in the hillside. I discovered that a lot of
imported drainage-pipes for the settlement had been
tumbled in there. There wasn't one that was not
broken. It was a wanton smash-up. At last I got under
the trees. My purpose was to stroll into the shade for
a moment; but no sooner within than it seemed to me
I had stepped into the gloomy circle of some Inferno.
The rapids were near, and an uninterrupted, uniform,
headlong, rushing noise filled the mournful stillness
of the grove, where not a breath stirred, not a leaf
moved, with a mysterious sound -- as though the tear-
ing pace of the launched earth had suddenly become
audible.
  "Black shapes crouched, lay, sat between the trees
leaning against the trunks, clinging to the earth, half
coming out, half effased within the dim light, in all
the attitudes of pain, abandonment, and despair. An-
other mine on the cliff went off, followed by a slight
shudder of the soil under my feet. The work was
going on. The work! And this was the place where
some of the helpers had withdrawn to die.
  "They were dying slowly -- it was very clear. They
were not enemies, they were not criminals, they were
nothing earthly now -- nothing but black shadows of
disease and starvation, lying confusedly in the green-
ish gloom. Brought from all the recesses of the coast
in all the legality of time contracts, lost in uncon-
genial surroundings, fed on unfamiliar food, they
sickened, became inefficient, and were then allowed
to crawl away and rest. These moribund shapes were
free as air -- and nearly as thin. I began to distinguish
the gleam of the eyes under the trees. Then, glancing
down, I saw a face near my hand. The black bones
reclined at full length with one shoulder against the
tree, and slowly the eyelids rose and the sunken eyes
looked up at me, enormous and vacant, a kind of
blind, white flicker in the depths of the orbs, which
died out slowly. The man seemed young -- almost a
boy -- but you know with them it's hard to tell. I
found nothing else to do but to offer him one of my
good Swede's ship's biscuits I had in my pocket. The
fingers closed slowly on it and held -- there was no
other movement and no other glance. He had tied a
bit of white worsted round his neck -- Why? Where
did he get it? Was it a badge -- an ornament -- charm
-- a propitiatory act? Was there any idea at all con-
nected with it? It looked startling round his black
neck, this bit of white thread from beyond the seas.
  "Near the same tree two more bundles of acute
angles sat with their legs drawn up. One, with his
chin propped on his knees, stared at nothing, in an
intolerable and appalling manner: his brother phan-
tom rested its forehead, as if overcome with a great
weariness; and all about others were scattered in
every pose of contorted collapse, as in some picture of
a massacre or a pestilence. While I stood horror-
struck, one of these creatures rose to his hands and
knees, and went off on all-fours towards the river to
drink. He lapped out of his hand, then sat up in the
sunlight, crossing his shins in front of him, and after
a time let his woolly head fall on his breastbone.
  "I didn't want any more loitering in the shade, and
I made haste towards the station. When near the
buildings I met a white man, in such an unexpected
elegance of getup that in the first moment I took him
for a sort of vision. I saw a high starched collar,
white cuffs, a light alpaca jacket, snowy trousers, a
clean necktie, and varnished boots. No hat. Hair
parted, brushed, oiled, under a green-lined parasol
held in a big white hand. He was amazing, and had a
penholder behind his ear.
  "I shook hands with this miracle, and I learned he
was the Company's chief accountant, and that all the
bookkeeping was done at this station. He had come
out for a moment, he said, 'to get a breath of fresh
air.' The expression sounded wonderfully odd, with
its suggestion of sedentary desk-life. I wouldn't have
mentioned the fellow to you at all, only it was from
his lips that I first heard the name of the man who is
so indissolubly connected with the memories of that
time. Moreover, I respected the fellow. Yes; I re-
spected his collars, his vast cuffs, his brushed hair. His
appearance was certainly that of a hairdresser's
dummy; but in the great demoralization of the land
he kept up his appearance. That's backbone. His
starched collars and got-up shirt-fronts were achieve-
ments of character. He had been out nearly three
years; and later, I could not help asking him how he
managed to sport such linen. He had just the faintest
blush, and said modestly, 'I've been teaching one of
the native women about the station. It was difficult.
She had a distaste for the work.' Thus this man had
verily accomplished something. And he was devoted
to his books, which were in apple-pie order.
  "Everything else in the station was in a muddle --
heads, things, buildings. Strings of dusty niggers with
splay feet arrived and departed; a stream of manu-
factured goods, rubbishy cottons, beads, and brass-
wire set into the depths of darkness, and in return
came a precious trickle of ivory.
  "I had to wait in the station for ten days -- an
eternity. I lived in a hut in the yard, but to be out of
the chaos I would sometimes get into the accountant's
office. It was built of horizontal planks, and so badly
put together that, as he bent over his high desk, he
was barred from neck to heels with narrow strips of
sunlight. There was no need to open the big shutter to
see. It was hot there, too; big flies buzzed fiendishly,
and did not sting, but stabbed. I sat generally on the
floor, while, of faultless appearance (and even slightly
scented), perching on a high stool, he wrote, he wrote.
Sometimes he stood up for exercise. When a truckle-
bed with a sick man (some invalid agent from up-
country) was put in there, he exhibited a gentle an-
noyance. 'The groans of this sick person,' he said,
'distract my attention. And without that it is ex-
tremely difficult to guard against clerical errors in
this climate.'
  "One day he remarked, without lifting his head,
'In the interior you will no doubt meet Mr. Kurtz.'
On my asking who Mr. Kurtz was, he said he was a
first-class agent; and seeing my disappointment at
this information, he added slowly, laying down his
pen, 'He is a very remarkable person.' Further ques-
tions elicited from him that Mr. Kurtz was at present
in charge of a trading-post, a very important one, in
the true ivory-country, at 'the very bottom of there.
Sends in as much ivory as all the others put together
. . .' He began to write again. The sick man was too
ill to groan. The flies buzzed in a great peace.
  "Suddenly there was a growing murmur of voices
and a great tramping of feet. A caravan had come in.
A violent babble of uncouth sounds burst out on the
other side of the planks. All the carriers were speaking
together, and in the midst of the uproar the lament-
able voice of the chief agent was heard 'giving it up'
tearfully for the twentieth time that day.... He
rose slowly. 'What a frightful row,' he said. He
crossed the room gently to look at the sick man, and
returning, said to me, 'He does not hear.' 'What!
Dead?' I asked, startled. 'No, not yet,' he answered,
with great composure. Then, alluding with a toss of
the head to the tumult in the station-yard, 'When one
has got to make correct entries, one comes to hate
those savages -- hate them to the death.' He remained
thoughtful for a moment. 'When you see Mr. Kurtz'
he went on, 'tell him from me that everything here' --
he glanced at the deck -- 'is very satisfactory. I don't
like to write to him -- with those messengers of ours
you never know who may get hold of your letter -- at
that Central Station.' He stared at me for a moment
with his mild, bulging eyes. 'Oho, he will go far, very
far,' he began again. 'He will be a somebody in the
Administration before long. They, above -- the Coun-
cil in Europe, you know -- mean him to be.'
  "He turned to his work. The noise outside had
ceased, and presently in going out I stopped at the
door. In the steady buzz of flies the homeward-bound
agent was lying flushed and insensible; the other,
bent over his books, was making correct entries of
perfectly correct transactions; and fifty feet below the
doorstep I could see the still treetops of the grove of
death.
  "Next day I left that station at last, with a caravan
of sixty men, for a two-hundred-mile tramp.
  "No use telling you much about that. Paths, paths,
everywhere; a stamped-in network of paths spreading
over the empty land, through the long grass, through
burnt grass, through thickets, down and up chilly
ravines, up and down stony hills ablaze with heat;
and a solitude, a solitude, nobody, not a hut. The
population had cleared out a long time ago. Well, if
a lot of mysterious niggers armed with all kinds of
fearful weapons suddenly took to travelling on the
road between Deal and Gravesend, catching the yo-
kels right and left to carry heavy loads for them, I
fancy every farm and cottage thereabouts would
get empty very soon. Only here the dwellings were
gone, too. Still I passed through several abandoned
villages. There's something pathetically childish in
the ruins of grass walls. Day after day, with the stamp
and shuffle of sixty pair of bare feet behind me, each
pair under a 60-lb. load. Camp, cook, sleep, strike
camp, march. Now and then a carrier dead in harness,
at rest in the long grass near the path, with an empty
water-gourd and his long staff lying by his side. A
great silence around and above. Perhaps on some
quiet night the tremor of far-off drums, sinking, swell-
ing, a tremor vast, faint; a sound weird, appealing,
suggestive, and wild -- and perhaps with as profound
a meaning as the sound of bells in a Christian country.
Once a white man in an unbuttoned uniform, camping
on the path with an armed escort of lank Zanzibaris,
very hospitable and festive -- not to say drunk. Was
looking after the upkeep of the road, he declared.
Can't say I saw any road or any upkeep, unless the
body of a middle-aged negro, with a bullet-hole in the
forehead, upon which I absolutely stumbled three
miles farther on, may be considered as a permanent
improvement. I had a white companion, too, not a bad
chap, but rather too fleshy and with the exasperating
habit of fainting on the hot hillsides, miles away from
the least bit of shade and water. Annoying, you know,
to hold your own coat like a parasol over a man's
head while he is coming to. I couldn't help asking him
once what he meant by coming there at all. 'To make
money, of course. What do you think?' he said, scorn-
fully. Then he got fever, and had to be carried in a
hammock slung under a pole. As he weighed sixteen
stone I had no end of rows with the carriers. They
jibbed, ran away, sneaked off with their loads in the
night -- quite a mutiny. So, one evening, I made a
speech in English with gestures, not one of which was
lost to the sixty pairs of eyes before me, and the next
morning I started the hammock off in front all right.
An hour afterwards I came upon the whole concern
wrecked in a bush -- man, hammock, groans, blankets,
horrors. The heavy pole had skinned his poor nose.
He was very anxious for me to kill somebody, but
there wasn't the shadow of a carrier near. I remem-
bered the old doctor -- 'It would be interesting for
science to watch the mental changes of individuals, on
the spot.' I felt I was becoming scientifically interest-
ing. However, all that is to no purpose. On the fif-
teenth day I came in sight of the big river again, and
hobbled into the Central Station. It was on a back
water surrounded by scrub and forest, with a pretty
border of smelly mud on one side, and on the three
others enclosed by a crazy fence of rushes. A ne-
glected gap was all the gate it had, and the first glance
at the place was enough to let you see the flabby devil
was running that show. White men with long staves in
their hands appeared languidly from amongst the
buildings, strolling up to take a look at me, and then
retired out of sight somewhere. One of them, a stout,
excitable chap with black moustaches, informed me
with great volubility and many digressions, as soon
as I told him who I was, that my steamer was at the
bottom of the river. I was thunderstruck. What, how,
why? Oh, it was 'all right.' The 'manager himself'
was there. All quite correct. 'Everybody had behaved
splendidly! splendidly!' -- 'you must,' he said in agi-
tation, 'go and see the general manager at once. He is
waiting!'
  "I did not see the real significance of that wreck at
once. I fancy I see it now, but I am not sure not at
all. Certainly the affair was too stupid -- when I think
of it -- to be altogether natural. Still . . . But at the
moment it presented itself simply as a confounded
nuisance. The steamer was sunk. They had started
two days before in a sudden hurry up the river with
the manager on board, in charge of some volunteer
skipper, and before they had been out three hours
they tore the bottom out of her on stones, and she
sank near the south bank. I asked myself what I was
to do there, now my boat was lost. As a matter of fact,
I had plenty to do in fishing my command out of the
river. I had to set about it the very next day. That,
and the repairs when I brought the pieces to the sta-
tion, took some months.
  "My first interview with the manager was curious.
He did not ask me to sit down after my twenty-mile
walk that morning. He was commonplace in com-
plexion, in feature, in manners, and in voice. He was
of middle size and of ordinary build. His eyes, of the
usual blue, were perhaps remarkably cold, and he
certainly could make his glance fall on one as trench-
ant and heavy as an axe. But even at these times the
rest of his person seemed to disclaim the intention.
Otherwise there was only an indefinable, faint expres-
sion of his lips, something stealthy -- a smile -- not a
smile -- I remember it, but I can't explain. It was un-
conscious, this smile was, though just after he had
said something it got intensified for an instant. It
came at the end of his speeches like a seal applied on
the words to make the meaning of the commonest
phrase appear absolutely inscrutable. He was a com-
mon trader, from his youth up employed in these
parts -- nothing more. He was obeyed, yet he inspired
neither love nor fear, nor even respect. He inspired
uneasiness. That was it! Uneasiness. Not a definite
mistrust -- just uneasiness -- nothing more. You have
no idea how effective such a . . . a . . . faculty
can be. He had no genius for organizing, for initiative,
or for order even. That was evident in such things as
the deplorable state of the station. He had no learn-
ing, and no intelligence. His position had come to him
-- why? Perhaps because he was never ill . . . He
had served three terms of three years out there . . .
Because triumphant health in the general rout of con-
stitutions is a kind of power in itself. When he went
home on leave he rioted on a large scale -- pompously.
Jack ashore -- with a difference -- in externals only.
This one could gather from his casual talk. He origi-
nated nothing, he could keep the routine going --
that's all. But he was great. He was great by this little
thing that it was impossible to tell what could control
such a man. He never gave that secret away. Perhaps
there was nothing within him. Such a suspicion made
one pause -- for out there there were no external
checks. Once when various tropical diseases had laid
low almost every 'agent' in the station, he was heard
to say, 'Men who come out here should have no en-
trails.' He sealed the utterance with that smile of his,
as though it had been a door opening into a darkness
he had in his keeping. You fancied you had seen
things -- but the seal was on. When annoyed at meal-
times by the constant quarrels of the white men about
precedence, he ordered an immense round table to be
made, for which a special house had to be built. This
was the station's mess-room. Where he sat was the
first place -- the rest were nowhere. One felt this to be
his unalterable conviction. He was neither civil nor
uncivil. He was quiet. He allowed his 'boy' -- an over-
fed young negro from the coast -- to treat the white
men, under his very eyes, with provoking insolence.
  "He began to speak as soon as he saw me. I had
been very long on the road. He could not wait. Had
to start without me. The up-river stations had to be
relieved. There had been so many delays already that
he did not know who was dead and who was alive, and
how they got on -- and so on, and so on. He paid no
attention to my explanation, and, playing with a stick
of sealing-wax, repeated several times that the situa-
tion was 'very grave, very grave.' There were ru-
mours that a very important station was in jeopardy,
and its chief, Mr. Kurtz, was ill. Hoped it was not
true. Mr. Kurtz was . . . I felt weary and irritable.
Hang Kurtz, I thought. I interrupted him by saying
I had heard of Mr. Kurtz on the coast. 'Ah! So they
talk of him down there,' he murmured to himself.
Then he began again, assuring me Mr. Kurtz was the
best agent he had, an exceptional man, of the greatest
importance to the Company; therefore I could under-
stand his anxiety. He was, he said, 'very, very uneasy.'
Certainly he fidgeted on his chair a good deal, ex-
claimed, 'Ah, Mr. Kurtz!' broke the stick of sealing-
wax and seemed dumfounded by the accident. Next
thing he wanted to know 'how long it would take to'
. . . I interrupted him again. Being hungry, you
know, and kept on my feet too, I was getting savage.
'How can I tell?' I said. 'I haven't even seen the
wreck yet -- some months, no doubt.' All this talk
seemed to me so futile. 'Some months,' he said. "Well,
let us say three months before we can make a start.
Yes. That ought to do the affair.' I flung out of his
hut (he lived all alone in a clay hut with a sort of
verandah) muttering to myself my opinion of him.
He was a chattering idiot. Afterwards I took it back
when it was borne in upon me startlingly with what
extreme nicety he had estimated the time requisite for
the 'affair.'
  "I went to work the next day, turning, so to speak,
my back on that station. In that way only it seemed to
me I could keep my hold on the redeeming facts of
life. Still, one must look about sometimes; and then I
saw this station, these men strolling aimlessly about in
the sunshine of the yard. I asked myself sometimes
what it all meant. They wandered here and there with
their absurd long staves in their hands, like a lot of
faithless pilgrims bewitched inside a rotten fence. The
word 'ivory' rang in the air, was whispered, was
sighed. You would think they were praying to it. A
taint of imbecile rapacity blew through it all, like a
whiff from some corpse. By Jove! I've never seen
anything so unreal in my life. And outside, the silent
wilderness surrounding this cleared speck on the earth
struck me as something great and invincible, like evil
or truth, waiting patiently for the passing away of this
fantastic invasion.
  "Oh, these months! Well, never mind. Various
things happened. One evening a grass shed full of
calico, cotton prints, beads, and I don't know what
else, burst into a blaze so suddenly that you would
have thought the earth had opened to let an avenging
fire consume all that trash. I was smoking my pipe
quietly by my dismantled steamer, and saw them all
cutting capers in the light, with their arms lifted high,
when the stout man with moustaches came tearing
down to the river, a tin pail in his hand, assured me
that everybody was 'behaving splendidly, splendidly,'
dipped about a quart of water and tore back again. I
noticed there was a hole in the bottom of his pail.
  "I strolled up. There was no hurry. You see the
thing had gone off like a box of matches. It had been
hopeless from the very first. The flame had leaped
high, driven everybody back, lighted up everything --
and collapsed. The shed was already a heap of embers
glowing fiercely. A nigger was being beaten near by.
They said he had caused the fire in some way; be that
as it may, he was screeching most horribly. I saw him,
later, for several days, sitting in a bit of shade looking
very sick and trying to recover himself: afterwards he
arose and went out -- and the wilderness without a
sound took him into its bosom again. As I approached
the glow from the dark I found myself at the back of
two men, talking. I heard the name of Kurtz pro-
nounced, then the words, 'take advantage of this un-
fortunate accident.' One of the men was the manager. I
wished him a good evening. 'Did you ever see anything
like it -- eh? it is incredible,' he said, and walked off.
The other man remained. He was a first-class agent,
young, gentlemanly, a bit reserved, with a forked
little beard and a hooked nose. He was stand-offish
with the other agents, and they on their side said he
was the manager's spy upon them. As to me, I had
hardly ever spoken to him before. We got into talk,
and by and by we strolled away from the hissing ruins.
Then he asked me to his room, which was in the main
building of the station. He struck a match, and I
perceived that this young aristocrat had not only a
silver-mounted dressing-case but also a whole candle
all to himself. Just at that time the manager was the
only man supposed to have any right to candles.
Native mats covered the clay walls; a collection of
spears, assegais, shields, knives was hung up in tro-
phies. The business intrusted to this fellow was the
making of bricks -- so I had been informed; but there
wasn't a fragment of a brick anywhere in the station,
and he could not make bricks without something, I
don't know what -- straw maybe. Anyway, it could not
be found there and as it was not likely to be sent from
Europe, it did not appear clear to me what he was
waiting for. An act of special creation perhaps. How-
ever, they were all waiting all the sixteen or twenty
pilgrims of them -- for something; and upon my word
it did not seem an uncongenial occupation, from the
way they took it, though the only thing that ever
came to them was disease -- as far as I could see. They
beguiled the time by backbiting and intriguing against
each other in a foolish kind of way. There was an air
of plotting about that station, but nothing came of it,
of course. It was as unreal as everything else -- as the
philanthropic pretence of the whole concern, as their
talk, as their government, as their show of work. The
only real feeling was a desire to get appointed to a
trading-post where ivory was to be had, so that they
could earn percentages. They intrigued and slandered
and hated each other only on that account -- but as to
effectually lifting a little finger -- oh, no. By heavens!
there is something after all in the world allowing one
man to steal a horse while another must not look at a
halter. Steal a horse straight out. Very well. He has
done it. Perhaps he can ride. But there is a way of
looking at a halter that would provoke the most chari-
table of saints into a kick.
  "I had no idea why he wanted to be sociable, but as
we chatted in there it suddenly ocurred to me the
fellow was trying to get at something -- in fact, pump-
ing me. He alluded constantly to Europe, to the peo-
ple I was supposed to know there -- putting leading
questions as to my acquaintances in the sepulchral city,
and so on. His little eyes glittered like mica discs --
with curiosity -- though he tried to keep up a bit of
superciliousness. At first I was astonished, but very
soon I became awfully curious to see what he would
find out from me. I couldn't possibly imagine what I
had in me to make it worth his while. It was very pretty
to see how he baffled himself, for in truth my body was
full only of chills, and my head had nothing in it but
that wretched steamboat business. It was evident he
took me for a perfectly shameless prevaricator. At last
he got angry, and, to conceal a movement of furious
annoyance, he yawned. I rose. Then I noticed a small
sketch in oils, on a panel, representing a woman,
draped and blindfolded, carrying a lighted torch. The
background was sombre -- almost black. The move-
ment of the woman was stately, and the effect of the
torchlight on the face was sinister.
  "It arrested me, and he stood by civilly, holding an
empty half-pint champagne bottle (medical comforts)
with the candle stuck in it. To my question he said
Mr. Kurtz had painted this -- in this very station more
than a year ago -- while waiting for means to go to his
trading-post. 'Tell me, pray,' said I, 'who is this Mr.
Kurtz?'
  " 'The chief of the Inner Station,' he answered in a
short tone, looking away. 'Much obliged,' I said,
laughing. 'And you are the brickmaker of the Central
Station. Every one knows that.' He was silent for a
while. 'He is a prodigy,' he said at last. 'He is an
emissary of pity and science and progress, and devil
knows what else. We want,' he began to declaim sud-
denly, 'for the guidance of the cause intrusted to us by
Europe, so to speak, higher intelligence, wide sympa-
thies, a singleness of purpose.' 'Who says that?' I
asked. 'Lots of them,' he replied. 'Some even write
that; and so he comes here, a special being, as you
ought to know.' 'Why ought I to know?' I inter-
rupted, really surprised. He paid no attention. 'Yes.
Today he is chief of the best station, next year he will
be assistant-manager, two years more and . . . but I
daresay you know what he will be in two years' time.
You are of the new gang -- the gang of virtue. The
same people who sent him specially also recom-
mended you. Oh, don't say no. I've my own eyes to
trust.' Light dawned upon me. My dear aunt's influ-
ential acquaintances were producing an unexpected
effect upon that young man. I nearly burst into a
laugh. 'Do you read the Company's confidential cor-
respondence?' I asked. He hadn't a word to say. It
was great fun. 'When Mr. Kurtz,' I continued, se-
verely, 'is General Manager, you won't have the op-
portunity.'
  "He blew the candle out suddenly, and we went
outside. The moon had risen. Black figures strolled
about listlessly, pouring water on the glow, whence
proceeded a sound of hissing; steam ascended in the
moonlight, the beaten nigger groaned somewhere.
'What a row the brute makes!' said the indefatigable
man with the moustaches, appearing near us. 'Serve
him right. Transgression -- punishment -- bang! Piti-
less, pitiless. That's the only way. This will prevent
all conflagrations for the future. I was just telling the
manager . . .' He noticed my companion, and be-
came crestfallen all at once. 'Not in bed yet,' he said,
with a kind of servile heartiness; 'it's so natural. Ha!
Danger -- agitation.' He vanished. I went on to the
riverside, and the other followed me. I heard a scath-
ing murmur at my ear, 'Heap of muffs -- go to.' The
pilgrims could be seen in knots gesticulating, discuss-
ing. Several had still their staves in their hands. I
verily believe they took these sticks to bed with them.
Beyond the fence the forest stood up spectrally in the
moonlight, and through the dim stir, through the
faint sounds of that lamentable courtyard, the silence
of the land went home to one's very heart -- its mys-
tery, its greatness, the amazing reality of its concealed
life. The hurt nigger moaned feebly somewhere near
by, and then fetched a deep sigh that made me mend
my pace away from there. I felt a hand introducing
itself under my arm. 'My dear sir,' said the fellow, 'I
don't want to be misunderstood, and especially by
you, who will see Mr. Kurtz long before I can have
that pleasure. I wouldn't like him to get a false idea
of my disposition....'
  "I let him run on, this papier-mache Mephistophe-
les, and it seemed to me that if I tried I could poke
my forefinger through him, and would find nothing
inside but a little loose dirt, maybe. He, don't you see,
had been planning to be assistant-manager by and by
under the present man, and I could see that the com-
ing of that Kurtz had upset them both not a little. He
talked precipitately, and I did not try to stop him. I
had my shoulders against the wreck of my steamer,
hauled up on the slope like a carcass of some big river
animal. The smell of mud, of primeval mud, by Jove!
was in my nostrils, the high stillness of primeval for-
est was before my eyes; there were shiny patches on
the black creek. The moon had spread over every-
thing a thin layer of silver -- over the rank grass, over
the mud, upon the wall of matted vegetation standing
higher than the wall of a temple, over the great river
I could see through a sombre gap glittering, glitter-
ing, as it flowed broadly by without a murmur. All
this was great, expectant, mute, while the man jab-
bered about himself. I wondered whether the stillness
on the face of the immensity looking at us two were
meant as an appeal or as a menace. What were we who
had strayed in here? Could we handle that dumb
thing, or would it handle us? I felt how big, how
confoundedly big, was that thing that couldn't talk,
and perhaps was deaf as well. What was in there? I
could see a little ivory coming out from there, and I
had heard Mr. Kurtz was in there. I had heard
enough about it, too -- God knows! Yet somehow it
didn't bring any image with it -- no more than if I had
been told an angel or a fiend was in there. I believed
it in the same way one of you might believe there are
inhabitants in the planet Mars. I knew once a Scotch
sailmaker who was certain, dead sure, there were peo-
ple in Mars. If you asked him for some idea how they
looked and behaved, he would get shy and mutter
something about 'walking on all-fours.' If you as
much as smiled, he would -- though a man of sixty --
offer to fight you. I would not have gone so far as to
fight for Kurtz, but I went for him near enough to
lie. You know I hate, detest, and can't bear a lie, not
because I am straighter than the rest of us, but simply
because it appalls me. There is a taint of death, a
flavour of mortality in lies which is exactly what I
hate and detest in the world -- what I want to forget.
It makes me miserable and sick, like biting something
rotten would do. Temperament, I suppose. Well, I
went near enough to it by letting the young fool there
believe anything he liked to imagine as to my influ-
ence in Europe. I became in an instant as much of a
pretence as the rest of the bewitched pilgrims. This
simply because I had a notion it somehow would be of
help to that Kurtz whom at the time I did not see
you understand. He was just a word for me. I did
not see the man in the name any more than you
do. Do you see him? Do you see the story? Do you
see anything? It seems to me I am trying to tell you
a dream -- making a vain attempt, because no relation
of a dream can convey the dream-sensation, that com-
mingling of absurdity, surprise, and bewilderment in
a tremor of struggling revolt, that notion of being
captured by the incredible which is of the very essence
of dreams...."
  He was silent for a while.
  ". . . No, it is impossible; it is impossible to con-
vey the life-sensation of any given epoch of one's ex-
istence -- that which makes its truth, its meaning its
subtle and penetrating essence. It is impossible. We
live, as we dream alone...."
  He paused again again if reflecting, then added:
  "Of course in this you fellows see more than I
could then. You see me, whom you know. . . ."
  It had become so pitch dark that we listeners could
hardly see one another. For a long time already he,
sitting apart, had been no more to us than a voice.
There was not a word from anybody. The others
might have been asleep, but I was awake. I listened, I
listened on the watch for the sentence, for the word,
that would give me the clue to the faint uneasi-
ness inspired by this narrative that seemed to shape
itself without human lips in the heavy night-air of the
river.
  ". . . Yes -- I let him run on," Marlow began
again, "and think what he pleased about the powers
that were behind me. I did! And there was nothing
behind me! There was nothing but that wretched,
old, mangled steamboat I was leaning against, while
he talked fluently about 'the necessity for every man
to get on.' 'And when one comes out here, you con-
ceive, it is not to gaze at the moon.' Mr. Kurtz was a
'universal genius,' but even a genius would find it
easier to work with 'adequate tools -- intelligent men.'
He did not make bricks -- why, there was a physical
impossibility in the way -- as I was well aware; and if
he did secretarial work for the manager, it was be-
cause 'no sensible man rejects wantonly the confidence
of his superiors.' Did I see it? I saw it. What more did
I want? What I really wanted was rivets, by heaven!
Rivets. To get on with the work -- to stop the hole.
Rivets I wanted. There were cases of them down at
the coast cases piled up -- burst -- split! You kicked
a loose rivet at every second step in that station-yard
on the hillside. Rivets had rolled into the grove of
death. You could fill your pockets with rivets for the
trouble of stooping down -- and there wasn't one rivet
to be found where it was wanted. We had plates that
would to, but nothing to fasten them with. And every
week the messenger, a lone negro, letterbag on shoul-
der and staff in hand, left our station for the coast.
And several times a week a coast caravan came in with
trade goods -- ghastly glazed calico that made you
shudder only to look at it, glass beads value about a
penny a quart, confounded spotted cotton handker-
chiefs. And no rivets. Three carriers could have
brought all that was wanted to set that steamboat
afloat.
  "He was becoming confidential now, but I fancy my
unresponsive attitude must have exasperated him at
last, for he judged it necessary to inform me he feared
neither God nor devil, let alone any mere man. I said
I could see that very well, but what I wanted was a
certain quantity of rivets -- and rivets were what really
Mr. Kurtz wanted, if he had only known it. Now
letters went to the coast every week.... 'My dear
sir,' he cried, 'I write from dictation.' I demanded
rivets. There was a way -- for an intelligent man. He
changed his manner; became very cold, and suddenly
began to talk about a hippopotamus; wondered
whether sleeping on board the steamer (I stuck to
my salvage night and day) I wasn't disturbed. There
was an old hippo that had the bad habit of getting out
on the bank and roaming at night over the station
grounds. The pilgrims used to turn out in a body and
empty every rifle they could lay hands on at him.
Some even had sat up o' nights for him. All this
energy was wasted, though. 'That animal has a
charmed life,' he said; 'but you can say this only of
brutes in this country. No man -- you apprehend me?
-- no man here bears a charmed life.' He stood there
for a moment in the moonlight with his delicate
hooked nose set a little askew, and his mica eyes
glittering without a wink, then, with a curt Good-
night, he strode off. I could see he was disturbed and
considerably puzzled, which made me feel more hope-
ful than I had been for days. It was a great comfort
to turn from that chap to my influential friend, the
battered, twisted, ruined, tin-pot steamboat. I clam-
bered on board. She rang under my feet like an empty
Huntley & Palmer biscuit-tin kicked along a gutter;
she was nothing so solid in make, and rather less pretty
in shape, but I had expended enough hard work on
her to make me love her. No influential friend would
have served me better. She had given me a chance to
come out a bit -- to find out what I could do. No, I
don't like work. I had rather laze about and think of
all the fine things that can be done. I don't like work
-- no man does -- but I like what is in the work -- the
chance to find yourself. Your own reality -- for your-
self, not for others -- what no other man can ever
know. They can only see the mere show, and never
can tell what it really means.
  "I was not surprised to see somebody sitting aft, on
the deck, with his legs dangling over the mud. You
see I rather chummed with the few mechanics there
were in that station, whom the other pilgrims natur-
ally despised -- on account of their imperfect manners,
I suppose. This was the foreman -- a boiler-maker by
trade -- a good worker. He was a lank, bony, yellow-
faced man, with big intense eyes. His aspect was
worried, and his head was as bald as the palm of my
hand; but his hair in falling seemed to have stuck to
his chin, and had prospered in the new locality, for
his beard hung down to his waist. He was a widower
with six young children (he had left them in charge
of a sister of his to come out there), and the passion of
his life was pigeon-flying. He was an enthusiast and
a connoisseur. He would rave about pigeons. After
work hours he used sometimes to come over from his
hut for a talk about his children and his pigeons; at
work, when he had to crawl in the mud under the
bottom of the steamboat, he would tie up that beard
of his in a kind of white serviette he brought for the
purpose. It had loops to go over his ears. In the eve-
ning he could be seen squatted on the bank rinsing that
wrapper in the creek with great care, then spreading
it solemnly on a bush to dry. 
  "I slapped him on the back and shouted, 'We shall
have rivets!' He scrambled to his feet exclaiming,
'No! Rivets!' as though he couldn't believe his ears.
Then in a low voice, 'You . . . eh?' I don't know
why we behaved like lunatics. I put my finger to the
side of my nose and nodded mysteriously. 'Good for
you!' he cried, snapped his fingers above his head,
lifting one foot. I tried a jig. We capered on the iron
deck. A frightful clatter came out of that hulk, and
the virgin forest on the other bank of the creek sent
it back in a thundering roll upon the sleeping station.
It must have made some of the pilgrims sit up in their
hovels. A dark figure obscured the lighted doorway
of the manager's hut, vanished, then, a second or
so after, the doorway itself vanished, too. We stopped,
and the silence driven away by the stamping of our
feet flowed back again from the recesses of the land.
The great wall of vegetation, an exuberant and en-
tangled mass of trunks, branches, leaves, boughs, fes-
toons, motionless in the moonlight, was like a rioting
invasion of soundless life, a rolling wave of plants,
piled up, crested, ready to topple over the creek, to
sweep every little man of us out of his little existence.
And it moved not. A deadened burst of mighty
splashes and snorts reached us from afar, as though
an ichthyosaurus had been taking a bath of glitter in
the great river. 'After all,' said the boiler-maker in a
reasonable tone, 'why shouldn't we get the rivets?'
Why not, indeed! I did not know of any reason why
we shouldn't. 'They'll come in three weeks,' I said,
confidently.
  "But they didn't. Instead of rivets there came an
invasion, an infliction, a visitation. It came in sections
during the next three weeks, each section headed by
a donkey carrying a white man in new clothes and
tan shoes, bowing from that elevation right and left
to the impressed pilgrims. A quarrelsome band of
footsore sulky niggers trod on the heels of the don-
key; a lot of tents, campstools, tin boxes, white cases,
brown bales would be shot down in the court-yard,
and the air of mystery would deepen a little over the
muddle of the station. Five such instalments came,
with their absurd air of disorderly flight with the
loot of innumerable outfit shops and provision stores,
that, one would think, they were lugging, after a
raid, into the wilderness for equitable division. It was
an inextricable mess of things decent in themselves
but that human folly made look like the spoils of
thieving.
  "This devoted band called itself the Eldorado
Exploring Expedition, and I believe they were sworn
to secrecy. Their talk, however, was the talk of sordid
buccaneers: it was reckless without hardihood, greedy
without audacity, and cruel without courage; there
was not an atom of foresight or of serious intention in
the whole batch of them, and they did not seem aware
these things are wanted for the work of the world.
To tear treasure out of the bowels of the land was
their desire, with no more moral purpose at the back
of it than there is in burglars breaking into a safe.
Who paid the expenses of the noble enterprise I don't
know; but the uncle of our manager was leader of
that lot.
  "In exterior he resembled a butcher in a poor neigh-
bourhood, and his eyes had a look of sleepy cunning.
He carried his fat paunch with ostentation on his
short legs, and during the time his gang infested the
station spoke to no one but his nephew. You could
see these two roaming about all day long with their
heads close together in an everlasting confab.
  "I had given up worrying myself about the rivets.
One's capacity for that kind of folly is more limited
than you would suppose. I said Hang! -- and let
things slide. I had plenty of time for meditation, and
now and then I would give some thought to Kurtz.
I wasn't very interested in him. No. Still, I was curious
to see whether this man, who had come out equipped
with moral ideas of some sort, would climb to the top
after all and how he would set about his work when
there."

                        II

  "One evening as I was lying flat on the deck of my
steamboat, I heard voices approaching -- and there
were the nephew and the uncle strolling along the
bank. I laid my head on my arm again, and had nearly
lost myself in a doze, when somebody said in my ear,
as it were: 'I am as harmless as a little child, but I
don't like to be dictated to. Am I the manager -- or am
I not? I was ordered to send him there. It's incred-
ible.'. . . I became aware that the two were standing
on the shore alongside the forepart of the steamboat,
just below my head. I did not move; it did not occur
to me to move: I was sleepy. 'It is unpleasant,'
grunted the uncle. 'He has asked the Administration
to be sent there,' said the other, 'with the idea of show-
ing what he could do; and I was instructed accord-
ingly. Look at the influence that man must have. Is
it not frightful?' They both agreed it was frightful,
then made several bizarre remarks: 'Make rain and
fine weather -- one man -- the Council -- by the nose' --
bits of absurd sentences that got the better of my
drowsiness, so that I had pretty near the whole of my
wits about me when the uncle said, 'The climate may
do away with this difficulty for you. Is he alone there?'
'Yes,' answered the manager; 'he sent his assistant
down the river with a note to me in these terms:
"Clear this poor devil out of the country, and don't
bother sending more of that sort. I had rather be
alone than have the kind of men you can dispose of
with me." It was more than a year ago. Can you im-
agine such impudence!' 'Anything since then?' asked
the other hoarsely. 'Ivory,' jerked the nephew; 'lots
of it -- prime sort -- lots -- most annoying, from him.'
'And with that?' questioned the heavy rumble. 'In-
voice,' was the reply fired out, so to speak. Then si-
lence. They had been talking about Kurtz.
  "I was broad awake by this time, but, lying per-
fectly at ease, remained still, having no inducement to
change my position. 'How did that ivory come all
this way?' growled the elder man, who seemed very
vexed. The other explained that it had come with a
fleet of canoes in charge of an English half-caste
clerk Kurtz had with him; that Kurtz had apparently
intended to return himself, the station being by that
time bare of goods and stores, but after coming three
hundred miles, had suddenly decided to go back,
which he started to do alone in a small dugout with
four paddlers, leaving the half-caste to continue down
the river with the ivory. The two fellows there seemed
astounded at anybody attempting such a thing. They 
were at a loss for an adequate motive. As to me, I
seemed to see Kurtz for the first time. It was a distinct
glimpse: the dugout, four paddling savages, and the
lone white man turning his back suddenly on the
headquarters, on relief, on thoughts of home -- per-
haps; setting his face towards the depths of the wil-
derness, towards his empty and desolate station. I
did not know the motive. Perhaps he was just simply
a fine fellow who stuck to his work for its own sake.
His name, you understand, had not been pronounced
once. He was 'that man.' The half caste, who, as far
as I could see, had conducted a difficult trip with great
prudence and pluck, was invariably alluded to as
'that scoundrel.' The 'scoundrel' had reported that
the 'man' had been very ill -- had recovered imper-
fectly.... The two below me moved away then a
few paces, and strolled back and forth at some little
distance. I heard: 'Military post -- doctor -- two hun-
dred miles -- quite alone now -- unavoidable delays --
nine months -- no news -- strange rumours.' They ap-
proached again, just as the manager was saying, 'No
one, as far as I know, unless a species of wandering
trader -- a pestilential fellow, snapping ivory from the
natives.' Who was it they were talking about now? I
gathered in snatches that this was some man supposed
to be in Kurtz's district, and of whom the manager
did not approve. 'We will not be free from unfair
competition till one of these fellows is hanged for an
example,' he said. 'Certainly,' grunted the other; 'get
him hanged! Why not? Anything -- anything can be
done in this country. That's what I say; nobody here,
you understand, here, can endanger your position.
And why? You stand the climate -- you outlast them
all. The danger is in Europe; but there before I left
I took care to --' They moved off and whispered,
then their voices rose again. 'The extraordinary series
of delays is not my fault. I did my best.' The fat man
sighed. 'Very sad.' 'And the pestiferous absurdity of
his talk,' continued the other; 'he bothered me enough
when he was here. "Each station should be like a
beacon on the road towards better things, a centre for
trade of course, but also for humanizing, improving,
instructing." Conceive you -- that ass! And he wants
to be manager! No, it's --' Here he got choked by
excessive indignation, and I lifted my head the least
bit. I was surprised to see how near they were --
right under me. I could have spat upon their hats.
They were looking on the ground, absorbed in
thought. The manager was switching his leg with a
slender twig: his sagacious relative lifted his head.
'You have been well since you came out this time?' he
asked. The other gave a start. 'Who? I? Oh! Like a
charm -- like a charm. But the rest -- oh, my goodness!
All sick. They die so quick, too, that I haven't the
time to send them out of the country -- it's incredible!'
'H'm. Just so,' grunted the uncle. 'Ah! my boy, trust
to this -- I say, trust to this.' I saw him extend his
short flipper of an arm for a gesture that took in the
forest, the creek, the mud, the river -- seemed to
beckon with a dishonouring flourish before the sunlit
face of the land a treacherous appeal to the lurking
death, to the hidden evil, to the profound darkness of
its heart. It was so startling that I leaped to my feet
and looked back at the edge of the forest, as though
I had expected an answer of some sort to that black
display of confidence. You know the foolish notions
that come to one sometimes. The high stillness con-
fronted these two figures with its ominous patience,
waiting for the passing away of a fantastic invasion.
  "They swore aloud together -- out of sheer fright,
I believe -- then pretending not to know anything of
my existence, turned back to the station. The sun was
low; and leaning forward side by side, they seemed
to be tugging painfully uphill their two ridiculous
shadows of unequal length, that trailed behind them
slowly over the tall grass without bending a single
blade.
  "In a few days the Eldorado Expedition went into
the patient wilderness, that dosed upon it as the sea
closes over a diver. Long afterwards the news came
that all the donkeys were dead. I know nothing as to
the fate of the less valuable animals. They, no doubt,
like the rest of us, found what they deserved. I did not
inquire. I was then rather excited at the prospect of
meeting Kurtz very soon. When I say very soon I
mean it comparatively. It was just two months from
the day we left the creek when we came to the bank
below Kurtz's station.
  "Going up that river was like travelling back to the
earliest beginnings of the world, when vegetation
rioted on the earth and the big trees were kings. An
empty stream, a great silence, an impenetrable forest.
The air was warm, thick, heavy, sluggish. There was
no joy in the brilliance of sunshine. The long stretches
of the waterway ran on, deserted, into the gloom of
over-shadowed distances. On silvery sandbanks hippos
and alligators sunned themselves side by side. The
broadening waters flowed through a mob of wooded
islands; you lost your way on that river as you would
in a desert, and butted all day long against shoals,
trying to find the channel, till you thought yourself
bewitched and cut off for ever from everything you
had known once -- somewhere -- far away -- in another
existence perhaps. There were moments when one's
past came back to one, as it will sometimes when you
have not a moment to spare to yourself; but it came in
the shape of an unrestful and noisy dream, remembered
with wonder amongst the overwhelming realities
of this strange world of plants, and water, and silence.
And this stillness of life did not in the least resemble
a peace. It was the stillness of an implacable force
brooding over an inscrutable intention. It looked at
you with a vengeful aspect. I got used to it afterwards;
I did not see it any more; I had no time. I had to keep
guessing at the channel; I had to discern, mostly by
inspiration, the signs of hidden banks; I watched for
sunken stones; I was learning to clap my teeth smartly
before my heart flew out, when I shaved by a fluke
some infernal sly old snag that would have ripped the
life out of the tin-pot steamboat and drowned all the
pilgrims; I had to keep a lookout for the signs of
dead wood we could cut up in the night for next day's
steaming. When you have to attend to things of that
sort, to the mere incidents of the surface, the reality --
the reality, I tell you -- fades. The inner truth is hid-
den -- luckily, luckily. But I felt it all the same; I
felt often its mysterious stillness watching me at my
monkey tricks, just as it watches you fellows perform-
ing on your respective tight-ropes for -- what is it?
half-a-crown a tumble --"
  "Try to be civil, Marlow," growled a voice, and I
knew there was at least one listener awake besides
myself.
  "I beg your pardon. I forgot the heartache which
makes up the rest of the price. And indeed what does
the price matter, if the trick be well done? You do
your tricks very well. And I didn't do badly either,
since I managed not to sink that steamboat on my first
trip. It's a wonder to me yet. Imagine a blindfolded
man set to drive a van over a bad road. I sweated and
shivered over that business considerably, I can tell
you. After all, for a seaman, to scrape the bottom of
the thing that's supposed to float all the time under
his care is the unpardonable sin. No one may know of
it, but you never forget the thump -- eh? A blow on
the very heart. You remember it, you dream of it, you
wake up at night and think of it -- years after -- and go
hot and cold all over. I don't pretend to say that
steamboat floated all the time. More than once she
had to wade for a bit, with twenty cannibals splashing
around and pushing. We had enlisted some of these
chaps on the way for a crew. Fine fellows -- cannibals
-- in their place. They were men one could work with,
and I am grateful to them. And, after all, they did
not eat each other before my face: they had brought
along a provision of hippo-meat which went rotten,
and made the mystery of the wilderness stink in my
nostrils. Phoo! I can sniff it now. I had the manager
on board and three or four pilgrims with their staves
-- all complete. Sometimes we came upon a station
close by the bank, clinging to the skirts of the un-
known, and the white men rushing out of a tumble-
down hovel, with great gestures of joy and surprise
and welcome, seemed very strange -- had the appear-
ance of being held there captive by a spell. The word
ivory would ring in the air for a while -- and on we
went again into the silence, along empty reaches,
round the still bends, between the high walls of our
winding way, reverberating in hollow claps the pon-
derous beat of the stern-wheel. Trees, trees, millions
of trees, massive, immense, running up high; and
at their foot, hugging the bank against the stream,
crept the little begrimed steamboat, like a sluggish
beetle crawling on the floor of a lofty portico. It made
you feel very small, very lost, and yet it was not alto-
gether depressing, that feeling. After all, if you were
small, the grimy beetle crawled on -- which was just
what you wanted it to do. Where the pilgrims im-
agined it crawled to I don't know. To some place
where they expected to get something. I bet! For me
it crawled towards Kurtz -- exclusively; but when the
steam-pipes started leaking we crawled very slow.
The reaches opened before us and closed behind, as if
the forest had stepped leisurely across the water to
bar the way for our return. We penetrated deeper and
deeper into the heart of darkness. It was very quiet
there. At night sometimes the roll of drums behind
the curtain of trees would run up the river and remain
sustained faintly, as if hovering in the air high over
our heads, till the first break of day. Whether it meant
war, peace, or prayer we could not tell. The dawns
were heralded by the descent of a chill stillness; the
wood-cutters slept, their fires burned low; the snap-
ping of a twig would make you start. We were wan-
derers on a prehistoric earth, on an earth that wore the
aspect of an unknown planet. We could have fancied
ourselves the first of men taking possession of an ac-
cursed inheritance, to be subdued at the cost of pro-
found anguish and of excessive toil. But suddenly,
as we struggled round a bend, there would be a
glimpse of rush walls, of peaked grass-roofs, a burst
of yells, a whirl of black limbs, a mass of hands clap-
ping, of feet stamping, of bodies swaying, of eyes
rolling, under the droop of heavy and motionless
foliage. The steamer toiled along slowly on the edge
of a black and incomprehensible frenzy. The prehis-
toric man was cursing us, praying to us, welcoming us
-- who could tell? We were cut off from the compre-
hension of our surroundings; we glided past like
phantoms, wondering and secretly appalled, as sane
men would be before an enthusiastic outbreak in a
madhouse. We could not understand because we were
too far and could not remember because we were
travelling in the night of first ages, of those ages that
are gone, leaving hardly a sign -- and no memories.
  "The earth seemed unearthly. We are accustomed
to look upon the shackled form of a conquered mon-
ster, but there -- there you could look at a thing mon-
strous and free. It was unearthly, and the men were
-- No, they were not inhuman. Well, you know,
that was the worst of it -- this suspicion of their not
being inhuman. It would come slowly to one. They
howled and leaped, and spun, and made horrid faces;
but what thrilled you was just the thought of their
humanity -- like yours -- the thought of your remote
kinship with this wild and passionate uproar. Ugly.
Yes, it was ugly enough; but if you were man enough
you would admit to yourself that there was in you just
the faintest trace of a response to the terrible frank-
ness of that noise, a dim suspicion of there being a
meaning in it which you -- you so remote from the
night of first ages -- could comprehend. And why not?
The mind of man is capable of anything -- because
everything is in it, all the past as well as all the future.
What was there after all? Joy, fear, sorrow, devotion,
valour, rage -- who can tell? -- but truth -- truth
stripped of its cloak of time. Let the fool gape and
shudder -- the man knows, and can look on without a
wink. But he must at least be as much of a man as
these on the shore. He must meet that truth with his
own true stuff -- with his own inborn strength. Princi-
ples won't do. Acquisitions, clothes, pretty rags -- rags
that would fly off at the first good shake. No; you
want a deliberate belief. An appeal to me in this fiend-
ish row -- is there? Very well; I hear; I admit, but I
have a voice, too, and for good or evil mine is the
speech that cannot be silenced. Of course, a fool, what
with sheer fright and fine sentiments, is always safe.
Who's that grunting? You wonder I didn't go ashore
for a howl and a dance? Well, no -- I didn't. Fine
sentiments, you say? Fine sentiments, be hanged! I
had no time. I had to mess about with white-lead and
strips of woolen blanket helping to put bandages on
those leaky steampipes -- I tell you. I had to watch
the steering, and circumvent those snags, and get the
tin-pot along by hook or by crook. There was surface-
truth enough in these things to save a wiser man. And
between whiles I had to look after the savage who was
fireman. He was an improved specimen; he could fire
up a vertical boiler. He was there below me, and,
upon my word, to look at him was as edifying as
seeing a dog in a parody of breeches and a feather
hat, walking on his hindlegs. A few months of
training had done for that really fine chap. He
squinted at the steam-gauge and at the water-guage
with an evident effort of intrepidity -- and he had
filed teeth, too, the poor devil, and the wool of his
pate shaved into queer patterns, and three orna-
mental scars on each of his cheeks. He ought to have
been clapping his hands and stamping his feet on the
bank, instead of which he was hard at work, a thrall to
strange witchcraft, full of improving knowledge. He
was useful because he had been instructed; and what
he knew was this -- that should the water in that trans-
parent thing disappear, the evil spirit inside the
boiler would get angry through the greatness of his
thirst, and take a terrible vengeance. So he sweated
and watched the glass fearfully (with an impromptu
charm, made of rags, tied to his arm, and a piece of
polished bone, as big as a watch, stuck flatways through
his lower lip), while the wooded banks slipped past
us slowly, the short noise was left behind, the inter-
minable miles of silence -- and we crept on, towards
Kurtz. But the snags were thick, the water was treach-
erous and shallow, the boiler seemed indeed to have
a sulky devil in it, and thus neither that fireman nor
I had any time to peer into our creepy thoughts.
  "Some fifty miles below the Inner Station we came
upon a hut of reeds, an inclined and melancholy pole,
with the unrecognizable tatters of what had been a
flag of some sort flying from it, and a neatly stacked
woodpile. This was unexpected. We came to the bank,
and on the stack of firewood found a flat piece of
board with some faded pencil-writing on it. When de-
ciphered it said: 'Wood for you. Hurry up. Approach
cautiously.' There was a signature, but it was illegible
-- not Kurtz -- a much longer word. 'Hurry up.'
Where? Up the river? 'Approach cautiously.' We had
not done so. But the warning could not have been
meant for the place where it could be only found
after approach. Something was wrong above. But
what -- and how much? That was the question. We
commented adversely upon the imbecility of that
telegraphic style. The bush around said nothing, and
would not let us look very far either. A torn curtain
of red twill hung in the doorway of the hut, and
flapped sadly in our faces. The dwelling was dis-
mantled; but we could see a white man had lived
there not very long ago. There remained a rude table
-- a plank on two posts; a heap of rubbish reposed in
a dark corner, and by the door I picked up a book. It
had lost its covers, and the pages had been thumbed
into a state of extremely dirty softness; but the back
had been lovingly stitched afresh with white cotton
thread, which looked clean yet. It was an extraordi-
nary find. Its title was, An Inquiry into some Points
of Seamanship, by a man Towser, Towson -- some such
name -- Master in his Majesty's Navy. The matter
looked dreary reading enough, with illustrative dia-
grams and repulsive tables of figures, and the copy
was sixty years old. I handled this amazing antiquity
with the greatest possible tenderness, lest it should
dissolve in my hands. Within, Towson or Towser was
inquiring earnestly into the breaking strain of ships'
chains and tackle, and other such matters. Not a very
enthralling book; but at the first glance you could
see there a singleness of intention, an honest concern
for the right way of going to work, which made these
humble pages, thought out so many years ago, lumi-
nous with another than a professional light. The
simple old sailor, with his talk of chains and purchases,
made me forget the jungle and the pilgrims in a deli-
cious sensation of having come upon something unmis-
takably real. Such a book being there was wonderful
enough but still more astounding were the notes pen-
cilled in the margin, and plainly referring to the text.
I couldn't believe my eyes! They were in cipher! Yes,
it looked like cipher. Fancy a man lugging with him
a book of that description into this nowhere and
studying it -- and making notes -- in cipher at that! It
was an extravagant mystery.
  "I had been dimly aware for some time of a worry-
ing noise, and when I lifted my eyes I saw the wood-
pile was gone, and the manager, aided by all the pil-
grims, was shouting at me from the riverside. I
slipped the book into my pocket. I assure you to leave
off reading was like tearing myself away from the
shelter of an old and solid friendship.
  "I started the lame engine ahead. 'It must be this
miserable trader -- this intruder,' exclaimed the man-
ager, looking back malevolently at the place we had
left. 'He must be English,' I said. 'It will not save
him from getting into trouble if he is not careful,'
muttered the manager darkly. I observed with as-
sumed innocence that no man was safe from trouble
in this world.
  "The current was more rapid now, the steamer
seemed at her last gasp, the stern-wheel flopped lan-
guidly, and I caught myself listening on tiptoe for the
next beat of the boat, for in sober truth I expected the
wretched thing to give up every moment. It was like
watching the last flickers of a life. But still we crawled.
Sometimes I would pick out a tree a little way ahead
to measure our progress towards Kurtz by, but I lost
it invariably before we got abreast. To keep the eyes
so long on one thing was too much for human patience.
The manager displayed a beautiful resignation. I
fretted and fumed and took to arguing with myself
whether or no I would talk openly with Kurtz; but
before I could come to any conclusion it occurred to
me that my speech or my silence, indeed any action
of mine, would be a mere futility. What did it matter
what any one knew or ignored? What did it matter
who was manager? One gets sometimes such a flash
of insight. The essentials of this affair lay deep under
the surface, beyond my reach, and beyond my power
of meddling.
  "Towards the evening of the second day we judged
ourselves about eight miles from Kurtz's station. I
wanted to push on; but the manager looked grave,
and told me the navigation up there was so dangerous
that it would be advisable, the sun being very low
already, to wait where we were till next morning.
Moreover, he pointed out that if the warning to ap-
proach cautiously were to be followed, we must ap-
proach in daylight -- not at dusk or in the dark. This
was sensible enough. Eight miles meant nearly three
hours' steaming for us, and I could also see suspicious
ripples at the upper end of the reach. Nevertheless,
I was annoyed beyond expression at the delay, and
most unreasonably, too, since one night more could
not matter much after so many months. As we had
plenty of wood, and caution was the word, I brought
up in the middle of the stream. The reach was narrow,
straight, with high sides like a railway cutting. The
dusk came gliding into it long before the sun had set.
The current ran smooth and swift, but a dumb immo-
bility sat on the banks. The living trees, lashed to-
gether by the creepers and every living bush of the
undergrowth, might have been changed into stone,
even to the slenderest twig, to the lightest leaf. It
was not sleep -- it seemed unnatural, like a state of
trance. Not the faintest sound of any kind could be
heard. You looked on amazed, and began to suspect
yourself of being deaf-- then the night came sud-
denly, and struck you blind as well. About three in the
morning some large fish leaped, and the loud splash
made me jump as though a gun had been fired. When
the sun rose there was a white fog, very warm and
clammy, and more blinding than the night. It did not
shift or drive; it was just there, standing all round
you like something solid. At eight or nine, perhaps, it
lifted as a shutter lifts. We had a glimpse of the
towering multitude of trees, of the immense matted
jungle, with the blazing little ball of the sun hanging
over it -- all perfectly still -- and then the white shutter
came down again, smoothly, as if sliding in greased
grooves. I ordered the chain, which we had begun to
heave in, to be paid out again. Before it stopped run-
ning with a muffled rattle, a cry, a very loud cry, as of
infinite desolation, soared slowly in the opaque air. It
ceased. A complaining clamour, modulated in savage
discords, filled our ears. The sheer unexpectedness of
it made my hair stir under my cap. I don't know how
it struck the others: to me it seemed as though the
mist itself had screamed, so suddenly, and apparently
from all sides at once, did this tumultuous and mourn-
ful uproar arise. It culminated in a hurried outbreak
of almost intolerably escessive shrieking, which
stopped short, leaving us stiffened in a variety of silly
attitudes, and obstinately listening to the nearly as
appalling and excessive silence. 'Good God! What is
the meaning --' stammered at my elbow one of the
pilgrims -- a little fat man, with sandy hair and red
whiskers, who wore sidespring boots, and pink py-
jamas tucked into his socks. Two others remained
open-mouthed a whole minute, then dashed into the
little cabin, to rush out incontinently and stand dart-
ing scared glances, with Winchesters at 'ready' in
their hands. What we could see was just the steamer
we were on, her outlines blurred as though she had
been on the point of dissolving, and a misty strip of
water, perhaps two feet broad, around her -- and that
was all. The rest of the world was nowhere, as far as
our eyes and ears were concerned. Just nowhere.
Gone, disappeared; swept off without leaving a
whisper or a shadow behind.
  "I went forward, and ordered the chain to be
hauled in short, so as to be ready to trip the anchor
and move the steamboat at once if necessary. 'Will
they attack?' whispered an awed voice. 'We will be
all butchered in this fog,' murmured another. The
faces twitched with the strain, the hands trembled
slightly, the eyes forgot to wink. It was very curious
to see the contrast of expressions of the white men
and of the black fellows of our crew, who were as
much strangers to that part of the river as we, though
their homes were only eight hundred miles away.
The whites, of course greatly discomposed, had be-
sides a curious look of being painfully shocked by such
an outrageous row. The others had an alert, naturally
interested expression; but their faces were essentially
quiet, even those of the one or two who grinned as
they hauled at the chain. Several exchanged short,
grunting phrases, which seemed to settle the matter
to their satisfaction. Their headman, a young, broad-
chested black, severely draped in darkblue fringed
cloths, with fierce nostrils and his hair all done up
artfully in oily ringlets, stood near me. 'Aha!' I said,
just for good fellowship's sake. 'Catch 'im,' he
snapped, with a bloodshot widening of his eyes and
a flash of sharp teeth -- 'catch 'im. Give 'im to us."To
you, eh?' I asked; 'what would you do with them?'
'Eat 'im!' he said curtly, and, leaning his elbow on the
rail, looked out into the fog in a dignified and pro-
foundly pensive attitude. I would no doubt have been
properly horrified, had it not occurred to me that he
and his chaps must be very hungry: that they must
have been growing increasingly hungry for at least
this month past. They had been engaged for six
months (I don't think a single one of them had any
clear idea of time, as we at the end of countless ages
have. They still belonged to the beginnings of time --
had no inherited experience to teach them as it were),
and of course, as long as there was a piece of paper
written over in accordance with some farcical law or
other made down the river, it didn't enter anybody's
head to trouble how they would live. Certainly they
had brought with them some rotten hippo-meat, which
couldn't have lasted very long, anyway, even if the
pilgrims hadn't, in the midst of a shocking hullabaloo,
thrown a considerable quantity of it overboard. It
looked like a high-handed proceeding; but it was
really a case of legitimate self-defence. You can't
breathe dead hippo waking, sleeping, and eating, and
at the same time keep your precarious grip on exist-
ence. Besides that, they had given them every week
three pieces of brass wire, each about nine inches long;
and the theory was they were to buy their provisions
with that currency in riverside villages. You can see
how that worked. There were either no villages, or
the people were hostile, or the director, who like the
rest of us fed out of tins, with an occasional old he-goat
thrown in, didn't want to stop the steamer for some
more or less recondite reason. So, unless they swal-
lowed the wire itself, or made loops of it to snare the
fishes with, I don't see what good their extravagant
salary could be to them. I must say it was paid with a
regularity worthy of a large and honourable trading
company. For the rest, the only thing to eat -- though
it didn't look eatable in the least -- I saw in their pos-
session was a few lumps of some stuff like half-cooked
dough, of a dirty lavender colour, they kept wrapped
in leaves, and now and then swallowed a piece of,
but so small that it seemed done more for the looks of
the thing than for any serious purpose of sustenance.
Why in the name of all the gnawing devils of hunger
they didn't go for us -- they were thirty to five -- and
have a good tuck-in for once, amazes me now when I
think of it. They were big powerful men, with not
much capacity to weigh the consequences, with cour-
age, with strength, even yet, though their skins were
no longer glossy and their muscles no longer hard.
And I saw that something restraining, one of those
human secrets that baffle probability, had come into
play there. I looked at them with a swift quickening of
interest -- not because it occurred to me I might be
eaten by them before very long, though I own to you
that just then I perceived -- in a new light, as it were
-- how unwholesome the pilgrims looked, and I
hoped, yes, I positively hoped, that my aspect was not
so -- what shall I say? -- so -- unappetizing: a touch of
fantastic vanity which fitted well with the dream-sen-
sation that pervaded all my days at that time. Perhaps
I had a little fever, too. One can't live with one's finger
everlastingly on one's pulse. I had often 'a little
fever,' or a little touch of other things -- the playful
paw-strokes of the wilderness, the preliminary trifling
before the more serious onslaught which came in due
course. Yes; I looked at them as you would on any
human being, with a curiosity of their impulses,
motives, capacities, weaknesses, when brought to the
test of an inexorable physical necessity. Restraint!
What possible restraint? Was it superstition, disgust,
patience, fear -- or some kind of primitive honour? No
fear can stand up to hunger, no patience can wear it out,
disgust simply does not exist where hunger is; and as
to superstition, beliefs, and what you may call princi-
ples, they are less than chaff in a breeze. Don't you
know the devilry of lingering starvation, its exasperat-
ing torment, its black thoughts, its sombre and brood-
ing ferocity? Well, I do. It takes a man all his inborn
strength to fight hunger properly. It's really easier to
face bereavement, dishonour, and the perdition of
one's soul -- than this kind of prolonged hunger. Sad,
but true. And these chaps, too, had no earthly reason
for any kind of scruple. Restraint! I would just as
soon have expected restraint from a hyena prowling
amongst the corpses of a battlefield. But there was the
fact facing me -- the fact dazzling, to be seen, like the
foam on the depths of the sea, like a ripple on an un-
fathomable enigma, a mystery greater -- when I
thought of it -- than the curious, inexplicable note of
desperate grief in this savage clamour that had swept
by us on the river-bank, behind the blind whiteness of
the fog.
  "Two pilgrims were quarrelling in hurried whis-
pers as to which bank. 'Left.' 'No, no; how can you?
Right, right, of course.' 'It is very serious,' said the
manager's voice behind me; 'I would be desolated if
anything should happen to Mr. Kurtz before we came
up.' I looked at him, and had not the slightest doubt
he was sincere. He was just the kind of man who
would wish to preserve appearances. That was his re-
straint. But when he muttered something about going
on at once, I did not even take the trouble to answer
him. I knew, and he knew, that it was impossible.
Were we to let go our hold of the bottom, we would
be absolutely in the air -- in space. We wouldn't be
able to tell where we were going to -- whether up or
down stream, or across -- till we fetched against one
bank or the other -- and then we wouldn't know at
first which it was. Of course I made no move. I had
no mind for a smash-up. You couldn't imagine a more
deadly place for a shipwreck. Whether drowned at
once or not, we were sure to perish speedily in one
way or another. 'I authorize you to take all the risks,'
he said, after a short silence. 'I refuse to take any,' I
said shortly; which was just the answer he expected,
though its tone might have surprised him. 'Well, I
must defer to your judgment. You are captain,' he
said with marked civility. I turned my shoulder to him
in sign of my appreciation, and looked into the fog.
How long would it last? It was the most hopeless
lookout. The approach to this Kurtz grubbing for
ivory in the wretched bush was beset by as many dan-
gers as though he had been an enchanted princess
sleeping in a fabulous castle. 'Will they attack, do you
think?' asked the manager, in a confidential tone.
  "I did not think they would attack, for several
obvious reasons. The thick fog was one. If they left
the bank in their canoes they would get lost in it, as
we would be if we attempted to move. Still, I had
also judged the jungle of both banks quite impene-
trable -- and yet eyes were in it, eyes that had seen us.
The riverside bushes were certainly very thick; but
the undergrowth behind was evidently penetrable.
However, during the short lift I had seen no canoes
anywhere in the reach -- certainly not abreast of the
steamer. But what made the idea of attack inconceiv-
able to me was the nature of the noise -- of the cries
we had heard. They had not the fierce character
boding immediate hostile intention. Unexpected,
wild, and violent as they had been, they had given
me an irresistible impression of sorrow. The glimpse
of the steamboat had for some reason filled those
savages with unrestrained grief. The danger, if any,
I expounded, was from our proximity to a great
human passion let loose. Even extreme grief may ul-
timately vent itself in violence -- but more generally
takes the form of apathy....
  "You should have seen the pilgrims stare! They
had no heart to grin, or even to revile me: but I be-
lieve they thought me gone mad -- with fright, maybe.
I delivered a regular lecture. My dear boys, it was no
good bothering. Keep a lookout? Well, you may guess
I watched the fog for the signs of lifting as a cat
watches a mouse; but for anything else our eyes were
of no more use to us than if we had been buried miles
deep in a heap of cotton-wool. It feIt like it, too --
choking, warm, stifling. Besides, all I said, though it
sounded extravagant, was absolutely true to fact.
What we afterwards alluded to as an attack was
really an attempt at repulse. The action was very far
from being aggressive -- it was not even defensive, in
the usual sense: it was undertaken under the stress of
desperation, and in its essence was purely protective.
  "It developed itself, I should say, two hours after
the fog lifted, and its commencement was at a spot,
roughly speaking, about a mile and a half below
Kurtz's station. We had just floundered and flopped
round a bend, when I saw an islet, a mere grassy hum-
mock of bright green, in the middle of the stream.
It was the only thing of the kind; but as we opened
the reach more, I perceived it was the head of a long
sand-bank, or rather of a chain of shallow patches
stretching down the middle of the river. They were
discoloured, just awash, and the whole lot was seen
just under the water, exactly as a man's backbone is
seen running down the middle of his back under the
skin. Now, as far as I did see, I could go to the right
or to the left of this. I didn't know either channel, of
course. The banks looked pretty well alike, the depth
appeared the same; but as I had been informed the
station was on the west side, I naturally headed for
the western passage.
  "No sooner had we fairly entered it than I became
aware it was much narrower than I had supposed. To
the left of us there was the long uninterrupted shoal,
and to the right a high, steep bank heavily overgrown
with bushes. Above the bush the trees stood in serried
ranks. The twigs overhung the current thickly, and
from distance to distance a large limb of some tree
projected rigidly over the stream. It was then well on
in the afternoon, the face of the forest was gloomy,
and a broad strip of shadow had already fallen on the
water. In this shadow we steamed up -- very slowly, as
you may imagine. I sheered her well inshore -- the
water being deepest near the bank, as the sounding-
pole informed me.
  "One of my hungry and forbearing friends was
sounding in the bows just below me. This steamboat
was exactly like a decked scow. On the deck, there
were two little teakwood houses, with doors and win-
dows. The boiler was in the fore-end, and the ma-
chinery right astern. Over the whole there was a light
roof, supported on stanchions. The funnel projected
through that roof, and in front of the funnel a small
cabin built of light planks served for a pilot-house. It
contained a couch, two camp-stools, a loaded Martini-
Henry leaning in one corner, a tiny table, and the
steering-wheel. It had a wide door in front and a
broad shutter at each side. All these were always
thrown open, of course. I spent my days perched up
there on the extreme fore-end of that roof, before the
door. At night I slept, or tried to, on the couch. An
athletic black belonging to some coast tribe and edu-
cated by my poor predecessor, was the helmsman. He
sported a pair of brass earrings, wore a blue cloth
wrapper from the waist to the ankles, and thought all
the world of himself. He was the most unstable kind
of fool I had ever seen. He steered with no end of a
swagger while you were by; but if he lost sight of
you, he became instantly the prey of an abject funk,
and would let that cripple of a steamboat get the upper
hand of him in a minute.
  "I was looking down at the sounding-pole, and
feeling much annoyed to see at each try a little more
of it stick out of that river, when I saw my poleman
give up the business suddenly, and stretch himself flat
on the deck, without even taking the trouble to haul his
pole in. He kept hold on it though, and it trailed in
the water. At the same time the fireman, whom I
could also see below me, sat down abruptly before his
furnace and ducked his head. I was amazed. Then I
had to look at the river mighty quick, because there
was a snag in the fairway. Sticks, little sticks, were
flying about -- thick: they were whizzing before my
nose, dropping below me, striking behind me against
my pilot-house. All this time the river, the shore, the
woods, were very quiet -- perfectly quiet. I could only
hear the heavy splashing thump of the stern-wheel
and the patter of these things. We cleared the snag
clumsily. Arrows, by Jove! We were being shot at!
I stepped in quickly to close the shutter on the land-
side. That fool-helmsman, his hands on the spokes,
was lifting his knees high, stamping his feet, champing
his mouth, like a reined-in horse. Confound him! And
we were staggering within ten feet of the bank. I
had to lean right out to swing the heavy shutter, and I
saw a face amongst the leaves on the level with my
own, looking at me very fierce and steady; and then
suddenly, as though a veil had been removed from
my eyes, I made out, deep in the tangled gloom,
naked breasts, arms, legs, glaring eyes -- the bush was
swarming with human limbs in movement, glistening,
of bronze colour. The twigs shook, swayed, and
rustled, the arrows flew out of them, and then the
shutter came to. 'Steer her straight,' I said to the
helmsman. He held his head rigid, face forward; but
his eyes rolled, he kept on lifting and setting down
his feet gently, his mouth foamed a little. 'Keep
quiet!' I said in a fury. I might just as well have
ordered a tree not to sway in the wind. I darted out.
Below me there was a great scuffle of feet on the iron
deck; confused exclamations; a voice screamed, 'Can
you turn back?' I caught sight of a V-shaped ripple on
the water ahead. What? Another snag! A fusillade
burst out under my feet. The pilgrims had opened
with their Winchesters, and were simply squirting
lead into that bush. A deuce of a lot of smoke came
up and drove slowly forward. I swore at it. Now I
couldn't see the ripple or the snag either. I stood in
the doorway, peering, and the arrows came in swarms.
They might have been poisoned, but they looked as
though they wouldn't kill a cat. The bush began to
howl. Our wood-cutters raised a warlike whoop; the
report of a rifle just at my back deafened me. I glanced
over my shoulder, and the pilot-house was yet full of
noise and smoke when I made a dash at the wheel.
The fool-nigger had dropped everything, to throw
the shutter open and let off that Martini-Henry. He
stood before the wide opening, glaring, and I yelled
at him to come back, while I straightened the sudden
twist out of that steamboat. There was no room to
turn even if I had wanted to, the snag was somewhere
very near ahead in that confounded smoke, there was
no time to lose, so I just crowded her into the bank --
right into the bank, where I knew the water was deep.
"We tore slowly along the overhanging bushes in
a whirl of broken twigs and flying leaves. The fusil-
lade below stopped short, as I had foreseen it would
when the squirts got empty. I threw my head back to
a glinting whizz that traversed the pilot-house, in at
one shutter-hole and out at the other. Looking past that
mad helmsman, who was shaking the empty rifle and
yelling at the shore, I saw vague forms of men run-
ning bent double, leaping, gliding, distinct, incom-
plete, evanescent. Something big appeared in the air
before the shutter, the rifle went overboard, and the
man stepped back swiftly, looked at me over his
shoulder in an extraordinary, profound, familiar man-
ner, and fell upon my feet. The side of his head hit
the wheel twice, and the end of what appeared a long
cane clattered round and knocked over a little camp-
stool. It looked as though after wrenching that thing
from somebody ashore he had lost his balance in the
effort. The thin smoke had blown away, we were clear
of the snag, and looking ahead I could see that in
another hundred yards or so I would be free to sheer
off, away from the bank; but my feet felt so very
warm and wet that I had to look down. The man had
rolled on his back and stared straight up at me; both
his hands clutched that cane. It was the shaft of a
spear that, either thrown or lunged through the open-
ing, had caught him in the side just below the ribs;
the blade had gone in out of sight, after making a
frightful gash; my shoes were full; a pool of blood
lay very still, gleaming dark-red under the wheel; his
eyes shone with an amazing lustre. The fusillade burst
out again. He looked at me anxiously, gripping the
spear like something precious, with an air of being
afraid I would try to take it away from him. I had to
make an effort to free my eyes from his gaze and
attend to the steering. With one hand I felt above my
head for the line of the steam whistle, and jerked out
screech after screech hurriedly. The tumult of angry
and warlike yells was checked instantly, and then from
the depths of the woods went out such a tremulous
and prolonged wail of mournful fear and utter despair
as may be imagined to follow the flight of the last
hope from the earth. There was a great commotion in
the bush; the shower of arrows stopped, a few drop-
ping shots rang out sharply -- then silence, in which
the languid beat of the stern-wheel came plainly to
my ears. I put the helm hard a-starboard at the mo-
ment when the pilgrim in pink pyjamas, very hot and
agitated, appeared in the doorway. 'The manager
sends me --' he began in an official tone, and stopped
short. 'Good God!' he said, glaring at the wounded
man.
  "We two whites stood over him, and his lustrous
and inquiring glance enveloped us both. I declare it
looked as though he would presently put to us some
question in an understandable language; but he died
without uttering a sound, without moving a limb,
without twitching a muscle. Only in the very last
moment, as though in response to some sign we could
not see, to some whisper we could not hear, he
frowned heavily, and that frown gave to his black
death-mask an inconceivably sombre, brooding, and
menacing expression. The lustre of inquiring glance
faded swiftly into vacant glassiness. 'Can you steer?'
I asked the agent eagerly. He looked very dubious; but
I made a grab at his arm, and he understood at once
I meant him to steer whether or no. To tell you the
truth, I was morbidly anxious to change my shoes and
socks. 'He is dead,' murmured the fellow, immensely
impressed. 'No doubt about it,' said I, tugging like
mad at the shoe laces. 'And by the way, I suppose Mr.
Kurtz is dead as well by this time.'
  "For the moment that was the dominant thought.
There was a sense of extreme disappointment, as
though I had found out I had been striving after some-
thing altogether without a substance. I couldn't have
been more disgusted if I had travelled all this way
for the sole purpose of talking with Mr. Kurtz. Talk-
ing with . . . I flung one shoe overboard, and became
aware that that was exactly what I had been looking
forward to -- a talk with Kurtz. I made the strange
discovery that I had never imagined him as doing,
you know, but as discoursing. I didn't say to myself,
'Now I will never see him,' or 'Now I will never shake
him by the hand,' but, 'Now I will never hear him.'
The man presented himself as a voice. Not of course
that I did not connect him with some sort of action.
Hadn't I been told in all the tones of jealousy and
admiration that he had collected, bartered, swindled,
or stolen more ivory than all the other agents to-
gether? That was not the point. The point was in his
being a gifted creature, and that of all his gifts the
one that stood out preeminently, that carried with it
a sense of real presence, was his ability to talk, his
words -- the gift of expression, the bewildering, the
illuminating, the most exalted and the most con-
temptible, the pulsating stream of light, or the deceit-
ful flow from the heart of an impenetrable darkness.
  "The other shoe went flying unto the devil-god of
that river. I thought, 'By Jove! it's all over. We are
too late; he has vanished -- the gift has vanished, by
means of some spear, arrow, or club. I will never hear
that chap speak after all' -- and my sorrow had a star-
tling extravagance of emotion, even such as I had
noticed in the howling sorrow of these savages in the
bush. I couldn't have felt more of lonely desolation
somehow, had I been robbed of a belief or had missed
my destiny in life.... Why do you sigh in this
beastly way, somebody? Absurd? Well, absurd. Good
Lord! mustn't a man ever -- Here, give me some
tobacco."... 
  There was a pause of profourd stillness, then a
match flared, and Marlow's lean face appeared, worn,
hollow, with downward folds and dropped eyelids,
with an aspect of concentrated abtention; and as he
took vigorous draws at his pipe, it seemed to retreat
and advance out of the night in the regular flicker of
tiny flame. The match went out.
  "Absurd!" he cried. "This is the worst of trying to
tell.... Here you all are, each moored with two
good addresses, like a hulk with two anchors, a butcher
round one corner, a policeman round another, excel-
lent appetites, and temperature normal -- you hear --
normal from year's end to year's end. And you say,
Absurd! Absurd be -- exploded! Absurd! My dear
boys, what can you expect from a man who out of
sheer nervousness had just flung overboard a pair of
new shoes! Now I think of it, it is amazing I did not
shed tears. I am, upon the whole, proud of my forti-
tude. I was cut to the quick at the idea of having lost
the inestimable privilege of listening to the gifted
Kurtz. Of course I was wrong. The privilege was
waiting for me. Oh, yes, I heard more than enough.
And I was right, too. A voice. He was very little more
than a voice. And I heard -- him -- it -- this voice -- other
voices -- all of them were so little more than voices --
and the memory of that time itself lingers around me,
impalpable, like a dying vibration of one immense
jabber, silly, atrocious, sordid, savage, or simply mean,
without any kind of sense. Voices, voices -- even the
girl herself -- now --"
  He was silent for a long time.
  "I laid the ghost of his gifts at last with a lie," he
began, suddenly. "Girl! What? Did I mention a girl?
Oh, she is out of it -- completely. They -- the women
I mean -- are out of it -- should be out of it. We must
help them to stay in that beautiful world of their own,
lest ours gets worse. Oh, she had to be out of it. You
should have heard the disinterred body of Mr. Kurtz
saying, 'My Intended.' You would have perceived
directly then how completely she was out of it. And
the lofty frontal bone of Mr. Kurtz! They say the
hair goes on growing sometimes, but this -- ah -- speci-
men, was impressively bald. The wilderness had
patted him on the head, and, behold, it was like a ball
-- an ivory ball; it had caressed him, and -- lo! -- he
had withered; it had taken him, loved him, embraced
him, got into his veins, consumed his flesh, and sealed
his soul to its own by the inconceivable ceremonies of
some devilish initiation. He was its spoiled and pam-
pered favourite. Ivory? I should think so. Heaps of
it, stacks of it. The old mud shanty was bursting with
it. You would think there was not a single tusk left
either above or below the ground in the whole
country. 'Mostly fossil,' the manager had remarked,
disparagingly. It was no more fossil than I am; but
they call it fossil when it is dug up. It appears these
niggers do bury the tusks sometimes -- but evidently
they couldn't bury this parcel deep enough to save the
gifted Mr. Kurtz from his fate. We filled the steam-
boat with it, and had to pile a lot on the deck. Thus
he could see and enjoy as long as he could see, because
the appreciation of this favour had remained with him
to the last. You should have heard him say, 'My
ivory.' Oh, yes, I heard him. 'My Intended, my ivory,
my station, my river, my --' everything belonged
to him. It made me hold my breath in expectation of
hearing the wilderness burst into a prodigious peal
of laughter that would shake the fixed stars in their
places. Everything belonged to him -- but that was a
trifle. The thing was to know what he belonged to,
how many powers of darkness claimed him for their
own. That was the reflection that made you creepy all
over. It was impossible -- it was not good for one either
-- trying to imagine. He had taken a high seat amongst
the devils of the land -- I mean literally. You can't
understand. How could you? -- with solid pavement
under your feet, surrounded by kind neighbours
ready to cheer you or to fall on you, stepping deli-
cately between the butcher and the policeman, in
the holy terror of scandal and gallows and lunatic
asylums -- how can you imagine what particular region
of the first ages a man's untrammelled feet may take
him into by the way of solitude -- utter solitude
without a policeman -- by the way of silence -- utter
silence, where no warning voice of a kind neighbour
can be heard whispering of public opinion? These
little things make all the great difference. When they
are gone you must fall back upon your own innate
strength, upon your own capacity for faithfulness. Of
course you may be too much of a fool to go wrong -- 
too dull even to know you are being assaulted by the
powers of darkness. I take it, no fool ever made a
bargain for his soul with the devil; the fool is too
much of a fool, or the devil too much of a devil
-- I don't know which. Or you may be such a
thunderingly exalted creature as to be altogether
deaf and blind to anything but heavenly sights and
sounds. Then the earth for you is only a standing
place -- and whether to be like this is your loss or
your gain I won't pretend to say. But most of us are
neither one nor the other. The earth for us is a
place to live in, where we must put up with sights,
with sounds, with smells, too, by Jove! -- breathe
dead hippo, so to speak, and not be contaminated. And
there, don't you see? Your strength comes in, the
faith in your ability for the digging of unostentatious
holes to bury the stuff in -- your power of devotion,
not to yourself, but to an obscure back-breaking busi-
ness. And that's difficult enough. Mind, I am not
trying to excuse or even explain -- I am trying to ac-
count to myself for -- for -- Mr. Kurtz -- for the shade
of Mr. Kurtz. This initiated wraith from the back of
Nowhere honoured me with its amazing confidence
before it vanished altogether. This was because it
could speak English to me. The original Kurtz had
been educated partly in England, and -- as he was
good enough to say himself -- his sympathies were in
the right place. His mother was half-English, his
father was half-French. All Europe contributed to
the making of Kurtz; and by and by I learned
that, most appropriately, the International Society
for the Suppression of Savage Customs had intrusted
him with the making of a report, for its future guid-
ance. And he had written it, too. I've seen it. I've
read it. It was eloquent, vibrating with eloquence,
but too high-strung, I think. Seventeen pages of
close writing he had found time for! But this must
have been before his -- let us say -- nerves, went
wrong, and caused him to preside at certain midnight
dances ending with unspeakable rites, which -- as far
as I reluctantly gathered from what I heard at various
times -- were offered up to him -- do you under-
stand? -- to Mr. Kurtz himself. But it was a beautiful
piece of writing. The opening paragraph, however,
in the light of later information, strikes me now as
ominous. He began with the argument that we whites,
from the point of development we had arrived at,
'must necessarily appear to them [savages] in the
nature of supernatural beings -- we approach them
with the might as of a deity,' and so on, and so on. 'By
the simple exercise of our will we can exert a power
for good practically unbounded,' etc., etc. From that
point he soared and took me with him. The peroration
was magnificent, though difficult to remember, you
know. It gave me the notion of an exotic Immensity
ruled by an august Benevolence. It made me tingle
with enthusiasm. This was the unbounded power of
eloquence -- of words -- of burning noble words. There
were no practical hints to interrupt the magic current
of phrases, unless a kind of note at the foot of the last
page, scrawled evidently much later, in an unsteady
hand, may be regarded as the exposition of a method.
It was very simple, and at the end of that moving
appeal to every altruistic sentiment it blazed at you,
luminous and terrifying, like a flash of lightning in a
serene sky: 'Exterminate all the brutes!' The curious
part was that he had apparently forgotten all about
that valuable postscriptum, because, later on, when he
in a sense came to himself, he repeatedly entreated me
to take good care of 'my pamphlet' (he called it), as it
was sure to have in the future a good influence upon
his career. I had full information about all these
things, and, besides, as it turned out, I was to have
the care of his memory. I've done enough for it to
give me the indisputable right to lay it, if I choose,
for an everlasting rest in the dust-bin of progress,
amongst all the sweepings and, figuratively speaking,
all the dead cats of civilization. But then, you see, I
can't choose. He won't be forgotten. Whatever he
was, he was not common. He had the power to charm
or frighten rudimentary souls into an aggravated
witch-dance in his honour; he could also fill the small
souls of the pilgrims with bitter misgivings: he had
one devoted friend at least, and he had conquered one
soul in the world that was neither rudimentary nor
tainted with self-seeking. No; I can't forget him,
though I am not prepared to affirm the fellow was
exactly worth the life we lost in getting to him. I
missed my late helmsman awfully -- I missed him
even while his body was still lying in the pilot-house.
Perhaps you will think it passing strange this regret
for a savage who was no more account than a grain of
sand in a black Sahara. Well, don't you see, he had
done something, he had steered; for months I had
him at my back -- a help -- an instrument. It was a kind
of partnership. He steered for me -- I had to look after
him, I worried about his deficiencies, and thus a subtle
bond had been created, of which I only became aware
when it was suddenly broken. And the intimate pro-
fundity of that look he gave me when he received his
hurt remains to this day in my memory -- like a claim
of distant kinship affirmed in a supreme moment.
  "Poor fool! If he had only left that shutter alone.
He had no restraint, no restraint just like Kurtz -- a
tree swayed by the wind. As soon as I had put on a dry
pair of slippers, I dragged him out, after first jerking
the spear out of his side, which operation I confess I
performed with my eyes shut tight. His heels leaped
together over the little doorstep; his shoulders were
pressed to my breast; I hugged him from behind des-
perately. Oh! he was heavy, heavy; heavier than any
man on earth, I should imagine. Then without more
ado I tipped him overboard. The current snatched
him as though he had been a wisp of grass, and I saw
the body roll over twice before I lost sight of it for
ever. All the pilgrims and the manager were then
congregated on the awning-deck about the pilot-house,
chattering at each other like a flock of excited magpies,
and there was a scandalized murmur at my heartless
promptitude. What they wanted to keep that body
hanging about for I can't guess. Embalm it, maybe.
But I had also heard another, and a very ominous,
murmur on the deck below. My friends the wood-
cutters were likewise scandalized, and with a better
show of reason -- though I admit that the reason itself
was quite inadmissible. Oh, quite! I had made up my
mind that if my late helmsman was to be eaten, the
fishes alone should have him. He had been a very
second-rate helmsman while alive, but now he was
dead he might have become a first-class temptation,
and possibly cause some startling trouble. Besides, I
was anxious to take the wheel, the man in pink py-
jamas showing himself a hopeless duffer at the busi-
ness.
  "This I did directly the simple funeral was over.
We were going half-speed, keeping right in the middle
of the stream, and I listened to the talk about me.
They had given up Kurtz, they had given up the
station; Kurtz was dead, and the station had been
burnt -- and so on -- and so on. The red-haired pilgrim
was beside himself with the thought that at least this
poor Kurtz had been properly avenged. 'Say! We
must have made a glorious slaughter of them in the
bush. Eh? What do you think? Say?' He positively
danced, the bloodthirsty little gingery beggar. And
he had nearly fainted when he saw the wounded man!
I could not help saying, 'You made a glorious lot of
smoke, anyhow.' I had seen, from the way the tops
of the bushes rustled and flew, that almost all the
shots had gone too high. You can't hit anything unless
you take aim and fire from the shoulder; but these
chaps fired from the hip with their eyes shut. The
retreat, I maintained -- and I was right -- was caused
by the screeching of the steam whistle. Upon this
they forgot Kurtz, and began to howl at me with
indignant protests.
  "The manager stood by the wheel murmuring con-
fidentially about the necessity of getting well away
down the river before dark at all events, when I saw
in the distance a clearing on the riverside and the
outlines of some sort of building. 'What's this?' I
asked. He clapped his hands in wonder. 'The station!'
he cried. I edged in at once, still going half-speed.
  "Through my glasses I saw the slope of a hill inter-
spersed with rare trees and perfectly free from under-
growth. A long decaying building on the summit was
half buried in the high grass; the large holes in the
peaked roof gaped black from afar; the jungle and
the woods made a background. There was no en-
closure or fence of any kind; but there had been one
apparently, for near the house half-a-dozen slim posts
remained in a row, roughly trimmed, and with their
upper ends ornamented with round carved balls. The
rails, or whatever there had been between, had dis-
appeared. Of course the forest surrounded all that.
The river-bank was clear, and on the waterside I saw
a white man under a hat like a cartwheel beckoning
persistently with his whole arm. Examining the edge
of the forest above and below, I was almost certain I
could see movements -- human forms gliding here and
there. I steamed past prudently, then stopped the
engines and let her drift down. The man on the shore
began to shout, urging us to land. 'We have been at-
tacked,' screamed the manager. 'I know -- I know. It's
all right,' yelled back the other, as cheerful as you
please. 'Come along. It's all right. I am glad.'
  "His aspect reminded me of something I had seen
-- something funny I had seen somewhere. As I
manoeuvred to get alongside, I was asking myself,
'What does this fellow look like?' Suddenly I got it.
He looked like a harlequin. His clothes had been
made of some stuff that was brown holland probably,
but it was covered with patches all over, with bright
patches, blue, red, and yellow -- patches on the back,
patches on the front, patches on elbows, on knees;
coloured binding around his jacket, scarlet edging at
the bottom of his trousers; and the sunshine made
him look extremely gay and wonderfully neat withal,
because you could see how beautifully all this patching
had been done. A beardless, boyish face, very fair, no
features to speak of, nose peeling, little blue eyes,
smiles and frowns chasing each other over that open
countenance like sunshine and shadow on a wind-
swept plain. 'Look out, captain!' he cried; 'there's a
snag lodged in here last night.' What! Another snag?
I confess I swore shamefully. I had nearly holed my
cripple, to finish off that charming trip. The harlequin
on the bank turned his little pug-nose up to me. 'You
English?' he asked, all smiles. 'Are you?' I shouted
from the wheel. The smiles vanished, and he shook
his head as if sorry for my disappointment. Then he
brightened up. 'Never mind!' he cried encouragingly.
'Are we in time?' I asked. 'He is up there,' he replied,
with a toss of the head up the hill, and becoming
gloomy all of a sudden. His face was like the autumn
sky, overcast one moment and bright the next.
  "When the manager, escorted by the pilgrims, all
of them armed to the teeth, had gone to the house
this chap came on board. 'I say, I don't like this.
These natives are in the bush,' I said. He assured me
earnestly it was all right. 'They are simple people,' he
added; 'well, I am glad you came. It took me all my
time to keep them off.' 'But you said it was all right,'
I cried. 'Oh, they meant no harm,' he said; and as I
stared he corrected himself, 'Not exactly.' Then viva-
ciously, 'My faith, your pilot-house wants a clean-up!'
In the next breath he advised me to keep enough
steam on the boiler to blow the whistle in case of
any trouble. 'One good screech will do more for you
than all your rifles. They are simple people,' he
repeated. He rattled away at such a rate he quite over-
whelmed me. He seemed to be trying to make up for
lots of silence, and actually hinted, laughing, that
such was the case. 'Don't you talk with Mr. Kurtz?' I
said. 'You don't talk with that man -- you listen to him,'
he exclaimed with severe exaltation. 'But now --' He
waved his arm, and in the twinkling of an eye was in
the uttermost depths of despondency. In a moment he
came up again with a jump, possessed himself of both
my hands, shook them continuously, while he
gabbled: 'Brother sailor . . . honour . . . pleasure
. . . delight . . .introduce myself . . . Russian . . .
son of an arch-priest . . . Government of Tambov
. . . What? Tobacco! English tobacco; the excellent
English tobacco! Now, that's brotherly. Smoke?
Where's a sailor that does not smoke?'
  "The pipe soothed him, and gradually I made out
he had run away from school, had gone to sea in a
Russian ship; ran away again; served some time in
English ships; was now reconciled with the arch-
priest. He made a point of that. 'But when one is
young one must see things, gather experience, ideas;
enlarge the mind.' 'Here!' I interrupted. 'You can
never tell! Here I met Mr. Kurtz,' he said, youth
fully solemn and reproachful. I held my tongue after
that. It appears he had persuaded a Dutch trading-
house on the coast to fit him out with stores and goods,
and had started for the interior with a light heart
and no more idea of what would happen to him than
a baby. He had been wandering about that river for
nearly two years alone, cut off from everybody and
everything. 'I am not so young as I look. I am twenty-
five,' he said. 'At first old Van Shuyten would tell me
to go to the devil,' he narrated with keen enjoyment;
'but I stuck to him, and talked and talked, till at last
he got afraid I would talk the hind-leg off his favour-
ite dog, so he gave me some cheap things and a few
guns, and told me he hoped he would never see my
face again. Good old Dutchman, Van Shuyten. I've
sent him one small lot of ivory a year ago, so that he
can't call me a little thief when I get back. I hope he
got it. And for the rest I don't care. I had some wood
stacked for you. That was my old house. Did you see?'
  "I gave him Towson's book. He made as though he
would kiss me, but restrained himself. 'The only book
I had left, and I thought I had lost it,' he said, looking
at it ecstatically. 'So many accidents happen to a man
going about alone, you know. Canoes get upset some-
times -- and sometimes you've got to clear out so quick
when the people get angry.' He thumbed the pages.
'You made notes in Russian?' I asked. He nodded. 'I
thought they were written in cipher,' I said. He
laughed, then became serious. 'I had lots of trouble
to keep these people off,' he said. 'Did they want to
kill you?' I asked. 'Oh, no!' he cried, and checked
himself. 'Why did they attack us?' I pursued. He
hesitated, then said shamefacedly, 'They don't want
him to go.' 'Don't they?' I said curiously. He nodded
a nod full of mystery and wisdom. 'I tell you,' he
cried, 'this man has enlarged my mind.' He opened
his arms wide, staring at me with his little blue eyes
that were perfectly round."

                      III

  "I looked at him, lost in astonishment. There he
was before me, in motley, as though he had absconded
from a troupe of mimes, enthusiastic, fabulous. His
very existence was improbable, inexplicable, and alto-
gether bewildering. He was an insoluble problem. It
was inconceivable how he had existed, how he had
succeeded in getting so far, how he had managed to
remain -- why he did not instantly disappear. 'I went
a little farther,' he said, 'then still a little farther --
till I had gone so far that I don't know how I'll ever
get back. Never mind. Plenty time. I can manage.
You take Kurtz away quick -- quick -- I tell you.' The
glamour of youth enveloped his parti-coloured rags,
his destitution, his loneliness, the essential desolation
of his futile wanderings. For months -- for years -- his
life hadn't been worth a day's purchase; and there he
was gallantly, thoughtlessly alive, to all appearance
indestructible solely by the virtue of his few years and
of his unreflecting audacity. I was seduced into some-
thing like admiration -- like envy. Glamour urged him
on, glamour kept him unscathed. He surely wanted
nothing from the wilderness but space to breathe in
and to push on through. His need was to exist, and to
move onwards at the greatest possible risk, and with
a maximum of privation. If the absolutely pure, un-
calculating, unpractical spirit of adventure had ever
ruled a human being, it ruled this bepatched youth.
I almost envied him the possession of this modest and
clear flame. It seemed to have consumed all thought
of self so completely, that even while he was talking
to you, you forgot that it was he -- the man before
your eyes -- who had gone through these things. I
did not envy him his devotion to Kurtz, though. He
had not meditated over it. It came to him, and he ac-
cepted it with a sort of eager fatalism. I must say that
to me it appeared about the most dangerous thing in
every way he had come upon so far.
  "They had come together unavoidably, like two
ships becalmed near each other, and lay rubbing sides
at last. I suppose Kurtz wanted an audience, because
on a certain occasion, when encamped in the forest,
they had talked all night, or more probably Kurtz
had talked. 'We talked of everything,' he said, quite
transported at the recollection. 'I forgot there was
such a thing as sleep. The night did not seem to last
an hour. Everything! Everything! . . . Of love,
too.' 'Ah, he talked to you of love!' I said, much
amused. 'It isn't what you think,' he cried, almost
passionately. 'It was in general. He made me see
things -- things.'
  "He threw his arms up. We were on deck at the
time, and the headman of my wood cutters, lounging
near by, turned upon him his heavy and glittering
eyes. I looked around, and I don't know why, but I
assure you that never, never before, did this land,
this river, this jungle, the very arch of this blazing
sky, appear to me so hopeless and so dark, so impene-
trable to human thought, so pitiless to human weak-
ness. 'And, ever since, you have been with him, of
course?' I said.
  "On the contrary. It appears their intercourse had
been very much broken by various causes. He had, as
he informed me proudly, managed to nurse Kurtz
through two illnesses (he alluded to it as you would
to some risky feat), but as a rule Kurtz wandered
alone, far in the depths of the forest. 'Very often
coming to this station, I had to wait days and days
before he would turn up,' he said. 'Ah, it was worth
waiting for! -- sometimes.' 'What was he doing? ex-
ploring or what?' I asked. 'Oh, yes, of course', he
had discovered lots of villages, a lake, too -- he did not
know exactly in what direction; it was dangerous to
inquire too much -- but mostly his expeditions had
been for ivory. 'But he had no goods to trade with by
that time,' I objected. 'There's a good lot of cartridges
left even yet,' he answered, looking away. 'To speak
plainly, he raided the country,' I said. He nodded.
'Not alone, surely!' He muttered something about
the villages round that lake. 'Kurtz got the tribe to
follow him, did he?' I suggested. He fidgeted a little.
'They adored him,' he said. The tone of these words
was so extraordinary that I looked at him searchingly.
It was curious to see his mingled eagerness and reluc-
tance to speak of Kurtz. The man filled his life, occu-
pied his thoughts, swayed his emotions. 'What can
you expect?' he burst out; 'he came to them with
thunder and lightning, you know -- and they had never
seen anything like it -- and very terrible. He could be
very terrible. You can't judge Mr. Kurtz as you
would an ordinary man. No, no, no! Now -- just to
give you an idea -- I don't mind telling you, he wanted
to shoot me, too, one day -- but I don't judge him.'
'Shoot you!' I cried 'What for?' 'Well, I had a small
lot of ivory the chief of that village near my house
gave me. You see I used to shoot game for them.
Well, he wanted it, and wouldn't hear reason. He
declared he would shoot me unless I gave him the
ivory and then cleared out of the country, because
he could do so, and had a fancy for it, and there was
nothing on earth to prevent him killing whom he
jolly well pleased. And it was true, too. I gave him
the ivory. What did I care! But I didn't clear out.
No, no. I couldn't leave him. I had to be careful,
of course, till we got friendly again for a time. He
had his second illness then. Afterwards I had to
keep out of the way; but I didn't mind. He was
living for the most part in those villages on the lake.
When he came down to the river, sometimes he would
take to me, and sometimes it was better for me to be
careful. This man suffered too much. He hated all
this, and somehow he couldn't get away. When I had
a chance I begged him to try and leave while there was
time; I offered to go back with him. And he would
say yes, and then he would remain; go off on another
ivory hunt; disappear for weeks; forget himself
amongst these people -- forget himself -- you know.'
'Why! he's mad,' I said. He protested indignantly.
Mr. Kurtz couldn't be mad. If I had heard him talk,
only two days ago, I wouldn't dare hint at such a
thing. . . . I had taken up my binoculars while we
talked, and was looking at the shore, sweeping the
limit of the forest at each side and at the back of the
house. The consciousness of there being people in that
bush, so silent, so quiet -- as silent and quiet as the
ruined house on the hill -- made me uneasy. There was
no sign on the face of nature of this amazing tale that
was not so much told as suggested to me in desolate
exclamations, completed by shrugs, in interrupted
phrases, in hints ending in deep sighs. The woods
were unmoved, like a mask -- heavy, like the closed
door of a prison -- they looked with their air of hidden
knowledge, of patient expectation, of unapproachable
silence. The Russian was explaining to me that it was
only lately that Mr. Kurtz had come down to the
river, bringing along with him all the fighting men
of that lake tribe. He had been absent for several
months -- getting himself adored, I suppose -- and had
come down unexpectedly, with the intention to all
appearance of making a raid either across the river or
down stream. Evidently the appetite for more ivory
had got the better of the -- what shall I say? -- less
material aspirations. However he had got much worse
suddenly. 'I heard he was lying helpless, and so I
came up -- took my chance,' said the Russian. 'Oh, he
is bad, very bad.' I directed my glass to the house.
There were no signs of life, but there was the ruined
roof, the long mud wall peeping above the grass,
with three little square window-holes, no two of the
same size; all this brought within reach of my hand,
as it were. And then I made a brusque movement, and
one of the remaining posts of that vanished fence
leaped up in the field of my glass. You remember I
told you I had been struck at the distance by certain
attempts at ornamentation, rather remarkable in the
ruinous aspect of the place. Now I had suddenly a
nearer view, and its first result was to make me throw
my head back as if before a blow. Then I went care-
fully from post to post with my glass, and I saw my
mistake. These round knobs were not ornamental but
symbolic; they were expressive and puzzling, striking
and disturbing -- food for thought and also for vul-
tures if there had been any looking down from the
sky; but at all events for such ants as were industrious
enough to ascend the pole. They would have been
even more impressive, those heads on the stakes, if
their faces had not been turned to the house. Only
one, the first I had made out, was facing my way. I
was not so shocked as you may think. The start back
I had given was really nothing but a movement of
surprise. I had expected to see a knob of wood there,
you know. I returned deliberately to the first I had
seen -- and there it was, black, dried, sunken, with
dosed eyelids -- a head that seemed to sleep at the top
of that pole, and, with the shrunken dry lips showing
a narrow white line of the teeth, was smiling, too,
smiling continuously at some endless and jocose
dream of that eternal slumber.
  "I am not disclosing any trade secrets. In fact, the
manager said afterwards that Mr. Kurtz's methods
had ruined the district. I have no opinion on that
point, but I want you clearly to understand that there
was nothing exactly profitable in these heads being
there. They only showed that Mr. Kurtz lacked re-
straint in the gratification of his various lusts, that
there was something wanting in him -- some small
matter which, when the pressing need arose, could not
be found under his magnificent eloquence. Whether
he knew of his deficiency himself I can't say. I think
the knowledge came to him at last -- only at the very
last. But the wilderness had found him out early, and
had taken on him a terrible vengeance for the fantastic
invasion. I think it had whispered to him things about
himself which he did not know, things of which he
had no conception till he took counsel with this great
solitude -- and the whisper had proved irresistibly fas-
cinating. It echoed loudly within him because he was
hollow at the core.... I put down the glass, and
the head that had appeared near enough to be spoken
to seemed at once to have leaped away from me into
inaccessible distance.
  "The admirer of Mr. Kurtz was a bit crestfallen. In
a hurried, indistinct voice he began to assure me he had
not dared to take these -- say, symbols -- down. He was
not afraid of the natives; they would not stir till Mr.
Kurtz gave the word. His ascendancy was extraor-
dinary. The camps of the people surrounded the
place, and the chiefs came every day to see him. They
would crawl.... 'I don't want to know anything of
the ceremonies used when approaching Mr. Kurtz,'
I shouted. Curious, this feeling that came over me
that such details would be more intolerable than
those heads drying on the stakes under Mr. Kurtz's
windows. After a]l, that was only a savage sight, while
I seemed at one bound to have been transported into
some lightless region of subtle horrors, where pure,
uncomplicated savagery was a positive relief, being
something that had a right to exist -- obviously -- in the
sunshine. The young man looked at me with surprise.
I suppose it did not occur to him that Mr. Kurtz was
no idol of mine. He forgot I hadn't heard any of these
splendid monologues on, what was it? on love, jus-
tice, conduct of life -- or what not. If it had come to
crawling before Mr. Kurtz, he crawled as much as the
veriest savage of them all. I had no idea of the condi-
tions, he said: these heads were the heads of rebels. I
shocked him excessively by laughing. Rebels! What
would be the next definition I was to hear? There had
been enemies, criminals, workers -- and these were
rebels. Those rebellious heads looked very subdued to
me on their sticks. 'You don't know how such a life
tries a man like Kurtz,' cried Kurtz's last disciple.
'Well, and you?' I said. 'I! I! I am a simple man. I
have no great thoughts. I want nothing from anybody.
How can you compare me to . . . ?' His feelings
were too much for speech, and suddenly he broke
down. 'I don't understand,' he groaned. 'I've been
doing my best to keep him alive, and that's enough.
I had no hand in all this. I have no abilities. There
hasn't been a drop of medicine or a mouthful of in-
valid food for months here. He was shamefully aban-
doned. A man like this, with such ideas. Shamefully!
Shamefully! I -- I -- haven't slept for the last ten
nights . . .'
  "His voice lost itself in the calm of the evening.
The long shadows of the forest had slipped downhill
while we talked, had gone far beyond the ruined
hovel, beyond the symbolic row of stakes. All this
was in the gloom, while we down there were yet in
the sunshine, and the stretch of the river abreast of
the clearing glittered in a still and dazzling splendour,
with a murky and overshadowed bend above and
below. Not a living soul was seen on the shore. The
bushes did not rustle.
  "Suddenly round the corner of the house a group
of men appeared, as though they had come up from
the ground. They waded waist-deep in the grass, in a
compact body, bearing an improvised stretcher in their
midst. Instantly, in the emptiness of the landscape, a
cry arose whose shrillness pierced the still air like a
sharp arrow flying straight to the very heart of the
land; and, as if by enchantment, streams of human
beings -- of naked human beings -- with spears in their
hands, with bows, with shields, with wild glances and
savage movements, were poured into the dearing by
the dark-faced and pensive forest. The bushes shook,
the grass swayed for a time, and then everything
stood still in attentive immobility.
  " 'Now, if he does not say the right thing to them
we are all done for,' said the Russian at my elbow.
The knot of men with the stretcher had stopped, too,
halfway to the steamer, as if petrified. I saw the man
on the stretcher sit up, lank and with an uplifted arm,
above the shoulders of the bearers. 'Let us hope that
the man who can talk so well of love in general will
find some particular reason to spare us this time,' I
said. I resented bitterly the absurd danger of our situ-
ation, as if to be at the mercy of that atrocious phan-
tom had been a dishonouring necessity. I could not
hear a sound, but through my glasses I saw the thin
arm extended commandingly, the lower jaw moving,
the eyes of that apparition shining darkly far in its
bony head that nodded with grotesque jerks. Kurtz --
Kurtz -- that means short in German -- don't it? Well,
the name was as true as everything else in his life --
and death. He looked at least seven feet long. His
covering had fallen off, and his body emerged from it
pitiful and appalling as from a winding-sheet. I could
see the cage of his ribs all astir, the bones of his arm
waving. It was as though an animated image of death
carved out of old ivory had been shaking its hand with
menaces at a motionless crowd of men made of dark
and glittering bronze. I saw him open his mouth wide
-- it gave him a weirdly voracious aspect, as though he
had wanted to swallow all the air, all the earth, all the
men before him. A deep voice reached me faintly. He
must have been shouting. He fell back suddenly. The
stretcher shook as the bearers staggered forward
again, and almost at the same time I noticed that the
crowd of savages was vanishing without any percepti-
ble movement of retreat, as if the forest that had
ejected these beings so suddenly had drawn them in
again as the breath is drawn in a long aspiration.
  "Some of the pilgrims behind the stretcher carried
his arms -- two shot-guns, a heavy rifle, and a light
revolver-carbine -- the thunderbolts of that pitiful
Jupiter. The manager bent over him murmuring as
he walked beside his head. They laid him down in one
of the little cabins -- just a room for a bed place and a
camp-stool or two, you know. We had brought his
belated correspondence, and a lot of torn envelopes
and open letters littered his bed. His hand roamed
feebly amongst these papers. I was struck by the fire
of his eyes and the composed languor of his expres-
sion. It was not so much the exhaustion of disease. He
did not seem in pain. This shadow looked satiated and
calm, as though for the moment it had had its fill of
all the emotions.
  "He rustled one of the letters, and looking straight
in my face said, 'I am glad.' Somebody had been writ-
ing to him about me. These special recommendations
were turning up again. The volume of tone he emitted
without effort, almost without the trouble of moving
his lips, amazed me. A voice! a voice! It was grave,
profound, vibrating, while the man did not seem cap-
able of a whisper. However, he had enough strength
in him -- factitious no doubt -- to very nearly make an
end of us, as you shall hear directly.
  "The manager appeared silently in the doorway; I
stepped out at once and he drew the curtain after me.
The Russian, eyed curiously by the pilgrims, was star-
ing at the shore. I followed the direction of his glance.
  "Dark human shapes could be made out in the dis-
tance, flitting indistinctly against the gloomy border
of the forest, and near the river two bronze figures,
leaning on tall spears, stood in the sunlight under fan-
tastic head-dresses of spotted skins, warlike and still in
statuesque repose. And from right to left along the
lighted shore moved a wild and gorgeous apparition
of a woman.
  "She walked with measured steps, draped in striped
and fringed clothes, treading the earth proudly, with
a slight jingle and flash of barbarous ornaments. She
carried her head high; her hair was done in the shape
of a helmet; she had brass leggings to the knee, brass
wire gauntlets to the elbow, a crimson spot on her
tawny cheek, innumerable necklaces of glass beads on
her neck; bizarre things, charms, gifts of witch-men,
that hung about her, glittered and trembled at every
step. She must have had the value of several elephant
tusks upon her. She was savage and superb, wild-eyed
and magnificent; there was something ominous and
stately in her deliberate progress. And in the hush
that had fallen suddenly upon the whole sorrowful
land, the immense wilderness, the colossal body of the
fecund and mysterious life seemed to look at her,
pensive, as though it had been looking at the image of
its own tenebrous and passionate soul.
  "She came abreast of the steamer, stood still, and
faced us. Her long shadow fell to the water's edge.
Her face had a tragic and fierce aspect of wild sorrow
and of dumb pain mingled with the fear of some
struggling, half-shaped resolve. She stood looking at
us without a stir, and like the wilderness itself, with an
air of brooding over an inscrutable purpose. A whole
minute passed, and then she made a step forward.
There was a low jingle, a glint of yellow metal, a
sway of fringed draperies, and she stopped as if her
heart had failed her. The young fellow by my side
growled. The pilgrims murmured at my back. She
looked at us all as if her life had depended upon the
unswerving steadiness of her glance. Suddenly she
opened her bared arms and threw them up rigid
above her head, as though in an uncontrollable desire
to touch the sky, and at the same time the swift shad-
ows darted out on the earth, swept around on the
river, gathering the steamer into a shadowy embrace.
A formidable silence hung over the scene.
  "She turned away slowly, walked on, following the
bank, and passed into the bushes to the left. Once
only her eyes gleamed back at us in the dusk of the
thickets before she disappeared.
  " 'If she had offered to come aboard I really think
I would have tried to shoot her,' said the man of
patches, nervously. 'I have been risking my life every
day for the last fortnight to keep her out of the house.
She got in one day and kicked up a row about those
miserable rags I picked up in the storeroom to mend
my clothes with. I wasn't decent. At least it must have
been that, for she talked like a fury to Kurtz for an
hour, pointing at me now and then. I don't under-
stand the dialect of this tribe. Luckily for me, I fancy
Kurtz felt too ill that day to care, or there would have
been mischief. I don't understand.... No -- it's too
much for me. Ah, well, it's all over now.'
  "At this moment I heard Kurtz's deep voice behind
the curtain: 'Save me! -- save the ivory, you mean.
Don't tell me. Save me! Why, I've had to save you.
You are interrupting my plans now. Sick! Sick! Not
so sick as you would like to believe. Never mind. I'll
carry my ideas out yet -- I will return. I'll show you
what can be done. You with your little peddling no-
tions -- you are interfering with me. I will return.
I....'
  "The manager came out. He did me the honour to
take me under the arm and lead me aside. 'He is very
low, very low,' he said. He considered it necessary to
sigh, but neglected to be consistently sorrowful. 'We
have done all we could for him -- haven't we? But
there is no disguising the fact, Mr. Kurtz has done
more harm than good to the Company. He did not
see the time was not ripe for vigorous action. Cau-
tiously, cautiously -- that's my principle. We must be
cautious yet. The district is closed to us for a time.
Deplorable! Upon the whole, the trade will suffer.
I don't deny there is a remarkable quantity of ivory --
mostly fossil. We must save it, at all events -- but look
how precarious the position is -- and why? Because the
method is unsound.' 'Do you,' said I, looking at the
shore, 'call it "unsound method?" ' 'Without doubt,'
he exclaimed hotly. 'Don't you?' . . . 'No method at
all,' I murmured after a while. 'Exactly,' he exulted.
'I anticipated this. Shows a complete want of judg-
ment. It is my duty to point it out in the proper quar-
ter.' 'Oh,' said I, 'that fellow -- what's his name? -- the
brickmaker, will make a readable report for you.' He
appeared confounded for a moment. It seemed to me
I had never breathed an atmosphere so vile, and I
turned mentally to Kurtz for relief -- positively for
relief. 'Nevertheless I think Mr. Kurtz is a remark-
able man,' I said with emphasis. He started, dropped
on me a cold heavy glance, said very quietly, 'he was
and turned his back on me. My hour of favour was
over; I found myself lumped along with Kurtz as a
partisan of methods for which the time was not ripe:
I was unsound! Ah! but it was something to have at
least a choice of nightmares.
  "I had turned to the wilderness really, not to Mr.
Kurtz, who, I was ready to admit, was as good as
buried. And for a moment it seemed to me as if I also
were buried in a vast grave full of unspeakable secrets.
I felt an intolerable weight oppressing my breast, the
smell of the damp earth, the unseen presence of vic-
torious corruption, the darkness of an impenetrable
night.... The Russian tapped me on the shoulder.
I heard him mumbling and stammering something
about 'brother seaman -- couldn't conceal -- knowledge
of matters that would affect Mr. Kurtz's reputation.'
I waited. For him evidently Mr. Kurtz was not in his
grave; I suspect that for him Mr. Kuutz was one of
the immortals. 'Well!' said I at last, 'speak out. As it
happens, I am Mr. Kurtz's friend -- in a way.' 
  "He stated with a good deal of formality that had
we not been 'of the same profession,' he would have
kept the matter to himself without regard to conse-
quences. 'He suspected there was an active ill will to-
wards him on the part of these white men that --'
'You are right,' I said, remembering a certain conver-
sation I had overheard. 'The manager thinks you
ought to be hanged.' He showed a concern at this
intelligence which amused me at first. 'I had better
get out of the way quietly,' he said earnestly. 'I can do
no more for Kurtz now, and they would soon find
some excuse. What's to stop them? There's a military
post three hundred miles from here.' 'Well, upon my
word,' said I, 'perhaps you had better go if you have
any friends amongst the savages near by.' 'Plenty,' he
said. 'They are simple people -- and I want nothing,
you know.' He stood biting his lip, then: 'I didn't want
any harm to happen to these whites here, but of course
I was thinking of Mr. Kurtz's reputation -- but you
are a brother seaman and --' 'All right,' said I, after
a time. 'Mr. Kurtz's reputation is safe with me.' I did
not know how truly I spoke.
  "He informed me, lowering his voice, that it was
Kurtz who had ordered the attack to be made on the
steamer. 'He hated sometimes the idea of being taken
away -- and then again.... But I don't understand
these matters. I am a simple man. He thought it
would scare you away -- that you would give it up,
thinking him dead. I could not stop him. Oh, I had an
awful time of it this last month.' 'Very well,' I said.
'He is all right now.' 'Ye-e-es,' he muttered, not very
convinced apparently. 'Thanks,' said I; 'I shall keep
my eyes open.' 'But quiet -- eh?' he urged anxiously.
'It would be awful for his reputation if anybody
here --' I promised a complete discretion with great
gravity. 'I have a canoe and three black fellows wait-
ing not very far. I am off. Could you give me a few
Martini-Henry cartridges?' I could, and did, with
proper secrecy. He helped himself, with a wink at me,
to a handful of my tobacco. 'Between sailors -- you
know -- good English tobacco.' At the door of the
pilot-house he turned round -- 'I say, haven't you a
pair of shoes you could spare?' He raised one leg.
'Look' The soles were tied with knotted strings san-
dalwise under his bare feet. I rooted out an old pair,
at which he looked with admiration before tucking it
under his left arm. One of his pockets (bright red)
was bulging with cartridges, from the other (dark
blue) peeped 'Towson's Inquiry,' ctc., etc. He seemed
to think himself excellently well equipped for a re-
newed encounter with the wilderness. 'Ah! I'll never,
never meet such a man again. You ought to have
heard him recite poetry -- his own, too, it was, he told
me. Poetry!' He rolled his eyes at the recollection of
these delights. 'Oh, he enlarged my mind!' 'Good-
bye,' said I. He shook hands and vanished in the
night. Sometimes I ask myself whether I had ever
really seen him -- whether it was possible to meet such
a phenomenon! . . .
  "When I woke up shortly after midnight his warn-
ing came to my mind with its hint of danger that
seemed, in the starred darkness, real enough to make
me get up for the purpose of having a look round. On
the hill a big fire burned, illuminating fitfully a
crooked corner of the station-house. One of the agents
with a picket of a few of our blacks, armed for the
purpose, was keeping guard over the ivory; but deep
within the forest, red gleams that wavered, that
seemed to sink and rise from the ground amongst
confused columnar shapes of intense blackness, showed
the exact position of the camp where Mr. Kurtz's
adorers were keeping their uneasy vigil. The monoto-
nous beating of a big drum filled the air with muf-
fled shocks and a lingering vibration. A steady
droning sound of many men chanting each to himself
some weird incantation came out from the black, flat
wall of the woods as the humming of bees comes out
of a hive, and had a strange narcotic effect upon my
half-awake senses. I believe I dozed off leaning over
the rail, till an abrupt burst of yells, an overwhelming
outbreak of a pent-up and mysterious frenzy, woke me
up in a bewildered wonder. It was cut short all at
once, and the low droning went on with an effect of
audible and soothing silence. I glanced casually into
the little cabin. A light was burning within, but Mr.
Kurtz was not there.
  "I think I would have raised an outcry if I had
believed my eyes. But I didn't believe them at first --
the thing seemed so impossible. The fact is I was com-
pletely unnerved by a sheer blank fright, pure abstract
terror, unconnected with any distinct shape of physical
danger. What made this emotion so overpowering
was -- how shall I define it? -- the moral shock I re-
ceived, as if something altogether monstrous, intoler-
able to thought and odious to the soul, had been
thrust upon me unexpectedly. This lasted of course
the merest fraction of a second, and then the usual
sense of commonplace, deadly danger, the possibility
of a sudden onslaught and massacre, or something of
the kind, which I saw impending, was positively wel-
come and composing. It pacified me, in fact, so much
that I did not raise an alarm.
  "There was an agent buttoned up inside an ulster
and sleeping on a chair on deck within three feet of
me. The yells had not awakened him; he snored very
slightly; I left him to his slumbers and leaped ashore.
I did not betray Mr. Kurtz -- it was ordered I should
never betray him -- it was written I should be loyal to
the nightmare of my choice. I was anxious to deal
with this shadow by myself alone -- and to this day I
don't know why I was so jealous of sharing with any
one the peculiar blackness of that experience.
  "As soon as I got on the bank I saw a trail -- a broad
trail through the grass. I remember the exultation
with which I said to myself, 'He can't walk -- he is
crawling on all-fours -- I've got him.' The grass was
wet with dew. I strode rapidly with clenched fists. I
fancy I had some vague notion of falling upon him
and giving him a drubbing. I don't know. I had some
imbecile thoughts. The knitting old woman with the
cat obtruded herself upon my memory as a most im-
proper person to be sitting at the other end of such an
affair. I saw a row of pilgrims squirting lead in the air
out of Winchesters held to the hip. I thought I would
never get back to the steamer, and imagined myself
living alone and unarmed in the woods to an advanced
age. Such silly things -- you know. And I remember I
confounded the beat of the drum with the beating of
my heart, and was pleased at its calm regularity.
  "I kept to the track though -- then stopped to listen.
The night was very clear; a dark blue space, sparkling
with dew and starlight, in which black things stood
very still. I thought I could see a kind of motion
ahead of me. I was strangely cocksure of everything
that night. I actually left the track and ran in a wide
semicircle (I verily believe chuckling to myself) so as
to get in front of that stir, of that motion I had seen
-- if indeed I had seen anything. I was circumventing
Kurtz as though it had been a boyish game.
  "I came upon him, and, if he had not heard me
coming, I would have fallen over him, too, but he got
up in time. He rose, unsteady, long, pale, indistinct,
like a vapour exhaled by the earth, and swayed
slightly, misty and silent before me; while at my back
the fires loomed between the trees, and the murmur
of many voices issued from the forest. I had cut him
off cleverly; but when actually confronting him I
seemed to come to my senses, I saw the danger in its
right proportion. It was by no means over yet. Sup-
pose he began to shout? Though he could hardly
stand, there was still plenty of vigour in his voice. 'Go
away -- hide yourself,' he said, in that profound tone.
It was very awful. I glanced back. We were within
thirty yards from the nearest fire. A black figure stood
up, strode on long black legs, waving long black arms,
across the glow. It had horns -- antelope horns, I think
-- on its head. Some sorcerer, some witch-man, no
doubt: it looked fiendlike enough. 'Do you know what
you are doing?' I whispered. 'Perfectly,' he answered,
raising his voice for that single word: it sounded to me
far off and yet loud, like a hail through a speaking-
trumpet. 'If he makes a row we are lost,' I thought to
myself. This clearly was not a case for fisticuffs, even
apart from the very natural aversion I had to beat
that Shadow -- this wandering and tormented thing.
'You will be lost,' I said -- 'utterly lost.' One gets
sometimes such a flash of inspiration, you know. I did
say the right thing, though indeed he could not have
been more irretrievably lost than he was at this very
moment, when the foundations of our intimacy were
being laid -- to endure -- to endure -- even to the end --
even beyond.
  " 'I had irnmense plans,' he muttered irresolutely.
'Yes,' said I; 'but if you try to shout I'll smash your
head with --' There was not a stick or a stone near.
'I will throttle you for good,' I corrected myself. 'I
was on the threshold of great things,' he pleaded, in a
voice of longing, with a wistfulness of tone that made
my blood run cold. 'And now for this stupid scoun-
drel --' 'Your success in Europe is assured in any
case,' I affirmed steadily, I did not want to have the
throttling of him, you understand -- and indeed it
would have been very little use for any practical pur-
pose. I tried to break the spell -- the heavy, mute spell
of the wilderness -- that seemed to draw him to its
pitiless breast by the awakening of forgotten and
brutal instincts, by the memory of gratified and mon-
strous passions. This alone, I was convinced, had
driven him out to the edge of the forest, to the bush,
towards the gleam of fires, the throb of drums, the
drone of weird incantations; this alone had beguiled
his unlawful soul beyond the bounds of permitted
aspirations. And, don't you see, the terror of the posi-
tion was not in being knocked on the head -- though I
had a very lively sense of that danger, too -- but in
this, that I had to deal with a being to whom I could
not appeal in the name of anything high or low. I had,
even like the niggers, to invoke him -- himself -- his
own exalted and incredible degradation. There was
nothing either above or below him, and I knew it. He
had kicked himself loose of the earth. Confound the
man! he had kicked the very earth to pieces. He was
alone, and I before him did not know whether I stood
on the ground or floated in the air. I've been telling
you what we said -- repeating the phrases we pro-
nounced -- but what's the good? They were common
everyday words -- the familiar, vague sounds ex-
changed on every waking day of life. But what of
that? They had behind them, to my mind, the terrific
suggestiveness of words heard in dreams, of phrases
spoken in nightmares. Soul! If anybody ever struggled
with a soul, I am the man. And I wasn't arguing with
a lunatic either. Believe me or not, his intelligence was
perfectly clear concentrated, it is true, upon himself
with horrible intensity, yet clear; and therein was my
only chance -- barring, of course, the killing him there
and then, which wasn't so good, on account of un-
avoidable noise. But his soul was mad. Being alone in
the wilderness, it had looked within itself, and, by
heavens! I tell you, it had gone mad. I had -- for my
sins, I suppose -- to go through the ordeal of looking
into it myself. No eloquence could have been so
withering to one's belief in mankind as his final burst
of sincerity. He struggled with himself, too. I saw it --
I heard it. I saw the inconceivable mystery of a soul
that knew no restraint, no faith, and no fear, yet strug-
gling blindly with itself. I kept my head pretty well;
but when I had him at last stretched on the couch, I
wiped my forehead, while my legs shook under me as
though I had carried half a ton on my back down that
hill. And yet I had only supported him, his bony arm
clasped round my neck -- and he was not much heavier
than a child.
  "When next day we left at noon, the crowd, of
whose presence behind the curtain of trees I had been
acutely conscious all the time, flowed out of the woods
again, filled the clearing, covered the slope with a
mass of naked, breathing, quivering, bronze bodies. I
steamed up a bit, then swung down stream, and two
thousand eyes followed the evolutions of the splash-
ing, thumping, fierce river-demon beating the water
with its terrible tail and breathing black smoke into
the air. In front of the first rank, along the river,
three men, plastered with bright red earth from head
to foot, strutted to and fro restlessly. When we came
abreast again, they faced the river, stamped their feet,
nodded their horned heads, swayed their scarlet bod-
ies; they shook towards the fierce river-demon a
bunch of black feathers, a mangy skin with a pendent
tail -- something that looked like a dried gourd; they
shouted periodically together strings of amazing words
that resembled no sounds of human language; and
the deep murmurs of the crowd, interrupted sud-
denly, were like the responses of some satanic litany.
  "We had carried Kurtz into the pilot-house: there
was more air there. Lying on the couch, he stared
through the open shutter. There was an eddy in the
mass of human bodies, and the woman with helmeted
head and tawny cheeks rushed out to the very brink
of the stream. She put out her hands, shouted some-
thing, and all that wild mob took up the shout in a
roaring chorus of articulated, rapid, breathless ut-
terance.
  " 'Do you understand this?' I asked.
  "He kept on looking out past me with fiery, long-
ing eyes, with a mingled expression of wistfulness and
hate. He made no answer, but I saw a smile, a smile of
indefinable meaning, appearing on his colourless lips
that a moment after twitched convulsively. 'Do I
not?' he said slowly, gasping, as if the words had been
torn out of him by a supernatural power.
  "I pulled the string of the whistle, and I did this
because I saw the pilgrims on deck getting out their
rifles with an air of anticipating a jolly lark. At the
sudden screech there was a movement of abject terror
through that wedged mass of bodies. 'Don't! don't you
frighten them away,' cried some one on deck discon-
solately. I pulled the string time after time. They
broke and ran, they leaped, they crouched, they
swerved, they dodged the flying terror of the sound.
The three red chaps had fallen flat, face down on the
shore, as though they had been shot dead. Only the
barbarous and superb woman did not so much as
flinch, and stretched tragically her bare arms after us
over the sombre and glittering river.
  "And then that imbecile crowd down on the deck
started their little fun, and I could see nothing more
for smoke.


  "The brown current ran swiftly out of the heart of
darkness, bearing us down towards the sea with twice
the speed of our upward progress; and Kurtz's life
was running swiftly, too, ebbing, ebbing out of his
heart into the sea of inexorable time. The manager
was very placid, he had no vital anxieties now, he took
us both in with a comprehensive and satisfied glance:
the 'affair' had come off as well as could be wished. I
saw the time approaching when I would be left alone
of the party of 'unsound method.' The pilgrims
looked upon me with disfavour. I was, so to speak,
numbered with the dead. It is strange how I accepted
this unforeseen partnership, this choice of nightmares
forced upon me in the tenebrous land invaded by
these mean and greedy phantoms.
  "Kurtz discoursed. A voice! a voice! It rang deep to
the very last. It survived his strength to hide in the
magnificent folds of eloquence the barren darkness of
his heart. Oh, he struggled! he struggled! The wastes
of his weary brain were haunted by shadowy images
now -- images of wealth and fame revolving obse-
quiously round his unextinguishable gift of noble and
lofty expression. My Intended, my station, my career,
my ideas -- these were the subjects for the occasional
utterances of elevated sentiments. The shade of the
original Kurtz frequented the bedside of the hollow
sham, whose fate it was to be buried presently in the
mould of primeval earth. But both the diabolic love
and the unearthly hate of the mysteries it had pene-
trated fought for the possession of that soul satiated
with primitive emotions, avid of lying fame, of sham
distinction, of all the appearances of success and power.
  "Sometimes he was contemptibly childish. He de-
sired to have kings meet him at railway-stations on his
return from some ghastly Nowhere, where he in-
tended to accomplish great things. 'You show them
you have in you something that is really profitable,
and then there will be no limits to the recognition of
your ability,' he would say. 'Of course you must take
care of the motives -- right motives -- always.' The
long reaches that were like one and the same reach,
monotonous bends that were exactly alike, slipped
past the steamer with their multitude of secular trees
looking patiently after this grimy fragment of an-
other world, the forerunner of change, of conquest,
of trade, of massacres, of blessings. I looked ahead --
piloting. 'Close the shutter,' said Kurtz suddenly one
day; 'I can't bear to look at this.' I did so. There was
a silence. 'Oh, but I will wring your heart yet!' he
cried at the invisible wilderness.
  "We broke down -- as I had expected -- and had to
lie up for repairs at the head of an island. This delay
was the first thing that shook Kurtz's confidence. One
morning he gave me a packet of papers and a photo-
graph -- the lot tied together with a shoe-string. 'Keep
this for me,' he said. 'This noxious fool' (meaning the
manager) 'is capable of prying into my boxes when I
am not looking.' In the afternoon I saw him. He was
lying on his back with closed eyes, and I withdrew
quietly, but I heard him mutter, 'Live rightly, die, die
. . .' I listened. There was nothing more. Was he
rehearsing some speech in his sleep, or was it a frag-
ment of a phrase from some newspaper article? He
had been writing for the papers and meant to do so
again, 'for the furthering of my ideas. It's a duty.'
  "His was an impenetrable darkness. I looked at him
as you peer down at a man who is lying at the bottom
of a precipice where the sun never shines. But I had
not much time to give him, because I was helping the
engine-driver to take to pieces the leaky cylinders, to
straighten a bent connecting-rod, and in other such
matters. I lived in an infernal mess of rust, filings,
nuts, bolts, spanners, hammers, ratchet drills -- things
I abominate, because I don't get on with them. I
tended the little forge we fortunately had aboard; I
toiled wearily in a wretched scrap-heap -- unless I had
the shakes too bad to stand.
  "One evening coming in with a candle I was star-
tled to hear him say a little tremulously, 'I am lying
here in the dark waiting for death.' The light was
within a foot of his eyes. I forced myself to murmur,
'Oh, nonsense!' and stood over him as if transfixed.
  "Anything approaching the change that came over
his features I have never seen before, and hope never
to see again. Oh, I wasn't touched. I was fascinated.
It was as though a veil had been rent. I saw on that
ivory face the expression of sombre pride, of ruthless
power, of craven terror -- of an intense and hopeless
despair. Did he live his life again in every detail of
desire, temptation, and surrender during that su-
preme moment of complete knowledge? He cried in
a whisper at some image, at some vision -- he cried out
twice, a cry that was no more than a breath:
  " 'The horror! The horror!'
  "I blew the candle out and left the cabin. The pil-
grims were dining in the mess-room, and I took my
place opposite the manager, who lifted his eyes to
give me a questioning glance, which I successfully ig-
nored. He leaned back, serene, with that peculiar
smile of his sealing the unexpressed depths of his
meanness. A continuous shower of small flies streamed
upon the lamp, upon the cloth, upon our hands and
faces. Suddenly the manager's boy put his insolent
black head in the doorway, and said in a tone of scath-
ing contempt:
  " 'Mistah Kurtz -- he dead.'
  "All the pilgrims rushed out to see. I remained,
and went on with my dinner. I believe that I was con-
sidered brutally callous. However, I did not eat much.
There was a lamp in there -- light, don't you know --
and outside it was so beastly, beastly dark. I went no
more near the remarkable man who had pronounced
a judgment upon the adventures of his soul on this
earth. The voice was gone. What else had been there?
But I am of course aware that next day the pilgrims
buried something in a muddy hole.
  "And then they very nearly buried me.
  "However, as you see, I did not go to join Kurtz
there and then. I did not. I remained to dream the
nightmare out to the end, and to show my loyalty to
Kurtz once more. Destiny. My destiny! Droll thing
life is -- that mysterious arrangement of merciless logic
for a futile purpose. The most you can hope from it
is some knowledge of yourself -- that comes too late --
a crop of unextinguishable regrets. I have wrestled
with death. It is the most unexciting contest you can
imagine. It takes place in an impalpable greyness,
with nothing underfoot, with nothing around, without
spectators, without clamour, without glory, without
the great desire of victory, without the great fear of
defeat, in a sickly atmosphere of tepid scepticism,
without much belief in your own right, and still less
in that of your adversary. If such is the form of ulti-
mate wisdom, then life is a greater riddle than some
of us think it to be. I was within a hair's breadth of the
last opportunity for pronouncement, and I found with
humiliation that probably I would have nothing to
say. This is the reason why I affirm that Kurtz was a
remarkable man. He had something to say. He said
it. Since I had peeped over the edge myself, I under-
stand better the meaning of his stare, that could not
see the flame of the candle, but was wide enough to
embrace the whole universe, piercing enough to pene-
trate all the hearts that beat in the darkness. He had
summed up -- he had judged. 'The horror!' He was a
remarkable man. After all, this was the expression of
some sort of belief; it had candour, it had conviction,
it had a vibrating note of revolt in its whisper, it had
the appalling face of a glimpsed truth -- the strange
commingling of desire and hate. And it is not my own
extremity I remember best -- a vision of greyness with-
out form filled with physical pain, and a careless con-
tempt for the evanescence of all things -- even of this
pain itself. No! It is his extremity that I seem to have
lived through. True, he had made that last stride, he
had stepped over the edge, while I had been permit-
ted to draw back my hesitating foot. And perhaps in
this is the whole difference; perhaps all the wisdom,
and all truth, and all sincerity, are just compressed
into that inappreciable moment of time in which we
step over the threshold of the invisible. Perhaps! I
like to think my summing-up would not have been a
word of careless contempt. Better his cry -- much bet-
ter. It was an affirmation, a moral victory paid for by
innumerable defeats, by abominable terrors, by abomi-
nable satisfactions. But it was a victory! That is why I
have remained loyal to Kurtz to the last, and even
beyond, when a long time after I heard once more,
not his own voice, but the echo of his magnificent elo-
quence thrown to me from a soul as translucently pure
as a cliff of crystal.
  "No, they did not bury me, though there is a period
of time which I remember mistily, with a shuddering
wonder, like a passage through some inconceivable
world that had no hope in it and no desire. I found
myself back in the sepulchral city resenting the sight
of people hurrying through the streets to filch a little
money from each other, to devour their infamous
cookery, to gulp their unwholesome beer, to dream
their insignificant and silly dreams. They trespassed
upon my thoughts. They were intruders whose knowl-
edge of life was to me an irritating pretence, because I
felt so sure they could not possibly know the things I
knew. Their bearing, which was simply the bearing of
commonplace individuals going about their business in
the assurance of perfect safety, was offensive to me
like the outrageous flauntings of folly in the face of a
danger it is unable to comprehend. I had no particular
desire to enlighten them, but I had some difficulty in
restraining myself from laughing in their faces so full
of stupid importance. I daresay I was not very well at
that time. I tottered about the streets -- there were
various affairs to settle -- grinning bitterly at perfectly
respectable persons. I admit my behaviour was inex-
cusable, but then my temperature was seldom normal
in these days. My dear aunt's endeavours to 'nurse up
my strength' seemed altogether beside the mark. It
was not my strength that wanted nursing, it was my
imagination that wanted soothing. I kept the bundle
of papers given me by Kurtz, not knowing exactly
what to do with it. His mother had died lately,
watched over, as I was told, by his Intended. A clean-
shaved man, with an official manner and wearing
gold-rimmed spectacles, called on me one day and
made inquiries, at first circuitous, afterwards suavely
pressing, about what he was pleased to denominate
certain 'documents.' I was not surprised, because I had
had two rows with the manager on the subject out
there. I had refused to give up the smallest scrap out
of that package, and I took the same attitude with the
spectacled man. He became darkly menacing at Last,
and with much heat argued that the Company had the
right to every bit of information about its 'territories.'
And said he, 'Mr. Kurtz's knowledge of unexplored
regions must have been necessarily extensive and pe-
culiar -- owing to his great abilities and to the deplor-
able circumstances in which he had been placed:
therefore --' I assured him Mr. Kurtz's knowledge,
however extensive, did not bear upon the problems of
commerce or administration. He invoked then the
name of science. 'It would be an incalculable loss if,'
etc., etc. I offered him the report on the 'Suppression
of Savage Customs,' with the postscriptum torn off.
He took it up eagerly, but ended by sniffing at it with
an air of contempt. 'This is not what we had a right to
expect,' he remarked. 'Expect nothing else,' I said.
'There are only private letters.' He withdrew upon
some threat of legal proceedings, and I saw him no
more; but another fellow, calling himself Kurtz's
cousin, appeared two days later, and was anxious to
hear all the details about his dear relative's last mo-
ments. Incidentally he gave me to understand that
Kurtz had been essentially a great musician. 'There
was the making of an immense success,' said the man,
who was an organist, I believe, with lank grey hair
flowing over a greasy coat-collar. I had no reason to
doubt his statement, and to this day I am unable to
say what was Kurtz's profession, whether he ever had
any -- which was the greatest of his talents. I had taken
him for a painter who wrote for the papers, or else for
a journalist who could paint -- but even the cousin
(who took snuff during the interview) could not tell
me what he had been -- exactly. He was a universal
genius -- on that point I agreed with the old chap, who
thereupon blew his nose noisily into a large cotton
handkerchief and withdrew in senile agitation, bear-
ing off some family letters and memoranda without
importance. Ultimately a journalist anxious to know
something of the fate of his 'dear colleague' turned
up. This visitor informed me Kurtz's proper sphere
ought to have been politics 'on the popular side.' He
had furry straight eyebrows, bristly hair cropped
short, an eyeglass on a broad ribbon, and, becoming
expansive, confessed his opinion that Kurtz really
couldn't write a bit -- 'but heavens! how that man
could talk. He electrified large meetings. He had
faith -- don't you see? -- he had the faith. He could get
himself to believe anything -- anything. He would
have been a splendid leader of an extreme party.'
'What party?' I asked. 'Any party,' answered the
other. 'He was an -- an -- extremist.' Did I not think
so? I assented. Did I know, he asked, with a sudden
flash of curiosity, 'what it was that had induced him
to go out there?' 'Yes,' said I, and forthwith handed
him the famous Report for publication, if he thought
fit. He glanced through it hurriedly, mumbling all
the time, judged 'it would do,' and took himself off
with this plunder.
  "Thus I was left at last with a slim packet of let-
ters and the girl's portrait. She struck me as beautiful
-- I mean she had a beautiful expression. I know that
the sunlight can be made to lie, too, yet one felt that
no manipulation of light and pose could have con-
veyed the delicate shade of truthfulness upon those
features. She seemed ready to listen without mental
reservation, without suspicion, without a thought for
herself. I conclucled I would go and give her back her
portrait and those letters myself. Curiosity? Yes; and
also some other feeling perhaps. All that had been
Kurtz's had passed out of my hands: his soul, his
body, his station, his plans, his ivory, his career. There
remained only his memory and his Intended -- and I
wanted to give that up, too, to the past, in a way -- to
surrender personally all that remained of him with
me to that oblivion which is the last word of our
common fate. I don't defend myself. I had no clear
perception of what it was I really wanted. Perhaps it
was an impulse of unconscious loyalty, or the fulfil-
ment of one of those ironic necessities that lurk in the
facts of human existence. I don't know. I can't tell.
But I went.
  "I thought his memory was like the other memo-
ries of the dead that accumulate in every man's life --
a vague impress on the brain of shadows that had
fallen on it in their swift and final passage; but before
the high and ponderous door, between the tall houses
of a street as still and decorous as a well-kept alley in
a cemetery, I had a vision of him on the stretcher,
opening his mouth voraciously, as if to devour all the
earth with all its mankind. He lived then before me;
he lived as much as he had ever lived -- a shadow in-
satiable of splendid appearances, of frightful realities;
a shadow darker than the shadow of the night, and
draped nobly in the folds of a gorgeous eloquence.
The vision seemed to enter the house with me -- the
stretcher, the phantom-bearers, the wild crowd of
obedient worshippers, the gloom of the forests, the
glitter of the reach between the murky bends, the beat
of the drum, regular and muffled like the beating of a
heart -- the heart of a conquering darkness. It was a
moment of triumph for the wilderness, an invading
and vengeful rush which, it seemed to me, I would
have to keep back alone for the salvation of another
soul. And the memory of what I had heard him say
afar there, with the horned shapes stirring at my back,
in the glow of fires, within the patient woods, those
broken phrases came back to me, were heard again in
their ominous and terrifying simplicity. I remem-
bered his abject pleading, his abject threats, the colos-
sal scale of his vile desires, the meanness, the torment,
the tempestuous anguish of his soul. And later on I
seemed to see his collected languid manner, when he
said one day, 'This lot of ivory now is really mine.
The Company did not pay for it. I collected it myself
at a very great personal risk. I am afraid they will try
to claim it as theirs though. H'm. It is a difficult case.
What do you think I ought to do -- resist? Eh? I want
no more than justice.' . . . He wanted no more than
justice -- no more than justice. I rang the bell before a
mahogany door on the first floor, and while I waited
he seemed to stare at me out of the glassy panel -- stare
with that wide and immense stare embracing, con-
demning, loathing all the universe. I seemed to hear
the whispered cry, 'The horror! The horror! '
  "The dusk was falling. I had to wait in a lofty
drawingroom with three long windows from floor to
ceiling that were like three luminous and bedraped
columns. The bent gilt legs and backs of the furniture
shone in indistinct curves. The tall marble fireplace
had a cold and monumental whiteness. A grand piano
stood massively in a corner; with dark gleams on the
flat surfaces like a sombre and polished sarcophagus.
A high door opened closed I rose.
  "She came forward, all in black, with a pale head,
floating towards me in the dusk. She was in mourning.
It was more than a year since his death, more than a
year since the news came; she seemed as though she
would remember and mourn forever. She took both
my hands in hers and murmured, 'I had heard you
were coming.' I noticed she was not very young -- I
mean not girlish. She had a mature capacity for fidel-
ity, for belief, for suffering. The room seemed to have
grown darker, as if all the sad light of the cloudy eve-
ning had taken refuge on her forehead. This fair hair,
this pale visage, this pure brow, seemed surrounded
by an ashy halo from which the dark eyes looked out
at me. Their glance was guileless, profound, confi-
dent, and trustful. She carried her sorrowful head as
though she were proud of that sorrow, as though she
would say, 'I -- I alone know how to mourn for him
as he deserves.' But while we were still shaking hands,
such a look of awful desolation came upon her face
that I perceived she was one of those creatures that
are not the playthings of Time. For her he had died
only yesterday. And, by Jove! the impression was so
powerful that for me, too, he seemed to have died
only yesterday -- nay, this very minute. I saw her and
him in the same instant of time -- his death and her
sorrow -- I saw her sorrow in the very moment of his
death. Do you understand? I saw them together - I
heard them together. She had said, with a deep catch
of the breath, 'I have survived' while my strained ears
seemed to hear distinctly, mingled with her tone of
despairing regret, the summing up whisper of his
eternal condemnation. I asked myself what I was
doing there, with a sensation of panic in my heart as
though I had blundered into a place of cruel and
absurd mysteries not fit for a human being to behold.
She motioned me to a chair. We sat down. I laid the
packet gently on the little table, and she put her hand
over it.... 'You knew him well,' she murmured,
after a moment of mourning silence.
  " 'Intimacy grows quickly out there,' I said. 'I
knew him as well as it is possible for one man to know
another.'
  " 'And you admired him,' she said. 'It was impos-
sible to know him and not to admire him. Was it?'
  " 'He was a remarkable man,' I said, unsteadily.
Then before the appealing fixity of her gaze, that
seemed to watch for more words on my lips, I went
on, 'It was impossible not to --'
  " 'Love him,' she finished eagerly, silencing me
into an appalled dumbness. 'How true! how truel
But when you think that no one knew him so well as
I! I had all his noble confidence. I knew him best.'
  " 'You knew him best,' I repeated. And perhaps
she did. But with every word spoken the room was
growing darker, and only her forehead, smooth and
white, remained illumined by the unextinguishable
light of belief and love.
  " 'You were his friend,' she went on. 'His friend,'
she repeated, a little louder. 'You must have been, if
he had given you this, and sent you to me. I feel I can
speak to you -- and oh! I must speak. I want you -- you
who have heard his last words -- to know I have been
worthy of him.... It is not pride.... Yes! I am
proud to know I understood him better than any one
on earth -- he told me so himself. And since his mother
died I have had no one -- no one -- to -- to --'
  "I listened. The darkness deepened. I was not even
sure whether he had given me the right bundle. I
rather suspect he wanted me to take care of another
batch of his papers which, after his death, I saw the
manager examining under the lamp. And the girl
talked, easing her pain in the certitude of my sympa-
thy; she talked as thirsty men drink. I had heard that
her engagement with Kurtz had been disapproved by
her people. He wasn't rich enough or something. And
indeed I don't know whether he had not been a pau-
per all his life. He had given me some reason to infer
that it was his impatience of comparative poverty that
drove him out there.
  " '. . . Who was not his friend who had heard him
speak once?' she was saying. 'He drew men towards
him by what was best in them.' She looked at me with
intensity. 'It is the gift of the great,' she went on, and
the sound of her low voice seemed to have the ac-
companiment of all the other sounds, full of mystery,
desolation, and sorrow, I had ever heard -- the ripple
of the river, the soughing of the trees swayed by the
wind, the murmurs of the crowds, the faint ring of
incomprehensible words cried from afar, the whisper
of a voice speaking from beyond the threshold of an
eternal darkness. 'But you have heard him! You
know!' she cried.
  " 'Yes, I know,' I said with something like despair
in my heart, but bowing my head before the faith that
was in her, before that great and saving illusion
that shone with an unearthly glow in the darkness, in
the triumphant darkness from which I could not have
defended her -- from which I could not even defend
myself.
  " 'What a loss to me -- to us!' -- she corrected her-
self with beautiful generosity; then added in a mur-
mur, 'To the world.' By the last gleams of twilight I
could see the glitter of her eyes, full of tears -- of tears
that would not fall.
  " 'I have been very happy -- very fortunate -- very
proud,' she went on. 'Too fortunate. Too happy for a
little while. And now I am unhappy for -- for life.'
  "She stood up; her fair hair seemed to catch all the
remaining light in a glimmer of gold. I rose, too.
  " 'And of all this,' she went on mournfully, 'of all
his promise, and of all his greatness, of his generous
mind, of his noble heart, nothing remains -- nothing
but a memory. You and I --'
  " 'We shall always remember him,' I said hastily.
  " 'No!' she cried. 'It is impossible that all this
should be lost -- that such a life should be sacrificed to
leave nothing -- but sorrow. You know what vast plans
he had. I knew of them, too -- I could not perhaps
understand -- but others knew of them. Something
must remain. His words, at least, have not died.'
  " 'His words will remain,' I said.
  " 'And his example,' she whispered to herself. 'Men
looked up to him -- his goodness shone in every act.
His example --'
  " 'True,' I said; 'his example, too. Yes, his example.
I forgot that.'
  " 'But I do not. I cannot -- I cannot believe -- not
yet. I cannot believe that I shall never see him again,
that nobody will see him again, never, never, never.'
  "She put out her arms as if after a retreating figure,
stretching them back and with clasped pale hands
across the fading and narrow sheen of the window.
Never see him! I saw him clearly enough then. I
shall see this eloquent phantom as long as I live, and
I shall see her, too, a tragic and familiar Shade,
resembling in this gesture another one, tragic also,
and bedecked with powerless charms, stretching bare
brown arms over the glitter of the infernal stream,
the stream of darkness. She said suddenly very low,
'He died as he lived.'
  " 'His end,' said I, with dull anger stirring in me,
'was in every way worthy of his life.'
  " 'And I was not with him,' she murmured. My
anger subsided before a feeling of infinite pity.
  " 'Everything that could be done --' I mumbled.
  " 'Ah, but I believed in him more than any one on
earth -- more than his own mother, more than -- him-
self. He needed me! Me! I would have treasured
every sigh, every word, every sign, every glance.'
  "I felt like a chill grip on my chest. 'Don't,' I said,
in a muffled voice.
  " 'Forgive me. I -- I have mourned so long in
silence -- in silence.... You were with him -- to the
last? I think of his loneliness. Nobody near to under-
stand him as I would have understood. Perhaps no
one to hear....'
  " 'To the very end,' I said, shakily. 'I heard his
very last words....' I stopped in a fright.
  " 'Repeat them,' she murmured in a heart-broken
tone. 'I want -- I want -- something -- something -- to --
to live with.'
  "I was on the point of crying at her, 'Don't you
hear them?' The dusk was repeating them in a per-
sistent whisper all around us, in a whisper that seemed
to swell menacingly like the first whisper of a rising
wind. 'The horror! The horror!'
  " 'His last word -- to live with,' she insisted. 'Don't
you understand I loved him -- I loved him -- I loved
him!'
  "I pulled myself together and spoke slowly.
  "'The last word he pronounced was -- your name.'
  "I heard a light sigh and then my heart stood still,
stopped dead short by an exulting and terrible cry, by
the cry of inconceivable triumph and of unspeakable
pain. 'I knew it -- I was sure!' . . . She knew. She was
sure. I heard her weeping; she had hidden her face
in her hands. It seemed to me that the house would
collapse before I could escape, that the heavens
would fall upon my head. But nothing happened. The
heavens do not fall for such a trifle. Would they have
fallen, I wonder, if I had rendered Kurtz that justice
which was his due? Hadn't he said he wanted only
justice? But I couldn't. I could not tell her. It would
have been too dark -- too dark altogether...."
  Marlow ceased, and sat apart, indistinct and silent,
in the pose of a meditating Buddha. Nobody moved
for a time. "We have lost the first of the ebb," said
the Director suddenly. I raised my head. The offing
was barred by a black bank of clouds, and the tran-
quil waterway leading to the uttermost ends of the
earth flowed sombre under an overcast sky -- seemed
to lead into the heart of an immense darkness.
[corrections to typos made 6/22/94 by PDCChristy@aol.com]
Original etext came from the Online Book Initiative (OBI)
via the Internet Wiretap


[obi/Joseph.Conrad/heart.of.darkness.txt]

Joseph Conrad: The Heart of Darkness


                        I
  The Nellie, a cruising yawl, swung to her anchor
without a flutter of the sails, and was at rest. The flood
had made, the wind was nearly calm, and being bound
down the river, the only thing for it was to come to
and wait for the turn of the tide.
  The sea-reach of the Thames stretched before us
like the beginning of an interminable waterway. In
the offing the sea and the sky were welded together
without a joint, and in the luminous space the tanned
sails of the barges drifting up with the tide seemed to
stand still in red clusters of canvas sharply peaked,
with gleams of varnished spirits. A haze rested on the
low shores that ran out to sea in vanishing flatness.
The air was dark above Gravesend, and farther back
still seemed condensed into a mournful gloom, brood-
ing motionless over the biggest, and the greatest, town
on earth.
  The Director of Companies was our captain and our
host. We four affectionately watched his back as he
stood in the bows looking to seaward. On the whole
river there was nothing that looked half so nautical.
He resembled a pilot, which to a seaman is trust-
worthiness personified. It was difficult to realize his
work was not out there in the luminous estuary, but
behind him, within the brooding gloom.
  Between us there was, as I have already said some-
where, the bond of the sea. Besides holding our hearts
together through long periods of separation, it had
the effect of making us tolerant of each other's yarns
-- and even convictions. The Lawyer -- the best of old
fellows -- had, because of his many years and many
virtues, the only cushion on deck, and was lying on the
only rug. The Accountant had brought out already a
box of dominoes, and was toying architecturally with
the bones. Marlow sat cross-legged right aft, leaning
against the mizzenmast. He had sunken cheeks, a
yellow complexion, a straight back, an ascetic aspect,
and, with his arms dropped, the palms of hands out-
wards, resembled an idol. The Director, satisfied the
anchor had good hold, made his way aft and sat down
amongst us. We exchanged a few words lazily. After-
wards there was silence on board the yacht. For some
reason or other we did not begin that game of domi-
noes. We felt meditative, and fit for nothing but
placid staring. The day was ending in a serenity of
still and exquisite brilliance. The water shone pacifi-
cally; the sky, without a speck, was a benign immen-
sity of unstained light; the very mist on the Essex
marsh was like a gauzy and radiant fabric, hung from
the wooded rises inland, and draping the low shores
in diaphanous folds. Only the gloom to the west,
brooding over the upper reaches, became more sombre
every minute, as if angered by the approach of the sun.
  And at last, in its curved and imperceptible fall, the
sun sank low, and from glowing white changed to a
dull red without rays and without heat, as if about to
go out suddenly, stricken to death by the touch of
that gloom brooding over a crowd of men.
  Forthwith a change came over the waters, and the
serenity became less brilliant but more profound. The
old river in its broad reach rested unruffled at the
decline of day, after ages of good service done to the
race that peopled its banks, spread out in the tranquil
dignity of a waterway leading to the uttermost ends
of the earth. We looked at the venerable stream not
in the vivid flush of a short day that comes and departs
for ever, but in the august light of abiding memories.
And indeed nothing is easier for a man who has, as
the phrase goes, "followed the sea" with reverence
and affection, than to evoke the great spirit of the past
upon the lower reaches of the Thames. The tidal cur-
rent runs to and fro in its unceasing service, crowded
with memories of men and ships it had borne to the
rest of home or to the battles of the sea. It had known
and served all the men of whom the nation is proud,
from Sir Francis Drake to Sir John Franklin, knights
all, titled and untitled -- the great knights-errant of
the sea. It had borne all the ships whose names are
like jewels flashing in the night of time, from the
Golden Hind returning with her round flanks full of
treasure, to be visited by the Queen's Highness and
thus pass out of the gigantic tale, to the Erebus and
Terror, bound on other conquests -- and that never
returned. It had known the ships and the men. They
had sailed from Deptford, from Greenwich, from
Erith -- the adventurers and the settlers; kings' ships
and the ships of men on 'Change; captains, admirals,
the dark "interlopers" of the Eastern trade, and the
commissioned "generals" of East India fleets. Hunters
for gold or pursuers of fame, they all had gone out
on that stream, bearing the sword, and often the torch,
messengers of the might within the land, bearers of a
spark from the sacred fire. What greatness had not
floated on the ebb of that river into the mystery of
an unknown earth! . . . The dreams of men, the
seed of commonwealths, the germs of empires.
  The sun set; the dusk fell on the stream, and lights
began to appear along the shore. The Chapman light-
house, a three-legged thing erect on a mud-flat, shone
strongly. Lights of ships moved in the fairway -- a
great stir of lights going up and going down. And
farther west on the upper reaches the place of the
monstrous town was still marked ominously on the
sky, a brooding gloom in sunshine, a lurid glare under
the stars.
  "And this also," said Marlow suddenly, "has been
one of the dark places of the earth."
  He was the only man of us who still "followed the
sea." The worst that could be said of him was that he
did not represent his class. He was a seaman, but he
was a wanderer, too, while most seamen lead, if one
may so express it, a sedentary life. Their minds are
of the stay-at-home order, and their home is always
with them -- the ship; and so is their country -- the sea.
One ship is very much like another, and the sea is
always the same. In the immutability of their sur-
roundings the foreign shores, the foreign faces, the
changing immensity of life, glide past, veiled not by
a sense of mystery but by a slightly disdainful igno-
rance; for there is nothing mysterious to a seaman
unless it be the sea itself, which is the mistress of his
existence and as inscrutable as Destiny. For the rest,
after his hours of work, a casual stroll or a casual spree
on shore suffices to unfold for him the secret of a
whole continent, and generally he finds the secret not
worth knowing. The yarns of seamen have a direct
simplicity, the whole meaning of which lies within the
shell of a cracked nut. But Marlow was not typical
(if his propensity to spin yarns be excepted), and to
him the meaning of an episode was not inside like a
kernel but outside, enveloping the tale which brought
it out only as a glow brings out a haze, in the likeness
of one of these misty halos that sometimes are made
visible by the spectral illumination of moonshine.
  His remark did not seem at all surprising. It was
just like Marlow. It was accepted in silence. No one
took the trouble to grunt even; and presently he said,
very slow --
  "I was thinking of very old times, when the
Romans first came here, nineteen hundred years ago --
the other day.... Light came out of this river
since -- you say Knights? Yes; but it is like a running
blaze on a plain, like a flash of lightning in the clouds.
We live in the flicker -- may it last as long as the old
earth keeps rolling! But darkness was here yesterday.
Imagine the feelings of a commander of a fine -- what
d'ye call 'em? -- trireme in the Mediterranean, or-
dered suddenly to the north run overland across the
Gauls in a hurry; put in charge of one of these craft
the legionaries -- a wonderful lot of handy men they
must have been, too -- used to build, apparently by the
hundred, in a month or two, if we may believe what
we read. Imagine him here -- the very end of the
world, a sea the colour of lead, a sky the colour of
smoke, a kind of ship about as rigid as a concertina --
and going up this river with stores, or orders, or what
you like. Sand-banks, marshes, forests, savages, --
precious little to eat fit for a civilized man, nothing but
Thames water to drink. No Falernian wine here, no
going ashore. Here and there a military camp lost in
a wilderness, like a needle in a bundle of hay -- cold,
fog, tempests, disease, exile, and death -- death skulk-
ing in the air, in the water, in the bush. They must
have been dying like flies here. Oh, yes -- he did it.
Did it very well, too, no doubt, and without thinking
much about it either, except afterwards to brag of
what he had gone through in his time, perhaps. They
were men enough to face the darkness. And perhaps
he was cheered by keeping his eye on a chance of pro-
motion to the fleet at Ravenna by and by, if he had
good friends in Rome and survived the awful climate.
Or think of a decent young citizen in a toga -- perhaps
too much dice, you know -- coming out here in the
train of some prefect, or tax-gatherer, or trader even,
to mend his fortunes. Land in a swamp, march
through the woods, and in some inland post feel the
savagery, the utter savagery, had closed round him --
all that mysterious life of the wilderness that stirs in
the forest, in the jungles, in the hearts of wild men.
There's no initiation either into such mysteries. He
has to live in the midst of the incomprehensible,
which is also detestable. And it has a fascination, too,
that goes to work upon him. The fascination of the
abomination -- you know, imagine the growing regrets,
the longing to escape, the powerless disgust, the sur-
render, the hate."
  He paused.
  "Mind," he began again, lifting one arm from the
elbow, the palm of the hand outwards, so that, with
his legs folded before him, he had the pose of a
Buddha preaching in European clothes and without a
lotus-flower -- "Mind, none of us would feel exactly
like this. What saves us is efficiency -- the devotion to
efficiency. But these chaps were not much account,
really. They were no colonists; their administration
was merely a squeeze, and nothing more, I suspect.
They were conquerors, and for that you want only
brute force -- nothing to boast of, when you have it,
since your strength is just an accident arising from the
weakness of others. They grabbed what they could get
for the sake of what was to be got. It was just robbery
with violence, aggravated murder on a great scale,
and men going at it blind -- as is very proper for those
who tackle a darkness. The conquest of the earth,
which mostly means the taking it away from those
who have a different complexion or slightly flatter
noses than ourselves, is not a pretty thing when you
look into it too much. What redeems it is the idea
only. An idea at the back of it; not a sentimental pre-
tence but an idea; and an unselfish belief in the idea --
something you can set up, and bow down before, and
offer a sacrifice to..."
  He broke off. Flames glided in the river, small
green flames, red flames, white flames, pursuing, over-
taking, joining, crossing each other -- then separating
slowly or hastily. The traffic of the great city went on
in the deepening night upon the sleepless river. We
looked on, waiting patiently -- there was nothing else
to do till the end of the flood; but it was only after a
long silence, when he said, in a hesitating voice, "I
suppose you fellows remember I did once turn fresh
water sailor for a bit," that we knew we were fated,
before the ebb began to run, to hear about one of
Marlow's inconclusive experiences.
  "I don't want to bother you much with what hap-
pened to me personally," he began, showing in this
remark the weakness of many tellers of tales who
seem so often unaware of what their audience would
best like to hear; "yet to understand the effect of it on
me you ought to know how I got out there, what I
saw, how I went up that river to the place where I
first met the poor chap. It was the farthest point of
navigation and the culminating point of my experi-
ence. It seemed somehow to throw a kind of light on
everything about me -- and into my thoughts. It was
sombre enough, too -- and pitiful -- not extraordinary
in any way -- not very clear either. No, not very clear.
And yet it seemed to throw a kind of light.
  "I had then, as you remember, just returned to
London after a lot of Indian Ocean, Pacific, China
Seas a regular dose of the East -- six years or so, and
I was loafing about, hindering you fellows in your
work and invading your homes, just as though I had
got a heavenly mission to civilize you. It was very fine
for a time, but after a bit I did get tired of resting.
Then I began to look for a ship -- I should think the
hardest work on earth. But the ships wouldn't even
look at me. And I got tired of that game, too.
  "Now when I was a little chap I had a passion for
maps. I would look for hours at South America, or
Africa, or Australia, and lose myself in all the glories
of exploration. At that time there were many blank
spaces on the earth, and when I saw one that looked
particularly inviting on a map (but they all look that)
I would put my finger on it and say, 'When I grow
up I will go there.' The North Pole was one of these
places, I remember. Well, I haven't been there yet,
and shall not try now. The glamour's off. Other places
were scattered about the Equator, and in every sort of
latitude all over the two hemispheres. I have been in
some of them, and . . . well, we won't talk about
that. But there was one yet -- the biggest, the most
blank, so to speak -- that I had a hankering after.
  "True, by this time it was not a blank space any
more. It had got filled since my boyhood with rivers
and lakes and names. It had ceased to be a blank space
of delightful mystery -- a white patch for a boy to
dream gloriously over. It had become a place of dark-
ness. But there was in it one river especially, a mighty
big river, that you could see on the map, resembling
an immense snake uncoiled, with its head in the sea, its
body at rest curving afar over a vast country, and its
tail lost in the depths of the land. And as I looked at
the map of it in a shop-window, it fascinated me as a
snake would a bird -- a silly little bird. Then I remem-
bered there was a big concern, a Company for trade
on that river. Dash it all! I thought to myself, they
can't trade without using some kind of craft on that lot
of fresh water -- steamboats! Why shouldn't I try to
get charge of one? I went on along Fleet Street, but
could not shake off the idea. The snake had charmed
me.
  "You understand it was a Continental concern, that
Trading society; but I have a lot of relations living on
the Continent, because it's cheap and not so nasty as it
looks, they say.
  "I am sorry to own I began to worry them. This
was already a fresh departure for me. I was not used
to get things that way, you know. I always went my
own road and on my own legs where I had a mind to
go. I wouldn't have believed it of myself; but, then --
you see -- I felt somehow I must get there by hook or
by crook. So I worried them. The men said 'My dear
fellow,' and did nothing. Then -- would you believe
it? -- I tried the women. I, Charlie Marlow, set the
women to work -- to get a job. Heavens! We]l, you
see, the notion drove me. I had an aunt, a dear enthu-
siastic soul. She wrote: 'It will be delightful. I am
ready to do anything, anything for you. It is a glorious
idea. I know the wife of a very high personage in the
Administration, and also a man who has lots of influ-
ence with,' etc., etc. She was determined to make no
end of fuss to get me appointed skipper of a river
steamboat, if such was my fancy.
  "I got my appointment -- of course; and I got it
very quick. It appears the Company had received news
that one of their captains had been killed in a scuffle
with the natives. This was my chance, and it made me
the more anxious to go. It was only months and
months afterwards, when I made the attempt to re-
cover what was left of the body, that I heard the
original quarrel arose from a misunderstanding about
some hens. Yes, two black hens. Fresleven -- that was
the fellow's name, a Dane -- thought himself wronged
somehow in the bargain, so he went ashore and started
to hammer the chief of the village with a stick. Oh,
it didn't surprise me in the least to hear this, and at the
same time to be told that Fresleven was the gentlest,
quietest creature that ever walked on two legs. No
doubt he was; but he had been a couple of years al-
ready out there engaged in the noble cause, you know,
and he probably felt the need at last of asserting his
self-respect in some way. Therefore he whacked the
old nigger mercilessly, while a big crowd of his people
watched him, thunderstruck, till some man -- I was
told the chief's son -- in desperation at hearing the old
chap yell, made a tentative jab with a spear at the
white man -- and of course it went quite easy between
the shoulder-blades. Then the whole population
cleared into the forest, expecting all kinds of calamities
to happen, while, on the other hand, the steamer Fres-
leven commanded left also in a bad panic, in charge of
the engineer, I believe. Afterwards nobody seemed to
trouble much about Fresleven's remains, till I got out
and stepped into his shoes. I couldn't let it rest,
though; but when an opportunity offered at last to
meet my predecessor, the grass growing through his
ribs was tall enough to hide his bones. They were all
there. The supernatural being had not been touched
after he fell. And the village was deserted, the huts
gaped black, rotting, all askew within the fallen en-
dosures. A calamity had come to it, sure enough. The
people had vanished. Mad terror had scattered them,
men, women, and children, through the bush, and
they had never returned. What became of the hens I
don't know either. I should think the cause of progress
got them, anyhow. However, through this glorious
affair I got my appointment, before I had fairly begun
to hope for it.
  "I flew around like mad to get ready, and before
forty-eight hours I was crossing the Channel to snow
myself to my employers, and sign the contract. In a
very few hours I arrived in a city that always makes
me think of a whited sepulchre. Prejudice no doubt. I
had no difficulty in finding the Company's offices. It
was the biggest thing in the town, and everybody I
met was full of it. They were going to run an over sea
empire, and make no end of coin by trade.
  "A narrow and deserted street in deep shadow, high
houses, innumerable windows with venetian blinds, a
dead silence, grass sprouting between the stones, im-
posing carriage archways right and left, immense
double doors standing ponderously ajar. I slipped
through one of these cracks, went up a swept and un-
garnished staircase, as arid as a desert, and opened the
first door I came to. Two women, one fat and the
other slim, sat on straw-bottomed chairs, knitting black
wool. The slim one got up and walked straight at me
-- still knitting with downcast eyes -- and only just as
I began to think of getting out of her way, as you
would for a somnambulist, stood still, and looked up.
Her dress was as plain as an umbrella-cover, and she
turned round without a word and preceded me into a
waiting-room. I gave my name, and looked about.
Deal table in the middle, plain chairs all round the
walls, on one end a large shining map, marked with
all the colours of a rainbow. There was a vast amount
of red -- good to see at any time, because one knows
that some real work is done in there, a deuce of a lot
of blue, a little green, smears of orange, and, on
the East Coast, a purple patch, to show where the
jolly pioneers of progress drink the jolly lager-beer.
However, I wasn't going into any of these. I was
going into the yellow. Dead in the centre. And the
river was there -- fascinating -- deadly -- like a snake.
Ough! A door opened, a white-haired secretarial head,
but wearing a compassionate expression, appeared, and
a skinny forefinger beckoned me into the sanctuary. Its
light was dim, and a heavy writing-desk squatted in
the middle. From behind that structure came out an
impression of pale plumpness in a frock-coat. The
great man himself. He was five feet six, I should
judge, and had his grip on the handle-end of ever so
many millions. He shook hands, I fancy, murmured
vaguely, Was satisfied with my French. Bon voyage.
  "In about forty-five seconds I found myself again in
the waiting-room with the compassionate secretary,
who, full of desolation and sympathy, made me sign
some document. I believe I undertook amongst other
things not to disclose any trade secrets. Well, I am
not going to.
  "I began to feel slightly uneasy. You know I am
not used to such ceremonies, and there was something
ominous in the atmosphere. It was just as though I
had been let into some conspiracy -- I don't know --
something not quite right; and I was glad to get out.
In the outer room the two women knitted black wool
feverishly. People were arriving, and the younger one
was walking back and forth introducing them. The
old one sat on her chair. Her flat cloth slippers were
propped up on a foot-warmer, and a cat reposed on her
lap. She wore a starched white affair on her head, had
a wart on one cheek, and silver-rimmed spectacles hung
on the tip of her nose. She glanced at me above the
glasses. The swift and indifferent placidity of that
look troubled me. Two youths with foolish and cheery
countenances were being piloted over, and she threw at
them the same quick glance of unconcerned wisdom.
She seemed to know all about them and about me, too.
An eerie feeling came over me. She seemed uncanny
and fateful. Often far away there I thought of these
two, guarding the door of Darkness, knitting black
wool as for a warm pall, one introducing, introducing
continuously to the unknown, the other scrutinizing
the cheery and foolish faces with unconcerned old
eyes. Ave! Old knittter of black wool. Morituri te
salutant. Not many of those she looked at ever saw
her again -- not half, by a long way.
  "There was yet a visit to the doctor. 'A simple for-
mality,' assured me the secretary, with an air of taking
an immense part in all my sorrows. Accordingly a
young chap wearing his hat over the left eyebrow,
some clerk I suppose -- there must have been clerks
in the business, though the house was as still as a
house in a city of the dead -- came from somewhere
up-stairs, and led me forth. He was shabby and care-
less, with inkstains on the sleeves of his jacket, and
his cravat was large and billowy, under a chin shaped
like the toe of an old boot. It was a little too early for
the doctor, so I proposed a drink, and thereupon he
developed a vein of joviality. As we sat over our ver-
mouths he glorified the Company's business, and by
and by I expressed casually my surprise at him not
going out there. He became very cool and collected
all at once. 'I am not such a fool as I look, quoth
Plato to his disciples,' he said sententiously, emptied
his glass with great resolution, and we rose.
  "The old doctor felt my pulse, evidently thinking
of something else the while. 'Good, good for there,' he
mumbled, and then with a certain eagerness asked me
whether I would let him measure my head. Rather
surprised, I said Yes, when he produced a thing like
calipers and got the dimensions back and front and
every way, taking notes carefully. He was an un-
shaven little man in a threadbare coat like a gaberdine,
with his feet in slippers, and I thought him a harmless
fool. 'I always ask leave, in the interests of science, to
measure the crania of those going out there,' he said.
'And when they come back, too?' I asked. 'Oh, I never
see them,' he remarked; 'and, moreover, the changes
take place inside, you know.' He smiled, as if at some
quiet joke. 'So you are going out there. Famous.
Interesting, too.' He gave me a searching glance, and
made another note. 'Ever any madness in your fam-
ily?' he asked, in a matter-of-fact tone. I felt very
annoyed. 'Is that question in the interests of science,
too?' 'It would be,' he said, without taking notice of
my irritation, 'interesting for science to watch the
mental changes of individuals, on the spot, but . . .'
'Are you an alienist?' I interrupted. 'Every doctor
should be -- a little,' answered that original, imperturb-
ably. 'I have a little theory which you messieurs who
go out there must help me to prove. This is my share
in the advantages my country shall reap from the
possession of such a magnificent dependency. The
mere wealth I leave to others. Pardon my questions,
but you are the first Englishman coming under my
observation . . .' I hastened to assure him I was not
in the least typical. 'If I were,' said I, 'I wouldn't be
talking like this with you.' 'What you say is rather
profound, and probably erroneous,' he said, with a
laugh. 'Avoid irritation more than exposure to the
sun. Adieu. How do you English say, eh? Good-bye.
Ah! Good-bye. Adieu. In the tropics one must before
everything keep calm.' . . . He lifted a warning
forefinger. . . 'Du calme, du calme, Adieu.'
  "One thing more remained to do -- say good-bye to
my excellent aunt. I found her triumphant. I had a
cup of tea -- the last decent cup of tea for many days --
and in a room that most soothingly looked just as you
would expect a lady's drawing-room to look, we had a
long quiet chat by the fireside. In the course of these
confidences it became quite plain to me I had been
represented to the wife of the high dignitary, and
goodness knows to how many more people besides, as
an exceptional and gifted creature -- a piece of good
fortune for the Company -- a man you don't get hold
of every day. Good heavens! and I was going to take
charge of a two-penny-half-penny river-steamboat with
a penny whistle attached! It appeared, however, I
was also one of the Workers, with a capital -- you
know. Something like an emissary of light, something
like a lower sort of apostle. There had been a lot of
such rot let loose in print and talk just about that time,
and the excellent woman, living right in the rush of
all that humbug, got carried off her feet. She talked
about 'weaning those ignorant millions from their
horrid ways,' till, upon my word, she made me quite
uncomfortable. I ventured to hint that the Company
was run for profit.
  " 'You forget, dear Charlie, that the labourer is
worthy of his hire,' she said, brightly. It's queer how
out of touch with truth women are. They live in a
world of their own, and there has never been anything
like it, and never can be. It is too beautiful altogether,
and if they were to set it up it would go to pieces
before the first sunset. Some confounded fact we men
have been living contentedly with ever since the day
of creation would start up and knock the whole thing
over.
  "After this I got embraced, told to wear flannel, be
sure to write often, and so on -- and I left. In the
street -- I don't know why -- a queer feeling came to me
that I was an impostor. Odd thing that I, who used to
clear out for any part of the world at twenty-four
hours' notice, with less thought than most men give to
the crossing of a street, had a moment -- I won't say
of hesitation, but of startled pause, before this com-
monplace affair. The best way I can explain it to you
is by saying that, for a second or two, I felt as though,
instead of going to the centre of a continent, I were
about to set off for the centre of the earth.
  "I left in a French steamer, and she called in every
blamed port they have out there, for, as far as I
could see, the sole purpose of landing soldiers and
custom-house officers. I watched the coast. Watching a
coast as it slips by the ship is like thinking about an
enigma. There it is before you -- smiling, frowning,
inviting, grand, mean, insipid, or savage, and always
mute with an air of whispering, 'Come and find out.'
This one was almost featureless, as if still in the mak-
ing, with an aspect of monotonous grimness. The edge
of a colossal jungle, so dark-green as to be almost
black, fringed with white surf, ran straight, like a
ruled line, far, far away along a blue sea whose glitter
was blurred by a creeping mist. The sun was fierce,
the land seemed to glisten and drip with steam. Here
and there greyish-whitish specks showed up clustered
inside the white surf, with a flag fiying above them
perhaps. Settlements some centuries old, and still no
bigger than pinheads on the untouched expanse of
their background. We pounded along, stopped, landed
soldiers; went on, landed custom-house clerks to
levy toll in what looked like a God-forsaken wilder-
ness, with a tin shed and a flag-pole lost in it; landed
more soldiers to take care of the custom-house clerks,
presumably. Some, I heard, got drowned in the surf;
but whether they did or not, nobody seemed particu-
larly to care. They were just flung out there, and on
we went. Every day the coast looked the same, as
though we had not moved; but we passed various
places -- trading places with names like Gran' Bas-
sam, Little Popo; names that seemed to belong to
some sordid farce acted in front of a sinister back-cloth.
The idleness of a passenger, my isolation amongst all
these men with whom I had no point of contact, the
oily and languid sea, the uniform sombreness of the
coast, seemed to keep me away from the truth of things,
within the toil of a mournful and senseless delusion.
The voice of the surf heard now and then was a posi-
tive pleasure, like the speech of a brother. It was some-
thing natural, that had its reason, that had a meaning
Now and then a boat from the shore gave one a mo-
mentary contact with reality. It was paddled by
black fellows. You could see from afar the white of
their eyeballs glistening. They shouted, sang; their
bodies streamed with perspiration; they had faces
like grotesque masks -- these chaps; but they had bone,
muscle, a wild vitality, an intense energy of move-
ment, that was as natural and true as the surf along
their coast. They wanted no excuse for being there.
They were a great comfort to look at. For a time I
would feel I belonged still to a world of straightfor-
ward facts; but the feeling would not last long. Some-
thing would turn up to scare it away. Once, I remem-
ber, we came upon a man-of-war anchored off the
coast. There wasn't even a shed there, and she was
shelling the bush. It appears the French had one of
their wars going on thereabouts. Her ensign dropped
limp like a rag; the muzzles of the long six-inch guns
stuck out all over the low hull; the greasy, slimy swell
swung her up lazily and let her down, swaying her
thin masts. In the empty immensity of earth, sky, and
water, there she was, incomprehensible, firing into a
continent. Pop, would go one of the six-inch guns; a
small flame would dart and vanish, a little white smoke
would disappear, a tiny projectile would give a feeble
screech -- and nothing happened. Nothing could hap-
pen. There was a touch of insanity in the proceeding,
a sense of lugubrious drollery in the sight; and it was
not dissipated by somebody on board assuring me
earnestly there was a camp of natives -- he called them
enemies! -- hidden out of sight somewhere.
**  "We gave her her letters (I heard the men in that
lonely ship were dying of fever at the rate of three
a day) and went on. We called at some more places
with farcical names, where the merry dance of death
and trade goes on in a still and earthy atmosphere as
of an overheated catacomb; all along the formless
coast bordered by dangerous surf, as if Nature herself
had tried to ward off intruders; in and out of rivers,
streams of death in life, whose banks were rotting into
mud, whose waters, thickened into slime, invaded the
contorted mangroves, that seemed to writhe at us
in the extremity of an impotent despair. Nowhere
did we stop long enough to get a particularized im-
pression, but the general sense of vague and oppres-
sive wonder grew upon me. It was like a weary
pilgrimage amongst hints for nightmares
  "It was upward of thirty days before I saw the
mouth of the big river. We anchored off the seat of
the government. But my work would not begin till
some two hundred miles farther on. So as soon as I
could I made a start for a place thirty miles higher up.
  "I had my passage on a little sea-going steamer.
Her captain was a Swede, and knowing me for a
seaman, invited me on the bridge. He was a young
man, lean, fair, and morose, with lanky hair and a
shuffling gait. As we left the miserable little wharf,
he tossed his head contemptuously at the shore. 'Been
living there?' he asked. I said, 'Yes.' 'Fine lot these
government chaps -- are they not?' he went on, speak-
ing English with great precision and considerable bit-
terness. 'It is funny what some people will do for a
few francs a month. I wonder what becomes of that
kind when it goes upcountry?' I said to him I expected
to see that soon. 'So-o-o!' he exclaimed. He shuffled
athwart, keeping one eye ahead vigilantly. 'Don't be
too sure,' he continued. 'The other day I took up a
man who hanged himself on the road. He was a
Swede, too.' 'Hanged himself! Why, in God's name?'
I cried. He kept on looking out watchfully. 'Who
knows? The sun too much for him, or the country
perhaps.'
  "At last we opened a reach. A rocky cliff appeared,
mounds of turned-up earth by the shore, houses on a
hill, others with iron roofs, amongst a waste of exca-
vations, or hanging to the declivity. A continuous noise
of the rapids above hovered over this scene of in-
habited devastation. A lot of people, mostly black
and naked, moved about like ants. A jetty projected
into the river. A blinding sunlight drowned all this
at times in a sudden recrudescence of glare. 'There's
your Company's station,' said the Swede, pointing to
three wooden barrack-like structures on the rocky
slope. 'I will send your things up. Four boxes did you
say? So. Farewell.'
  "I came upon a boiler wallowing in the grass, then
found a path leading up the hill. It turned aside for
the boulders, and also for an undersized railway-truck
lying there on its back with its wheels in the air. One
was off. The thing looked as dead as the carcass of
some animal. I came upon more pieces of decaying
machinery, a stack of rusty rails. To the left a clump
of trees made a shady spot, where dark things seemed
to stir feebly. I blinked, the path was steep. A horn
tooted to the right, and I saw the black people run. A
heavy and dull detonation shook the ground, a puff
of smoke came out of the cliff, and that was all. No
change appeared on the face of the rock. They were
building a railway. The cliff was not in the way or
anything; but this objectless blasting was all the work
going on.
  "A slight clinking behind me made me turn my
head. Six black men advanced in a file, toiling up the
path. They walked erect and slow, balancing small
baskets full of earth on their heads, and the clink
kept time with their footsteps. Black rags were wound
round their loins, and the short ends behind waggled
to and fro like tails. I could see every rib, the joints of
their limbs were like knots in a rope; each had an
iron collar on his neck, and all were connected together
with a chain whose bights swung between them,
rhythmically clinking. Another report from the cliff
made me think suddenly of that ship of war I had
seen firing into a continent. It was the same kind of
ominous voice; but these men could by no stretch of
imagination be called enemies. They were called
criminals, and the outraged law, like the bursting
shells, had come to them, an insoluble mystery from
the sea. All their meagre breasts panted together, the
violently dilated nostrils quivered, the eyes stared
stonily uphill. They passed me within six inches, with-
out a glance, with that complete, deathlike indifference
of unhappy savages. Behind this raw matter one of the
reclaimed, the product of the new forces at work,
strolled despondently, carrying a rifle by its middle.
He had a uniform jacket with one button off, and
seeing a white man on the path, hoisted his weapon to
his shoulder with alacrity. This was simple prudence,
white men being so much alike at a distance that he
could not tell who I might be. He was speedily re-
assured, and with a large, white, rascally grin, and a
glance at his charge, seemed to take me into partner-
ship in his exalted trust. After all, I also was a part of
the great cause of these high and just proceedings.
  "Instead of going up, I turned and descended to the
left. My idea was to let that chain-gang get out of
sight before I climbed the hill. You know I am not
particularly tender; I've had to strike and to fend off.
I've had to resist and to attack sometimes -- that's only
one way of resisting -- without counting the exact cost,
according to the demands of such sort of life as I had
blundered into. I've seen the devil of violence, and
the devil of greed, and the devil of hot desire; but,
by all the stars! these were strong, lusty, red-eyed
devils, that swayed and drove men -- men, I tell you.
But as I stood on this hillside, I foresaw that in the
blinding sunshine of that land I would become ac-
quainted with a flabby, pretending, weak-eyed devil
of a rapacious and pitiless folly. How insidious he
could be, too, I was only to find out several months
later and a thousand miles farther. For a moment I
stood appalled, as though by a warning. Finally I
descended the hill, obliquely, towards the trees I had
seen.
  "I avoided a vast artificial hole somebody had been
digging on the slope, the purpose of which I found it
impossible to divine. It wasn't a quarry or a sandpit,
anyhow. It was just a hole. It might have been con-
nected with the philanthropic desire of giving the
criminals something to do. I don't know. Then I
nearly fell into a very narrow ravine, almost no more
than a scar in the hillside. I discovered that a lot of
imported drainage-pipes for the settlement had been
tumbled in there. There wasn't one that was not
broken. It was a wanton smash-up. At last I got under
the trees. My purpose was to stroll into the shade for
a moment; but no sooner within than it seemed to me
I had stepped into the gloomy circle of some Inferno.
The rapids were near, and an uninterrupted, uniform,
headlong, rushing noise filled the mournful stillness
of the grove, where not a breath stirred, not a leaf
moved, with a mysterious sound -- as though the tear-
ing pace of the launched earth had suddenly become
audible.
  "Black shapes crouched, lay, sat between the trees
leaning against the trunks, clinging to the earth, half
coming out, half effased within the dim light, in all
the attitudes of pain, abandonment, and despair. An-
other mine on the cliff went off, followed by a slight
shudder of the soil under my feet. The work was
going on. The work! And this was the place where
some of the helpers had withdrawn to die.
  "They were dying slowly -- it was very clear. They
were not enemies, they were not criminals, they were
nothing earthly now -- nothing but black shadows of
disease and starvation, lying confusedly in the green-
ish gloom. Brought from all the recesses of the coast
in all the legality of time contracts, lost in uncon-
genial surroundings, fed on unfamiliar food, they
sickened, became inefficient, and were then allowed
to crawl away and rest. These moribund shapes were
free as air -- and nearly as thin. I began to distinguish
the gleam of the eyes under the trees. Then, glancing
down, I saw a face near my hand. The black bones
reclined at full length with one shoulder against the
tree, and slowly the eyelids rose and the sunken eyes
looked up at me, enormous and vacant, a kind of
blind, white flicker in the depths of the orbs, which
died out slowly. The man seemed young -- almost a
boy -- but you know with them it's hard to tell. I
found nothing else to do but to offer him one of my
good Swede's ship's biscuits I had in my pocket. The
fingers closed slowly on it and held -- there was no
other movement and no other glance. He had tied a
bit of white worsted round his neck -- Why? Where
did he get it? Was it a badge -- an ornament -- charm
-- a propitiatory act? Was there any idea at all con-
nected with it? It looked startling round his black
neck, this bit of white thread from beyond the seas.
  "Near the same tree two more bundles of acute
angles sat with their legs drawn up. One, with his
chin propped on his knees, stared at nothing, in an
intolerable and appalling manner: his brother phan-
tom rested its forehead, as if overcome with a great
weariness; and all about others were scattered in
every pose of contorted collapse, as in some picture of
a massacre or a pestilence. While I stood horror-
struck, one of these creatures rose to his hands and
knees, and went off on all-fours towards the river to
drink. He lapped out of his hand, then sat up in the
sunlight, crossing his shins in front of him, and after
a time let his woolly head fall on his breastbone.
  "I didn't want any more loitering in the shade, and
I made haste towards the station. When near the
buildings I met a white man, in such an unexpected
elegance of getup that in the first moment I took him
for a sort of vision. I saw a high starched collar,
white cuffs, a light alpaca jacket, snowy trousers, a
clean necktie, and varnished boots. No hat. Hair
parted, brushed, oiled, under a green-lined parasol
held in a big white hand. He was amazing, and had a
penholder behind his ear.
  "I shook hands with this miracle, and I learned he
was the Company's chief accountant, and that all the
bookkeeping was done at this station. He had come
out for a moment, he said, 'to get a breath of fresh
air.' The expression sounded wonderfully odd, with
its suggestion of sedentary desk-life. I wouldn't have
mentioned the fellow to you at all, only it was from
his lips that I first heard the name of the man who is
so indissolubly connected with the memories of that
time. Moreover, I respected the fellow. Yes; I re-
spected his collars, his vast cuffs, his brushed hair. His
appearance was certainly that of a hairdresser's
dummy; but in the great demoralization of the land
he kept up his appearance. That's backbone. His
starched collars and got-up shirt-fronts were achieve-
ments of character. He had been out nearly three
years; and later, I could not help asking him how he
managed to sport such linen. He had just the faintest
blush, and said modestly, 'I've been teaching one of
the native women about the station. It was difficult.
She had a distaste for the work.' Thus this man had
verily accomplished something. And he was devoted
to his books, which were in apple-pie order.
  "Everything else in the station was in a muddle --
heads, things, buildings. Strings of dusty niggers with
splay feet arrived and departed; a stream of manu-
factured goods, rubbishy cottons, beads, and brass-
wire set into the depths of darkness, and in return
came a precious trickle of ivory.
  "I had to wait in the station for ten days -- an
eternity. I lived in a hut in the yard, but to be out of
the chaos I would sometimes get into the accountant's
office. It was built of horizontal planks, and so badly
put together that, as he bent over his high desk, he
was barred from neck to heels with narrow strips of
sunlight. There was no need to open the big shutter to
see. It was hot there, too; big flies buzzed fiendishly,
and did not sting, but stabbed. I sat generally on the
floor, while, of faultless appearance (and even slightly
scented), perching on a high stool, he wrote, he wrote.
Sometimes he stood up for exercise. When a truckle-
bed with a sick man (some invalid agent from up-
country) was put in there, he exhibited a gentle an-
noyance. 'The groans of this sick person,' he said,
'distract my attention. And without that it is ex-
tremely difficult to guard against clerical errors in
this climate.'
  "One day he remarked, without lifting his head,
'In the interior you will no doubt meet Mr. Kurtz.'
On my asking who Mr. Kurtz was, he said he was a
first-class agent; and seeing my disappointment at
this information, he added slowly, laying down his
pen, 'He is a very remarkable person.' Further ques-
tions elicited from him that Mr. Kurtz was at present
in charge of a trading-post, a very important one, in
the true ivory-country, at 'the very bottom of there.
Sends in as much ivory as all the others put together
. . .' He began to write again. The sick man was too
ill to groan. The flies buzzed in a great peace.
  "Suddenly there was a growing murmur of voices
and a great tramping of feet. A caravan had come in.
A violent babble of uncouth sounds burst out on the
other side of the planks. All the carriers were speaking
together, and in the midst of the uproar the lament-
able voice of the chief agent was heard 'giving it up'
tearfully for the twentieth time that day.... He
rose slowly. 'What a frightful row,' he said. He
crossed the room gently to look at the sick man, and
returning, said to me, 'He does not hear.' 'What!
Dead?' I asked, startled. 'No, not yet,' he answered,
with great composure. Then, alluding with a toss of
the head to the tumult in the station-yard, 'When one
has got to make correct entries, one comes to hate
those savages -- hate them to the death.' He remained
thoughtful for a moment. 'When you see Mr. Kurtz'
he went on, 'tell him from me that everything here' --
he glanced at the deck -- 'is very satisfactory. I don't
like to write to him -- with those messengers of ours
you never know who may get hold of your letter -- at
that Central Station.' He stared at me for a moment
with his mild, bulging eyes. 'Oho, he will go far, very
far,' he began again. 'He will be a somebody in the
Administration before long. They, above -- the Coun-
cil in Europe, you know -- mean him to be.'
  "He turned to his work. The noise outside had
ceased, and presently in going out I stopped at the
door. In the steady buzz of flies the homeward-bound
agent was lying flushed and insensible; the other,
bent over his books, was making correct entries of
perfectly correct transactions; and fifty feet below the
doorstep I could see the still treetops of the grove of
death.
  "Next day I left that station at last, with a caravan
of sixty men, for a two-hundred-mile tramp.
  "No use telling you much about that. Paths, paths,
everywhere; a stamped-in network of paths spreading
over the empty land, through the long grass, through
burnt grass, through thickets, down and up chilly
ravines, up and down stony hills ablaze with heat;
and a solitude, a solitude, nobody, not a hut. The
population had cleared out a long time ago. Well, if
a lot of mysterious niggers armed with all kinds of
fearful weapons suddenly took to travelling on the
road between Deal and Gravesend, catching the yo-
kels right and left to carry heavy loads for them, I
fancy every farm and cottage thereabouts would
get empty very soon. Only here the dwellings were
gone, too. Still I passed through several abandoned
villages. There's something pathetically childish in
the ruins of grass walls. Day after day, with the stamp
and shuffle of sixty pair of bare feet behind me, each
pair under a 60-lb. load. Camp, cook, sleep, strike
camp, march. Now and then a carrier dead in harness,
at rest in the long grass near the path, with an empty
water-gourd and his long staff lying by his side. A
great silence around and above. Perhaps on some
quiet night the tremor of far-off drums, sinking, swell-
ing, a tremor vast, faint; a sound weird, appealing,
suggestive, and wild -- and perhaps with as profound
a meaning as the sound of bells in a Christian country.
Once a white man in an unbuttoned uniform, camping
on the path with an armed escort of lank Zanzibaris,
very hospitable and festive -- not to say drunk. Was
looking after the upkeep of the road, he declared.
Can't say I saw any road or any upkeep, unless the
body of a middle-aged negro, with a bullet-hole in the
forehead, upon which I absolutely stumbled three
miles farther on, may be considered as a permanent
improvement. I had a white companion, too, not a bad
chap, but rather too fleshy and with the exasperating
habit of fainting on the hot hillsides, miles away from
the least bit of shade and water. Annoying, you know,
to hold your own coat like a parasol over a man's
head while he is coming to. I couldn't help asking him
once what he meant by coming there at all. 'To make
money, of course. What do you think?' he said, scorn-
fully. Then he got fever, and had to be carried in a
hammock slung under a pole. As he weighed sixteen
stone I had no end of rows with the carriers. They
jibbed, ran away, sneaked off with their loads in the
night -- quite a mutiny. So, one evening, I made a
speech in English with gestures, not one of which was
lost to the sixty pairs of eyes before me, and the next
morning I started the hammock off in front all right.
An hour afterwards I came upon the whole concern
wrecked in a bush -- man, hammock, groans, blankets,
horrors. The heavy pole had skinned his poor nose.
He was very anxious for me to kill somebody, but
there wasn't the shadow of a carrier near. I remem-
bered the old doctor -- 'It would be interesting for
science to watch the mental changes of individuals, on
the spot.' I felt I was becoming scientifically interest-
ing. However, all that is to no purpose. On the fif-
teenth day I came in sight of the big river again, and
hobbled into the Central Station. It was on a back
water surrounded by scrub and forest, with a pretty
border of smelly mud on one side, and on the three
others enclosed by a crazy fence of rushes. A ne-
glected gap was all the gate it had, and the first glance
at the place was enough to let you see the flabby devil
was running that show. White men with long staves in
their hands appeared languidly from amongst the
buildings, strolling up to take a look at me, and then
retired out of sight somewhere. One of them, a stout,
excitable chap with black moustaches, informed me
with great volubility and many digressions, as soon
as I told him who I was, that my steamer was at the
bottom of the river. I was thunderstruck. What, how,
why? Oh, it was 'all right.' The 'manager himself'
was there. All quite correct. 'Everybody had behaved
splendidly! splendidly!' -- 'you must,' he said in agi-
tation, 'go and see the general manager at once. He is
waiting!'
  "I did not see the real significance of that wreck at
once. I fancy I see it now, but I am not sure not at
all. Certainly the affair was too stupid -- when I think
of it -- to be altogether natural. Still . . . But at the
moment it presented itself simply as a confounded
nuisance. The steamer was sunk. They had started
two days before in a sudden hurry up the river with
the manager on board, in charge of some volunteer
skipper, and before they had been out three hours
they tore the bottom out of her on stones, and she
sank near the south bank. I asked myself what I was
to do there, now my boat was lost. As a matter of fact,
I had plenty to do in fishing my command out of the
river. I had to set about it the very next day. That,
and the repairs when I brought the pieces to the sta-
tion, took some months.
  "My first interview with the manager was curious.
He did not ask me to sit down after my twenty-mile
walk that morning. He was commonplace in com-
plexion, in feature, in manners, and in voice. He was
of middle size and of ordinary build. His eyes, of the
usual blue, were perhaps remarkably cold, and he
certainly could make his glance fall on one as trench-
ant and heavy as an axe. But even at these times the
rest of his person seemed to disclaim the intention.
Otherwise there was only an indefinable, faint expres-
sion of his lips, something stealthy -- a smile -- not a
smile -- I remember it, but I can't explain. It was un-
conscious, this smile was, though just after he had
said something it got intensified for an instant. It
came at the end of his speeches like a seal applied on
the words to make the meaning of the commonest
phrase appear absolutely inscrutable. He was a com-
mon trader, from his youth up employed in these
parts -- nothing more. He was obeyed, yet he inspired
neither love nor fear, nor even respect. He inspired
uneasiness. That was it! Uneasiness. Not a definite
mistrust -- just uneasiness -- nothing more. You have
no idea how effective such a . . . a . . . faculty
can be. He had no genius for organizing, for initiative,
or for order even. That was evident in such things as
the deplorable state of the station. He had no learn-
ing, and no intelligence. His position had come to him
-- why? Perhaps because he was never ill . . . He
had served three terms of three years out there . . .
Because triumphant health in the general rout of con-
stitutions is a kind of power in itself. When he went
home on leave he rioted on a large scale -- pompously.
Jack ashore -- with a difference -- in externals only.
This one could gather from his casual talk. He origi-
nated nothing, he could keep the routine going --
that's all. But he was great. He was great by this little
thing that it was impossible to tell what could control
such a man. He never gave that secret away. Perhaps
there was nothing within him. Such a suspicion made
one pause -- for out there there were no external
checks. Once when various tropical diseases had laid
low almost every 'agent' in the station, he was heard
to say, 'Men who come out here should have no en-
trails.' He sealed the utterance with that smile of his,
as though it had been a door opening into a darkness
he had in his keeping. You fancied you had seen
things -- but the seal was on. When annoyed at meal-
times by the constant quarrels of the white men about
precedence, he ordered an immense round table to be
made, for which a special house had to be built. This
was the station's mess-room. Where he sat was the
first place -- the rest were nowhere. One felt this to be
his unalterable conviction. He was neither civil nor
uncivil. He was quiet. He allowed his 'boy' -- an over-
fed young negro from the coast -- to treat the white
men, under his very eyes, with provoking insolence.
  "He began to speak as soon as he saw me. I had
been very long on the road. He could not wait. Had
to start without me. The up-river stations had to be
relieved. There had been so many delays already that
he did not know who was dead and who was alive, and
how they got on -- and so on, and so on. He paid no
attention to my explanation, and, playing with a stick
of sealing-wax, repeated several times that the situa-
tion was 'very grave, very grave.' There were ru-
mours that a very important station was in jeopardy,
and its chief, Mr. Kurtz, was ill. Hoped it was not
true. Mr. Kurtz was . . . I felt weary and irritable.
Hang Kurtz, I thought. I interrupted him by saying
I had heard of Mr. Kurtz on the coast. 'Ah! So they
talk of him down there,' he murmured to himself.
Then he began again, assuring me Mr. Kurtz was the
best agent he had, an exceptional man, of the greatest
importance to the Company; therefore I could under-
stand his anxiety. He was, he said, 'very, very uneasy.'
Certainly he fidgeted on his chair a good deal, ex-
claimed, 'Ah, Mr. Kurtz!' broke the stick of sealing-
wax and seemed dumfounded by the accident. Next
thing he wanted to know 'how long it would take to'
. . . I interrupted him again. Being hungry, you
know, and kept on my feet too, I was getting savage.
'How can I tell?' I said. 'I haven't even seen the
wreck yet -- some months, no doubt.' All this talk
seemed to me so futile. 'Some months,' he said. "Well,
let us say three months before we can make a start.
Yes. That ought to do the affair.' I flung out of his
hut (he lived all alone in a clay hut with a sort of
verandah) muttering to myself my opinion of him.
He was a chattering idiot. Afterwards I took it back
when it was borne in upon me startlingly with what
extreme nicety he had estimated the time requisite for
the 'affair.'
  "I went to work the next day, turning, so to speak,
my back on that station. In that way only it seemed to
me I could keep my hold on the redeeming facts of
life. Still, one must look about sometimes; and then I
saw this station, these men strolling aimlessly about in
the sunshine of the yard. I asked myself sometimes
what it all meant. They wandered here and there with
their absurd long staves in their hands, like a lot of
faithless pilgrims bewitched inside a rotten fence. The
word 'ivory' rang in the air, was whispered, was
sighed. You would think they were praying to it. A
taint of imbecile rapacity blew through it all, like a
whiff from some corpse. By Jove! I've never seen
anything so unreal in my life. And outside, the silent
wilderness surrounding this cleared speck on the earth
struck me as something great and invincible, like evil
or truth, waiting patiently for the passing away of this
fantastic invasion.
  "Oh, these months! Well, never mind. Various
things happened. One evening a grass shed full of
calico, cotton prints, beads, and I don't know what
else, burst into a blaze so suddenly that you would
have thought the earth had opened to let an avenging
fire consume all that trash. I was smoking my pipe
quietly by my dismantled steamer, and saw them all
cutting capers in the light, with their arms lifted high,
when the stout man with moustaches came tearing
down to the river, a tin pail in his hand, assured me
that everybody was 'behaving splendidly, splendidly,'
dipped about a quart of water and tore back again. I
noticed there was a hole in the bottom of his pail.
  "I strolled up. There was no hurry. You see the
thing had gone off like a box of matches. It had been
hopeless from the very first. The flame had leaped
high, driven everybody back, lighted up everything --
and collapsed. The shed was already a heap of embers
glowing fiercely. A nigger was being beaten near by.
They said he had caused the fire in some way; be that
as it may, he was screeching most horribly. I saw him,
later, for several days, sitting in a bit of shade looking
very sick and trying to recover himself: afterwards he
arose and went out -- and the wilderness without a
sound took him into its bosom again. As I approached
the glow from the dark I found myself at the back of
two men, talking. I heard the name of Kurtz pro-
nounced, then the words, 'take advantage of this un-
fortunate accident.' One of the men was the manager. I
wished him a good evening. 'Did you ever see anything
like it -- eh? it is incredible,' he said, and walked off.
The other man remained. He was a first-class agent,
young, gentlemanly, a bit reserved, with a forked
little beard and a hooked nose. He was stand-offish
with the other agents, and they on their side said he
was the manager's spy upon them. As to me, I had
hardly ever spoken to him before. We got into talk,
and by and by we strolled away from the hissing ruins.
Then he asked me to his room, which was in the main
building of the station. He struck a match, and I
perceived that this young aristocrat had not only a
silver-mounted dressing-case but also a whole candle
all to himself. Just at that time the manager was the
only man supposed to have any right to candles.
Native mats covered the clay walls; a collection of
spears, assegais, shields, knives was hung up in tro-
phies. The business intrusted to this fellow was the
making of bricks -- so I had been informed; but there
wasn't a fragment of a brick anywhere in the station,
and he could not make bricks without something, I
don't know what -- straw maybe. Anyway, it could not
be found there and as it was not likely to be sent from
Europe, it did not appear clear to me what he was
waiting for. An act of special creation perhaps. How-
ever, they were all waiting all the sixteen or twenty
pilgrims of them -- for something; and upon my word
it did not seem an uncongenial occupation, from the
way they took it, though the only thing that ever
came to them was disease -- as far as I could see. They
beguiled the time by backbiting and intriguing against
each other in a foolish kind of way. There was an air
of plotting about that station, but nothing came of it,
of course. It was as unreal as everything else -- as the
philanthropic pretence of the whole concern, as their
talk, as their government, as their show of work. The
only real feeling was a desire to get appointed to a
trading-post where ivory was to be had, so that they
could earn percentages. They intrigued and slandered
and hated each other only on that account -- but as to
effectually lifting a little finger -- oh, no. By heavens!
there is something after all in the world allowing one
man to steal a horse while another must not look at a
halter. Steal a horse straight out. Very well. He has
done it. Perhaps he can ride. But there is a way of
looking at a halter that would provoke the most chari-
table of saints into a kick.
  "I had no idea why he wanted to be sociable, but as
we chatted in there it suddenly ocurred to me the
fellow was trying to get at something -- in fact, pump-
ing me. He alluded constantly to Europe, to the peo-
ple I was supposed to know there -- putting leading
questions as to my acquaintances in the sepulchral city,
and so on. His little eyes glittered like mica discs --
with curiosity -- though he tried to keep up a bit of
superciliousness. At first I was astonished, but very
soon I became awfully curious to see what he would
find out from me. I couldn't possibly imagine what I
had in me to make it worth his while. It was very pretty
to see how he baffled himself, for in truth my body was
full only of chills, and my head had nothing in it but
that wretched steamboat business. It was evident he
took me for a perfectly shameless prevaricator. At last
he got angry, and, to conceal a movement of furious
annoyance, he yawned. I rose. Then I noticed a small
sketch in oils, on a panel, representing a woman,
draped and blindfolded, carrying a lighted torch. The
background was sombre -- almost black. The move-
ment of the woman was stately, and the effect of the
torchlight on the face was sinister.
  "It arrested me, and he stood by civilly, holding an
empty half-pint champagne bottle (medical comforts)
with the candle stuck in it. To my question he said
Mr. Kurtz had painted this -- in this very station more
than a year ago -- while waiting for means to go to his
trading-post. 'Tell me, pray,' said I, 'who is this Mr.
Kurtz?'
  " 'The chief of the Inner Station,' he answered in a
short tone, looking away. 'Much obliged,' I said,
laughing. 'And you are the brickmaker of the Central
Station. Every one knows that.' He was silent for a
while. 'He is a prodigy,' he said at last. 'He is an
emissary of pity and science and progress, and devil
knows what else. We want,' he began to declaim sud-
denly, 'for the guidance of the cause intrusted to us by
Europe, so to speak, higher intelligence, wide sympa-
thies, a singleness of purpose.' 'Who says that?' I
asked. 'Lots of them,' he replied. 'Some even write
that; and so he comes here, a special being, as you
ought to know.' 'Why ought I to know?' I inter-
rupted, really surprised. He paid no attention. 'Yes.
Today he is chief of the best station, next year he will
be assistant-manager, two years more and . . . but I
daresay you know what he will be in two years' time.
You are of the new gang -- the gang of virtue. The
same people who sent him specially also recom-
mended you. Oh, don't say no. I've my own eyes to
trust.' Light dawned upon me. My dear aunt's influ-
ential acquaintances were producing an unexpected
effect upon that young man. I nearly burst into a
laugh. 'Do you read the Company's confidential cor-
respondence?' I asked. He hadn't a word to say. It
was great fun. 'When Mr. Kurtz,' I continued, se-
verely, 'is General Manager, you won't have the op-
portunity.'
  "He blew the candle out suddenly, and we went
outside. The moon had risen. Black figures strolled
about listlessly, pouring water on the glow, whence
proceeded a sound of hissing; steam ascended in the
moonlight, the beaten nigger groaned somewhere.
'What a row the brute makes!' said the indefatigable
man with the moustaches, appearing near us. 'Serve
him right. Transgression -- punishment -- bang! Piti-
less, pitiless. That's the only way. This will prevent
all conflagrations for the future. I was just telling the
manager . . .' He noticed my companion, and be-
came crestfallen all at once. 'Not in bed yet,' he said,
with a kind of servile heartiness; 'it's so natural. Ha!
Danger -- agitation.' He vanished. I went on to the
riverside, and the other followed me. I heard a scath-
ing murmur at my ear, 'Heap of muffs -- go to.' The
pilgrims could be seen in knots gesticulating, discuss-
ing. Several had still their staves in their hands. I
verily believe they took these sticks to bed with them.
Beyond the fence the forest stood up spectrally in the
moonlight, and through the dim stir, through the
faint sounds of that lamentable courtyard, the silence
of the land went home to one's very heart -- its mys-
tery, its greatness, the amazing reality of its concealed
life. The hurt nigger moaned feebly somewhere near
by, and then fetched a deep sigh that made me mend
my pace away from there. I felt a hand introducing
itself under my arm. 'My dear sir,' said the fellow, 'I
don't want to be misunderstood, and especially by
you, who will see Mr. Kurtz long before I can have
that pleasure. I wouldn't like him to get a false idea
of my disposition....'
  "I let him run on, this papier-mache Mephistophe-
les, and it seemed to me that if I tried I could poke
my forefinger through him, and would find nothing
inside but a little loose dirt, maybe. He, don't you see,
had been planning to be assistant-manager by and by
under the present man, and I could see that the com-
ing of that Kurtz had upset them both not a little. He
talked precipitately, and I did not try to stop him. I
had my shoulders against the wreck of my steamer,
hauled up on the slope like a carcass of some big river
animal. The smell of mud, of primeval mud, by Jove!
was in my nostrils, the high stillness of primeval for-
est was before my eyes; there were shiny patches on
the black creek. The moon had spread over every-
thing a thin layer of silver -- over the rank grass, over
the mud, upon the wall of matted vegetation standing
higher than the wall of a temple, over the great river
I could see through a sombre gap glittering, glitter-
ing, as it flowed broadly by without a murmur. All
this was great, expectant, mute, while the man jab-
bered about himself. I wondered whether the stillness
on the face of the immensity looking at us two were
meant as an appeal or as a menace. What were we who
had strayed in here? Could we handle that dumb
thing, or would it handle us? I felt how big, how
confoundedly big, was that thing that couldn't talk,
and perhaps was deaf as well. What was in there? I
could see a little ivory coming out from there, and I
had heard Mr. Kurtz was in there. I had heard
enough about it, too -- God knows! Yet somehow it
didn't bring any image with it -- no more than if I had
been told an angel or a fiend was in there. I believed
it in the same way one of you might believe there are
inhabitants in the planet Mars. I knew once a Scotch
sailmaker who was certain, dead sure, there were peo-
ple in Mars. If you asked him for some idea how they
looked and behaved, he would get shy and mutter
something about 'walking on all-fours.' If you as
much as smiled, he would -- though a man of sixty --
offer to fight you. I would not have gone so far as to
fight for Kurtz, but I went for him near enough to
lie. You know I hate, detest, and can't bear a lie, not
because I am straighter than the rest of us, but simply
because it appalls me. There is a taint of death, a
flavour of mortality in lies which is exactly what I
hate and detest in the world -- what I want to forget.
It makes me miserable and sick, like biting something
rotten would do. Temperament, I suppose. Well, I
went near enough to it by letting the young fool there
believe anything he liked to imagine as to my influ-
ence in Europe. I became in an instant as much of a
pretence as the rest of the bewitched pilgrims. This
simply because I had a notion it somehow would be of
help to that Kurtz whom at the time I did not see
you understand. He was just a word for me. I did
not see the man in the name any more than you
do. Do you see him? Do you see the story? Do you
see anything? It seems to me I am trying to tell you
a dream -- making a vain attempt, because no relation
of a dream can convey the dream-sensation, that com-
mingling of absurdity, surprise, and bewilderment in
a tremor of struggling revolt, that notion of being
captured by the incredible which is of the very essence
of dreams...."
  He was silent for a while.
  ". . . No, it is impossible; it is impossible to con-
vey the life-sensation of any given epoch of one's ex-
istence -- that which makes its truth, its meaning its
subtle and penetrating essence. It is impossible. We
live, as we dream alone...."
  He paused again again if reflecting, then added:
  "Of course in this you fellows see more than I
could then. You see me, whom you know. . . ."
  It had become so pitch dark that we listeners could
hardly see one another. For a long time already he,
sitting apart, had been no more to us than a voice.
There was not a word from anybody. The others
might have been asleep, but I was awake. I listened, I
listened on the watch for the sentence, for the word,
that would give me the clue to the faint uneasi-
ness inspired by this narrative that seemed to shape
itself without human lips in the heavy night-air of the
river.
  ". . . Yes -- I let him run on," Marlow began
again, "and think what he pleased about the powers
that were behind me. I did! And there was nothing
behind me! There was nothing but that wretched,
old, mangled steamboat I was leaning against, while
he talked fluently about 'the necessity for every man
to get on.' 'And when one comes out here, you con-
ceive, it is not to gaze at the moon.' Mr. Kurtz was a
'universal genius,' but even a genius would find it
easier to work with 'adequate tools -- intelligent men.'
He did not make bricks -- why, there was a physical
impossibility in the way -- as I was well aware; and if
he did secretarial work for the manager, it was be-
cause 'no sensible man rejects wantonly the confidence
of his superiors.' Did I see it? I saw it. What more did
I want? What I really wanted was rivets, by heaven!
Rivets. To get on with the work -- to stop the hole.
Rivets I wanted. There were cases of them down at
the coast cases piled up -- burst -- split! You kicked
a loose rivet at every second step in that station-yard
on the hillside. Rivets had rolled into the grove of
death. You could fill your pockets with rivets for the
trouble of stooping down -- and there wasn't one rivet
to be found where it was wanted. We had plates that
would to, but nothing to fasten them with. And every
week the messenger, a lone negro, letterbag on shoul-
der and staff in hand, left our station for the coast.
And several times a week a coast caravan came in with
trade goods -- ghastly glazed calico that made you
shudder only to look at it, glass beads value about a
penny a quart, confounded spotted cotton handker-
chiefs. And no rivets. Three carriers could have
brought all that was wanted to set that steamboat
afloat.
  "He was becoming confidential now, but I fancy my
unresponsive attitude must have exasperated him at
last, for he judged it necessary to inform me he feared
neither God nor devil, let alone any mere man. I said
I could see that very well, but what I wanted was a
certain quantity of rivets -- and rivets were what really
Mr. Kurtz wanted, if he had only known it. Now
letters went to the coast every week.... 'My dear
sir,' he cried, 'I write from dictation.' I demanded
rivets. There was a way -- for an intelligent man. He
changed his manner; became very cold, and suddenly
began to talk about a hippopotamus; wondered
whether sleeping on board the steamer (I stuck to
my salvage night and day) I wasn't disturbed. There
was an old hippo that had the bad habit of getting out
on the bank and roaming at night over the station
grounds. The pilgrims used to turn out in a body and
empty every rifle they could lay hands on at him.
Some even had sat up o' nights for him. All this
energy was wasted, though. 'That animal has a
charmed life,' he said; 'but you can say this only of
brutes in this country. No man -- you apprehend me?
-- no man here bears a charmed life.' He stood there
for a moment in the moonlight with his delicate
hooked nose set a little askew, and his mica eyes
glittering without a wink, then, with a curt Good-
night, he strode off. I could see he was disturbed and
considerably puzzled, which made me feel more hope-
ful than I had been for days. It was a great comfort
to turn from that chap to my influential friend, the
battered, twisted, ruined, tin-pot steamboat. I clam-
bered on board. She rang under my feet like an empty
Huntley & Palmer biscuit-tin kicked along a gutter;
she was nothing so solid in make, and rather less pretty
in shape, but I had expended enough hard work on
her to make me love her. No influential friend would
have served me better. She had given me a chance to
come out a bit -- to find out what I could do. No, I
don't like work. I had rather laze about and think of
all the fine things that can be done. I don't like work
-- no man does -- but I like what is in the work -- the
chance to find yourself. Your own reality -- for your-
self, not for others -- what no other man can ever
know. They can only see the mere show, and never
can tell what it really means.
  "I was not surprised to see somebody sitting aft, on
the deck, with his legs dangling over the mud. You
see I rather chummed with the few mechanics there
were in that station, whom the other pilgrims natur-
ally despised -- on account of their imperfect manners,
I suppose. This was the foreman -- a boiler-maker by
trade -- a good worker. He was a lank, bony, yellow-
faced man, with big intense eyes. His aspect was
worried, and his head was as bald as the palm of my
hand; but his hair in falling seemed to have stuck to
his chin, and had prospered in the new locality, for
his beard hung down to his waist. He was a widower
with six young children (he had left them in charge
of a sister of his to come out there), and the passion of
his life was pigeon-flying. He was an enthusiast and
a connoisseur. He would rave about pigeons. After
work hours he used sometimes to come over from his
hut for a talk about his children and his pigeons; at
work, when he had to crawl in the mud under the
bottom of the steamboat, he would tie up that beard
of his in a kind of white serviette he brought for the
purpose. It had loops to go over his ears. In the eve-
ning he could be seen squatted on the bank rinsing that
wrapper in the creek with great care, then spreading
it solemnly on a bush to dry. 
  "I slapped him on the back and shouted, 'We shall
have rivets!' He scrambled to his feet exclaiming,
'No! Rivets!' as though he couldn't believe his ears.
Then in a low voice, 'You . . . eh?' I don't know
why we behaved like lunatics. I put my finger to the
side of my nose and nodded mysteriously. 'Good for
you!' he cried, snapped his fingers above his head,
lifting one foot. I tried a jig. We capered on the iron
deck. A frightful clatter came out of that hulk, and
the virgin forest on the other bank of the creek sent
it back in a thundering roll upon the sleeping station.
It must have made some of the pilgrims sit up in their
hovels. A dark figure obscured the lighted doorway
of the manager's hut, vanished, then, a second or
so after, the doorway itself vanished, too. We stopped,
and the silence driven away by the stamping of our
feet flowed back again from the recesses of the land.
The great wall of vegetation, an exuberant and en-
tangled mass of trunks, branches, leaves, boughs, fes-
toons, motionless in the moonlight, was like a rioting
invasion of soundless life, a rolling wave of plants,
piled up, crested, ready to topple over the creek, to
sweep every little man of us out of his little existence.
And it moved not. A deadened burst of mighty
splashes and snorts reached us from afar, as though
an ichthyosaurus had been taking a bath of glitter in
the great river. 'After all,' said the boiler-maker in a
reasonable tone, 'why shouldn't we get the rivets?'
Why not, indeed! I did not know of any reason why
we shouldn't. 'They'll come in three weeks,' I said,
confidently.
  "But they didn't. Instead of rivets there came an
invasion, an infliction, a visitation. It came in sections
during the next three weeks, each section headed by
a donkey carrying a white man in new clothes and
tan shoes, bowing from that elevation right and left
to the impressed pilgrims. A quarrelsome band of
footsore sulky niggers trod on the heels of the don-
key; a lot of tents, campstools, tin boxes, white cases,
brown bales would be shot down in the court-yard,
and the air of mystery would deepen a little over the
muddle of the station. Five such instalments came,
with their absurd air of disorderly flight with the
loot of innumerable outfit shops and provision stores,
that, one would think, they were lugging, after a
raid, into the wilderness for equitable division. It was
an inextricable mess of things decent in themselves
but that human folly made look like the spoils of
thieving.
  "This devoted band called itself the Eldorado
Exploring Expedition, and I believe they were sworn
to secrecy. Their talk, however, was the talk of sordid
buccaneers: it was reckless without hardihood, greedy
without audacity, and cruel without courage; there
was not an atom of foresight or of serious intention in
the whole batch of them, and they did not seem aware
these things are wanted for the work of the world.
To tear treasure out of the bowels of the land was
their desire, with no more moral purpose at the back
of it than there is in burglars breaking into a safe.
Who paid the expenses of the noble enterprise I don't
know; but the uncle of our manager was leader of
that lot.
  "In exterior he resembled a butcher in a poor neigh-
bourhood, and his eyes had a look of sleepy cunning.
He carried his fat paunch with ostentation on his
short legs, and during the time his gang infested the
station spoke to no one but his nephew. You could
see these two roaming about all day long with their
heads close together in an everlasting confab.
  "I had given up worrying myself about the rivets.
One's capacity for that kind of folly is more limited
than you would suppose. I said Hang! -- and let
things slide. I had plenty of time for meditation, and
now and then I would give some thought to Kurtz.
I wasn't very interested in him. No. Still, I was curious
to see whether this man, who had come out equipped
with moral ideas of some sort, would climb to the top
after all and how he would set about his work when
there."

                        II

  "One evening as I was lying flat on the deck of my
steamboat, I heard voices approaching -- and there
were the nephew and the uncle strolling along the
bank. I laid my head on my arm again, and had nearly
lost myself in a doze, when somebody said in my ear,
as it were: 'I am as harmless as a little child, but I
don't like to be dictated to. Am I the manager -- or am
I not? I was ordered to send him there. It's incred-
ible.'. . . I became aware that the two were standing
on the shore alongside the forepart of the steamboat,
just below my head. I did not move; it did not occur
to me to move: I was sleepy. 'It is unpleasant,'
grunted the uncle. 'He has asked the Administration
to be sent there,' said the other, 'with the idea of show-
ing what he could do; and I was instructed accord-
ingly. Look at the influence that man must have. Is
it not frightful?' They both agreed it was frightful,
then made several bizarre remarks: 'Make rain and
fine weather -- one man -- the Council -- by the nose' --
bits of absurd sentences that got the better of my
drowsiness, so that I had pretty near the whole of my
wits about me when the uncle said, 'The climate may
do away with this difficulty for you. Is he alone there?'
'Yes,' answered the manager; 'he sent his assistant
down the river with a note to me in these terms:
"Clear this poor devil out of the country, and don't
bother sending more of that sort. I had rather be
alone than have the kind of men you can dispose of
with me." It was more than a year ago. Can you im-
agine such impudence!' 'Anything since then?' asked
the other hoarsely. 'Ivory,' jerked the nephew; 'lots
of it -- prime sort -- lots -- most annoying, from him.'
'And with that?' questioned the heavy rumble. 'In-
voice,' was the reply fired out, so to speak. Then si-
lence. They had been talking about Kurtz.
  "I was broad awake by this time, but, lying per-
fectly at ease, remained still, having no inducement to
change my position. 'How did that ivory come all
this way?' growled the elder man, who seemed very
vexed. The other explained that it had come with a
fleet of canoes in charge of an English half-caste
clerk Kurtz had with him; that Kurtz had apparently
intended to return himself, the station being by that
time bare of goods and stores, but after coming three
hundred miles, had suddenly decided to go back,
which he started to do alone in a small dugout with
four paddlers, leaving the half-caste to continue down
the river with the ivory. The two fellows there seemed
astounded at anybody attempting such a thing. They 
were at a loss for an adequate motive. As to me, I
seemed to see Kurtz for the first time. It was a distinct
glimpse: the dugout, four paddling savages, and the
lone white man turning his back suddenly on the
headquarters, on relief, on thoughts of home -- per-
haps; setting his face towards the depths of the wil-
derness, towards his empty and desolate station. I
did not know the motive. Perhaps he was just simply
a fine fellow who stuck to his work for its own sake.
His name, you understand, had not been pronounced
once. He was 'that man.' The half caste, who, as far
as I could see, had conducted a difficult trip with great
prudence and pluck, was invariably alluded to as
'that scoundrel.' The 'scoundrel' had reported that
the 'man' had been very ill -- had recovered imper-
fectly.... The two below me moved away then a
few paces, and strolled back and forth at some little
distance. I heard: 'Military post -- doctor -- two hun-
dred miles -- quite alone now -- unavoidable delays --
nine months -- no news -- strange rumours.' They ap-
proached again, just as the manager was saying, 'No
one, as far as I know, unless a species of wandering
trader -- a pestilential fellow, snapping ivory from the
natives.' Who was it they were talking about now? I
gathered in snatches that this was some man supposed
to be in Kurtz's district, and of whom the manager
did not approve. 'We will not be free from unfair
competition till one of these fellows is hanged for an
example,' he said. 'Certainly,' grunted the other; 'get
him hanged! Why not? Anything -- anything can be
done in this country. That's what I say; nobody here,
you understand, here, can endanger your position.
And why? You stand the climate -- you outlast them
all. The danger is in Europe; but there before I left
I took care to --' They moved off and whispered,
then their voices rose again. 'The extraordinary series
of delays is not my fault. I did my best.' The fat man
sighed. 'Very sad.' 'And the pestiferous absurdity of
his talk,' continued the other; 'he bothered me enough
when he was here. "Each station should be like a
beacon on the road towards better things, a centre for
trade of course, but also for humanizing, improving,
instructing." Conceive you -- that ass! And he wants
to be manager! No, it's --' Here he got choked by
excessive indignation, and I lifted my head the least
bit. I was surprised to see how near they were --
right under me. I could have spat upon their hats.
They were looking on the ground, absorbed in
thought. The manager was switching his leg with a
slender twig: his sagacious relative lifted his head.
'You have been well since you came out this time?' he
asked. The other gave a start. 'Who? I? Oh! Like a
charm -- like a charm. But the rest -- oh, my goodness!
All sick. They die so quick, too, that I haven't the
time to send them out of the country -- it's incredible!'
'H'm. Just so,' grunted the uncle. 'Ah! my boy, trust
to this -- I say, trust to this.' I saw him extend his
short flipper of an arm for a gesture that took in the
forest, the creek, the mud, the river -- seemed to
beckon with a dishonouring flourish before the sunlit
face of the land a treacherous appeal to the lurking
death, to the hidden evil, to the profound darkness of
its heart. It was so startling that I leaped to my feet
and looked back at the edge of the forest, as though
I had expected an answer of some sort to that black
display of confidence. You know the foolish notions
that come to one sometimes. The high stillness con-
fronted these two figures with its ominous patience,
waiting for the passing away of a fantastic invasion.
  "They swore aloud together -- out of sheer fright,
I believe -- then pretending not to know anything of
my existence, turned back to the station. The sun was
low; and leaning forward side by side, they seemed
to be tugging painfully uphill their two ridiculous
shadows of unequal length, that trailed behind them
slowly over the tall grass without bending a single
blade.
  "In a few days the Eldorado Expedition went into
the patient wilderness, that dosed upon it as the sea
closes over a diver. Long afterwards the news came
that all the donkeys were dead. I know nothing as to
the fate of the less valuable animals. They, no doubt,
like the rest of us, found what they deserved. I did not
inquire. I was then rather excited at the prospect of
meeting Kurtz very soon. When I say very soon I
mean it comparatively. It was just two months from
the day we left the creek when we came to the bank
below Kurtz's station.
  "Going up that river was like travelling back to the
earliest beginnings of the world, when vegetation
rioted on the earth and the big trees were kings. An
empty stream, a great silence, an impenetrable forest.
The air was warm, thick, heavy, sluggish. There was
no joy in the brilliance of sunshine. The long stretches
of the waterway ran on, deserted, into the gloom of
over-shadowed distances. On silvery sandbanks hippos
and alligators sunned themselves side by side. The
broadening waters flowed through a mob of wooded
islands; you lost your way on that river as you would
in a desert, and butted all day long against shoals,
trying to find the channel, till you thought yourself
bewitched and cut off for ever from everything you
had known once -- somewhere -- far away -- in another
existence perhaps. There were moments when one's
past came back to one, as it will sometimes when you
have not a moment to spare to yourself; but it came in
the shape of an unrestful and noisy dream, remembered
with wonder amongst the overwhelming realities
of this strange world of plants, and water, and silence.
And this stillness of life did not in the least resemble
a peace. It was the stillness of an implacable force
brooding over an inscrutable intention. It looked at
you with a vengeful aspect. I got used to it afterwards;
I did not see it any more; I had no time. I had to keep
guessing at the channel; I had to discern, mostly by
inspiration, the signs of hidden banks; I watched for
sunken stones; I was learning to clap my teeth smartly
before my heart flew out, when I shaved by a fluke
some infernal sly old snag that would have ripped the
life out of the tin-pot steamboat and drowned all the
pilgrims; I had to keep a lookout for the signs of
dead wood we could cut up in the night for next day's
steaming. When you have to attend to things of that
sort, to the mere incidents of the surface, the reality --
the reality, I tell you -- fades. The inner truth is hid-
den -- luckily, luckily. But I felt it all the same; I
felt often its mysterious stillness watching me at my
monkey tricks, just as it watches you fellows perform-
ing on your respective tight-ropes for -- what is it?
half-a-crown a tumble --"
  "Try to be civil, Marlow," growled a voice, and I
knew there was at least one listener awake besides
myself.
  "I beg your pardon. I forgot the heartache which
makes up the rest of the price. And indeed what does
the price matter, if the trick be well done? You do
your tricks very well. And I didn't do badly either,
since I managed not to sink that steamboat on my first
trip. It's a wonder to me yet. Imagine a blindfolded
man set to drive a van over a bad road. I sweated and
shivered over that business considerably, I can tell
you. After all, for a seaman, to scrape the bottom of
the thing that's supposed to float all the time under
his care is the unpardonable sin. No one may know of
it, but you never forget the thump -- eh? A blow on
the very heart. You remember it, you dream of it, you
wake up at night and think of it -- years after -- and go
hot and cold all over. I don't pretend to say that
steamboat floated all the time. More than once she
had to wade for a bit, with twenty cannibals splashing
around and pushing. We had enlisted some of these
chaps on the way for a crew. Fine fellows -- cannibals
-- in their place. They were men one could work with,
and I am grateful to them. And, after all, they did
not eat each other before my face: they had brought
along a provision of hippo-meat which went rotten,
and made the mystery of the wilderness stink in my
nostrils. Phoo! I can sniff it now. I had the manager
on board and three or four pilgrims with their staves
-- all complete. Sometimes we came upon a station
close by the bank, clinging to the skirts of the un-
known, and the white men rushing out of a tumble-
down hovel, with great gestures of joy and surprise
and welcome, seemed very strange -- had the appear-
ance of being held there captive by a spell. The word
ivory would ring in the air for a while -- and on we
went again into the silence, along empty reaches,
round the still bends, between the high walls of our
winding way, reverberating in hollow claps the pon-
derous beat of the stern-wheel. Trees, trees, millions
of trees, massive, immense, running up high; and
at their foot, hugging the bank against the stream,
crept the little begrimed steamboat, like a sluggish
beetle crawling on the floor of a lofty portico. It made
you feel very small, very lost, and yet it was not alto-
gether depressing, that feeling. After all, if you were
small, the grimy beetle crawled on -- which was just
what you wanted it to do. Where the pilgrims im-
agined it crawled to I don't know. To some place
where they expected to get something. I bet! For me
it crawled towards Kurtz -- exclusively; but when the
steam-pipes started leaking we crawled very slow.
The reaches opened before us and closed behind, as if
the forest had stepped leisurely across the water to
bar the way for our return. We penetrated deeper and
deeper into the heart of darkness. It was very quiet
there. At night sometimes the roll of drums behind
the curtain of trees would run up the river and remain
sustained faintly, as if hovering in the air high over
our heads, till the first break of day. Whether it meant
war, peace, or prayer we could not tell. The dawns
were heralded by the descent of a chill stillness; the
wood-cutters slept, their fires burned low; the snap-
ping of a twig would make you start. We were wan-
derers on a prehistoric earth, on an earth that wore the
aspect of an unknown planet. We could have fancied
ourselves the first of men taking possession of an ac-
cursed inheritance, to be subdued at the cost of pro-
found anguish and of excessive toil. But suddenly,
as we struggled round a bend, there would be a
glimpse of rush walls, of peaked grass-roofs, a burst
of yells, a whirl of black limbs, a mass of hands clap-
ping, of feet stamping, of bodies swaying, of eyes
rolling, under the droop of heavy and motionless
foliage. The steamer toiled along slowly on the edge
of a black and incomprehensible frenzy. The prehis-
toric man was cursing us, praying to us, welcoming us
-- who could tell? We were cut off from the compre-
hension of our surroundings; we glided past like
phantoms, wondering and secretly appalled, as sane
men would be before an enthusiastic outbreak in a
madhouse. We could not understand because we were
too far and could not remember because we were
travelling in the night of first ages, of those ages that
are gone, leaving hardly a sign -- and no memories.
  "The earth seemed unearthly. We are accustomed
to look upon the shackled form of a conquered mon-
ster, but there -- there you could look at a thing mon-
strous and free. It was unearthly, and the men were
-- No, they were not inhuman. Well, you know,
that was the worst of it -- this suspicion of their not
being inhuman. It would come slowly to one. They
howled and leaped, and spun, and made horrid faces;
but what thrilled you was just the thought of their
humanity -- like yours -- the thought of your remote
kinship with this wild and passionate uproar. Ugly.
Yes, it was ugly enough; but if you were man enough
you would admit to yourself that there was in you just
the faintest trace of a response to the terrible frank-
ness of that noise, a dim suspicion of there being a
meaning in it which you -- you so remote from the
night of first ages -- could comprehend. And why not?
The mind of man is capable of anything -- because
everything is in it, all the past as well as all the future.
What was there after all? Joy, fear, sorrow, devotion,
valour, rage -- who can tell? -- but truth -- truth
stripped of its cloak of time. Let the fool gape and
shudder -- the man knows, and can look on without a
wink. But he must at least be as much of a man as
these on the shore. He must meet that truth with his
own true stuff -- with his own inborn strength. Princi-
ples won't do. Acquisitions, clothes, pretty rags -- rags
that would fly off at the first good shake. No; you
want a deliberate belief. An appeal to me in this fiend-
ish row -- is there? Very well; I hear; I admit, but I
have a voice, too, and for good or evil mine is the
speech that cannot be silenced. Of course, a fool, what
with sheer fright and fine sentiments, is always safe.
Who's that grunting? You wonder I didn't go ashore
for a howl and a dance? Well, no -- I didn't. Fine
sentiments, you say? Fine sentiments, be hanged! I
had no time. I had to mess about with white-lead and
strips of woolen blanket helping to put bandages on
those leaky steampipes -- I tell you. I had to watch
the steering, and circumvent those snags, and get the
tin-pot along by hook or by crook. There was surface-
truth enough in these things to save a wiser man. And
between whiles I had to look after the savage who was
fireman. He was an improved specimen; he could fire
up a vertical boiler. He was there below me, and,
upon my word, to look at him was as edifying as
seeing a dog in a parody of breeches and a feather
hat, walking on his hindlegs. A few months of
training had done for that really fine chap. He
squinted at the steam-gauge and at the water-guage
with an evident effort of intrepidity -- and he had
filed teeth, too, the poor devil, and the wool of his
pate shaved into queer patterns, and three orna-
mental scars on each of his cheeks. He ought to have
been clapping his hands and stamping his feet on the
bank, instead of which he was hard at work, a thrall to
strange witchcraft, full of improving knowledge. He
was useful because he had been instructed; and what
he knew was this -- that should the water in that trans-
parent thing disappear, the evil spirit inside the
boiler would get angry through the greatness of his
thirst, and take a terrible vengeance. So he sweated
and watched the glass fearfully (with an impromptu
charm, made of rags, tied to his arm, and a piece of
polished bone, as big as a watch, stuck flatways through
his lower lip), while the wooded banks slipped past
us slowly, the short noise was left behind, the inter-
minable miles of silence -- and we crept on, towards
Kurtz. But the snags were thick, the water was treach-
erous and shallow, the boiler seemed indeed to have
a sulky devil in it, and thus neither that fireman nor
I had any time to peer into our creepy thoughts.
  "Some fifty miles below the Inner Station we came
upon a hut of reeds, an inclined and melancholy pole,
with the unrecognizable tatters of what had been a
flag of some sort flying from it, and a neatly stacked
woodpile. This was unexpected. We came to the bank,
and on the stack of firewood found a flat piece of
board with some faded pencil-writing on it. When de-
ciphered it said: 'Wood for you. Hurry up. Approach
cautiously.' There was a signature, but it was illegible
-- not Kurtz -- a much longer word. 'Hurry up.'
Where? Up the river? 'Approach cautiously.' We had
not done so. But the warning could not have been
meant for the place where it could be only found
after approach. Something was wrong above. But
what -- and how much? That was the question. We
commented adversely upon the imbecility of that
telegraphic style. The bush around said nothing, and
would not let us look very far either. A torn curtain
of red twill hung in the doorway of the hut, and
flapped sadly in our faces. The dwelling was dis-
mantled; but we could see a white man had lived
there not very long ago. There remained a rude table
-- a plank on two posts; a heap of rubbish reposed in
a dark corner, and by the door I picked up a book. It
had lost its covers, and the pages had been thumbed
into a state of extremely dirty softness; but the back
had been lovingly stitched afresh with white cotton
thread, which looked clean yet. It was an extraordi-
nary find. Its title was, An Inquiry into some Points
of Seamanship, by a man Towser, Towson -- some such
name -- Master in his Majesty's Navy. The matter
looked dreary reading enough, with illustrative dia-
grams and repulsive tables of figures, and the copy
was sixty years old. I handled this amazing antiquity
with the greatest possible tenderness, lest it should
dissolve in my hands. Within, Towson or Towser was
inquiring earnestly into the breaking strain of ships'
chains and tackle, and other such matters. Not a very
enthralling book; but at the first glance you could
see there a singleness of intention, an honest concern
for the right way of going to work, which made these
humble pages, thought out so many years ago, lumi-
nous with another than a professional light. The
simple old sailor, with his talk of chains and purchases,
made me forget the jungle and the pilgrims in a deli-
cious sensation of having come upon something unmis-
takably real. Such a book being there was wonderful
enough but still more astounding were the notes pen-
cilled in the margin, and plainly referring to the text.
I couldn't believe my eyes! They were in cipher! Yes,
it looked like cipher. Fancy a man lugging with him
a book of that description into this nowhere and
studying it -- and making notes -- in cipher at that! It
was an extravagant mystery.
  "I had been dimly aware for some time of a worry-
ing noise, and when I lifted my eyes I saw the wood-
pile was gone, and the manager, aided by all the pil-
grims, was shouting at me from the riverside. I
slipped the book into my pocket. I assure you to leave
off reading was like tearing myself away from the
shelter of an old and solid friendship.
  "I started the lame engine ahead. 'It must be this
miserable trader -- this intruder,' exclaimed the man-
ager, looking back malevolently at the place we had
left. 'He must be English,' I said. 'It will not save
him from getting into trouble if he is not careful,'
muttered the manager darkly. I observed with as-
sumed innocence that no man was safe from trouble
in this world.
  "The current was more rapid now, the steamer
seemed at her last gasp, the stern-wheel flopped lan-
guidly, and I caught myself listening on tiptoe for the
next beat of the boat, for in sober truth I expected the
wretched thing to give up every moment. It was like
watching the last flickers of a life. But still we crawled.
Sometimes I would pick out a tree a little way ahead
to measure our progress towards Kurtz by, but I lost
it invariably before we got abreast. To keep the eyes
so long on one thing was too much for human patience.
The manager displayed a beautiful resignation. I
fretted and fumed and took to arguing with myself
whether or no I would talk openly with Kurtz; but
before I could come to any conclusion it occurred to
me that my speech or my silence, indeed any action
of mine, would be a mere futility. What did it matter
what any one knew or ignored? What did it matter
who was manager? One gets sometimes such a flash
of insight. The essentials of this affair lay deep under
the surface, beyond my reach, and beyond my power
of meddling.
  "Towards the evening of the second day we judged
ourselves about eight miles from Kurtz's station. I
wanted to push on; but the manager looked grave,
and told me the navigation up there was so dangerous
that it would be advisable, the sun being very low
already, to wait where we were till next morning.
Moreover, he pointed out that if the warning to ap-
proach cautiously were to be followed, we must ap-
proach in daylight -- not at dusk or in the dark. This
was sensible enough. Eight miles meant nearly three
hours' steaming for us, and I could also see suspicious
ripples at the upper end of the reach. Nevertheless,
I was annoyed beyond expression at the delay, and
most unreasonably, too, since one night more could
not matter much after so many months. As we had
plenty of wood, and caution was the word, I brought
up in the middle of the stream. The reach was narrow,
straight, with high sides like a railway cutting. The
dusk came gliding into it long before the sun had set.
The current ran smooth and swift, but a dumb immo-
bility sat on the banks. The living trees, lashed to-
gether by the creepers and every living bush of the
undergrowth, might have been changed into stone,
even to the slenderest twig, to the lightest leaf. It
was not sleep -- it seemed unnatural, like a state of
trance. Not the faintest sound of any kind could be
heard. You looked on amazed, and began to suspect
yourself of being deaf-- then the night came sud-
denly, and struck you blind as well. About three in the
morning some large fish leaped, and the loud splash
made me jump as though a gun had been fired. When
the sun rose there was a white fog, very warm and
clammy, and more blinding than the night. It did not
shift or drive; it was just there, standing all round
you like something solid. At eight or nine, perhaps, it
lifted as a shutter lifts. We had a glimpse of the
towering multitude of trees, of the immense matted
jungle, with the blazing little ball of the sun hanging
over it -- all perfectly still -- and then the white shutter
came down again, smoothly, as if sliding in greased
grooves. I ordered the chain, which we had begun to
heave in, to be paid out again. Before it stopped run-
ning with a muffled rattle, a cry, a very loud cry, as of
infinite desolation, soared slowly in the opaque air. It
ceased. A complaining clamour, modulated in savage
discords, filled our ears. The sheer unexpectedness of
it made my hair stir under my cap. I don't know how
it struck the others: to me it seemed as though the
mist itself had screamed, so suddenly, and apparently
from all sides at once, did this tumultuous and mourn-
ful uproar arise. It culminated in a hurried outbreak
of almost intolerably escessive shrieking, which
stopped short, leaving us stiffened in a variety of silly
attitudes, and obstinately listening to the nearly as
appalling and excessive silence. 'Good God! What is
the meaning --' stammered at my elbow one of the
pilgrims -- a little fat man, with sandy hair and red
whiskers, who wore sidespring boots, and pink py-
jamas tucked into his socks. Two others remained
open-mouthed a whole minute, then dashed into the
little cabin, to rush out incontinently and stand dart-
ing scared glances, with Winchesters at 'ready' in
their hands. What we could see was just the steamer
we were on, her outlines blurred as though she had
been on the point of dissolving, and a misty strip of
water, perhaps two feet broad, around her -- and that
was all. The rest of the world was nowhere, as far as
our eyes and ears were concerned. Just nowhere.
Gone, disappeared; swept off without leaving a
whisper or a shadow behind.
  "I went forward, and ordered the chain to be
hauled in short, so as to be ready to trip the anchor
and move the steamboat at once if necessary. 'Will
they attack?' whispered an awed voice. 'We will be
all butchered in this fog,' murmured another. The
faces twitched with the strain, the hands trembled
slightly, the eyes forgot to wink. It was very curious
to see the contrast of expressions of the white men
and of the black fellows of our crew, who were as
much strangers to that part of the river as we, though
their homes were only eight hundred miles away.
The whites, of course greatly discomposed, had be-
sides a curious look of being painfully shocked by such
an outrageous row. The others had an alert, naturally
interested expression; but their faces were essentially
quiet, even those of the one or two who grinned as
they hauled at the chain. Several exchanged short,
grunting phrases, which seemed to settle the matter
to their satisfaction. Their headman, a young, broad-
chested black, severely draped in darkblue fringed
cloths, with fierce nostrils and his hair all done up
artfully in oily ringlets, stood near me. 'Aha!' I said,
just for good fellowship's sake. 'Catch 'im,' he
snapped, with a bloodshot widening of his eyes and
a flash of sharp teeth -- 'catch 'im. Give 'im to us."To
you, eh?' I asked; 'what would you do with them?'
'Eat 'im!' he said curtly, and, leaning his elbow on the
rail, looked out into the fog in a dignified and pro-
foundly pensive attitude. I would no doubt have been
properly horrified, had it not occurred to me that he
and his chaps must be very hungry: that they must
have been growing increasingly hungry for at least
this month past. They had been engaged for six
months (I don't think a single one of them had any
clear idea of time, as we at the end of countless ages
have. They still belonged to the beginnings of time --
had no inherited experience to teach them as it were),
and of course, as long as there was a piece of paper
written over in accordance with some farcical law or
other made down the river, it didn't enter anybody's
head to trouble how they would live. Certainly they
had brought with them some rotten hippo-meat, which
couldn't have lasted very long, anyway, even if the
pilgrims hadn't, in the midst of a shocking hullabaloo,
thrown a considerable quantity of it overboard. It
looked like a high-handed proceeding; but it was
really a case of legitimate self-defence. You can't
breathe dead hippo waking, sleeping, and eating, and
at the same time keep your precarious grip on exist-
ence. Besides that, they had given them every week
three pieces of brass wire, each about nine inches long;
and the theory was they were to buy their provisions
with that currency in riverside villages. You can see
how that worked. There were either no villages, or
the people were hostile, or the director, who like the
rest of us fed out of tins, with an occasional old he-goat
thrown in, didn't want to stop the steamer for some
more or less recondite reason. So, unless they swal-
lowed the wire itself, or made loops of it to snare the
fishes with, I don't see what good their extravagant
salary could be to them. I must say it was paid with a
regularity worthy of a large and honourable trading
company. For the rest, the only thing to eat -- though
it didn't look eatable in the least -- I saw in their pos-
session was a few lumps of some stuff like half-cooked
dough, of a dirty lavender colour, they kept wrapped
in leaves, and now and then swallowed a piece of,
but so small that it seemed done more for the looks of
the thing than for any serious purpose of sustenance.
Why in the name of all the gnawing devils of hunger
they didn't go for us -- they were thirty to five -- and
have a good tuck-in for once, amazes me now when I
think of it. They were big powerful men, with not
much capacity to weigh the consequences, with cour-
age, with strength, even yet, though their skins were
no longer glossy and their muscles no longer hard.
And I saw that something restraining, one of those
human secrets that baffle probability, had come into
play there. I looked at them with a swift quickening of
interest -- not because it occurred to me I might be
eaten by them before very long, though I own to you
that just then I perceived -- in a new light, as it were
-- how unwholesome the pilgrims looked, and I
hoped, yes, I positively hoped, that my aspect was not
so -- what shall I say? -- so -- unappetizing: a touch of
fantastic vanity which fitted well with the dream-sen-
sation that pervaded all my days at that time. Perhaps
I had a little fever, too. One can't live with one's finger
everlastingly on one's pulse. I had often 'a little
fever,' or a little touch of other things -- the playful
paw-strokes of the wilderness, the preliminary trifling
before the more serious onslaught which came in due
course. Yes; I looked at them as you would on any
human being, with a curiosity of their impulses,
motives, capacities, weaknesses, when brought to the
test of an inexorable physical necessity. Restraint!
What possible restraint? Was it superstition, disgust,
patience, fear -- or some kind of primitive honour? No
fear can stand up to hunger, no patience can wear it out,
disgust simply does not exist where hunger is; and as
to superstition, beliefs, and what you may call princi-
ples, they are less than chaff in a breeze. Don't you
know the devilry of lingering starvation, its exasperat-
ing torment, its black thoughts, its sombre and brood-
ing ferocity? Well, I do. It takes a man all his inborn
strength to fight hunger properly. It's really easier to
face bereavement, dishonour, and the perdition of
one's soul -- than this kind of prolonged hunger. Sad,
but true. And these chaps, too, had no earthly reason
for any kind of scruple. Restraint! I would just as
soon have expected restraint from a hyena prowling
amongst the corpses of a battlefield. But there was the
fact facing me -- the fact dazzling, to be seen, like the
foam on the depths of the sea, like a ripple on an un-
fathomable enigma, a mystery greater -- when I
thought of it -- than the curious, inexplicable note of
desperate grief in this savage clamour that had swept
by us on the river-bank, behind the blind whiteness of
the fog.
  "Two pilgrims were quarrelling in hurried whis-
pers as to which bank. 'Left.' 'No, no; how can you?
Right, right, of course.' 'It is very serious,' said the
manager's voice behind me; 'I would be desolated if
anything should happen to Mr. Kurtz before we came
up.' I looked at him, and had not the slightest doubt
he was sincere. He was just the kind of man who
would wish to preserve appearances. That was his re-
straint. But when he muttered something about going
on at once, I did not even take the trouble to answer
him. I knew, and he knew, that it was impossible.
Were we to let go our hold of the bottom, we would
be absolutely in the air -- in space. We wouldn't be
able to tell where we were going to -- whether up or
down stream, or across -- till we fetched against one
bank or the other -- and then we wouldn't know at
first which it was. Of course I made no move. I had
no mind for a smash-up. You couldn't imagine a more
deadly place for a shipwreck. Whether drowned at
once or not, we were sure to perish speedily in one
way or another. 'I authorize you to take all the risks,'
he said, after a short silence. 'I refuse to take any,' I
said shortly; which was just the answer he expected,
though its tone might have surprised him. 'Well, I
must defer to your judgment. You are captain,' he
said with marked civility. I turned my shoulder to him
in sign of my appreciation, and looked into the fog.
How long would it last? It was the most hopeless
lookout. The approach to this Kurtz grubbing for
ivory in the wretched bush was beset by as many dan-
gers as though he had been an enchanted princess
sleeping in a fabulous castle. 'Will they attack, do you
think?' asked the manager, in a confidential tone.
  "I did not think they would attack, for several
obvious reasons. The thick fog was one. If they left
the bank in their canoes they would get lost in it, as
we would be if we attempted to move. Still, I had
also judged the jungle of both banks quite impene-
trable -- and yet eyes were in it, eyes that had seen us.
The riverside bushes were certainly very thick; but
the undergrowth behind was evidently penetrable.
However, during the short lift I had seen no canoes
anywhere in the reach -- certainly not abreast of the
steamer. But what made the idea of attack inconceiv-
able to me was the nature of the noise -- of the cries
we had heard. They had not the fierce character
boding immediate hostile intention. Unexpected,
wild, and violent as they had been, they had given
me an irresistible impression of sorrow. The glimpse
of the steamboat had for some reason filled those
savages with unrestrained grief. The danger, if any,
I expounded, was from our proximity to a great
human passion let loose. Even extreme grief may ul-
timately vent itself in violence -- but more generally
takes the form of apathy....
  "You should have seen the pilgrims stare! They
had no heart to grin, or even to revile me: but I be-
lieve they thought me gone mad -- with fright, maybe.
I delivered a regular lecture. My dear boys, it was no
good bothering. Keep a lookout? Well, you may guess
I watched the fog for the signs of lifting as a cat
watches a mouse; but for anything else our eyes were
of no more use to us than if we had been buried miles
deep in a heap of cotton-wool. It feIt like it, too --
choking, warm, stifling. Besides, all I said, though it
sounded extravagant, was absolutely true to fact.
What we afterwards alluded to as an attack was
really an attempt at repulse. The action was very far
from being aggressive -- it was not even defensive, in
the usual sense: it was undertaken under the stress of
desperation, and in its essence was purely protective.
  "It developed itself, I should say, two hours after
the fog lifted, and its commencement was at a spot,
roughly speaking, about a mile and a half below
Kurtz's station. We had just floundered and flopped
round a bend, when I saw an islet, a mere grassy hum-
mock of bright green, in the middle of the stream.
It was the only thing of the kind; but as we opened
the reach more, I perceived it was the head of a long
sand-bank, or rather of a chain of shallow patches
stretching down the middle of the river. They were
discoloured, just awash, and the whole lot was seen
just under the water, exactly as a man's backbone is
seen running down the middle of his back under the
skin. Now, as far as I did see, I could go to the right
or to the left of this. I didn't know either channel, of
course. The banks looked pretty well alike, the depth
appeared the same; but as I had been informed the
station was on the west side, I naturally headed for
the western passage.
  "No sooner had we fairly entered it than I became
aware it was much narrower than I had supposed. To
the left of us there was the long uninterrupted shoal,
and to the right a high, steep bank heavily overgrown
with bushes. Above the bush the trees stood in serried
ranks. The twigs overhung the current thickly, and
from distance to distance a large limb of some tree
projected rigidly over the stream. It was then well on
in the afternoon, the face of the forest was gloomy,
and a broad strip of shadow had already fallen on the
water. In this shadow we steamed up -- very slowly, as
you may imagine. I sheered her well inshore -- the
water being deepest near the bank, as the sounding-
pole informed me.
  "One of my hungry and forbearing friends was
sounding in the bows just below me. This steamboat
was exactly like a decked scow. On the deck, there
were two little teakwood houses, with doors and win-
dows. The boiler was in the fore-end, and the ma-
chinery right astern. Over the whole there was a light
roof, supported on stanchions. The funnel projected
through that roof, and in front of the funnel a small
cabin built of light planks served for a pilot-house. It
contained a couch, two camp-stools, a loaded Martini-
Henry leaning in one corner, a tiny table, and the
steering-wheel. It had a wide door in front and a
broad shutter at each side. All these were always
thrown open, of course. I spent my days perched up
there on the extreme fore-end of that roof, before the
door. At night I slept, or tried to, on the couch. An
athletic black belonging to some coast tribe and edu-
cated by my poor predecessor, was the helmsman. He
sported a pair of brass earrings, wore a blue cloth
wrapper from the waist to the ankles, and thought all
the world of himself. He was the most unstable kind
of fool I had ever seen. He steered with no end of a
swagger while you were by; but if he lost sight of
you, he became instantly the prey of an abject funk,
and would let that cripple of a steamboat get the upper
hand of him in a minute.
  "I was looking down at the sounding-pole, and
feeling much annoyed to see at each try a little more
of it stick out of that river, when I saw my poleman
give up the business suddenly, and stretch himself flat
on the deck, without even taking the trouble to haul his
pole in. He kept hold on it though, and it trailed in
the water. At the same time the fireman, whom I
could also see below me, sat down abruptly before his
furnace and ducked his head. I was amazed. Then I
had to look at the river mighty quick, because there
was a snag in the fairway. Sticks, little sticks, were
flying about -- thick: they were whizzing before my
nose, dropping below me, striking behind me against
my pilot-house. All this time the river, the shore, the
woods, were very quiet -- perfectly quiet. I could only
hear the heavy splashing thump of the stern-wheel
and the patter of these things. We cleared the snag
clumsily. Arrows, by Jove! We were being shot at!
I stepped in quickly to close the shutter on the land-
side. That fool-helmsman, his hands on the spokes,
was lifting his knees high, stamping his feet, champing
his mouth, like a reined-in horse. Confound him! And
we were staggering within ten feet of the bank. I
had to lean right out to swing the heavy shutter, and I
saw a face amongst the leaves on the level with my
own, looking at me very fierce and steady; and then
suddenly, as though a veil had been removed from
my eyes, I made out, deep in the tangled gloom,
naked breasts, arms, legs, glaring eyes -- the bush was
swarming with human limbs in movement, glistening,
of bronze colour. The twigs shook, swayed, and
rustled, the arrows flew out of them, and then the
shutter came to. 'Steer her straight,' I said to the
helmsman. He held his head rigid, face forward; but
his eyes rolled, he kept on lifting and setting down
his feet gently, his mouth foamed a little. 'Keep
quiet!' I said in a fury. I might just as well have
ordered a tree not to sway in the wind. I darted out.
Below me there was a great scuffle of feet on the iron
deck; confused exclamations; a voice screamed, 'Can
you turn back?' I caught sight of a V-shaped ripple on
the water ahead. What? Another snag! A fusillade
burst out under my feet. The pilgrims had opened
with their Winchesters, and were simply squirting
lead into that bush. A deuce of a lot of smoke came
up and drove slowly forward. I swore at it. Now I
couldn't see the ripple or the snag either. I stood in
the doorway, peering, and the arrows came in swarms.
They might have been poisoned, but they looked as
though they wouldn't kill a cat. The bush began to
howl. Our wood-cutters raised a warlike whoop; the
report of a rifle just at my back deafened me. I glanced
over my shoulder, and the pilot-house was yet full of
noise and smoke when I made a dash at the wheel.
The fool-nigger had dropped everything, to throw
the shutter open and let off that Martini-Henry. He
stood before the wide opening, glaring, and I yelled
at him to come back, while I straightened the sudden
twist out of that steamboat. There was no room to
turn even if I had wanted to, the snag was somewhere
very near ahead in that confounded smoke, there was
no time to lose, so I just crowded her into the bank --
right into the bank, where I knew the water was deep.
"We tore slowly along the overhanging bushes in
a whirl of broken twigs and flying leaves. The fusil-
lade below stopped short, as I had foreseen it would
when the squirts got empty. I threw my head back to
a glinting whizz that traversed the pilot-house, in at
one shutter-hole and out at the other. Looking past that
mad helmsman, who was shaking the empty rifle and
yelling at the shore, I saw vague forms of men run-
ning bent double, leaping, gliding, distinct, incom-
plete, evanescent. Something big appeared in the air
before the shutter, the rifle went overboard, and the
man stepped back swiftly, looked at me over his
shoulder in an extraordinary, profound, familiar man-
ner, and fell upon my feet. The side of his head hit
the wheel twice, and the end of what appeared a long
cane clattered round and knocked over a little camp-
stool. It looked as though after wrenching that thing
from somebody ashore he had lost his balance in the
effort. The thin smoke had blown away, we were clear
of the snag, and looking ahead I could see that in
another hundred yards or so I would be free to sheer
off, away from the bank; but my feet felt so very
warm and wet that I had to look down. The man had
rolled on his back and stared straight up at me; both
his hands clutched that cane. It was the shaft of a
spear that, either thrown or lunged through the open-
ing, had caught him in the side just below the ribs;
the blade had gone in out of sight, after making a
frightful gash; my shoes were full; a pool of blood
lay very still, gleaming dark-red under the wheel; his
eyes shone with an amazing lustre. The fusillade burst
out again. He looked at me anxiously, gripping the
spear like something precious, with an air of being
afraid I would try to take it away from him. I had to
make an effort to free my eyes from his gaze and
attend to the steering. With one hand I felt above my
head for the line of the steam whistle, and jerked out
screech after screech hurriedly. The tumult of angry
and warlike yells was checked instantly, and then from
the depths of the woods went out such a tremulous
and prolonged wail of mournful fear and utter despair
as may be imagined to follow the flight of the last
hope from the earth. There was a great commotion in
the bush; the shower of arrows stopped, a few drop-
ping shots rang out sharply -- then silence, in which
the languid beat of the stern-wheel came plainly to
my ears. I put the helm hard a-starboard at the mo-
ment when the pilgrim in pink pyjamas, very hot and
agitated, appeared in the doorway. 'The manager
sends me --' he began in an official tone, and stopped
short. 'Good God!' he said, glaring at the wounded
man.
  "We two whites stood over him, and his lustrous
and inquiring glance enveloped us both. I declare it
looked as though he would presently put to us some
question in an understandable language; but he died
without uttering a sound, without moving a limb,
without twitching a muscle. Only in the very last
moment, as though in response to some sign we could
not see, to some whisper we could not hear, he
frowned heavily, and that frown gave to his black
death-mask an inconceivably sombre, brooding, and
menacing expression. The lustre of inquiring glance
faded swiftly into vacant glassiness. 'Can you steer?'
I asked the agent eagerly. He looked very dubious; but
I made a grab at his arm, and he understood at once
I meant him to steer whether or no. To tell you the
truth, I was morbidly anxious to change my shoes and
socks. 'He is dead,' murmured the fellow, immensely
impressed. 'No doubt about it,' said I, tugging like
mad at the shoe laces. 'And by the way, I suppose Mr.
Kurtz is dead as well by this time.'
  "For the moment that was the dominant thought.
There was a sense of extreme disappointment, as
though I had found out I had been striving after some-
thing altogether without a substance. I couldn't have
been more disgusted if I had travelled all this way
for the sole purpose of talking with Mr. Kurtz. Talk-
ing with . . . I flung one shoe overboard, and became
aware that that was exactly what I had been looking
forward to -- a talk with Kurtz. I made the strange
discovery that I had never imagined him as doing,
you know, but as discoursing. I didn't say to myself,
'Now I will never see him,' or 'Now I will never shake
him by the hand,' but, 'Now I will never hear him.'
The man presented himself as a voice. Not of course
that I did not connect him with some sort of action.
Hadn't I been told in all the tones of jealousy and
admiration that he had collected, bartered, swindled,
or stolen more ivory than all the other agents to-
gether? That was not the point. The point was in his
being a gifted creature, and that of all his gifts the
one that stood out preeminently, that carried with it
a sense of real presence, was his ability to talk, his
words -- the gift of expression, the bewildering, the
illuminating, the most exalted and the most con-
temptible, the pulsating stream of light, or the deceit-
ful flow from the heart of an impenetrable darkness.
  "The other shoe went flying unto the devil-god of
that river. I thought, 'By Jove! it's all over. We are
too late; he has vanished -- the gift has vanished, by
means of some spear, arrow, or club. I will never hear
that chap speak after all' -- and my sorrow had a star-
tling extravagance of emotion, even such as I had
noticed in the howling sorrow of these savages in the
bush. I couldn't have felt more of lonely desolation
somehow, had I been robbed of a belief or had missed
my destiny in life.... Why do you sigh in this
beastly way, somebody? Absurd? Well, absurd. Good
Lord! mustn't a man ever -- Here, give me some
tobacco."... 
  There was a pause of profourd stillness, then a
match flared, and Marlow's lean face appeared, worn,
hollow, with downward folds and dropped eyelids,
with an aspect of concentrated abtention; and as he
took vigorous draws at his pipe, it seemed to retreat
and advance out of the night in the regular flicker of
tiny flame. The match went out.
  "Absurd!" he cried. "This is the worst of trying to
tell.... Here you all are, each moored with two
good addresses, like a hulk with two anchors, a butcher
round one corner, a policeman round another, excel-
lent appetites, and temperature normal -- you hear --
normal from year's end to year's end. And you say,
Absurd! Absurd be -- exploded! Absurd! My dear
boys, what can you expect from a man who out of
sheer nervousness had just flung overboard a pair of
new shoes! Now I think of it, it is amazing I did not
shed tears. I am, upon the whole, proud of my forti-
tude. I was cut to the quick at the idea of having lost
the inestimable privilege of listening to the gifted
Kurtz. Of course I was wrong. The privilege was
waiting for me. Oh, yes, I heard more than enough.
And I was right, too. A voice. He was very little more
than a voice. And I heard -- him -- it -- this voice -- other
voices -- all of them were so little more than voices --
and the memory of that time itself lingers around me,
impalpable, like a dying vibration of one immense
jabber, silly, atrocious, sordid, savage, or simply mean,
without any kind of sense. Voices, voices -- even the
girl herself -- now --"
  He was silent for a long time.
  "I laid the ghost of his gifts at last with a lie," he
began, suddenly. "Girl! What? Did I mention a girl?
Oh, she is out of it -- completely. They -- the women
I mean -- are out of it -- should be out of it. We must
help them to stay in that beautiful world of their own,
lest ours gets worse. Oh, she had to be out of it. You
should have heard the disinterred body of Mr. Kurtz
saying, 'My Intended.' You would have perceived
directly then how completely she was out of it. And
the lofty frontal bone of Mr. Kurtz! They say the
hair goes on growing sometimes, but this -- ah -- speci-
men, was impressively bald. The wilderness had
patted him on the head, and, behold, it was like a ball
-- an ivory ball; it had caressed him, and -- lo! -- he
had withered; it had taken him, loved him, embraced
him, got into his veins, consumed his flesh, and sealed
his soul to its own by the inconceivable ceremonies of
some devilish initiation. He was its spoiled and pam-
pered favourite. Ivory? I should think so. Heaps of
it, stacks of it. The old mud shanty was bursting with
it. You would think there was not a single tusk left
either above or below the ground in the whole
country. 'Mostly fossil,' the manager had remarked,
disparagingly. It was no more fossil than I am; but
they call it fossil when it is dug up. It appears these
niggers do bury the tusks sometimes -- but evidently
they couldn't bury this parcel deep enough to save the
gifted Mr. Kurtz from his fate. We filled the steam-
boat with it, and had to pile a lot on the deck. Thus
he could see and enjoy as long as he could see, because
the appreciation of this favour had remained with him
to the last. You should have heard him say, 'My
ivory.' Oh, yes, I heard him. 'My Intended, my ivory,
my station, my river, my --' everything belonged
to him. It made me hold my breath in expectation of
hearing the wilderness burst into a prodigious peal
of laughter that would shake the fixed stars in their
places. Everything belonged to him -- but that was a
trifle. The thing was to know what he belonged to,
how many powers of darkness claimed him for their
own. That was the reflection that made you creepy all
over. It was impossible -- it was not good for one either
-- trying to imagine. He had taken a high seat amongst
the devils of the land -- I mean literally. You can't
understand. How could you? -- with solid pavement
under your feet, surrounded by kind neighbours
ready to cheer you or to fall on you, stepping deli-
cately between the butcher and the policeman, in
the holy terror of scandal and gallows and lunatic
asylums -- how can you imagine what particular region
of the first ages a man's untrammelled feet may take
him into by the way of solitude -- utter solitude
without a policeman -- by the way of silence -- utter
silence, where no warning voice of a kind neighbour
can be heard whispering of public opinion? These
little things make all the great difference. When they
are gone you must fall back upon your own innate
strength, upon your own capacity for faithfulness. Of
course you may be too much of a fool to go wrong -- 
too dull even to know you are being assaulted by the
powers of darkness. I take it, no fool ever made a
bargain for his soul with the devil; the fool is too
much of a fool, or the devil too much of a devil
-- I don't know which. Or you may be such a
thunderingly exalted creature as to be altogether
deaf and blind to anything but heavenly sights and
sounds. Then the earth for you is only a standing
place -- and whether to be like this is your loss or
your gain I won't pretend to say. But most of us are
neither one nor the other. The earth for us is a
place to live in, where we must put up with sights,
with sounds, with smells, too, by Jove! -- breathe
dead hippo, so to speak, and not be contaminated. And
there, don't you see? Your strength comes in, the
faith in your ability for the digging of unostentatious
holes to bury the stuff in -- your power of devotion,
not to yourself, but to an obscure back-breaking busi-
ness. And that's difficult enough. Mind, I am not
trying to excuse or even explain -- I am trying to ac-
count to myself for -- for -- Mr. Kurtz -- for the shade
of Mr. Kurtz. This initiated wraith from the back of
Nowhere honoured me with its amazing confidence
before it vanished altogether. This was because it
could speak English to me. The original Kurtz had
been educated partly in England, and -- as he was
good enough to say himself -- his sympathies were in
the right place. His mother was half-English, his
father was half-French. All Europe contributed to
the making of Kurtz; and by and by I learned
that, most appropriately, the International Society
for the Suppression of Savage Customs had intrusted
him with the making of a report, for its future guid-
ance. And he had written it, too. I've seen it. I've
read it. It was eloquent, vibrating with eloquence,
but too high-strung, I think. Seventeen pages of
close writing he had found time for! But this must
have been before his -- let us say -- nerves, went
wrong, and caused him to preside at certain midnight
dances ending with unspeakable rites, which -- as far
as I reluctantly gathered from what I heard at various
times -- were offered up to him -- do you under-
stand? -- to Mr. Kurtz himself. But it was a beautiful
piece of writing. The opening paragraph, however,
in the light of later information, strikes me now as
ominous. He began with the argument that we whites,
from the point of development we had arrived at,
'must necessarily appear to them [savages] in the
nature of supernatural beings -- we approach them
with the might as of a deity,' and so on, and so on. 'By
the simple exercise of our will we can exert a power
for good practically unbounded,' etc., etc. From that
point he soared and took me with him. The peroration
was magnificent, though difficult to remember, you
know. It gave me the notion of an exotic Immensity
ruled by an august Benevolence. It made me tingle
with enthusiasm. This was the unbounded power of
eloquence -- of words -- of burning noble words. There
were no practical hints to interrupt the magic current
of phrases, unless a kind of note at the foot of the last
page, scrawled evidently much later, in an unsteady
hand, may be regarded as the exposition of a method.
It was very simple, and at the end of that moving
appeal to every altruistic sentiment it blazed at you,
luminous and terrifying, like a flash of lightning in a
serene sky: 'Exterminate all the brutes!' The curious
part was that he had apparently forgotten all about
that valuable postscriptum, because, later on, when he
in a sense came to himself, he repeatedly entreated me
to take good care of 'my pamphlet' (he called it), as it
was sure to have in the future a good influence upon
his career. I had full information about all these
things, and, besides, as it turned out, I was to have
the care of his memory. I've done enough for it to
give me the indisputable right to lay it, if I choose,
for an everlasting rest in the dust-bin of progress,
amongst all the sweepings and, figuratively speaking,
all the dead cats of civilization. But then, you see, I
can't choose. He won't be forgotten. Whatever he
was, he was not common. He had the power to charm
or frighten rudimentary souls into an aggravated
witch-dance in his honour; he could also fill the small
souls of the pilgrims with bitter misgivings: he had
one devoted friend at least, and he had conquered one
soul in the world that was neither rudimentary nor
tainted with self-seeking. No; I can't forget him,
though I am not prepared to affirm the fellow was
exactly worth the life we lost in getting to him. I
missed my late helmsman awfully -- I missed him
even while his body was still lying in the pilot-house.
Perhaps you will think it passing strange this regret
for a savage who was no more account than a grain of
sand in a black Sahara. Well, don't you see, he had
done something, he had steered; for months I had
him at my back -- a help -- an instrument. It was a kind
of partnership. He steered for me -- I had to look after
him, I worried about his deficiencies, and thus a subtle
bond had been created, of which I only became aware
when it was suddenly broken. And the intimate pro-
fundity of that look he gave me when he received his
hurt remains to this day in my memory -- like a claim
of distant kinship affirmed in a supreme moment.
  "Poor fool! If he had only left that shutter alone.
He had no restraint, no restraint just like Kurtz -- a
tree swayed by the wind. As soon as I had put on a dry
pair of slippers, I dragged him out, after first jerking
the spear out of his side, which operation I confess I
performed with my eyes shut tight. His heels leaped
together over the little doorstep; his shoulders were
pressed to my breast; I hugged him from behind des-
perately. Oh! he was heavy, heavy; heavier than any
man on earth, I should imagine. Then without more
ado I tipped him overboard. The current snatched
him as though he had been a wisp of grass, and I saw
the body roll over twice before I lost sight of it for
ever. All the pilgrims and the manager were then
congregated on the awning-deck about the pilot-house,
chattering at each other like a flock of excited magpies,
and there was a scandalized murmur at my heartless
promptitude. What they wanted to keep that body
hanging about for I can't guess. Embalm it, maybe.
But I had also heard another, and a very ominous,
murmur on the deck below. My friends the wood-
cutters were likewise scandalized, and with a better
show of reason -- though I admit that the reason itself
was quite inadmissible. Oh, quite! I had made up my
mind that if my late helmsman was to be eaten, the
fishes alone should have him. He had been a very
second-rate helmsman while alive, but now he was
dead he might have become a first-class temptation,
and possibly cause some startling trouble. Besides, I
was anxious to take the wheel, the man in pink py-
jamas showing himself a hopeless duffer at the busi-
ness.
  "This I did directly the simple funeral was over.
We were going half-speed, keeping right in the middle
of the stream, and I listened to the talk about me.
They had given up Kurtz, they had given up the
station; Kurtz was dead, and the station had been
burnt -- and so on -- and so on. The red-haired pilgrim
was beside himself with the thought that at least this
poor Kurtz had been properly avenged. 'Say! We
must have made a glorious slaughter of them in the
bush. Eh? What do you think? Say?' He positively
danced, the bloodthirsty little gingery beggar. And
he had nearly fainted when he saw the wounded man!
I could not help saying, 'You made a glorious lot of
smoke, anyhow.' I had seen, from the way the tops
of the bushes rustled and flew, that almost all the
shots had gone too high. You can't hit anything unless
you take aim and fire from the shoulder; but these
chaps fired from the hip with their eyes shut. The
retreat, I maintained -- and I was right -- was caused
by the screeching of the steam whistle. Upon this
they forgot Kurtz, and began to howl at me with
indignant protests.
  "The manager stood by the wheel murmuring con-
fidentially about the necessity of getting well away
down the river before dark at all events, when I saw
in the distance a clearing on the riverside and the
outlines of some sort of building. 'What's this?' I
asked. He clapped his hands in wonder. 'The station!'
he cried. I edged in at once, still going half-speed.
  "Through my glasses I saw the slope of a hill inter-
spersed with rare trees and perfectly free from under-
growth. A long decaying building on the summit was
half buried in the high grass; the large holes in the
peaked roof gaped black from afar; the jungle and
the woods made a background. There was no en-
closure or fence of any kind; but there had been one
apparently, for near the house half-a-dozen slim posts
remained in a row, roughly trimmed, and with their
upper ends ornamented with round carved balls. The
rails, or whatever there had been between, had dis-
appeared. Of course the forest surrounded all that.
The river-bank was clear, and on the waterside I saw
a white man under a hat like a cartwheel beckoning
persistently with his whole arm. Examining the edge
of the forest above and below, I was almost certain I
could see movements -- human forms gliding here and
there. I steamed past prudently, then stopped the
engines and let her drift down. The man on the shore
began to shout, urging us to land. 'We have been at-
tacked,' screamed the manager. 'I know -- I know. It's
all right,' yelled back the other, as cheerful as you
please. 'Come along. It's all right. I am glad.'
  "His aspect reminded me of something I had seen
-- something funny I had seen somewhere. As I
manoeuvred to get alongside, I was asking myself,
'What does this fellow look like?' Suddenly I got it.
He looked like a harlequin. His clothes had been
made of some stuff that was brown holland probably,
but it was covered with patches all over, with bright
patches, blue, red, and yellow -- patches on the back,
patches on the front, patches on elbows, on knees;
coloured binding around his jacket, scarlet edging at
the bottom of his trousers; and the sunshine made
him look extremely gay and wonderfully neat withal,
because you could see how beautifully all this patching
had been done. A beardless, boyish face, very fair, no
features to speak of, nose peeling, little blue eyes,
smiles and frowns chasing each other over that open
countenance like sunshine and shadow on a wind-
swept plain. 'Look out, captain!' he cried; 'there's a
snag lodged in here last night.' What! Another snag?
I confess I swore shamefully. I had nearly holed my
cripple, to finish off that charming trip. The harlequin
on the bank turned his little pug-nose up to me. 'You
English?' he asked, all smiles. 'Are you?' I shouted
from the wheel. The smiles vanished, and he shook
his head as if sorry for my disappointment. Then he
brightened up. 'Never mind!' he cried encouragingly.
'Are we in time?' I asked. 'He is up there,' he replied,
with a toss of the head up the hill, and becoming
gloomy all of a sudden. His face was like the autumn
sky, overcast one moment and bright the next.
  "When the manager, escorted by the pilgrims, all
of them armed to the teeth, had gone to the house
this chap came on board. 'I say, I don't like this.
These natives are in the bush,' I said. He assured me
earnestly it was all right. 'They are simple people,' he
added; 'well, I am glad you came. It took me all my
time to keep them off.' 'But you said it was all right,'
I cried. 'Oh, they meant no harm,' he said; and as I
stared he corrected himself, 'Not exactly.' Then viva-
ciously, 'My faith, your pilot-house wants a clean-up!'
In the next breath he advised me to keep enough
steam on the boiler to blow the whistle in case of
any trouble. 'One good screech will do more for you
than all your rifles. They are simple people,' he
repeated. He rattled away at such a rate he quite over-
whelmed me. He seemed to be trying to make up for
lots of silence, and actually hinted, laughing, that
such was the case. 'Don't you talk with Mr. Kurtz?' I
said. 'You don't talk with that man -- you listen to him,'
he exclaimed with severe exaltation. 'But now --' He
waved his arm, and in the twinkling of an eye was in
the uttermost depths of despondency. In a moment he
came up again with a jump, possessed himself of both
my hands, shook them continuously, while he
gabbled: 'Brother sailor . . . honour . . . pleasure
. . . delight . . .introduce myself . . . Russian . . .
son of an arch-priest . . . Government of Tambov
. . . What? Tobacco! English tobacco; the excellent
English tobacco! Now, that's brotherly. Smoke?
Where's a sailor that does not smoke?'
  "The pipe soothed him, and gradually I made out
he had run away from school, had gone to sea in a
Russian ship; ran away again; served some time in
English ships; was now reconciled with the arch-
priest. He made a point of that. 'But when one is
young one must see things, gather experience, ideas;
enlarge the mind.' 'Here!' I interrupted. 'You can
never tell! Here I met Mr. Kurtz,' he said, youth
fully solemn and reproachful. I held my tongue after
that. It appears he had persuaded a Dutch trading-
house on the coast to fit him out with stores and goods,
and had started for the interior with a light heart
and no more idea of what would happen to him than
a baby. He had been wandering about that river for
nearly two years alone, cut off from everybody and
everything. 'I am not so young as I look. I am twenty-
five,' he said. 'At first old Van Shuyten would tell me
to go to the devil,' he narrated with keen enjoyment;
'but I stuck to him, and talked and talked, till at last
he got afraid I would talk the hind-leg off his favour-
ite dog, so he gave me some cheap things and a few
guns, and told me he hoped he would never see my
face again. Good old Dutchman, Van Shuyten. I've
sent him one small lot of ivory a year ago, so that he
can't call me a little thief when I get back. I hope he
got it. And for the rest I don't care. I had some wood
stacked for you. That was my old house. Did you see?'
  "I gave him Towson's book. He made as though he
would kiss me, but restrained himself. 'The only book
I had left, and I thought I had lost it,' he said, looking
at it ecstatically. 'So many accidents happen to a man
going about alone, you know. Canoes get upset some-
times -- and sometimes you've got to clear out so quick
when the people get angry.' He thumbed the pages.
'You made notes in Russian?' I asked. He nodded. 'I
thought they were written in cipher,' I said. He
laughed, then became serious. 'I had lots of trouble
to keep these people off,' he said. 'Did they want to
kill you?' I asked. 'Oh, no!' he cried, and checked
himself. 'Why did they attack us?' I pursued. He
hesitated, then said shamefacedly, 'They don't want
him to go.' 'Don't they?' I said curiously. He nodded
a nod full of mystery and wisdom. 'I tell you,' he
cried, 'this man has enlarged my mind.' He opened
his arms wide, staring at me with his little blue eyes
that were perfectly round."

                      III

  "I looked at him, lost in astonishment. There he
was before me, in motley, as though he had absconded
from a troupe of mimes, enthusiastic, fabulous. His
very existence was improbable, inexplicable, and alto-
gether bewildering. He was an insoluble problem. It
was inconceivable how he had existed, how he had
succeeded in getting so far, how he had managed to
remain -- why he did not instantly disappear. 'I went
a little farther,' he said, 'then still a little farther --
till I had gone so far that I don't know how I'll ever
get back. Never mind. Plenty time. I can manage.
You take Kurtz away quick -- quick -- I tell you.' The
glamour of youth enveloped his parti-coloured rags,
his destitution, his loneliness, the essential desolation
of his futile wanderings. For months -- for years -- his
life hadn't been worth a day's purchase; and there he
was gallantly, thoughtlessly alive, to all appearance
indestructible solely by the virtue of his few years and
of his unreflecting audacity. I was seduced into some-
thing like admiration -- like envy. Glamour urged him
on, glamour kept him unscathed. He surely wanted
nothing from the wilderness but space to breathe in
and to push on through. His need was to exist, and to
move onwards at the greatest possible risk, and with
a maximum of privation. If the absolutely pure, un-
calculating, unpractical spirit of adventure had ever
ruled a human being, it ruled this bepatched youth.
I almost envied him the possession of this modest and
clear flame. It seemed to have consumed all thought
of self so completely, that even while he was talking
to you, you forgot that it was he -- the man before
your eyes -- who had gone through these things. I
did not envy him his devotion to Kurtz, though. He
had not meditated over it. It came to him, and he ac-
cepted it with a sort of eager fatalism. I must say that
to me it appeared about the most dangerous thing in
every way he had come upon so far.
  "They had come together unavoidably, like two
ships becalmed near each other, and lay rubbing sides
at last. I suppose Kurtz wanted an audience, because
on a certain occasion, when encamped in the forest,
they had talked all night, or more probably Kurtz
had talked. 'We talked of everything,' he said, quite
transported at the recollection. 'I forgot there was
such a thing as sleep. The night did not seem to last
an hour. Everything! Everything! . . . Of love,
too.' 'Ah, he talked to you of love!' I said, much
amused. 'It isn't what you think,' he cried, almost
passionately. 'It was in general. He made me see
things -- things.'
  "He threw his arms up. We were on deck at the
time, and the headman of my wood cutters, lounging
near by, turned upon him his heavy and glittering
eyes. I looked around, and I don't know why, but I
assure you that never, never before, did this land,
this river, this jungle, the very arch of this blazing
sky, appear to me so hopeless and so dark, so impene-
trable to human thought, so pitiless to human weak-
ness. 'And, ever since, you have been with him, of
course?' I said.
  "On the contrary. It appears their intercourse had
been very much broken by various causes. He had, as
he informed me proudly, managed to nurse Kurtz
through two illnesses (he alluded to it as you would
to some risky feat), but as a rule Kurtz wandered
alone, far in the depths of the forest. 'Very often
coming to this station, I had to wait days and days
before he would turn up,' he said. 'Ah, it was worth
waiting for! -- sometimes.' 'What was he doing? ex-
ploring or what?' I asked. 'Oh, yes, of course', he
had discovered lots of villages, a lake, too -- he did not
know exactly in what direction; it was dangerous to
inquire too much -- but mostly his expeditions had
been for ivory. 'But he had no goods to trade with by
that time,' I objected. 'There's a good lot of cartridges
left even yet,' he answered, looking away. 'To speak
plainly, he raided the country,' I said. He nodded.
'Not alone, surely!' He muttered something about
the villages round that lake. 'Kurtz got the tribe to
follow him, did he?' I suggested. He fidgeted a little.
'They adored him,' he said. The tone of these words
was so extraordinary that I looked at him searchingly.
It was curious to see his mingled eagerness and reluc-
tance to speak of Kurtz. The man filled his life, occu-
pied his thoughts, swayed his emotions. 'What can
you expect?' he burst out; 'he came to them with
thunder and lightning, you know -- and they had never
seen anything like it -- and very terrible. He could be
very terrible. You can't judge Mr. Kurtz as you
would an ordinary man. No, no, no! Now -- just to
give you an idea -- I don't mind telling you, he wanted
to shoot me, too, one day -- but I don't judge him.'
'Shoot you!' I cried 'What for?' 'Well, I had a small
lot of ivory the chief of that village near my house
gave me. You see I used to shoot game for them.
Well, he wanted it, and wouldn't hear reason. He
declared he would shoot me unless I gave him the
ivory and then cleared out of the country, because
he could do so, and had a fancy for it, and there was
nothing on earth to prevent him killing whom he
jolly well pleased. And it was true, too. I gave him
the ivory. What did I care! But I didn't clear out.
No, no. I couldn't leave him. I had to be careful,
of course, till we got friendly again for a time. He
had his second illness then. Afterwards I had to
keep out of the way; but I didn't mind. He was
living for the most part in those villages on the lake.
When he came down to the river, sometimes he would
take to me, and sometimes it was better for me to be
careful. This man suffered too much. He hated all
this, and somehow he couldn't get away. When I had
a chance I begged him to try and leave while there was
time; I offered to go back with him. And he would
say yes, and then he would remain; go off on another
ivory hunt; disappear for weeks; forget himself
amongst these people -- forget himself -- you know.'
'Why! he's mad,' I said. He protested indignantly.
Mr. Kurtz couldn't be mad. If I had heard him talk,
only two days ago, I wouldn't dare hint at such a
thing. . . . I had taken up my binoculars while we
talked, and was looking at the shore, sweeping the
limit of the forest at each side and at the back of the
house. The consciousness of there being people in that
bush, so silent, so quiet -- as silent and quiet as the
ruined house on the hill -- made me uneasy. There was
no sign on the face of nature of this amazing tale that
was not so much told as suggested to me in desolate
exclamations, completed by shrugs, in interrupted
phrases, in hints ending in deep sighs. The woods
were unmoved, like a mask -- heavy, like the closed
door of a prison -- they looked with their air of hidden
knowledge, of patient expectation, of unapproachable
silence. The Russian was explaining to me that it was
only lately that Mr. Kurtz had come down to the
river, bringing along with him all the fighting men
of that lake tribe. He had been absent for several
months -- getting himself adored, I suppose -- and had
come down unexpectedly, with the intention to all
appearance of making a raid either across the river or
down stream. Evidently the appetite for more ivory
had got the better of the -- what shall I say? -- less
material aspirations. However he had got much worse
suddenly. 'I heard he was lying helpless, and so I
came up -- took my chance,' said the Russian. 'Oh, he
is bad, very bad.' I directed my glass to the house.
There were no signs of life, but there was the ruined
roof, the long mud wall peeping above the grass,
with three little square window-holes, no two of the
same size; all this brought within reach of my hand,
as it were. And then I made a brusque movement, and
one of the remaining posts of that vanished fence
leaped up in the field of my glass. You remember I
told you I had been struck at the distance by certain
attempts at ornamentation, rather remarkable in the
ruinous aspect of the place. Now I had suddenly a
nearer view, and its first result was to make me throw
my head back as if before a blow. Then I went care-
fully from post to post with my glass, and I saw my
mistake. These round knobs were not ornamental but
symbolic; they were expressive and puzzling, striking
and disturbing -- food for thought and also for vul-
tures if there had been any looking down from the
sky; but at all events for such ants as were industrious
enough to ascend the pole. They would have been
even more impressive, those heads on the stakes, if
their faces had not been turned to the house. Only
one, the first I had made out, was facing my way. I
was not so shocked as you may think. The start back
I had given was really nothing but a movement of
surprise. I had expected to see a knob of wood there,
you know. I returned deliberately to the first I had
seen -- and there it was, black, dried, sunken, with
dosed eyelids -- a head that seemed to sleep at the top
of that pole, and, with the shrunken dry lips showing
a narrow white line of the teeth, was smiling, too,
smiling continuously at some endless and jocose
dream of that eternal slumber.
  "I am not disclosing any trade secrets. In fact, the
manager said afterwards that Mr. Kurtz's methods
had ruined the district. I have no opinion on that
point, but I want you clearly to understand that there
was nothing exactly profitable in these heads being
there. They only showed that Mr. Kurtz lacked re-
straint in the gratification of his various lusts, that
there was something wanting in him -- some small
matter which, when the pressing need arose, could not
be found under his magnificent eloquence. Whether
he knew of his deficiency himself I can't say. I think
the knowledge came to him at last -- only at the very
last. But the wilderness had found him out early, and
had taken on him a terrible vengeance for the fantastic
invasion. I think it had whispered to him things about
himself which he did not know, things of which he
had no conception till he took counsel with this great
solitude -- and the whisper had proved irresistibly fas-
cinating. It echoed loudly within him because he was
hollow at the core.... I put down the glass, and
the head that had appeared near enough to be spoken
to seemed at once to have leaped away from me into
inaccessible distance.
  "The admirer of Mr. Kurtz was a bit crestfallen. In
a hurried, indistinct voice he began to assure me he had
not dared to take these -- say, symbols -- down. He was
not afraid of the natives; they would not stir till Mr.
Kurtz gave the word. His ascendancy was extraor-
dinary. The camps of the people surrounded the
place, and the chiefs came every day to see him. They
would crawl.... 'I don't want to know anything of
the ceremonies used when approaching Mr. Kurtz,'
I shouted. Curious, this feeling that came over me
that such details would be more intolerable than
those heads drying on the stakes under Mr. Kurtz's
windows. After a]l, that was only a savage sight, while
I seemed at one bound to have been transported into
some lightless region of subtle horrors, where pure,
uncomplicated savagery was a positive relief, being
something that had a right to exist -- obviously -- in the
sunshine. The young man looked at me with surprise.
I suppose it did not occur to him that Mr. Kurtz was
no idol of mine. He forgot I hadn't heard any of these
splendid monologues on, what was it? on love, jus-
tice, conduct of life -- or what not. If it had come to
crawling before Mr. Kurtz, he crawled as much as the
veriest savage of them all. I had no idea of the condi-
tions, he said: these heads were the heads of rebels. I
shocked him excessively by laughing. Rebels! What
would be the next definition I was to hear? There had
been enemies, criminals, workers -- and these were
rebels. Those rebellious heads looked very subdued to
me on their sticks. 'You don't know how such a life
tries a man like Kurtz,' cried Kurtz's last disciple.
'Well, and you?' I said. 'I! I! I am a simple man. I
have no great thoughts. I want nothing from anybody.
How can you compare me to . . . ?' His feelings
were too much for speech, and suddenly he broke
down. 'I don't understand,' he groaned. 'I've been
doing my best to keep him alive, and that's enough.
I had no hand in all this. I have no abilities. There
hasn't been a drop of medicine or a mouthful of in-
valid food for months here. He was shamefully aban-
doned. A man like this, with such ideas. Shamefully!
Shamefully! I -- I -- haven't slept for the last ten
nights . . .'
  "His voice lost itself in the calm of the evening.
The long shadows of the forest had slipped downhill
while we talked, had gone far beyond the ruined
hovel, beyond the symbolic row of stakes. All this
was in the gloom, while we down there were yet in
the sunshine, and the stretch of the river abreast of
the clearing glittered in a still and dazzling splendour,
with a murky and overshadowed bend above and
below. Not a living soul was seen on the shore. The
bushes did not rustle.
  "Suddenly round the corner of the house a group
of men appeared, as though they had come up from
the ground. They waded waist-deep in the grass, in a
compact body, bearing an improvised stretcher in their
midst. Instantly, in the emptiness of the landscape, a
cry arose whose shrillness pierced the still air like a
sharp arrow flying straight to the very heart of the
land; and, as if by enchantment, streams of human
beings -- of naked human beings -- with spears in their
hands, with bows, with shields, with wild glances and
savage movements, were poured into the dearing by
the dark-faced and pensive forest. The bushes shook,
the grass swayed for a time, and then everything
stood still in attentive immobility.
  " 'Now, if he does not say the right thing to them
we are all done for,' said the Russian at my elbow.
The knot of men with the stretcher had stopped, too,
halfway to the steamer, as if petrified. I saw the man
on the stretcher sit up, lank and with an uplifted arm,
above the shoulders of the bearers. 'Let us hope that
the man who can talk so well of love in general will
find some particular reason to spare us this time,' I
said. I resented bitterly the absurd danger of our situ-
ation, as if to be at the mercy of that atrocious phan-
tom had been a dishonouring necessity. I could not
hear a sound, but through my glasses I saw the thin
arm extended commandingly, the lower jaw moving,
the eyes of that apparition shining darkly far in its
bony head that nodded with grotesque jerks. Kurtz --
Kurtz -- that means short in German -- don't it? Well,
the name was as true as everything else in his life --
and death. He looked at least seven feet long. His
covering had fallen off, and his body emerged from it
pitiful and appalling as from a winding-sheet. I could
see the cage of his ribs all astir, the bones of his arm
waving. It was as though an animated image of death
carved out of old ivory had been shaking its hand with
menaces at a motionless crowd of men made of dark
and glittering bronze. I saw him open his mouth wide
-- it gave him a weirdly voracious aspect, as though he
had wanted to swallow all the air, all the earth, all the
men before him. A deep voice reached me faintly. He
must have been shouting. He fell back suddenly. The
stretcher shook as the bearers staggered forward
again, and almost at the same time I noticed that the
crowd of savages was vanishing without any percepti-
ble movement of retreat, as if the forest that had
ejected these beings so suddenly had drawn them in
again as the breath is drawn in a long aspiration.
  "Some of the pilgrims behind the stretcher carried
his arms -- two shot-guns, a heavy rifle, and a light
revolver-carbine -- the thunderbolts of that pitiful
Jupiter. The manager bent over him murmuring as
he walked beside his head. They laid him down in one
of the little cabins -- just a room for a bed place and a
camp-stool or two, you know. We had brought his
belated correspondence, and a lot of torn envelopes
and open letters littered his bed. His hand roamed
feebly amongst these papers. I was struck by the fire
of his eyes and the composed languor of his expres-
sion. It was not so much the exhaustion of disease. He
did not seem in pain. This shadow looked satiated and
calm, as though for the moment it had had its fill of
all the emotions.
  "He rustled one of the letters, and looking straight
in my face said, 'I am glad.' Somebody had been writ-
ing to him about me. These special recommendations
were turning up again. The volume of tone he emitted
without effort, almost without the trouble of moving
his lips, amazed me. A voice! a voice! It was grave,
profound, vibrating, while the man did not seem cap-
able of a whisper. However, he had enough strength
in him -- factitious no doubt -- to very nearly make an
end of us, as you shall hear directly.
  "The manager appeared silently in the doorway; I
stepped out at once and he drew the curtain after me.
The Russian, eyed curiously by the pilgrims, was star-
ing at the shore. I followed the direction of his glance.
  "Dark human shapes could be made out in the dis-
tance, flitting indistinctly against the gloomy border
of the forest, and near the river two bronze figures,
leaning on tall spears, stood in the sunlight under fan-
tastic head-dresses of spotted skins, warlike and still in
statuesque repose. And from right to left along the
lighted shore moved a wild and gorgeous apparition
of a woman.
  "She walked with measured steps, draped in striped
and fringed clothes, treading the earth proudly, with
a slight jingle and flash of barbarous ornaments. She
carried her head high; her hair was done in the shape
of a helmet; she had brass leggings to the knee, brass
wire gauntlets to the elbow, a crimson spot on her
tawny cheek, innumerable necklaces of glass beads on
her neck; bizarre things, charms, gifts of witch-men,
that hung about her, glittered and trembled at every
step. She must have had the value of several elephant
tusks upon her. She was savage and superb, wild-eyed
and magnificent; there was something ominous and
stately in her deliberate progress. And in the hush
that had fallen suddenly upon the whole sorrowful
land, the immense wilderness, the colossal body of the
fecund and mysterious life seemed to look at her,
pensive, as though it had been looking at the image of
its own tenebrous and passionate soul.
  "She came abreast of the steamer, stood still, and
faced us. Her long shadow fell to the water's edge.
Her face had a tragic and fierce aspect of wild sorrow
and of dumb pain mingled with the fear of some
struggling, half-shaped resolve. She stood looking at
us without a stir, and like the wilderness itself, with an
air of brooding over an inscrutable purpose. A whole
minute passed, and then she made a step forward.
There was a low jingle, a glint of yellow metal, a
sway of fringed draperies, and she stopped as if her
heart had failed her. The young fellow by my side
growled. The pilgrims murmured at my back. She
looked at us all as if her life had depended upon the
unswerving steadiness of her glance. Suddenly she
opened her bared arms and threw them up rigid
above her head, as though in an uncontrollable desire
to touch the sky, and at the same time the swift shad-
ows darted out on the earth, swept around on the
river, gathering the steamer into a shadowy embrace.
A formidable silence hung over the scene.
  "She turned away slowly, walked on, following the
bank, and passed into the bushes to the left. Once
only her eyes gleamed back at us in the dusk of the
thickets before she disappeared.
  " 'If she had offered to come aboard I really think
I would have tried to shoot her,' said the man of
patches, nervously. 'I have been risking my life every
day for the last fortnight to keep her out of the house.
She got in one day and kicked up a row about those
miserable rags I picked up in the storeroom to mend
my clothes with. I wasn't decent. At least it must have
been that, for she talked like a fury to Kurtz for an
hour, pointing at me now and then. I don't under-
stand the dialect of this tribe. Luckily for me, I fancy
Kurtz felt too ill that day to care, or there would have
been mischief. I don't understand.... No -- it's too
much for me. Ah, well, it's all over now.'
  "At this moment I heard Kurtz's deep voice behind
the curtain: 'Save me! -- save the ivory, you mean.
Don't tell me. Save me! Why, I've had to save you.
You are interrupting my plans now. Sick! Sick! Not
so sick as you would like to believe. Never mind. I'll
carry my ideas out yet -- I will return. I'll show you
what can be done. You with your little peddling no-
tions -- you are interfering with me. I will return.
I....'
  "The manager came out. He did me the honour to
take me under the arm and lead me aside. 'He is very
low, very low,' he said. He considered it necessary to
sigh, but neglected to be consistently sorrowful. 'We
have done all we could for him -- haven't we? But
there is no disguising the fact, Mr. Kurtz has done
more harm than good to the Company. He did not
see the time was not ripe for vigorous action. Cau-
tiously, cautiously -- that's my principle. We must be
cautious yet. The district is closed to us for a time.
Deplorable! Upon the whole, the trade will suffer.
I don't deny there is a remarkable quantity of ivory --
mostly fossil. We must save it, at all events -- but look
how precarious the position is -- and why? Because the
method is unsound.' 'Do you,' said I, looking at the
shore, 'call it "unsound method?" ' 'Without doubt,'
he exclaimed hotly. 'Don't you?' . . . 'No method at
all,' I murmured after a while. 'Exactly,' he exulted.
'I anticipated this. Shows a complete want of judg-
ment. It is my duty to point it out in the proper quar-
ter.' 'Oh,' said I, 'that fellow -- what's his name? -- the
brickmaker, will make a readable report for you.' He
appeared confounded for a moment. It seemed to me
I had never breathed an atmosphere so vile, and I
turned mentally to Kurtz for relief -- positively for
relief. 'Nevertheless I think Mr. Kurtz is a remark-
able man,' I said with emphasis. He started, dropped
on me a cold heavy glance, said very quietly, 'he was
and turned his back on me. My hour of favour was
over; I found myself lumped along with Kurtz as a
partisan of methods for which the time was not ripe:
I was unsound! Ah! but it was something to have at
least a choice of nightmares.
  "I had turned to the wilderness really, not to Mr.
Kurtz, who, I was ready to admit, was as good as
buried. And for a moment it seemed to me as if I also
were buried in a vast grave full of unspeakable secrets.
I felt an intolerable weight oppressing my breast, the
smell of the damp earth, the unseen presence of vic-
torious corruption, the darkness of an impenetrable
night.... The Russian tapped me on the shoulder.
I heard him mumbling and stammering something
about 'brother seaman -- couldn't conceal -- knowledge
of matters that would affect Mr. Kurtz's reputation.'
I waited. For him evidently Mr. Kurtz was not in his
grave; I suspect that for him Mr. Kuutz was one of
the immortals. 'Well!' said I at last, 'speak out. As it
happens, I am Mr. Kurtz's friend -- in a way.' 
  "He stated with a good deal of formality that had
we not been 'of the same profession,' he would have
kept the matter to himself without regard to conse-
quences. 'He suspected there was an active ill will to-
wards him on the part of these white men that --'
'You are right,' I said, remembering a certain conver-
sation I had overheard. 'The manager thinks you
ought to be hanged.' He showed a concern at this
intelligence which amused me at first. 'I had better
get out of the way quietly,' he said earnestly. 'I can do
no more for Kurtz now, and they would soon find
some excuse. What's to stop them? There's a military
post three hundred miles from here.' 'Well, upon my
word,' said I, 'perhaps you had better go if you have
any friends amongst the savages near by.' 'Plenty,' he
said. 'They are simple people -- and I want nothing,
you know.' He stood biting his lip, then: 'I didn't want
any harm to happen to these whites here, but of course
I was thinking of Mr. Kurtz's reputation -- but you
are a brother seaman and --' 'All right,' said I, after
a time. 'Mr. Kurtz's reputation is safe with me.' I did
not know how truly I spoke.
  "He informed me, lowering his voice, that it was
Kurtz who had ordered the attack to be made on the
steamer. 'He hated sometimes the idea of being taken
away -- and then again.... But I don't understand
these matters. I am a simple man. He thought it
would scare you away -- that you would give it up,
thinking him dead. I could not stop him. Oh, I had an
awful time of it this last month.' 'Very well,' I said.
'He is all right now.' 'Ye-e-es,' he muttered, not very
convinced apparently. 'Thanks,' said I; 'I shall keep
my eyes open.' 'But quiet -- eh?' he urged anxiously.
'It would be awful for his reputation if anybody
here --' I promised a complete discretion with great
gravity. 'I have a canoe and three black fellows wait-
ing not very far. I am off. Could you give me a few
Martini-Henry cartridges?' I could, and did, with
proper secrecy. He helped himself, with a wink at me,
to a handful of my tobacco. 'Between sailors -- you
know -- good English tobacco.' At the door of the
pilot-house he turned round -- 'I say, haven't you a
pair of shoes you could spare?' He raised one leg.
'Look' The soles were tied with knotted strings san-
dalwise under his bare feet. I rooted out an old pair,
at which he looked with admiration before tucking it
under his left arm. One of his pockets (bright red)
was bulging with cartridges, from the other (dark
blue) peeped 'Towson's Inquiry,' ctc., etc. He seemed
to think himself excellently well equipped for a re-
newed encounter with the wilderness. 'Ah! I'll never,
never meet such a man again. You ought to have
heard him recite poetry -- his own, too, it was, he told
me. Poetry!' He rolled his eyes at the recollection of
these delights. 'Oh, he enlarged my mind!' 'Good-
bye,' said I. He shook hands and vanished in the
night. Sometimes I ask myself whether I had ever
really seen him -- whether it was possible to meet such
a phenomenon! . . .
  "When I woke up shortly after midnight his warn-
ing came to my mind with its hint of danger that
seemed, in the starred darkness, real enough to make
me get up for the purpose of having a look round. On
the hill a big fire burned, illuminating fitfully a
crooked corner of the station-house. One of the agents
with a picket of a few of our blacks, armed for the
purpose, was keeping guard over the ivory; but deep
within the forest, red gleams that wavered, that
seemed to sink and rise from the ground amongst
confused columnar shapes of intense blackness, showed
the exact position of the camp where Mr. Kurtz's
adorers were keeping their uneasy vigil. The monoto-
nous beating of a big drum filled the air with muf-
fled shocks and a lingering vibration. A steady
droning sound of many men chanting each to himself
some weird incantation came out from the black, flat
wall of the woods as the humming of bees comes out
of a hive, and had a strange narcotic effect upon my
half-awake senses. I believe I dozed off leaning over
the rail, till an abrupt burst of yells, an overwhelming
outbreak of a pent-up and mysterious frenzy, woke me
up in a bewildered wonder. It was cut short all at
once, and the low droning went on with an effect of
audible and soothing silence. I glanced casually into
the little cabin. A light was burning within, but Mr.
Kurtz was not there.
  "I think I would have raised an outcry if I had
believed my eyes. But I didn't believe them at first --
the thing seemed so impossible. The fact is I was com-
pletely unnerved by a sheer blank fright, pure abstract
terror, unconnected with any distinct shape of physical
danger. What made this emotion so overpowering
was -- how shall I define it? -- the moral shock I re-
ceived, as if something altogether monstrous, intoler-
able to thought and odious to the soul, had been
thrust upon me unexpectedly. This lasted of course
the merest fraction of a second, and then the usual
sense of commonplace, deadly danger, the possibility
of a sudden onslaught and massacre, or something of
the kind, which I saw impending, was positively wel-
come and composing. It pacified me, in fact, so much
that I did not raise an alarm.
  "There was an agent buttoned up inside an ulster
and sleeping on a chair on deck within three feet of
me. The yells had not awakened him; he snored very
slightly; I left him to his slumbers and leaped ashore.
I did not betray Mr. Kurtz -- it was ordered I should
never betray him -- it was written I should be loyal to
the nightmare of my choice. I was anxious to deal
with this shadow by myself alone -- and to this day I
don't know why I was so jealous of sharing with any
one the peculiar blackness of that experience.
  "As soon as I got on the bank I saw a trail -- a broad
trail through the grass. I remember the exultation
with which I said to myself, 'He can't walk -- he is
crawling on all-fours -- I've got him.' The grass was
wet with dew. I strode rapidly with clenched fists. I
fancy I had some vague notion of falling upon him
and giving him a drubbing. I don't know. I had some
imbecile thoughts. The knitting old woman with the
cat obtruded herself upon my memory as a most im-
proper person to be sitting at the other end of such an
affair. I saw a row of pilgrims squirting lead in the air
out of Winchesters held to the hip. I thought I would
never get back to the steamer, and imagined myself
living alone and unarmed in the woods to an advanced
age. Such silly things -- you know. And I remember I
confounded the beat of the drum with the beating of
my heart, and was pleased at its calm regularity.
  "I kept to the track though -- then stopped to listen.
The night was very clear; a dark blue space, sparkling
with dew and starlight, in which black things stood
very still. I thought I could see a kind of motion
ahead of me. I was strangely cocksure of everything
that night. I actually left the track and ran in a wide
semicircle (I verily believe chuckling to myself) so as
to get in front of that stir, of that motion I had seen
-- if indeed I had seen anything. I was circumventing
Kurtz as though it had been a boyish game.
  "I came upon him, and, if he had not heard me
coming, I would have fallen over him, too, but he got
up in time. He rose, unsteady, long, pale, indistinct,
like a vapour exhaled by the earth, and swayed
slightly, misty and silent before me; while at my back
the fires loomed between the trees, and the murmur
of many voices issued from the forest. I had cut him
off cleverly; but when actually confronting him I
seemed to come to my senses, I saw the danger in its
right proportion. It was by no means over yet. Sup-
pose he began to shout? Though he could hardly
stand, there was still plenty of vigour in his voice. 'Go
away -- hide yourself,' he said, in that profound tone.
It was very awful. I glanced back. We were within
thirty yards from the nearest fire. A black figure stood
up, strode on long black legs, waving long black arms,
across the glow. It had horns -- antelope horns, I think
-- on its head. Some sorcerer, some witch-man, no
doubt: it looked fiendlike enough. 'Do you know what
you are doing?' I whispered. 'Perfectly,' he answered,
raising his voice for that single word: it sounded to me
far off and yet loud, like a hail through a speaking-
trumpet. 'If he makes a row we are lost,' I thought to
myself. This clearly was not a case for fisticuffs, even
apart from the very natural aversion I had to beat
that Shadow -- this wandering and tormented thing.
'You will be lost,' I said -- 'utterly lost.' One gets
sometimes such a flash of inspiration, you know. I did
say the right thing, though indeed he could not have
been more irretrievably lost than he was at this very
moment, when the foundations of our intimacy were
being laid -- to endure -- to endure -- even to the end --
even beyond.
  " 'I had irnmense plans,' he muttered irresolutely.
'Yes,' said I; 'but if you try to shout I'll smash your
head with --' There was not a stick or a stone near.
'I will throttle you for good,' I corrected myself. 'I
was on the threshold of great things,' he pleaded, in a
voice of longing, with a wistfulness of tone that made
my blood run cold. 'And now for this stupid scoun-
drel --' 'Your success in Europe is assured in any
case,' I affirmed steadily, I did not want to have the
throttling of him, you understand -- and indeed it
would have been very little use for any practical pur-
pose. I tried to break the spell -- the heavy, mute spell
of the wilderness -- that seemed to draw him to its
pitiless breast by the awakening of forgotten and
brutal instincts, by the memory of gratified and mon-
strous passions. This alone, I was convinced, had
driven him out to the edge of the forest, to the bush,
towards the gleam of fires, the throb of drums, the
drone of weird incantations; this alone had beguiled
his unlawful soul beyond the bounds of permitted
aspirations. And, don't you see, the terror of the posi-
tion was not in being knocked on the head -- though I
had a very lively sense of that danger, too -- but in
this, that I had to deal with a being to whom I could
not appeal in the name of anything high or low. I had,
even like the niggers, to invoke him -- himself -- his
own exalted and incredible degradation. There was
nothing either above or below him, and I knew it. He
had kicked himself loose of the earth. Confound the
man! he had kicked the very earth to pieces. He was
alone, and I before him did not know whether I stood
on the ground or floated in the air. I've been telling
you what we said -- repeating the phrases we pro-
nounced -- but what's the good? They were common
everyday words -- the familiar, vague sounds ex-
changed on every waking day of life. But what of
that? They had behind them, to my mind, the terrific
suggestiveness of words heard in dreams, of phrases
spoken in nightmares. Soul! If anybody ever struggled
with a soul, I am the man. And I wasn't arguing with
a lunatic either. Believe me or not, his intelligence was
perfectly clear concentrated, it is true, upon himself
with horrible intensity, yet clear; and therein was my
only chance -- barring, of course, the killing him there
and then, which wasn't so good, on account of un-
avoidable noise. But his soul was mad. Being alone in
the wilderness, it had looked within itself, and, by
heavens! I tell you, it had gone mad. I had -- for my
sins, I suppose -- to go through the ordeal of looking
into it myself. No eloquence could have been so
withering to one's belief in mankind as his final burst
of sincerity. He struggled with himself, too. I saw it --
I heard it. I saw the inconceivable mystery of a soul
that knew no restraint, no faith, and no fear, yet strug-
gling blindly with itself. I kept my head pretty well;
but when I had him at last stretched on the couch, I
wiped my forehead, while my legs shook under me as
though I had carried half a ton on my back down that
hill. And yet I had only supported him, his bony arm
clasped round my neck -- and he was not much heavier
than a child.
  "When next day we left at noon, the crowd, of
whose presence behind the curtain of trees I had been
acutely conscious all the time, flowed out of the woods
again, filled the clearing, covered the slope with a
mass of naked, breathing, quivering, bronze bodies. I
steamed up a bit, then swung down stream, and two
thousand eyes followed the evolutions of the splash-
ing, thumping, fierce river-demon beating the water
with its terrible tail and breathing black smoke into
the air. In front of the first rank, along the river,
three men, plastered with bright red earth from head
to foot, strutted to and fro restlessly. When we came
abreast again, they faced the river, stamped their feet,
nodded their horned heads, swayed their scarlet bod-
ies; they shook towards the fierce river-demon a
bunch of black feathers, a mangy skin with a pendent
tail -- something that looked like a dried gourd; they
shouted periodically together strings of amazing words
that resembled no sounds of human language; and
the deep murmurs of the crowd, interrupted sud-
denly, were like the responses of some satanic litany.
  "We had carried Kurtz into the pilot-house: there
was more air there. Lying on the couch, he stared
through the open shutter. There was an eddy in the
mass of human bodies, and the woman with helmeted
head and tawny cheeks rushed out to the very brink
of the stream. She put out her hands, shouted some-
thing, and all that wild mob took up the shout in a
roaring chorus of articulated, rapid, breathless ut-
terance.
  " 'Do you understand this?' I asked.
  "He kept on looking out past me with fiery, long-
ing eyes, with a mingled expression of wistfulness and
hate. He made no answer, but I saw a smile, a smile of
indefinable meaning, appearing on his colourless lips
that a moment after twitched convulsively. 'Do I
not?' he said slowly, gasping, as if the words had been
torn out of him by a supernatural power.
  "I pulled the string of the whistle, and I did this
because I saw the pilgrims on deck getting out their
rifles with an air of anticipating a jolly lark. At the
sudden screech there was a movement of abject terror
through that wedged mass of bodies. 'Don't! don't you
frighten them away,' cried some one on deck discon-
solately. I pulled the string time after time. They
broke and ran, they leaped, they crouched, they
swerved, they dodged the flying terror of the sound.
The three red chaps had fallen flat, face down on the
shore, as though they had been shot dead. Only the
barbarous and superb woman did not so much as
flinch, and stretched tragically her bare arms after us
over the sombre and glittering river.
  "And then that imbecile crowd down on the deck
started their little fun, and I could see nothing more
for smoke.


  "The brown current ran swiftly out of the heart of
darkness, bearing us down towards the sea with twice
the speed of our upward progress; and Kurtz's life
was running swiftly, too, ebbing, ebbing out of his
heart into the sea of inexorable time. The manager
was very placid, he had no vital anxieties now, he took
us both in with a comprehensive and satisfied glance:
the 'affair' had come off as well as could be wished. I
saw the time approaching when I would be left alone
of the party of 'unsound method.' The pilgrims
looked upon me with disfavour. I was, so to speak,
numbered with the dead. It is strange how I accepted
this unforeseen partnership, this choice of nightmares
forced upon me in the tenebrous land invaded by
these mean and greedy phantoms.
  "Kurtz discoursed. A voice! a voice! It rang deep to
the very last. It survived his strength to hide in the
magnificent folds of eloquence the barren darkness of
his heart. Oh, he struggled! he struggled! The wastes
of his weary brain were haunted by shadowy images
now -- images of wealth and fame revolving obse-
quiously round his unextinguishable gift of noble and
lofty expression. My Intended, my station, my career,
my ideas -- these were the subjects for the occasional
utterances of elevated sentiments. The shade of the
original Kurtz frequented the bedside of the hollow
sham, whose fate it was to be buried presently in the
mould of primeval earth. But both the diabolic love
and the unearthly hate of the mysteries it had pene-
trated fought for the possession of that soul satiated
with primitive emotions, avid of lying fame, of sham
distinction, of all the appearances of success and power.
  "Sometimes he was contemptibly childish. He de-
sired to have kings meet him at railway-stations on his
return from some ghastly Nowhere, where he in-
tended to accomplish great things. 'You show them
you have in you something that is really profitable,
and then there will be no limits to the recognition of
your ability,' he would say. 'Of course you must take
care of the motives -- right motives -- always.' The
long reaches that were like one and the same reach,
monotonous bends that were exactly alike, slipped
past the steamer with their multitude of secular trees
looking patiently after this grimy fragment of an-
other world, the forerunner of change, of conquest,
of trade, of massacres, of blessings. I looked ahead --
piloting. 'Close the shutter,' said Kurtz suddenly one
day; 'I can't bear to look at this.' I did so. There was
a silence. 'Oh, but I will wring your heart yet!' he
cried at the invisible wilderness.
  "We broke down -- as I had expected -- and had to
lie up for repairs at the head of an island. This delay
was the first thing that shook Kurtz's confidence. One
morning he gave me a packet of papers and a photo-
graph -- the lot tied together with a shoe-string. 'Keep
this for me,' he said. 'This noxious fool' (meaning the
manager) 'is capable of prying into my boxes when I
am not looking.' In the afternoon I saw him. He was
lying on his back with closed eyes, and I withdrew
quietly, but I heard him mutter, 'Live rightly, die, die
. . .' I listened. There was nothing more. Was he
rehearsing some speech in his sleep, or was it a frag-
ment of a phrase from some newspaper article? He
had been writing for the papers and meant to do so
again, 'for the furthering of my ideas. It's a duty.'
  "His was an impenetrable darkness. I looked at him
as you peer down at a man who is lying at the bottom
of a precipice where the sun never shines. But I had
not much time to give him, because I was helping the
engine-driver to take to pieces the leaky cylinders, to
straighten a bent connecting-rod, and in other such
matters. I lived in an infernal mess of rust, filings,
nuts, bolts, spanners, hammers, ratchet drills -- things
I abominate, because I don't get on with them. I
tended the little forge we fortunately had aboard; I
toiled wearily in a wretched scrap-heap -- unless I had
the shakes too bad to stand.
  "One evening coming in with a candle I was star-
tled to hear him say a little tremulously, 'I am lying
here in the dark waiting for death.' The light was
within a foot of his eyes. I forced myself to murmur,
'Oh, nonsense!' and stood over him as if transfixed.
  "Anything approaching the change that came over
his features I have never seen before, and hope never
to see again. Oh, I wasn't touched. I was fascinated.
It was as though a veil had been rent. I saw on that
ivory face the expression of sombre pride, of ruthless
power, of craven terror -- of an intense and hopeless
despair. Did he live his life again in every detail of
desire, temptation, and surrender during that su-
preme moment of complete knowledge? He cried in
a whisper at some image, at some vision -- he cried out
twice, a cry that was no more than a breath:
  " 'The horror! The horror!'
  "I blew the candle out and left the cabin. The pil-
grims were dining in the mess-room, and I took my
place opposite the manager, who lifted his eyes to
give me a questioning glance, which I successfully ig-
nored. He leaned back, serene, with that peculiar
smile of his sealing the unexpressed depths of his
meanness. A continuous shower of small flies streamed
upon the lamp, upon the cloth, upon our hands and
faces. Suddenly the manager's boy put his insolent
black head in the doorway, and said in a tone of scath-
ing contempt:
  " 'Mistah Kurtz -- he dead.'
  "All the pilgrims rushed out to see. I remained,
and went on with my dinner. I believe that I was con-
sidered brutally callous. However, I did not eat much.
There was a lamp in there -- light, don't you know --
and outside it was so beastly, beastly dark. I went no
more near the remarkable man who had pronounced
a judgment upon the adventures of his soul on this
earth. The voice was gone. What else had been there?
But I am of course aware that next day the pilgrims
buried something in a muddy hole.
  "And then they very nearly buried me.
  "However, as you see, I did not go to join Kurtz
there and then. I did not. I remained to dream the
nightmare out to the end, and to show my loyalty to
Kurtz once more. Destiny. My destiny! Droll thing
life is -- that mysterious arrangement of merciless logic
for a futile purpose. The most you can hope from it
is some knowledge of yourself -- that comes too late --
a crop of unextinguishable regrets. I have wrestled
with death. It is the most unexciting contest you can
imagine. It takes place in an impalpable greyness,
with nothing underfoot, with nothing around, without
spectators, without clamour, without glory, without
the great desire of victory, without the great fear of
defeat, in a sickly atmosphere of tepid scepticism,
without much belief in your own right, and still less
in that of your adversary. If such is the form of ulti-
mate wisdom, then life is a greater riddle than some
of us think it to be. I was within a hair's breadth of the
last opportunity for pronouncement, and I found with
humiliation that probably I would have nothing to
say. This is the reason why I affirm that Kurtz was a
remarkable man. He had something to say. He said
it. Since I had peeped over the edge myself, I under-
stand better the meaning of his stare, that could not
see the flame of the candle, but was wide enough to
embrace the whole universe, piercing enough to pene-
trate all the hearts that beat in the darkness. He had
summed up -- he had judged. 'The horror!' He was a
remarkable man. After all, this was the expression of
some sort of belief; it had candour, it had conviction,
it had a vibrating note of revolt in its whisper, it had
the appalling face of a glimpsed truth -- the strange
commingling of desire and hate. And it is not my own
extremity I remember best -- a vision of greyness with-
out form filled with physical pain, and a careless con-
tempt for the evanescence of all things -- even of this
pain itself. No! It is his extremity that I seem to have
lived through. True, he had made that last stride, he
had stepped over the edge, while I had been permit-
ted to draw back my hesitating foot. And perhaps in
this is the whole difference; perhaps all the wisdom,
and all truth, and all sincerity, are just compressed
into that inappreciable moment of time in which we
step over the threshold of the invisible. Perhaps! I
like to think my summing-up would not have been a
word of careless contempt. Better his cry -- much bet-
ter. It was an affirmation, a moral victory paid for by
innumerable defeats, by abominable terrors, by abomi-
nable satisfactions. But it was a victory! That is why I
have remained loyal to Kurtz to the last, and even
beyond, when a long time after I heard once more,
not his own voice, but the echo of his magnificent elo-
quence thrown to me from a soul as translucently pure
as a cliff of crystal.
  "No, they did not bury me, though there is a period
of time which I remember mistily, with a shuddering
wonder, like a passage through some inconceivable
world that had no hope in it and no desire. I found
myself back in the sepulchral city resenting the sight
of people hurrying through the streets to filch a little
money from each other, to devour their infamous
cookery, to gulp their unwholesome beer, to dream
their insignificant and silly dreams. They trespassed
upon my thoughts. They were intruders whose knowl-
edge of life was to me an irritating pretence, because I
felt so sure they could not possibly know the things I
knew. Their bearing, which was simply the bearing of
commonplace individuals going about their business in
the assurance of perfect safety, was offensive to me
like the outrageous flauntings of folly in the face of a
danger it is unable to comprehend. I had no particular
desire to enlighten them, but I had some difficulty in
restraining myself from laughing in their faces so full
of stupid importance. I daresay I was not very well at
that time. I tottered about the streets -- there were
various affairs to settle -- grinning bitterly at perfectly
respectable persons. I admit my behaviour was inex-
cusable, but then my temperature was seldom normal
in these days. My dear aunt's endeavours to 'nurse up
my strength' seemed altogether beside the mark. It
was not my strength that wanted nursing, it was my
imagination that wanted soothing. I kept the bundle
of papers given me by Kurtz, not knowing exactly
what to do with it. His mother had died lately,
watched over, as I was told, by his Intended. A clean-
shaved man, with an official manner and wearing
gold-rimmed spectacles, called on me one day and
made inquiries, at first circuitous, afterwards suavely
pressing, about what he was pleased to denominate
certain 'documents.' I was not surprised, because I had
had two rows with the manager on the subject out
there. I had refused to give up the smallest scrap out
of that package, and I took the same attitude with the
spectacled man. He became darkly menacing at Last,
and with much heat argued that the Company had the
right to every bit of information about its 'territories.'
And said he, 'Mr. Kurtz's knowledge of unexplored
regions must have been necessarily extensive and pe-
culiar -- owing to his great abilities and to the deplor-
able circumstances in which he had been placed:
therefore --' I assured him Mr. Kurtz's knowledge,
however extensive, did not bear upon the problems of
commerce or administration. He invoked then the
name of science. 'It would be an incalculable loss if,'
etc., etc. I offered him the report on the 'Suppression
of Savage Customs,' with the postscriptum torn off.
He took it up eagerly, but ended by sniffing at it with
an air of contempt. 'This is not what we had a right to
expect,' he remarked. 'Expect nothing else,' I said.
'There are only private letters.' He withdrew upon
some threat of legal proceedings, and I saw him no
more; but another fellow, calling himself Kurtz's
cousin, appeared two days later, and was anxious to
hear all the details about his dear relative's last mo-
ments. Incidentally he gave me to understand that
Kurtz had been essentially a great musician. 'There
was the making of an immense success,' said the man,
who was an organist, I believe, with lank grey hair
flowing over a greasy coat-collar. I had no reason to
doubt his statement, and to this day I am unable to
say what was Kurtz's profession, whether he ever had
any -- which was the greatest of his talents. I had taken
him for a painter who wrote for the papers, or else for
a journalist who could paint -- but even the cousin
(who took snuff during the interview) could not tell
me what he had been -- exactly. He was a universal
genius -- on that point I agreed with the old chap, who
thereupon blew his nose noisily into a large cotton
handkerchief and withdrew in senile agitation, bear-
ing off some family letters and memoranda without
importance. Ultimately a journalist anxious to know
something of the fate of his 'dear colleague' turned
up. This visitor informed me Kurtz's proper sphere
ought to have been politics 'on the popular side.' He
had furry straight eyebrows, bristly hair cropped
short, an eyeglass on a broad ribbon, and, becoming
expansive, confessed his opinion that Kurtz really
couldn't write a bit -- 'but heavens! how that man
could talk. He electrified large meetings. He had
faith -- don't you see? -- he had the faith. He could get
himself to believe anything -- anything. He would
have been a splendid leader of an extreme party.'
'What party?' I asked. 'Any party,' answered the
other. 'He was an -- an -- extremist.' Did I not think
so? I assented. Did I know, he asked, with a sudden
flash of curiosity, 'what it was that had induced him
to go out there?' 'Yes,' said I, and forthwith handed
him the famous Report for publication, if he thought
fit. He glanced through it hurriedly, mumbling all
the time, judged 'it would do,' and took himself off
with this plunder.
  "Thus I was left at last with a slim packet of let-
ters and the girl's portrait. She struck me as beautiful
-- I mean she had a beautiful expression. I know that
the sunlight can be made to lie, too, yet one felt that
no manipulation of light and pose could have con-
veyed the delicate shade of truthfulness upon those
features. She seemed ready to listen without mental
reservation, without suspicion, without a thought for
herself. I conclucled I would go and give her back her
portrait and those letters myself. Curiosity? Yes; and
also some other feeling perhaps. All that had been
Kurtz's had passed out of my hands: his soul, his
body, his station, his plans, his ivory, his career. There
remained only his memory and his Intended -- and I
wanted to give that up, too, to the past, in a way -- to
surrender personally all that remained of him with
me to that oblivion which is the last word of our
common fate. I don't defend myself. I had no clear
perception of what it was I really wanted. Perhaps it
was an impulse of unconscious loyalty, or the fulfil-
ment of one of those ironic necessities that lurk in the
facts of human existence. I don't know. I can't tell.
But I went.
  "I thought his memory was like the other memo-
ries of the dead that accumulate in every man's life --
a vague impress on the brain of shadows that had
fallen on it in their swift and final passage; but before
the high and ponderous door, between the tall houses
of a street as still and decorous as a well-kept alley in
a cemetery, I had a vision of him on the stretcher,
opening his mouth voraciously, as if to devour all the
earth with all its mankind. He lived then before me;
he lived as much as he had ever lived -- a shadow in-
satiable of splendid appearances, of frightful realities;
a shadow darker than the shadow of the night, and
draped nobly in the folds of a gorgeous eloquence.
The vision seemed to enter the house with me -- the
stretcher, the phantom-bearers, the wild crowd of
obedient worshippers, the gloom of the forests, the
glitter of the reach between the murky bends, the beat
of the drum, regular and muffled like the beating of a
heart -- the heart of a conquering darkness. It was a
moment of triumph for the wilderness, an invading
and vengeful rush which, it seemed to me, I would
have to keep back alone for the salvation of another
soul. And the memory of what I had heard him say
afar there, with the horned shapes stirring at my back,
in the glow of fires, within the patient woods, those
broken phrases came back to me, were heard again in
their ominous and terrifying simplicity. I remem-
bered his abject pleading, his abject threats, the colos-
sal scale of his vile desires, the meanness, the torment,
the tempestuous anguish of his soul. And later on I
seemed to see his collected languid manner, when he
said one day, 'This lot of ivory now is really mine.
The Company did not pay for it. I collected it myself
at a very great personal risk. I am afraid they will try
to claim it as theirs though. H'm. It is a difficult case.
What do you think I ought to do -- resist? Eh? I want
no more than justice.' . . . He wanted no more than
justice -- no more than justice. I rang the bell before a
mahogany door on the first floor, and while I waited
he seemed to stare at me out of the glassy panel -- stare
with that wide and immense stare embracing, con-
demning, loathing all the universe. I seemed to hear
the whispered cry, 'The horror! The horror! '
  "The dusk was falling. I had to wait in a lofty
drawingroom with three long windows from floor to
ceiling that were like three luminous and bedraped
columns. The bent gilt legs and backs of the furniture
shone in indistinct curves. The tall marble fireplace
had a cold and monumental whiteness. A grand piano
stood massively in a corner; with dark gleams on the
flat surfaces like a sombre and polished sarcophagus.
A high door opened closed I rose.
  "She came forward, all in black, with a pale head,
floating towards me in the dusk. She was in mourning.
It was more than a year since his death, more than a
year since the news came; she seemed as though she
would remember and mourn forever. She took both
my hands in hers and murmured, 'I had heard you
were coming.' I noticed she was not very young -- I
mean not girlish. She had a mature capacity for fidel-
ity, for belief, for suffering. The room seemed to have
grown darker, as if all the sad light of the cloudy eve-
ning had taken refuge on her forehead. This fair hair,
this pale visage, this pure brow, seemed surrounded
by an ashy halo from which the dark eyes looked out
at me. Their glance was guileless, profound, confi-
dent, and trustful. She carried her sorrowful head as
though she were proud of that sorrow, as though she
would say, 'I -- I alone know how to mourn for him
as he deserves.' But while we were still shaking hands,
such a look of awful desolation came upon her face
that I perceived she was one of those creatures that
are not the playthings of Time. For her he had died
only yesterday. And, by Jove! the impression was so
powerful that for me, too, he seemed to have died
only yesterday -- nay, this very minute. I saw her and
him in the same instant of time -- his death and her
sorrow -- I saw her sorrow in the very moment of his
death. Do you understand? I saw them together - I
heard them together. She had said, with a deep catch
of the breath, 'I have survived' while my strained ears
seemed to hear distinctly, mingled with her tone of
despairing regret, the summing up whisper of his
eternal condemnation. I asked myself what I was
doing there, with a sensation of panic in my heart as
though I had blundered into a place of cruel and
absurd mysteries not fit for a human being to behold.
She motioned me to a chair. We sat down. I laid the
packet gently on the little table, and she put her hand
over it.... 'You knew him well,' she murmured,
after a moment of mourning silence.
  " 'Intimacy grows quickly out there,' I said. 'I
knew him as well as it is possible for one man to know
another.'
  " 'And you admired him,' she said. 'It was impos-
sible to know him and not to admire him. Was it?'
  " 'He was a remarkable man,' I said, unsteadily.
Then before the appealing fixity of her gaze, that
seemed to watch for more words on my lips, I went
on, 'It was impossible not to --'
  " 'Love him,' she finished eagerly, silencing me
into an appalled dumbness. 'How true! how truel
But when you think that no one knew him so well as
I! I had all his noble confidence. I knew him best.'
  " 'You knew him best,' I repeated. And perhaps
she did. But with every word spoken the room was
growing darker, and only her forehead, smooth and
white, remained illumined by the unextinguishable
light of belief and love.
  " 'You were his friend,' she went on. 'His friend,'
she repeated, a little louder. 'You must have been, if
he had given you this, and sent you to me. I feel I can
speak to you -- and oh! I must speak. I want you -- you
who have heard his last words -- to know I have been
worthy of him.... It is not pride.... Yes! I am
proud to know I understood him better than any one
on earth -- he told me so himself. And since his mother
died I have had no one -- no one -- to -- to --'
  "I listened. The darkness deepened. I was not even
sure whether he had given me the right bundle. I
rather suspect he wanted me to take care of another
batch of his papers which, after his death, I saw the
manager examining under the lamp. And the girl
talked, easing her pain in the certitude of my sympa-
thy; she talked as thirsty men drink. I had heard that
her engagement with Kurtz had been disapproved by
her people. He wasn't rich enough or something. And
indeed I don't know whether he had not been a pau-
per all his life. He had given me some reason to infer
that it was his impatience of comparative poverty that
drove him out there.
  " '. . . Who was not his friend who had heard him
speak once?' she was saying. 'He drew men towards
him by what was best in them.' She looked at me with
intensity. 'It is the gift of the great,' she went on, and
the sound of her low voice seemed to have the ac-
companiment of all the other sounds, full of mystery,
desolation, and sorrow, I had ever heard -- the ripple
of the river, the soughing of the trees swayed by the
wind, the murmurs of the crowds, the faint ring of
incomprehensible words cried from afar, the whisper
of a voice speaking from beyond the threshold of an
eternal darkness. 'But you have heard him! You
know!' she cried.
  " 'Yes, I know,' I said with something like despair
in my heart, but bowing my head before the faith that
was in her, before that great and saving illusion
that shone with an unearthly glow in the darkness, in
the triumphant darkness from which I could not have
defended her -- from which I could not even defend
myself.
  " 'What a loss to me -- to us!' -- she corrected her-
self with beautiful generosity; then added in a mur-
mur, 'To the world.' By the last gleams of twilight I
could see the glitter of her eyes, full of tears -- of tears
that would not fall.
  " 'I have been very happy -- very fortunate -- very
proud,' she went on. 'Too fortunate. Too happy for a
little while. And now I am unhappy for -- for life.'
  "She stood up; her fair hair seemed to catch all the
remaining light in a glimmer of gold. I rose, too.
  " 'And of all this,' she went on mournfully, 'of all
his promise, and of all his greatness, of his generous
mind, of his noble heart, nothing remains -- nothing
but a memory. You and I --'
  " 'We shall always remember him,' I said hastily.
  " 'No!' she cried. 'It is impossible that all this
should be lost -- that such a life should be sacrificed to
leave nothing -- but sorrow. You know what vast plans
he had. I knew of them, too -- I could not perhaps
understand -- but others knew of them. Something
must remain. His words, at least, have not died.'
  " 'His words will remain,' I said.
  " 'And his example,' she whispered to herself. 'Men
looked up to him -- his goodness shone in every act.
His example --'
  " 'True,' I said; 'his example, too. Yes, his example.
I forgot that.'
  " 'But I do not. I cannot -- I cannot believe -- not
yet. I cannot believe that I shall never see him again,
that nobody will see him again, never, never, never.'
  "She put out her arms as if after a retreating figure,
stretching them back and with clasped pale hands
across the fading and narrow sheen of the window.
Never see him! I saw him clearly enough then. I
shall see this eloquent phantom as long as I live, and
I shall see her, too, a tragic and familiar Shade,
resembling in this gesture another one, tragic also,
and bedecked with powerless charms, stretching bare
brown arms over the glitter of the infernal stream,
the stream of darkness. She said suddenly very low,
'He died as he lived.'
  " 'His end,' said I, with dull anger stirring in me,
'was in every way worthy of his life.'
  " 'And I was not with him,' she murmured. My
anger subsided before a feeling of infinite pity.
  " 'Everything that could be done --' I mumbled.
  " 'Ah, but I believed in him more than any one on
earth -- more than his own mother, more than -- him-
self. He needed me! Me! I would have treasured
every sigh, every word, every sign, every glance.'
  "I felt like a chill grip on my chest. 'Don't,' I said,
in a muffled voice.
  " 'Forgive me. I -- I have mourned so long in
silence -- in silence.... You were with him -- to the
last? I think of his loneliness. Nobody near to under-
stand him as I would have understood. Perhaps no
one to hear....'
  " 'To the very end,' I said, shakily. 'I heard his
very last words....' I stopped in a fright.
  " 'Repeat them,' she murmured in a heart-broken
tone. 'I want -- I want -- something -- something -- to --
to live with.'
  "I was on the point of crying at her, 'Don't you
hear them?' The dusk was repeating them in a per-
sistent whisper all around us, in a whisper that seemed
to swell menacingly like the first whisper of a rising
wind. 'The horror! The horror!'
  " 'His last word -- to live with,' she insisted. 'Don't
you understand I loved him -- I loved him -- I loved
him!'
  "I pulled myself together and spoke slowly.
  "'The last word he pronounced was -- your name.'
  "I heard a light sigh and then my heart stood still,
stopped dead short by an exulting and terrible cry, by
the cry of inconceivable triumph and of unspeakable
pain. 'I knew it -- I was sure!' . . . She knew. She was
sure. I heard her weeping; she had hidden her face
in her hands. It seemed to me that the house would
collapse before I could escape, that the heavens
would fall upon my head. But nothing happened. The
heavens do not fall for such a trifle. Would they have
fallen, I wonder, if I had rendered Kurtz that justice
which was his due? Hadn't he said he wanted only
justice? But I couldn't. I could not tell her. It would
have been too dark -- too dark altogether...."
  Marlow ceased, and sat apart, indistinct and silent,
in the pose of a meditating Buddha. Nobody moved
for a time. "We have lost the first of the ebb," said
the Director suddenly. I raised my head. The offing
was barred by a black bank of clouds, and the tran-
quil waterway leading to the uttermost ends of the
earth flowed sombre under an overcast sky -- seemed
to lead into the heart of an immense darkness.

